Mike,

Following is a west fundies update.  We have not yet produced an abundance of finished product, but several great projects are in the development stage.  These projects are making nice progress even though it may not be visible to the casual observer.

PRODUCTION

This effort is being led by Tori and supported by both Jay and myself.  Gaskill's staff will be providing most of the manpower.  The concept is to design a model which takes a methodical and scientific approach in forecasting: (1) declines of existing production,  (2) increases due to drilling. 

Existing production

Using externally provided production data, we are in the process of dividing production into zones of like characteristics.  Each zone will be identified by: Basin --> Reservoir --> Formation.  Analysis will be done at the zone level to determine its unique depletion curve.  This curve will be extrapolated to forecast future production from existing wells.

New production

From rig count data (or completion data if we buy the more expensive database) we can determine which "zone" a new well is targeting.  Forecasted production can then be determined by applying a recent historical success ratio and the corresponding depletion curve identified in the preceding step.  The difficult component to forecast with great accuracy is future drilling.  Our current thinking is a calculation that considers forward prices, drilling costs (which are increasing since all the "easy wells" have already been drilled), and common required rates of return.

Unresolved

Determining the specific plants which will be affected by depletions and new drilling is an unresolved issue.  The reciepient plant for new drilling may be identified in public records or we may be able to use rig coordinates to determine the closest and most likely plant.  Depletions may be more difficult as I am unsure if the well data can be readily cross-referenced with the corresponding plants.

DEMAND

This effort is being led by Mat Smith and supported by Jason Huang and myself.  Our near-term goals are to refine the existing California model and to develop similar models for the PNW, DSW, and RM.

Jason Wolfe is facilitating data collection and interpretation for the PNW.  I will likely recruit Billianna to follow suit in the DSW.  Jason Huang is moving to Gaskill's group, however, he will still have some involvement in this project.  I still intend on recruiting an individual from the research group, but feel that it is best to have the other regions "framed" (ie: model built) prior to bringing that person aboard.  His role will be to refine our technique and mathematics.

Data collection and interpretation

Much of the needed data is already in place, however some work remains.  Our existing NWPL histories consist of a handfull of compressor flows; demand is calculated by subtracting the downstream flow from the upstream flow.  This "rough"  method works, but the downsides are: (1) this calculated number includes changes in line pack and therfore true demand is hidden; (2) we are forced to break NWPL into arbitrary regions determined by the placement of compressors.  Jason W. is working on collecting flows at every meter on the pipe.  This will afford a much more accurate reading of true demand devoid of linepack changes and significantly better regression analysis will result.  Jason is also looking at a more meaningful way of dividing the pipe into demand zones.

El Paso's system does not provide flows at individual meters, but we have recently discovered that several years of actual flows for pre-determined zones are available.  (Phoenix area, Tucson area, and El Paso City area).  Monique was working on uploading this data into our database.  I think Bilianna can pick up where Monique left off.

An ongoing process will be to drill into the various demand zones to gain a better understanding of specific drivers of that demand.  ie: weather sensitive load, industrial load and related economic factors, etc...

PNW, DSW, and RM regression analsysis

Two hurdles have prevented us from moving forward on this front.  First, the data collection discussed above-- this process should be complete within two weeks.  Second, our intention is to use Portland's power demand forecasts as a variable in our gas demand models.  Mat Smith needs to visit Portland to gain a comprehensive understanding of these load forecasts.  He has a trip scheduled for the end of October.

Provided things go according to plan, we should have "rough" models in place by mid-November.  At that time I will look to bring a research person aboard.

Okay.  We were referring to the phone interview folders that were passed out.  Frank asked me to verify.  

Thank you

Hi Mike,

I have you scheduled for the Trading Track interviews as below.   Frank is also included as is a number of Manager/Director level Traders.    Frank is assisting with some of the Phone screens of the external candidates.

Regards,

Karen.

All,

Please mark you calendars, you  have been selected to participate in the  ENA Trading Track recruiting event Monday, October 29th , 3 pm - 7 pm.     If you are unable to interview on this date please advise.

A selection of you will telephone screen 18 external candidates, and decide whether or not they should proceed to the final round on the above date.    A separate e:mail will be sent in relation to this.

Any questions let me know.

Regards,

Karen 
x54667

MIke,

Attached is the updated summary regarding expansions in the west.  There is only one change - PGT 2003 expansion.  The expansion has now dropped from 230,000 MM/d to 160,000 MM/d due to PPL dropping out.  

Let me know if you need anything else.

Phil

 

We were wondering why Frank Ermis is scheduled for the Trading Track interviews.  Is this correct?  Also, am I not on the list for interviews?  Please let us know.

Thank you,
Mike Grigsby

Sure.  How is 2:30?  Feel free to stop by and we can grab a conference room.

Do you have about 5 minutes this afternoon?  I just want to get your thoughts on a couple of things.

I would like it done on Monday.  Please.

Thanks

Does this need to be done before the move because inventory has already been taken at everyone's desk and it has been requested that no changes are made before we move unless necessary.  If yes, I will have it done beginning of next week and will take care of everything.

-Ina

Please move the box from Janie's desk to Randy's desk as soon as possible.  You will not need Janie's approval.

Thanks,
Mike

Please move the box from Janie's desk to Randy's desk as soon as possible.  You will not need Janie's approval.

Thanks,
Mike

Update below on ground campaign strategy & timing, as well as mounting pressures on Saudi and Pakistani governments. Two reports suggest the ground campaign is underway.   There are also press reports about an anthrax case in NYC--we are investigating and will update as soon as possible.

Call with questions.

RJ
x39934

1.	Afghanistan Ground War Set to Escalate

With a target list thinner than for Kosovo, results from the Afghanistan air campaign five days on have been limited.   But with Taleban fixed defences now softened up, the next phase of search and destroy ground raids, carried out by US and UK special forces and light assault forces, could be imminent.   Insertion will be difficult but various sightings made in recent days suggest to us that the process may have begun.   All our indications are that the US will commit a light division (up to 10,000 troops) and the UK a brigade (about 3,500).   This is a bigger commitment than previously advertised.  More stories along this line may become public over the weekend, even if the Pentagon does not explicitly confirm the action.

Word from Kabul is that Taleban morale is still high and that nightly bombings have prompted some commanders in the Northern Alliance to switch sides, joining the Taleban against the foreign invader.   But outlying Taleban commanders have defected the other way.   There is no clear pattern yet to these changes of allegiance and they may cancel each other out.  And as long as the air strikes remain accurate and clearly targeted against Taleban and bin Laden objectives - which they have been so far - the potential for the Taleban to rally more popular support in Afghanistan seems limited.

When the ground assault starts, from three or four strong points inside Afghanistan, the immediate aim will be to flush out Taleban forces and get them moving so they can be struck from the air.   Such action will be fast and high risk, without much media coverage (with the attendant risk that public support in the US diminishes if the real action is unseen).   If the Taleban can be thus loosened, special forces will then look for Afghans who can take them to the inner core of the Al Qaeda, led by bin Laden and Aymar al Zarawahi.  Depending on how long this takes, there is hope among allied planners that "reasonable elements" in the Taleban regime can be detached to form part of a broad-based coalition to run Afghanistan under supervision.   The Northern Alliance on its own is definitely not the answer.

2.	Saudis Feeling Increased Pressure

Refusal by Crown Prince Abdullah to allow Tony Blair to visit Saudi was only one manifestation of current nervousness in the Kingdom.   The tally of small, isolated violent incidents and attacks on Westerners in the interior is beginning to mount.   We have specific information moreover that leading Saudis who have not in the past paid money into Al Qaeda's coffers are now being 'advised' to do so, on grounds that they will not wish to incur Osama bin Laden's future displeasure.

Washington and London say the motivation for Abdullah's decision was well understood but both believe it was a mistake.  The points which Blair would have raised in public have been made by the British Ambassador in Riyadh to his Saudi hosts privately but it was the symbolism of the Prime Minister meeting with the King and the Crown Prince which London and Washington wanted to see.   Blair was particularly galled by Abdullah's blunt refusal to accept the visit when the two men spoke on the phone, particularly as it was the one blot on his most recent schedule of achievement.

3.	Pakistan Holding Steady- For Now

Popular unrest in Pakistan is real but amplified by media coverage.   Even in Peshawar we are told that 'playing to the cameras' has become a distinct element of the protest.   Musharraf meanwhile, having reshuffled top military and intelligence appointees, maintains both his grip and a wary eye on any signs of a split within his own ranks.  Our assessment is that he is controlling the situation - just.

4.	Key Issue for U.S. and Arab allies- Wider War?

There is also a distinct sense in Washington that major decisions are approaching.   This is not just the imminence of ground troops being deployed in Afghanistan, but the much wider question of the stability of Pakistan, the Gulf including Saudi Arabia, Egypt and Turkey being put in some jeopardy.   Those who have thought through these issues say they are prepared to risk it.   As long as action against terrorism concentrates on Afghanistan, the leaderships of most of these countries believe the situation will remain manageable.   But if it were to spill over, there could be difficulties for these regimes.

thanks

As you guys know the 2003 PGT expansion plans are supposed to be 230,000/day. The landscape of the shippers list is ever changing... Rumors of PPL pulling out 85,000/day to Malin and Stanfield is unconfirmed ( we are trying to validate)... and potentially Avista pulling out as they have been downgraded... they hold 35,000/day in 2003. Combined this is almost half of the planned expansion. 

Although not confirmed the bottom line is as the 03 shippers back out the expansion it becomes compromised and ultimately I believe the 2002 expansion and 2003 expansion start to blend together. As you guys know the 2002 shippers lists of 211,000 / day is made up 2 shippers Calpine 35,000/day and Newport Gen 175,000/day and this expansion has it's own issues.  

As we know more about shippers moving around I will pass on... pls do same.

BT 

Please begin your focus on increasing EOL liquidity as soon as possible.  This is not a long term project.  Lavo will be seeking immediate results.

Thanks,
Mike

Only EOL market makers are allowed to use free loading brokers.  Please do not use brokers for markets outside of your market making responsibility.  I am going to have the back office decline to book all broker deals done by traders outside of their responsibility.

Thanks,
Mike

Please notify HR that we will not be pursuing Jim.  Have them call his executive search rep as well.

Thanks,
Mike

you call HR.  He is not for us either.

We have decided not to pursue Jim.  Do I need to contact HR?  Please let me know.

Mike

We have decided not to pursue Jim.  Do I need to contact HR?  Please let me know.

Mike

Please review MEH presentation and send comments to MEH by 5:00 p.m.  May 12, 
1999 via notes mail.

Thank you,

Sylvia T. Sauseda/MEH

Congrats!    Mark

Don, thanks for the feedback.  I am supposed to meet with Mike G tomorrow and 
I would like to chat with you after that meeting.  Hope things are going 
well.  I will give you a call.  Mark

I would be happy to meet with her, but is unlikely we would be able to 
sponsor a junior lawyer.  It does not work well in our business.  Let me know 
if you want me to talk to her.  Mark

Yes, I would like to go.  Let me know the time.  Mark

Can you cover this?
Barbara Hanlon <BHANLON@isda.org> on 12/02/99 10:55:40 AM
Our next conference call will be held this Friday, December 3rd at 10:00
a.m. New York time.  If you wish to participate, please call 888-391-6741
and give passcode "ISDA ONE" and leader is Rick Grove.

Stacy Carey
Director of U.S. Regulatory Policy

Thanks Justin.

Ok to talk to him, I just don't want to get his expectations up.  Mark

Thanks.

Gay:

It is nice to hear from you.  I hope things are going well.   Merry Christmas!

Mark

Let's talk about it, but some sort of a consulting role seems appropriate.  I 
guess it would be less hands on than usual.    Mark

Thanks for the update.  Mark

Alison:

I think the energy panel at the AGM on March 17, 2000 in Amsterdam should 
discuss (i) development of energy trading on the continent, (ii) energy 
documentation issues and (iii) regulatory barriers to energy trading.  This 
is a great time to do a panel on energy trading in Europe!  I will copy Paul 
and Justin in London to get their ideas on both topics and panel members.  
Perhaps we can have a conference call next week.

Mark

1.  Enron Online Trading -- organized a legal team and solved enforceability 
and documentation issues around the world in a few short months for all the 
commodities traded by Enron.

   2.  Developing New Businesses -- major contributions in developing and 
structuring coal, insurance, band-width and power plant transactions.  The 
groundwork has been laid to develop very profitable businesses in each of 
these areas.

   3.  Aggressive Pursuit of Litigation Claims as a Plaintiff -- pursued 
Carolina Power & Light , Shell/Meridian, TVA, Ft. James and many others.  
Most have already settled with excellent results.  Successfully defended 
Wolfschlager, the last Panhandle case and Jolen. 

   4.  Lead Power Industry to Develop Master Power Agreement -- ENA lead the 
Edison Electric Institute coalition in developing  the first master power 
agreement.  ENA will benefit greatly in terms of dramatically lower 
transaction costs and greater liquidity.

   5.  Reduced Legal Costs as Percentage of Earnings -- brought overall legal 
costs to less than 6% of EBIT in 1999, down from 8% in 1998, despite the 
upsurge in origination activity.

   6.  Brought Finance and Corporate Legal Talent to Origination Deals -- as 
the origination work expanded dramatically and became much more complex, 
brought in more sophisticated legal talent to deals like UI and Peoples with 
great success.

   7.  New Concept to Better Manage and Communicate Legal Risks -- developed 
the legal risk book concept to highlight where the largest buckets of legal 
risks were and where efforts should be focused.

Please try to schedule a call with Justin and Paul in London and  Alison at 
ISDA over the next week or so.  Mark
Alison Smythe <ASMYTHE@isda.org> on 12/08/99 08:08:05 AM
Dear Mark,

Thank you for your suggested topics.  I will forward your e-mail on to Susan
Hinko as I understand she will be working on this panel with you.  I would
be happy to arrange a conference call for sometime next week.  Please advise
on who should participate on the call and I can issue an e-mail requesting
the participants availability.

Until we have the conference call, I will amend the agenda to include your
suggested topics below.  Once we determine who should participate on the
call, I will circulate the agenda to all conference call participants.  I
agree that it will be a good time to have an Energy Derivatives panel in
Europe during the AGM as I understand there has been a lot of activity in
this market in Europe.

By the way, I understand that Sylvia contacted our office regarding the
dates for Strategic Planning in 2000.  Strategic Planning is scheduled for
Wednesday, June 7 through Friday, June 9 at the Sonoma Mission Inn & Spa in
Sonoma, California.  Please mark your calendar.  The Board Meeting during
the AGM will be held on Wednesday, March 15 and Thursday, March 16 during
lunch on each day.

Please let me know about scheduling a conference call by Friday, December
10.

I look forward to hearing from you and best regards,
Alison Smythe

Alison:

I think the energy panel at the AGM on March 17, 2000 in Amsterdam should
discuss (i) development of energy trading on the continent, (ii) energy
documentation issues and (iii) regulatory barriers to energy trading.  This
is a great time to do a panel on energy trading in Europe!  I will copy Paul
and Justin in London to get their ideas on both topics and panel members.
Perhaps we can have a conference call next week.

Mark

MIchael:

I will be over for the ISDA board meeting on January 25 and 26.  With the 
launch of the credit derivatives business, I think it would be a good time to 
do a brief Securities Law/Chinese Wall seminar relating to the credit 
business.  I would propose to review the rules we have instituted in NA and 
particular issues in the European market.  My preference on timing is in the 
morning on the 26th, and second, in the afternoon on the 25th.  Please give 
your thoughts on this.  Take care.

Mark 

FYI, we need to talk about a presentation in the London office on Chinese 
walls.  Mark
Michael R Brown
12/07/99 01:08 PM
FYI
Michael

	Enron Europe
	

Sent by: Enron Europe General Announcement
We are pleased to announce the formation of the Credit Markets Group which is 
responsible for developing innovative products to better manage the risk of 
our internal credit portfolio as well as, looking  for opportunities to 
provide third party credit protection.  Initially, we will be making markets 
in bankruptcy protection on reference credits which are currently in our 
portfolio but we expect to add additional credit products and reference 
credits very quickly.

The team will utilise EnronOnline as its primary trade execution tool, 
looking to quickly build market share by capturing the eyes of our current 
counterparts.  Simultaneously,  we will launch an external web site focused 
on credit protection where potential customers will have access to real time 
prices and filter on specific reference credits as well as, access to credit 
models and research papers on effective credit risk management.  Utilising 
e-commerce business principles, we expect to aggressively claim the space for 
corporate credit protection.  We expect to make a public announcement about 
these new products in late January.

In order to effectively access the global market for credit protection, the 
group will be based in London with an initial local desk set up in Houston as 
well.  Bryan Seyfried will be transitioning out of RAC, where he was 
responsible for the Trading Controls and Research teams in Europe, to lead 
the group and he will report to me.

Thanks for the comments.  I will make sure Tana gets taken care of.  Mark

Please put this on my calender.
Barbara Hanlon <BHANLON@isda.org> on 12/08/99 10:56:40 AM
Our next conference call will be held this Friday, December 10th at 10:00
a.m. New York time.  If you wish to participate, please call 888-282-0360
and give passcode "ISDA ONE" and leader is Stacy Carey.

Stacy Carey
Director of U.S. Regulatory Policy

John:

I will get on your calender in January when I am over.  It is also my 
understanding, for the credit trading business you are developing, that 
Chinese walls are not necessary.  But it will be necesary to address if 
equity trading starts up.  Also, there are probably related issues, like 
restricted lists and the like, that could apply to credit trading.  Hope you 
have time to enjoy the Holidays.  Take care.   

please respond
2:30 does not seem to work for December 17.  Please let me know if you are 
available at 11:30.  Thanks.

Michael:

I think it is an excellent idea to keep count of the number of ISDAs we have 
as a way of focusing attention on our progress.  I think it may be a good 
idea to get a paralegal secondee from A&O or Linklaiters.  That secondee 
could then help with overflow work after a return to the firm.

Mark 

Robert, have you been able to get Alan's comments?    Mark

I have noticed it!   Mark

This was the right Monday, so next Monday was the OGC anyway.  Mark

Let me know if there is anything else I need to do right now.  I would think 
we would want to set up a conference call as soon as we have identified all 
the panel members.  Take care.  Mark

Please prepare this letter for Cliff's signature.  Mark
Richard B Sanders
12/15/99 12:05 PM
Sent by: Twanda Sweet
Here is a draft of the letter to Fort James.  Please let me know what you 
think.

I have listed a few pertinent facts about Jeff for your upcoming meeting.  
Let me know if you need more information.

1.   Jeff joined ENA Legal on September 1, 1993.  His title is currently 
Assistant General Counsel.

2.   Jeff leads a group in the legal department that focuses on physical 
trading.  Jeff spends most of his time on structured deals like Brooklyn 
Union and physical gas trading.  He also has lead the legal team on 
acquisition deals such as Columbia Energy Services.  He has a strong work 
ethic and an excellent record in closing important transactions.  

3.   He has good legal judgment and is described by his clients as a 
knowledgeable and practical trading lawyer.

4.   Jeff has consistently ranked "excellent" in the performance review 
process.

John, I can make it on this coming Tuesday.  Mark

Anita:

Thanks for your note.  You made a great contribution to the Singapore office 
and I thank you for that.  Have a happy new year!

Mark Haedicke

Gareth:  Thanks for that note.  Have a happy new year!    Mark Haedicke

Ernest:

Happy New Year!  Is it too late to call on behalf of your wife?  I was 
swamped in December and never got to it.  Let me know.  

Take care.

Mark

Ken:

This looks fine to me.  Where do we go from here?

Mark

Thanks for the memo.

Regards,

Mark

FYI
Corrinne Greasley <CGREASLEY@isda.org> on 01/06/2000 02:17:07 PM
Dear Members of the Board:

The dinner for the Board of Directors will take place on January 26, 2000,
at 6:45pm (following the Board Meeting) at the restaurant listed below:

Quaglino's
16 Bury Street
London SW1Y 6AL
Phone: 171 930 6767

Quaglino's comes highly recommended by our resident restaurant critics so
the evening promises to be an enjoyable one.  Please confirm your attendance
by return e-mail if you have not already done so.

Thanks
Corrinne

The name does not sound familiar to me.  Mark

Please give me an update so we can get this done.  Mark
Robert Pickel <RPICKEL@isda.org> on 01/06/2000 05:19:26 PM
Mark:

Happy new year. I hope your new year was eventful on the personal side and
uneventful on the business side.

As you will have seen from my e-mail earlier this week, we are very close to
final on the Supplement. We just have a couple of firms to hear from and we
are chasing them down. One of those is Enron, which you recall took on the
responsibility for the various commodities that no one else volunteered for
(benzene & methanol). Can you check up on the status of the review?

Thanks.

Bob

Happy New Year!  Thanks for the message.  I will check on this asap.  Mark

By copy of this message, I ask Janette to help Mark out with his request.  
Please have Mark stop by.   

Mark

FYI
Sheila Walton
01/07/2000 01:22 PM
I have attached a planning schedule that I will be following in HR for the 
1999 Bonuses and 2000 Merits.  Please remember that this schedule depends on 
several parties so some deviations may occur.  I have also attached some 
basic questions and answers that many employees ask.  Please call me at Ext 
30649 or my assistant Irma at Ext 31543 if you have any questions or 
concerns.  Also, I will ask you to pass this information to any of your 
direct reports which may need it.  

    

 I hope it comes true!  Mark

Calpine was going to take assignment of a contract with LCRA and backed out 
on the agreement.  We can talk about it more when I am in Portland on Tuesday 
and Wednesday.  Take care.

Mark

I will bring some to London as you requested.  See you soon.

Regards,

Mark

FYI
teruo.tanaka@ibjbank.co.jp on 01/21/2000 06:27:20 PM
Dear Mark,

We, at IBJ, started working on developing Japanese language confirms of
weather- and energy derivatives. We would like to make them as identical
to the standard document adopted by the market makers like yourselves as
possible.

I would appreciate if you could bring some of your standard form
confirms with you to London, although most of them would look exotic
enough to our traders.

Thank you in advance and see you next week.

Regards

Terry

Thanks for the info!  Mark

Bob:
I am fine with your proposed endorsement language.  It was great to see you 
last week! 

Mark

OK

I am working on a plan to increase our bench strength in trading.  Wtih 
bandwidth, EOL etc., I think recruiting additional lawyers to do trading 
legal work is critical.  I will give you and Michael a call over the next 
week or so.  

Take care.

Mark

My e-mail address is changed to mark.e.haedicke.enron.com

Julie, great to have you back!    Mark

Mary, by copy of this e-mail, I am asking Justin how big a presence National 
Power is in energy trading.  It seems to me National Power is more analogous 
to a dealer than a subscriber.

Mark

How big a presence is National Power in the market?  Are they analogous to a 
dealer?   Mark
Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org> on 02/11/2000 04:57:40 PM
We have received applications for membership from the following five
institutions.  They will go for approval at the next Executive Committee
meeting on Wednesday, February 23.

Please let me know if you know International Financial Systems, Prudential
Banking or HBK Investment.

Thanks,
Mary

Associate:
1.  International Financial Systems - a software company.  System is known
as MarginMan and clients include ABN Amro, Deutsche and Dresdner

Non-Dealer Subscriber:
2.  Prudential Banking PLC - a UK retail bank
3.  Britannia Building Society

Subscriber:
4.  National Power PLC - power/energy gerneration and supplier
5.  HBK Investments L.P. - a hedge fund headquartered in Dallas.  Was formed
in 1991 by Harlan B. Korenvaes, a former Managing Director in the equity
division at Merrill Lynch

Welcome!  Please stop by.  Mark

Let's talk about it.  Mark

I will be in Tokyo next week working on the start-up of energy trading in 
Japan for Enron.  I would like to book time on your respective schedules to 
meet on Wednesday afternoon.  I have some flexibility in my schedule if that 
does not work for you.  I will be in Tokyo on Thursday and Friday too.  Look 
foward to hearing from you.

Mark Haedicke

Having dealt wih Manfred on a number of matters I have to say I am not 
surprised.  Scott, please get personally involved in selecting a Punder 
lawyer that will take his place in meetings with customers and regulators.  I 
don't want to lose control of legal to John T in Germany.  Let's hire a 
lawyer on the ground if we need to.  Let me know.  Thanks.  Mark

Do we want to talk to him again?  If yes, Jeff, please give him a call.   Mark
 <<191#01!.DOC>>
Mark:

As you may recall, I interviewed with you in the fall of 1997.  I ended up
accepting an offer from Koch before going through the last round of
interviews (4th)  with Enron.

Over the past 2+ years, I have been the only power attorney at Koch.  Among
other functions, I have supported the power trading operations, the power
project development operations, and Koch's retail power accounts.  The work
has been challenging, exhilarating and at times overwhelming from a work
load perspective.  I truly love my job.  While I cannot complain about the
job experience, Koch as a company leaves much to be desired.

I would love to work for such an innovative company as Enron; your company
sets the standard in our industry.  I would love to talk to you about any
potential employment opportunities with Enron.  Please contact me if you
think I could bring value to you and Enron.

Sincerely,

Tim Beverick, Attorney
Koch Legal Services - Houston
* 713/544-5123
*     713/544-5544 or 7336
* BevericT@kochind.com

 - 191#01!.DOC

Sorry, I can't make it.  Mark

Thanks for your note.  I think it is easiest to contact Julia Murray and 
Lance Schuler.  Please call me at any time.

Mark

Mary:  I think National Power should be more than a subscriber member.  Mark
Justin Boyd
02/15/2000 04:39 AM
Mark,

Yes, National Power is one of two largest UK power generators.  They also 
have a significant gas presence (i.e., a top 15 player in the UK gas market).

Justin

   

How big a presence is National Power in the market?  Are they analogous to a 
dealer?   Mark
Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org> on 02/11/2000 04:57:40 PM
We have received applications for membership from the following five
institutions.  They will go for approval at the next Executive Committee
meeting on Wednesday, February 23.

Please let me know if you know International Financial Systems, Prudential
Banking or HBK Investment.

Thanks,
Mary

Associate:
1.  International Financial Systems - a software company.  System is known
as MarginMan and clients include ABN Amro, Deutsche and Dresdner

Non-Dealer Subscriber:
2.  Prudential Banking PLC - a UK retail bank
3.  Britannia Building Society

Subscriber:
4.  National Power PLC - power/energy gerneration and supplier
5.  HBK Investments L.P. - a hedge fund headquartered in Dallas.  Was formed
in 1991 by Harlan B. Korenvaes, a former Managing Director in the equity
division at Merrill Lynch

Dear Terry:

Thanks for your quick reply.  Wednesday at 2 PM works for me.  I would be 
happy to come to IBJ's offices.  I will be joined by two others on our team.  
I would propose to discuss the prospects and challenges for energy trading in 
Japan.  Let me know if this is OK with you.   Look foward to seeing you.

Regards,

Mark

Richard:  Looks good with one change:  please delete the reference to honesty 
-- it's a little too tough.  Mark

Martin:

Thanks for the update.  It sounds overall like the direction will not be 
negative to our business in any material way.  Is that correct?  How is the 
weather?

Mark

Alan, have you looked at these opinions for Japan, Korea or Singapore?  Are 
they helpful?  Let me know.  Mark
Corrinne Greasley <CGREASLEY@isda.org> on 02/15/2000 05:03:14 PM
Legal Opinion Contacts:

In the interest of fulfilling ISDA members requests for the prompt delivery
of its legal opinions the latest volume of opinions is available in PDF file
format.  This electronic format should allow Legal Opinion Contacts to
distribute copies to other persons within their organizations more easily.
Only bound copies of the opinions will be distributed by post.  A free copy
of Adobe Acrobat Reader, which launches the PDF file format program, can be
obtained from the following Adobe web site:
http://www.adobe.com/products/acrobat/readstep.html.

A copy of the update legal opinion discussing the enforceability of the
termination, bilateral close-out netting and multibranch close-out netting
provisions of the 1987 and 1992 ISDA Master Agreements for Australia  can be
obtained from the ISDA website at the following address:
http://www.isda.org/lo2000/ausupdate.pdf     This document is password
protected and can be accessed by typing in the following password: AU718914.

Also available from the ISDA web site are the 1999 legal opinion updates for
the following 31 jurisdictions:

Austria  Belgium  Bermuda   Canada  Cayman
Islands
Denmark England  Finland  France  Hong Kong
Ireland  Italy   Japan  Luxembourg
Malaysia
Netherlands  Netherlands Antilles New Zealand Norway
Philippines
Portugal Scotland  Singapore South Africa
South Korea
Spain   Sweden   Switzerland Taiwan
Thailand
United States

This document from the ISDA web site at the following address:
http://www.isda.org/lo2000/netupdate.pdf   This document is
password-protected and can be accessed by entering the following password:
NU718914.

Please note that both the revised opinion for Australia and the netting
opinion updates will be available on the ISDA web site for one week.  The
opinions will be removed from the web site on Tuesday, February 22, 2000 at
5:00pm New York time.

Members are reminded that the ISDA legal opinions are intended for use by
ISDA members only .

We have recently given Primary Contacts at our member firms the option of
directing the legal opinions to a different individual at the firm. In the
past the opinions were automatically sent to the Primary Contact even though
another person at the institution may have been most interested in the
opinions. For this reason, going forward the opinions and updates will be
sent to the Legal Opinion Contacts at our member institutions. Where a Legal
Opinion Contact was not designated by an institution, the Primary Contact
will continue to receive the opinions and updates.

Regional and Documentation Contacts have been notified that this volume of
opinions has been distributed and of its availability from Legal Opinion
Contacts electronically.

ISDA is pleased to provide this new opinion delivery service to its members
and we welcome any comments or questions you may have. If you encounter any
problems accessing the documents from the ISDA web site please contact us by
return e-mail or by telephone on 212 332 1200.

Regards
Robert Pickel
General Counsel

Bill:

Let's try to get together today or tomorrow.  I will be out next week.  Also, 
give Lance a call and get on his schedule.  Look foward to seeing you.

Mark

It is my understanding that it is ok with Jim and Elizabeth if Janette 
attends and works at the conference.  If that is correct, I am ok with her 
attending.  Mark

KMM:

I believe MEH needs a photo for HBA Pictorial.

sts

Terry:

We are meeting our accounting firm for lunch so we are not available.  Thanks 
anyway.  The address I have for IBJ is 1-3-3 Marunouchi, Chiyoda-ku.  Is that 
the correct address of your office?  Let me know.

Regards,

Mark

Travis, could you please spend a few minutes on this and respond to Steve 
Wallace?  Thanks.  Mark
Stephen Wallace@ENRON
02/17/2000 05:40 PM
Mark,

In a week or so Enron Global Exploration & Production will make a pitch to 
Korea National Oil Corporation amounting to a comprehensive proposal to 
provide various oil- and gas-field services to KNOC, plus offer the 
opportunity to provide financing, risk management and other Enron-type 
things.  (Our dealings with KNOC are so far highly confidential.)

Cedric Burgher, the CFO of Enron Global E&P, has, in the message below, 
sought my help with language to make the financing pitch as strong as 
possible but at the same time not binding on Enron.

Can you look at this and offer any comments or suggestions, or have someone 
in the legal group of ENA respond?  I would really appreciate it.

Thanks.
Stephen Wallace.

Cedric Burgher
02/17/2000 04:41 PM
Stephen,

As we discussed, it would be helpful to contact an attorney in ENA to lift 
"invester banker" like language to insert in our initial term sheet for 
KNOC.  The following is an approximation of what I have in mind.

"If desired by KNOC and subject to prevailing market conditions, Enron will 
use its best efforts to structure, advise, arrange, underwrite, syndicate, 
and/or provide the capital necessary to complete the project."

I'm sure the ENA guys have better language than this from some of their pitch 
books, but hopefully you see what I'm looking for with my first cut.  From a 
marketing perspective, we would like this to be as strong and attractive as 
possible from a KNOC perspective, and still provide us outs to make the 
"offer" non-binding.

Cedric

Joe:

I think there are several positive things to point out.  ISDA is opening an 
office in Japan as of April 13.  They have already hired one person and are 
looking for addtional people.  More importantly, Goldman moved one of its top 
traders worldwide, Tom Montag, from London to Tokyo and is generally beefing 
up the resources in Japan.  IBJ has contacted me about energy trading and 
asked for copies of confirms and says there is growing interest in the market 
place.  That's all I can think of for now.

Take care,

Mark

next time!  

Paul:

Thanks so much for your help.  I think the legal team you have made available 
to us is very impressive.  I look foward to our success in Japan.  I have 
authored many articles on trading in markets around the world.  Would anyone 
in your shop like to work with me on energy trading  and documentation in 
Japan?

Mark 

Mark:

I will be in Amsterdam for the ISDA board meeting on March 15 and 16.  I 
would like to get an update on the APX before leaving for Amsterdam.  For 
example, do we think it will be successful?  What kind of volume is trading?  
Also, I wanted to get your recommendation on what law firms or maybe the APX 
that I should visit while I am there.  Hope things are going well.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

I am sorry for ISDA that Mark Harding cannot run for Chairman again.  I will 
give you a call.  Is Montag willing to do it?

Seth:

I thought last week was very productive.  I appreciated your help.  The ISDA 
office in Tokyo is set to open officially on April 13, 2000.   Yasuko Horibe, 
who is currently in the ISDA office in NYC at 212-332-1271 is planning on 
moving to Japan to open the office.  Give her a call and get more details.  
Get back to me if you don't get the info you need.   

Rgards,

Mark 

Per our conversations.  Give me a call.    Mark

Mark, give me a call.  Mark

No, but I am ok with it.  She is doing a great job.   Mark

Please provide your comments to me as soon as you can.  The most important 
thing at this point is to make sure I have the business correctly described.  
I am working on the letter of intent now.  We will have to decide how 
detailed you want the term sheet and loi.  I would think you would want it 
fairly general for your first few meetings until we get feedback.  Let me 
know.

Mark

There is a proposal to have a meeting of the head traders of Enron, Reliant, 
Sempra, Coral, Duke, Southern, Dynergy and El Paso.  The idea would be to 
talk about e-commerce in the energy business.  Specifically, Enron might 
propose standardization of our masters, start-up of a clearing house for 
energy trading, electronic mechanism for confirmations, opening EOL to other 
companies to post bids and offers, and discuss electronic protocols for 
transactions with other energy companies to reduce costs.  We would probably 
discuss the state of regulatory restrictions under the CEA.

What are the anti-trust issues for such a meeting?
What are the appropriate parameters for such meeting?
Should legal counsel be in attendance?
Would it be best to make invitations through a formal letter?

Jeff, please review and let's talk about it.  Mark
Martin Rosell
03/06/2000 06:21 AM
Michael, sorry for missing this morning's staff meeting.  FYI, please find 
attached below a draft of the Oslo review presentation as discussed earlier.

Martin
Jan-Erland Bekeng
2000-03-06 10:55
Jan-Erland Bekeng
02/03/2000 09:04
FYI

Nick Swingler
01/03/2000 18:05
Thor

Please find attached the latest Oslo review presentation as discussed  with 
Brent earlier today.

Regards

Nic

Mark Haedicke requested I forward the attached drawing.

Thanks, please work with Travis as I asked to take the lead on developing the 
conference.  Mark

Thanks for the feedback.  Mark

I think we need coordination on all plant matters.  Mark

Talk to Janette and let's get a few other people.  Mark

Paul:

I think we should have a brief meeting of you and me and Lance Schuler to 
plan out a strategy and then direct Raisler.  Let me know if this sounds ok 
to you.   What do you think is driving the change of mind?

Regards,

Mark

Seth:

There is a new senior person that was just hired in Japan to be the head of 
the office.  You should find out that person's name and try to meet with that 
person in Japan as soon as you can.  I think Enron should try to steer one of 
the committees to focus on energy regulatory matters in a material way.  I am 
not sure what committtee that would be at this point.  I think you should 
have this conversation with the senior person and I will work on it at the 
board level.  

Let's keep comparing notes.

Regards,

Mark

John, thanks for the feedback on Mark and Scott.    

Regards,

Mark

I am ok with all the changes except the deletion of the last sentence in 
paragraph 1.  I don't understand why Abitibi-Consolidated deleted that 
sentence.

Mark

Tim:

I am preparing a list of the pluses and minuses for the three main 
alternatives of Settlement, Hearing and FERC.  I think it will be helpful to 
channel the discussion.  I will send it to you later today.

Mark

In the attached chart, I have listed our three main options, and the pluses 
and minuses, from my point of view, of each option.  Let's discuss this 
tomorrow.

Attached is the chart for Bigtoe.

At this point, I think they should be a subscriber member, since trading of 
paper is an emerging market.

Mark

Sorry for my tardy reply.  I have been covered up.  Thanks anyway.  Mark

I am not sure.  The numbers do look reasonable to me.  See if they are ok 
with Sheila Walton and would fit in with our standard policy.

Mark

fyi
Barbara Hanlon <BHANLON@isda.org> on 03/03/2000 10:56:55 AM
Please respond to Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
The Australian Financial Markets Association has sent to ISDA a copy of
CLERP6, the draft legislation reforming the Australian Corporations Law
relating to securities and derivatives.  We  understand that is expected to
be implemented in January 2001.  ISDA has not yet reviewed the draft.

 We attach a copy of the draft legislation for your information

Ruth Ainslie

 - legislation.rtf

We have not talked about this.  Mark

What's going on?  Where are working now?

Mark

1.  Legal Risk Report -- developed the concept of the legal risk report for 
ECT.  I began reporting and managing the ECT legal risks on that basis.  This 
resulted in a better understanding of legal risks such as the power contract 
risks.  There will be many collateral benefits for the company as a result of 
this new technology for legal risks such as better decision making on 
transactions and faster focus on solving problems.
   
   2.   Developed and implemented new Chinese Wall Policy  --  in the face of 
almost daily breaches of the then existing policy, a new policy was developed 
that is fashioned to fit the unique business of ECT.  The traders and 
originators helped design the policy and have "bought in".  Training was 
completed in June.  This new policy should reduce our SEC risk, while at the 
same time, allow us to take advantage of certain information.

   3.  Lead power industry to develop a standardized form  --  pushed ISDA 
and EEI to work with the major IOU's to jointly develop a standard master 
trading form for power.  The form is now 80% complete and is modeled after 
the ECT form.  The result will be a significant saving of legal time and 
effort and more transactions will be completed in the industry with less risk 
of an unintended default.

   4.  Cutting edge legal work -- identified and solved many cutting edge 
legal questions in connection with the start-up of many ECT businesses.  
These businesses include (i) the acquisition of competitive information, (ii) 
weather, coal, emissions, band- width and electronic trading, and (iii) 
acquisition of businesses through contract such as contemplated in the UI and 
the Peoples deals.

   5.  Carolina Power & Light -- after filing suit against CP&L, acheiving a 
settlement at 90% of the value, despite difficult legal issues.

   6.  Deals are Us  --  lots and lots of deals done.  Legal built a closer 
relationship with several difficult groups with improved results for the 
company.

Please print out for Bob Crane to sign.  Mark
Dusty Warren Paez
03/13/2000 09:50 AM
Mark,
Good morning.  The CA has been approved by Yvan's counsel.  After your 
review, could you send me originals for Bob Crane to sign.  Thank you.
Dusty

	
	

Would you handle this for me?  Thanks.

yvan_sanchez-maloney@abicon.com on 03/10/2000 04:05:51 PM
Bryan:

This is ok.  It's been reviewed by both our counsels.  You can have it signed 
by
an officer of Enron and fax it to me.

I'm on holiday for the week but I asked Natalie Tanguay to set up a meeting.
She's at 514-394-2214.

Thanks.

Yvan.

(See attached file: CA_e-com_enron_ver 95.doc)

 - CA_e-com_enron_ver 95.doc

Great conference in Amsterdam.  It was the best one yet.  I would like to 
have an IDSA sponsored energy conference in Houston sometime in the next 
year.  I think the time will be ripe to focus on (a)  energy derivatives 
around the world and (b) the application of web technology to energy.   If we 
do it right, we may draw a large group internationally and build our 
membership dramatically.  Let me know what you think.

Regards,

Mark

If you have not already done so, please complete and turn in 1999 Year End 
Performance Reviews for all employees that report to you (lawyers, legal 
specialists and administrative staff).  Thank you for your attention to this 
matter.  

I will need the 1999 Year End Performance Reviews completed by Friday, April 
7.  Thank you. 

Yes, I want to continue receiving it.  Mark

Have you thought about Arthur Andersen or PriceWaterhouse?    Mark

yes.

Please get the lunch on my schedule and book me to take them on a tour of the 
trading floor.  Mark
	James Derrick @ ENRON
	03/27/2000 01:30 PM
	
On Tuesday, April 11th the Chairman of Milbank, Tweed-- Mel M. Immergut,--and 
two of his partners who have done a considerable amount of work for 
Enron---Ed Feo and Eric Silverman --- are coming to Houston to pay us a 
courtesy visit.  I will host a lunch for them to which you are hereby 
invited.  Following lunch, they would like to visit with you or your 
designees to better acquaint themselves with the breadth of Enron's legal 
needs.  It might also  be useful for them to take a tour of one of our 
trading floors.  Please let me know if you are available to have lunch with 
us on the 11th and to spend perhaps 45 minutes with them sometime between the 
end of lunch and 5:30 p.m. discussing your group. Thank you.  JVD

Thanks for the info.  Mark

Bill:  I am looking foward to the game!  I will try to walk over to your 
offices by 6:00.  Mark

Thanks for the update.   Mark

Charles, the article looks very good to me.  I could not open the exhibits.  
Mark

Rick, please send me the schedule so I can foward it on to our lead trader in 
Japan.  Thanks.  Mark

That sounds like a great start in France.  Mark

Thanks.  We are in litigation with the Px.  Let me know if she continues to 
pursue Enron.  Mark

Thanks for the info.   Mark

Best of luck!  Please keep in touch!    Mark

I am on the boards on Harris County Children's Protective Services and 
International Swaps and Derivatives Association.  Mark

Liz, I would love to go.  Can I let you know tomorrow as I am still not sure 
what time by obligations here are over?    Mark

I don't know the person mentioned.   Mark

I will have to take a rain check.  I am meeting my son's fourth grade field 
trip here in SA and as it turns out we won't head back until about 7 pm.  
Have a great tme.    Mark

I think that is as good as we can get under the circumstances.  I would take 
it.  Mark

Jim:

Per our conversations, I propose the following additions to your draft memo:

Global Trading --  All lawyers providing legal services for trading 
activities (anywhere in the world) will continue to be consolidated into one 
group reporting to Mark Haedicke.

Legal Risk Books -- Mark will undertake an Enron-wide long term project to 
categorize legal risks into standardized risk "books".  To that end, Mark 
will form a team to work closely with each General Counsel or her/his 
designee regarding the significant legal risks in each subsidiary company. 
The goal will be to help us better understand our legal risks on a 
consolidated basis and to provide additional tools to manage our legal risks 
day to day.  It is anticipated that a consolidated monthly legal risk report 
will be prepared for Enron.

H&K has done only a little work for us.  Mark

For your review -- the latest diagram for the paper website.  Michael, I am 
free to discuss this at your convenience.  I am hopeful this structure will 
be unregulated in Europe as well.  Mark

Mark, 

Attached is the site structure diagram we were looking at earlier.  Let me 
know if you have any questions or would like to discuss the credit interface 
more thoroughly.  I will also forward the clean presentation copy with I get 
it back from graphics.

       -Brandon

Not enough experience.  Mark

I did it last week!  I  think it is a great seminar.  Mark

Based on earlier conversations, I have identified the following business 
methods that may be novel from a patent point of view:

1.   our site is offering "prime" paper rather than seconds or ends
2.   credit risk is managed by the site (credit intermediation) without cost 
to customers
3.   customers can access financial derivatives on paper to manage price risk 
on physical paper products
4.   customers have access to financial derivatives to manage price risk on 
prime offerings

Please give me your comments on this so we plan our strategy.

Mark Haedicke

George, I think your proposal is a good one in light of all the facts at 
hand.  I think it is best if we take the high road in approach as you have 
proposed.  I would ask Robert to prepare a one page bullet list of your 
points and then let's all briefly review it.  I want to stay mindful that 
litigation is possible and we have to chose our words carefully in event of 
litigation.  

Mark

That is a great success.     Mark

Bill, I am thinking I could do it May 14 or May 21, if that works for 
others.  I will confirm next week if those dates work.  Mark

Susan:

It is ok to provide the requested information.

Mark

Thanks for the invitation, but I cannot make it on Friday.  Have a great 
time.  Mark

Please list Mark Haedicke as an attendee for the Thursday, August 19, 1999 
Bon Voyage Bash for Kevin and Christine Hannon

Thank You

Yes, the 21st works for me.  I already made the mistake of mentioning the 
14th to Susan and she reminded me what day it was.  Mark

Bill, I am flexible but I like between 7 and 8.  Mark

Ken, how should I help promote the Senate bill?  Does it allow us to do a 
many to many paper product financial exchange without regulation?  What would 
you change about the Senate bill?

Mark

Dave, I didn't see Julia's name on the list.  I assume it was just 
oversight.  Let me know.  Mark

FYI
"Laxmi Mrig"<LMrig@uswest.net> on 04/25/2000 04:59:09 PM
Dear Colleague:

Electric Utility Consultants, Inc. (EUCI), a leading provider of cutting-edge 
conferences designed exclusively for electric utility industry professionals 
is offering the following conferences and courses:

1). Reliability Centered Maintenance Conferences, May 23-27, Vail, Colorado

2). Power Delivery Reliability Conference, June 19-20, 2000, Denver, Colorado 
and Congestion Management Conference, June 22-23, 2000, Denver, Colorado.

3). Short Courses (i) Independent/Merchant Power Plant Development, May 
17-19, 2000, (ii) Modern Power Distribution Planning, June 7-9, 2000, (iii) 
Distributed Power Generation, July 26-28, 2000, (iv) Reliability-Based 
Engineering for Power Distribution Systems, August 2-4, 2000, and (v) 
Transmission Capacity Planning Under FERC Order 2000, September 13-15, 2000. 
All courses to be held at Westin Hotel, Denver, Colorado

(4) Generating Plant Maintenance Conference, July 18-19, 2000, and Generating 
Plant Efficiency & Process Improvement Conference, July 20-21, 2000, Denver, 
Colorado

The brochures for these events are attached herewith. The files are in 
Microsoft Word format. If you have difficulty opening or printing these 
files, please let us know and we can fax the brochures to you.

The registration forms for the events are included in the attached files. 
Please fill out the registration form and fax it back to us at 303-741-0849. 
You may also call us at 303-770-8800 to register for the conferences.

If you are unable to attend the conference and feel that attending the events 
will be more appropriate for your colleagues, please forward the message to 
the appropriate individual(s).

Send us a note if you would like us to remove your name from our email 
distribution list.

Sincerely Yours,

L. Mrig
Electric Utility Consultants, Inc. (EUCI)
Tel: 303-770-8800, Fax: 303-741-0849
www.euci.com
lmrig@euci.com

 - RCM-Conference.doc
 - reliability & congestion.doc
 - short-courses.doc
 - powerplantconf.doc

Yes, talk to Cynthia or Mark Taylor.  Mark

Thanks, I think your list has real potential from a patent point of view.  
Mark

Thanks, the talking points are helpful.  Mark

A couple of other thoughts:

1.  Aggressively pursue litigation claims and manage litigation risks.
2.  Build contracts and legal infrastructure to support new businesses like 
paper.
3.  Develop top talent in the firms to assist getting all our deals done.

Mark

I will be there.  Mark

Yes.  Also, outside legal usually increases over the last 4 months of the 
year.  Mark

I could not open the document.  Mark

Rob, she could talk to Barbara Gray about a position as a paralegal.  Barbara 
is looking for help on some of the asset work.  Mark

Not enough experience for our shop.

Louise, I can take care of this.  Once in a while, I need to get my hands 
dirty.  Mark

Jason:

I have reviewed the CA and only have one comment.  I would like to add a 
paragragh 10 as follows:  "This Agreement shall terminate on the date one 
year from the date of this Agreement."

Enron Net Works LLC will be the party to the agreement.  The address is 1400 
Smith Street, Houston Texas  77002.  Please set up the agreement for 
signature by Louise Kitchen as Managing Director.  My number is 713-853-6544 
if you have any questions.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

Cynthia, Rick Grove and I talked by phone to Chairman Rainer today about 
energy.  I made the point that energy swaps should be treated just like 
financial commodity swaps.  Also, I pointed out that innovation has been 
slowed for electronic trading of energy by the current regulatory structure.  
I think it would be a good idea to prepare a "positive" letter from a few 
congressman encouraging a point of view on energy more like the Senate bill.  

Mark

Rick Grove and I spoke with Chairman Rainer on Friday about energy and he did 
not budge.  He appears to be strongly against us.  Why do you think that is?

Pls. handle.  Mark

	

Please have your Assistant forward the following information for the Project 
Merlin Working Group List to my attention:

1. Title
2. Location
3. Assistant's Name
4. Assistant's Telephone
5. Office Telephone Number
6. Office Facsimile Number
7. Email address
8. Home Telephone
9. Home Facsimile
10. Pager Number
11. Home Address

I know that some of this information is available via Enron Phone Book, but I 
want to make sure that we have the latest information available.  Thank you 
for your assistance.

Peter, the summary is very helpful.  Perhaps, we should drop the summary into 
the monthly report?  Please talk to Julia about that.  I want to make it as 
efficient as possible.  Mark

Nora, thanks for the information.  As new issues come up, please copy Mark 
Taylor.  Thanks for your help.  Mark

Justin, thanks!   Mark

Liz, it looks fine.  I have printed it and will initial for Greg's 
signature.  Let me know if you have any other questions.  Once you get the 
original back, please send to me for my files. 

Mark

Attached is our Confidentiality Agreement.  Please feel free to call me at 
(713) 853-6544 if you have any questions.  Thank you.

Attached is our Confidentiality Agreement.  Please feel free to call me if 
you have any questions at (713) 853-6544.  Thank you.

Attached is our Confidentiality Agreement.  Please call me at (713) 853-6544 
if you have any questions.  Thank you.

Attached is our Confidentiality Agreement.  Please feel free to call me at 
(713) 853-6544 if you have any questions.  Thank you.

Julia has all the handouts.  Mark

Randy, I will be out of town, but that is ok.   MARK

That is great that John has an interest!   Mark

Chris, I got your message.  I am very happy how you are coming out!  I think 
it is a great opportunity for both you and the company!  Please work through 
the move and comp questions with Julia.  Of course I will be available as 
needed.

Mark

Peter, is there any real risk that contingencies from LGEC could spill over 
to Enron Canada?  Mark

Please set up a meeting next week with Randy and Michelle and Dan to briefly 
review the issues below.    Mark
Randal Maffett
05/09/2000 09:38 AM
Mark - yesterday, I gave an update/projection presentation to Delainey, 
Donahue and Bowen and as you know part of it included the status of the 
various HR related issues (harassment, dismissals, etc...).  Hopefully, 
you're aware that Michelle Cash, Dan Lyons and Butch Hayes (Fulbright & 
Jaworski) have been guiding me all along and are fully up to speed.  However, 
Delainey wants me to get with you to make sure you're 100% in the loop as 
well.  

Let me (or Beth) know what's convenient for you and I'll flex my calendar as 
much as possible.

Thanks, RANDY

I am in Houston, but would be happy to give him some contact names.  What is 
his background?  That will help me come up with the right people.   Mark

FYI
Stephanie Harris @ ENRON

05/04/2000 03:04 PM
Robert C Williams@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
05/04/2000 02:49 PM
At Sean's request I had lunch today with Bill Urquhart and Lamont Jones, who 
are with Quinn Emanuel in L.A.  Quinn Emanuel is a litigation firm of 
approximately 100 attorneys based in L..A.  Their client list and litigation 
record are impressive.  From what I have read and heard, they strike me as 
the "Susman Godfrey" of L.A. (and could be even better).    Bill worked with 
Jonathan Sumption on an arbitration, they became friends, and now whenever 
Bill is in London he stays in Sumption's home.  I think we should keep the 
firm in mind for California litigation and international arbitrations. 

Bob:

Sorrry for the delay in responding.  I am ok with V&E representing the 
underwriter with the usual carve-outs..  

Mark

I have not heard of the firm.    Mark

Thanks for the summary.  Mark

I am OK with this so long as it does not set a precedent for next year.    
Mark

	Sheila Walton
	04/10/2000 11:09 AM
		 
FYI.  Let me know if you have any questions.

Sheila
Leslie Hansen
04/10/2000 10:07 AM
Sheila:

As we discussed when you gave me my offer letter, I have some vacation 
already planned and would like to make that vacation (with pay) a part of my 
offer of employment, in addition to the 28 or so hours that I'll accrue 
during the balance of 2000, which I will need to use for Thanksgiving and 
Christmas.  We are planning to spend the end of August in New England -- 
Thursday and Friday, Aug. 24 - 25, the following week of August 28 - 
September 1, and Labor Day, September 4.   Do you want to discuss this issue 
with Mark or would you prefer that I discuss it with him directly?

Otherwise, I am happy to accept the terms of the offer letter.  I still need 
to make some decisions about benefits.  I am assuming that I do not need to 
make my actual elections until my start date.  I would like to start on 
Monday, May 1 so that I have a couple of weeks to wrap things up with the 
firm.  

Thank you so much for all of your help with my transition to corporate life!

Leslie

You're very welcome.   Mark

Thanks for the memo.  I think the transaction makes a lot of sense.   Mark

Paul, thanks for the risk memo!  Mark

Peter, thanks for the note.  Please copy Julia on updates of this nature.  
Mark

Please put on my calendar.  Mark
	Debra Hicks@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/10/2000 04:37 PM
		 
Please mark your calendars to attend the Legal PRC meeting which will be held 
at the Doubletree Hotel in the Milam Room on Tuesday, June 6th from 1:30 
until 5:30.  If you have a conflict, please let me know as soon as possible.  
Thanks.

Debra

Dear Mr. Esposito:

I would recommend you talk to Brian Seyfried in London at 44-207-783-7907 re 
credit and Jere Overdyke in Houston at 713-853-9171 re insurance 
derivatives.  Let me know if you need any more help.

Sincerely,

Mark Haedicke

Yes, I am generally familiar with the deal.  Mark

I would like to be on the panel but I have on a conflict on the conference 
dates.  Please keep me in mind for next year.  

Mark Haedicke

Bill, that works for me.  I am happy to ride together.  Let me know what time 
you will pick me up.  Thanks. 

Mark

I am fine with your proposal.   Mark

I have put the executed doc in the mail.  Mark

I will be out of town.  Thanks for asking.  Mark

Jaime:

Thanks for the information!  Mark

Greg, it looks fine to me.  Let's make sure we have the supporting 
documentation of the good standing certificate and board resolution.  Mark

Jeff, here is the list of managers and officers as it now stands.  Let me 
know what additional changes you want made and we will get all of them done.  
Mark
	Deb Korkmas
	05/18/2000 04:34 PM
		 
Mark, as requested, here is the list of Managers and Officers for Enron Net 
Works LLC:

Managers:  James V. Derrick, Jr., Mark E. Haedicke, and Lawrence G. Whalley

Officers:

Lawrence G. Whalley, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
Michael McConnell, President and Chief Operating Officer
Jay Fitzgerald, Managing Director
Mark E. Haedicke, Managing Director and General Counsel
Louise Kitchen, Managing Director
Robert J. Hermann, Managing Director and General Tax Counsel
Jeffrey McMahon, Managing Director, Chief Commercial Officer, and Treasurer
Greg Piper, Managing Director
Harry Arora, Vice President
Bruce Garner, Vice President
Jordan H. Mintz, Vice President and Tax Counsel
Elaine V. Overturf, Deputy Corporate Secretary
Kate B. Cole, Assistant Secretary
Denise A. Ernest, Assistant Secretary

Deb

7:45 is ok with me.  I am at 14623 River Forest.  Let me know if you need 
directions.  Mark

We did a cogen deal in Nevada.  Try asking Karen Jones in Portland.  Mark

 This is a test.

For preparation of my travel folder for the trip.  Mark
	Corrinne Greasley <CGREASLEY@isda.org>
	05/23/2000 04:22 PM
		 
Members of the Board:

A complete set of materials was sent to ISDA Directors today in preparation
for the Strategic Planning Session scheduled for June 7-9, 2000 in
Sonoma,California.  Attached please find electronic copies of a few of the
presentations included in the Board book.

 Executive Briefing, Agenda, European & US Technology and Regulation
 <<Strategic Planning 2000 Executive Briefing.doc>>    <<Strategic Planning
2000 Agenda.doc>>    <<board book sonoma - eu regulation.doc>>      <<SONOMA
- E-trading - US.doc>>

Technology and Documentation Delivery
Below please find a memo to the Board (included in the Board materials)
describing the issues involved in the ISDA e-Documentation Project.
 <<Strategic planning e-delivery memo.doc>>

A sample of the electronic documents will be sent to Board Members
separately.

I can be reached by return e-mail or by telephone on 212 332 1200 should you
encounter any problems accessing these documents.

Corrinne Greasley

 - Strategic Planning 2000 Executive Briefing.doc
 - Strategic Planning 2000 Agenda.doc
 - board book sonoma - eu regulation.doc
 - SONOMA - E-trading - US.doc
 - Strategic planning e-delivery memo.doc

Fish.

Please put this on my calendar.  Mark
	David W Delainey
	Sent by: Kay Chapman
	05/23/2000 02:11 PM
		 
During our off-site at Columbia Lakes recently,  we identified areas in ENA 
where significant gaps exist that need filling at the Analyst and Associate 
level.  We have scheduled an off-cycle Super Saturday on June 3, 2000 and I 
would like your participation as an interviewer.  We will need approximately  
25-30 interviewers to fill approximately 30 Associate & Analyst positions.  I 
am counting on everyone making themselves available on the third to 
facilitate this priority action item.

Ted Bland will be forwarding information concerning the event to each of you 
early next week.  

Thank you for your participation.  

Dave

Please check with Janette.  Thanks.  Mark

Janet, I am looking to this now.  Mark

Elizabeth, I would like to present at this conference, subject to knowing 
more about it.  Let's talk about about what we would want to talk about.  I 
am wondering how interesting the topic will be.   Mark

I think we should try this out.  I will work on that.  Mark
	Greg Piper@ENRON
	05/19/2000 01:05 PM
		 
FYI

GP
What is your global strategy? How will you implement it?

Global eCommerce Law & Business Report can help net market makers answer
these questions with rich monthly analyses of legal and regulatory issues,
best business practices, and the barriers and opportunities that exist in
regions around the world. In our latest issue, for example, we provide a
detailed evaluation of content regulation, privacy, electronic signatures,
and consumer regulation which e-commerce marketers in Japan must consider.
Next month, look for a review of the regulatory environment in China.

Also in the current issue, a senior analyst at the Yankee Group explores
Latin America's fast growing Internet market, which is expected to more
than double by 2003. Venture capital funds are funneling billions of
dollars into enterprises in the region, and global players like Microsoft,
AOL, and Telefonica of Spain are making substantial acquisitions. Is this a
market you should be in?

As net markets build liquidity and seek to add value, globalization becomes
an increasingly important component of many business models. Global
eCommerce will help you stay ahead of the curve.

Vicki Mills was fortunate to meet many of you at the ground.zero3
conference in Boston this week, but she wasn't able to assure that each of
you received a sample copy of the publication. WorldTrade Executive would
therefore like to extend a special, risk-free offer to attendees of
ground.zero3.

Simply reply to this e-mail message, providing the information indicated
below, and you will receive 12 issues of Global eCommerce for only $498 d
that's $100 off our regular subscription rate. You may cancel at any time
during the first 60 days for a full refund, but we are confident you will
find Global eCommerce to be a valuable addition to your strategic planning
tools.

Remember, there is absolutely no risk to try GLOBAL eCOMMERCE.

Name:
Title:
Company:
Street Address:
City:                           State:                 Zip Code:
Country:
Phone:                          Email:

[Z9]  Global eCommerce Law and Business Report Risk-free trial

Credit Card #:
Expire Date:
Bill Me   [    ]
I Prefer: Mailed Copies [    ]    Emailed PDF Copies [    ]

GLOBAL eCOMMERCE is published by WorldTrade Executive, relied on by more
than half of the Global 1000 for such titles as Practical U.S./
International Tax Strategies, International Finance & Treasury and Russian
Petroleum Investor.

2250 Main Street
Concord, MA 01742
USA
978 287-0301 tel
978 287-0302 fax
http://www.wtexec.com

I received the binder.  Thank you.   Mark

Dave, I wanted to let you know that I will be in Israel on July 28, on the 
date of the VP pre-ranking.  This is a long scheduled family trip that would 
be difficult to cancel.  I can call in or get all my comments to you and 
others ahead of time.      Mark

That is a very interesting question.  I think we would eventually want to 
include derivatives in the cross default trigger because of their 
significance.  However, since we often have the far larger derivative 
position, it would seem at least now, this would more often work against us.

Mark Haedicke

Congrats on the deal!   Mark

FYI
	Michael R Brown
	05/26/2000 10:01 AM
		 
As discussed
Michael
Eric Gadd
25/05/2000 21:49
A quick brief on the key people I have met to date follows below.  Fiona, 
please pull together bios on each of Enron's team members and current job 
assignments at Enron and forward to Sid and John so they can know who they 
are dealing with - - - take a little of the mystery out of first 
engagements!  I will forward a hardcopy diagram of the Enron/MG plc 
Integration plan - - -

John Gill.  John's role as Assistant to the Executive is a senior commercial 
position.  He was recruited + hired by MG from GE Capital and has extensive 
experience in M+A activities.  He is assigned to MG's merchanting division 
and is a relatively recent hire.  I believe he has been actively involved in 
recruiting a 9 person structured finance team.  John, along with Sid Tipples 
and David Tregar, has been tasked to co-ordinate the Enron/MG integration.

Sid Tipples.  Like John Gill, Sid is an Assistant to the Executive working in 
the financial services division.  I've had limited conversation with him.  He 
is actively involved in corp development.

Howard Carter.  Howard is the Director of Finance in MCC.  He started his 
career at Anglo Chemical and Ore Co transferring to Philipp Bros when it 
acquired the majority holding in Anglo Chemicals.  He qualified as an 
accountant in 1979 and became a Fellow of the Chartered Association of 
Certified Accountants in 1984.  He joined MCC (physical merchanting division) 
when it was established in 1989.  He talked to me about a "control" function 
that his group performs that sounds somewhat like a combination of Enron's 
tasks for originators and structurers.  He seems to pick up several functions 
in the merchanting division and Michael Farmer is keen to keep him in the 
loop for H/R assessments.

David Tregar.  David is the Financial Director.  He was educated at Lancaster 
University prior to joining Arthur Andersen in 1973.  He became an associate 
of the Institute of Chartered Accountants in 1976 and  Fellow of the 
Institute in 1981.  Since leaving AA in 1978, he has worked continuously in 
commodity trading.  He joined MGAG in 1990 and was appointed Finance 
Director  of MGL in 1991.  Prior to this he worked for several US brokerage 
houses.  He is involved in just about everything at MG (risk, compliance, IT, 
treasury, banking).  Personally, David is very open and friendly.

Bernard Page.  Bernard is a long standing employee of MG (since early 1970s) 
due to retire in October.  He's had various positions of responsibilities.  
Prior to Enron's offer, he was winding down his career by planning MG's 
relocation from One America Square to 25 Cannon Street.  Now, it looks like 
he will be actively involved in relocating their offices to 40 G.  Bernard 
tends to be a little reticent until engaged in a conversation about MG's 
business, etc.  He has a solid understanding of the financial services 
division and an outstanding working knowledge of MG's office system 
infra-structure - - - if he doesn't know something, he knows where to get the 
answer.  I get the sense he has known Michael Hutchison for a long, long time.

Michael Farmer.  Michael is Managing Director of the merchanting division and 
has over 30 years experience in the metals industry.  He started his career 
with A Strauss & Co, a metal exchange broker and tin merchant.  He also 
worked for two other metal brokers and was formerly Desk Head (copper) for 
Philipp Brothers.  He jointly set up MCC, which is the (physical) merchanting 
division of MG, with Dieter Boettcher (Tom's father/uncle/relative???) who 
has subsequently retired.  Michael kindly explained the physical metals 
business to me and we immediately started connecting on commercial project 
development opportunities, particularly in copper.

Michael Hutchison.  Michael is the Managing Director of the financial 
services division.  He was educated at Hull University.  He joined MGL in 
1971, became a member of the Board of Directors in 1982, was appointed Joint 
Managing Director in 1984, and became Managing Director in 1995.  Between 
1984 and 1988, Michael was a committee member of the LME and from 1990 has 
served as a Director of the LME.  Michael is a very articulate, 
action-oriented trader, who just wants to get on with it.  Having said that, 
he has been very patient and careful in explaining the financial markets to 
me and has provided me with a lot of resources (videos, books, brochures, 
reports) on the industry.

Hamish Scutt.  Hamish was a banker with Kleinwort Benson for 18 years and 
developed a strong relationship with MG during the latter part, which led to 
him being recruited and hired ~3 years ago.  He is very interested in 
promoting a "credit culture" that proactively assigns  limits and measures 
performance.  I get the sense that he has, in his quiet and friendly way, 
pushed for more credit control in a productive fashion - - - he wants to 
avoid adversarial relationships with the metals traders.  He is very open to 
Enron's ideas about credit and is known by a number of people (Lee Munden, 
Steve Young) at Enron.

Tom McKeever.  Tom is the Executive Chairman and has been involved in the 
metals industry for over 22 years.  He joined MG in 1994 when he became 
responsible for the Group's US operations.  His experience with public 
companies (Amax) as a manager and director made him a very credible manager 
for MG during their IPO and period of public holding.  He lends stability and 
balance to the executive team.  He is very practical; for example, he wants 
to know who from Enron is going to contact MG staff - - - he doesn't want 
them, in their enthusiasm to be open with Enron, to reveal proprietary 
information to an unscrupulous competitor posing as Enron!

Tom Boettcher.  Tom joined MGAG in 1993 as a Vice President of the Metal 
Division, Head of Copper.  He became a Director of MCC in 1995.  Prior to 
joining MGAG he worked for 12 years as Head of Metal Department (Prokurist) 
at Norrdeutsche Affinerie.  I have only had limited discussion with Tom - - - 
he is preparing a list of development prospects based on a conversation I had 
with Michael Farmer.

Kevin Rhodes.  Kevin is the Director of Operations for the financial service 
division where he is responsible for the Administration department which 
encompasses all aspect of back-office and trader support systems.  He joined 
the Henry Bath (the warehousing company) from university and joined MGL when 
it took over Henry Bath in 1992.  I have not met Kevin, yet.

Timothy Jones.  Tim is the Director of Trading for the financial services 
division.  He joined MGL in 1980.  He was educated at Homefield College, 
Christchurch, and started with MGL as a trainee trader.  He has been MGL's 
Senior Trader for several years.  He was appointed a Director of MGL in 1995 
and is a member of the LME Ring Committee.  I have not met Tim, yet.

Put on my calendar.   Mark
	Raymond Bowen
	Sent by: Marsha Schiller
	05/26/2000 08:54 AM
		 
  

  Subject: Kafus

  Date:  Thursday, June 1, 2000

  Time:  2:00 - 3:00 p.m.

  Location: EB3321

Please advise Marsha at x-33356 if you cannot attend.

Thanks.

I do not know of any reason.  Mark

FYI.   You call and confirm with Dennis Oakley at Chase.
	<DENNIS.OAKLEY@chase.com>
	05/30/2000 09:03 AM
		 
Rebecca can you get a conference room for me and let us all know which one.

Thanks

Dennis

Neil A. Wright   05/26/2000 09:29 AM
(Embedded image moved to file: pic14140.pcx)

Global Derivative Operations  718 242-7301    Fax Number: 718 242-3791

Dennis,

I would be more than happy to meet with you and the gentlemen from Enron.  I
have put May 31 at 1:30 in my diary - please advise me of the exact location.

Thanks,

Neil

05/25/2000 04:26 PM
Dennis Oakley
Dennis Oakley
Dennis Oakley
05/25/2000 04:26 PM
05/25/2000 04:26 PM

Global Credit Capital Management/Credit Derivatives  (212) 270-9015    Fax
      Number: (212) 270-2370

Neil,

Mark Haedicke is an ISDA Board member and works for Enron Corporation.  Mark 
is
going to be in NY next Wednesday with two other colleagues visiting NY banks 
to
discuss automating the derivatives back office and STP.  Would you be 
available
to meet with Mark and me from 1:30 to 3:00 at 270 Park.

I've cc'd Mark on this in order to cut out the telephone tag if that time 
isn't
good for you.  I am available all next Wednesday and they are visiting JPM 
from
10:00 to 12:00.

Dennis

 - pic14140.pcx

Cliff, please find the legal opinion we previously discussed.  Mark
	"Karet, Ian" <ian.karet@linklaters.com>
	Sent by: "Leonard, Kay" <kay.leonard@linklaters.com>
	05/30/2000 12:08 PM
		 
Dear Mark

I attach our advice on eMetra, which John (now on vacation) has asked me to
send to you.

Best regards

Ian

 <<000515_Ltr Enron_2.doc>>

____________________________________________________________

This message is confidential. It may also be privileged or
otherwise protected by work product immunity or other legal
rules. If you have received it by mistake please let us know
by reply and then delete it from your system; you should not
copy the message or disclose its contents to anyone.
____________________________________________________________

 - 000515_Ltr Enron_2.doc

Let me know how it goes.  Mark

	"Wood, Don" <DWood@lockeliddell.com>
	06/07/00 12:24 PM
		 
Mark-    I'd like to invite you to pareticipate in the newly formed Houston
Chapter of the Texas General Counsel Forum.  GC and their direct reports are
the targeted membership and the organization has been very successful in
Dallas.  Led by several local GC and supported by only a few large law and
accounting firms, the Houston effort is just beginning.  Current
participants include Chase, Reliant Energy, Compaq, Texaco, Equiva, American
General, Sterling Bankshares and others.

 A breakfast meeting is scheduled for June 13 at the Doubletree in Allen
Center at 8:00 a.m. in the Granger A conference room.  Each organizer is
inviting two guests and I hope you can be one of mine.  Of course,  we would
also like Jim to participate and membership is open to all GC or their
direct reports in a company. Vince may visit with Jim about this group.

I have copied below a blurb desciribing the TGCF and membership plans. Let
me know by phone or email.  Thank you very much.

I just got back form 6 rounds of golf in 3 days at the Inn of the Mountain
Gods in Ruidoso. And a little time in the casino. Have you played there? My
game can be desrcibed as " arguably improving early beginner", says the rest
of the foursome.

                                             The Texas General Counsel Forum
is an organization whose mission is to
                                             facilitate communication and
information sharing among general counsel and
                                             outside counsel of best
practices for legal department management and for
                                             effective communication between
the legal department and executive
                                             management. Membership is open
to general counsel and their direct reports
                                             with management responsibility
for legal affairs of their companies, and
                                             to select outside counsel who
provide services to corporate legal departments.
                                             Directors and members of the
Forum will be present to discuss the
                                             organization's goals, purpose
and activities. Information about
                                             up -coming events and
membership applications will be available.

Don:

I would like to attend with you.  I will check with my assistant to make sure 
I can do it.

Take care,

Mark

Bob:

After last year it is a close call, but I want to do it again.  I am willing 
to go for one-half again but am ok with only a quarter of the games.  Let me 
know when you need the money and I will scout around to see if anyone wants a 
quarter of the games.

Mark

Janet, I received your message and heard you loud and clear.  We need to 
diversify the talent working on your deals.  Let's get you together with 
Julia next week to discuss.

	Janet R Dietrich
	06/06/00 04:01 PM
		 
I just heard that Chris Gaffney is transferring to the Toronto office. His 
skill sets/capabilities have been critical in the closing of both the UI and 
NSTAR deals and he has been actively engaged in the long-term NSTAR deal, 
Con-Ed, and our Project Green Jacket. It is critical to our business to have 
no transitional period with attorneys and I expect his replacement to be 
fully up to speed (i.e. knowledge of the power market, understanding of 
structured power transactions, etc) relative to definitive documents around 
these transactions. Chris is definitely a loss to our team. Please advise as 
to his qualified replacement on these specific deals.  Thanks. 

Mark, what has been mandated by AA and what is your recommendation.  Mark
	Linda Sietzema
	06/12/2000 09:39 AM
		 
Please see the attached memo from Greg Johnston.

Please put this on my schedule.  Mark
	Sherryl Stone@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	06/12/2000 08:10 AM
		 
Please read the attached invitation and RSVP to Sherryl Stone via e-mail or 
call 67601.

Is our filing date of July 1 still on track?   Mark

There will be a meeting to discuss unfinished PRC matters for ENA Legal on 
Monday, June 19, at 9:30 a.m. (immediately following the regularly scheduled 
OGC meeting) in conference room EB38C2.  This should take approximately 30 
minutes.

I think attending the ISDA workshop would be a good idea.

Mark

Thanks for updating  me on things.  We could get together for lunch some time 
if you want.  I am downtown and generally keep Thursday's open to lunch with 
friends.  I am at 713-853-6544 and you can always leave a message on vm.  
Take care.  Mark

Thanks for the message.  I will be over in a few weeks.  I look foward to 
catching up on things.  Mark

Please find the docs she is referring to so I can sign them.  We should get 
Jeff Hodge to sign them.  Mark
	"Choussy, Dorothee" <dorothee.choussy@linklaters.com>
	06/06/2000 08:27 AM
		 
Dear Mark,

I refer to my letter to you dated 31 May 2000, enclosing two originals of
the deed of waiver between MG Trade Services AG and Enron Investments PLC.
These two documents have to be signed by you on behalf of Enron Investments
PLC.

I would be very grateful if you could sign both originals and return them to
me as soon as possible by courier.

Thank you very much

Yours sincerely

Dorothee Choussy
John Goodwin's Trainee

Linklaters
Tel: 020 7456 3281
Fax: 020 7456 2285
mail to: dorothee.choussy@linklaters.com

____________________________________________________________

This message is confidential. It may also be privileged or
otherwise protected by work product immunity or other legal
rules. If you have received it by mistake please let us know
by reply and then delete it from your system; you should not
copy the message or disclose its contents to anyone.
____________________________________________________________

If you are going to be out of the office, please have your assistant send me 
an e-mail (and copy Janette) with the dates you will be out and the telephone 
number where you can be contacted. 

Thank you.

Alan, FYI.  Please forward on to Tom.  I could not get his e-mail address to 
come up.  Mark
	George James <George.James@msdw.com>
	06/13/2000 03:58 PM
	Please respond to George.James
		 
Rosemary,

Should we limit the presentations to ISDA members only?  What about
FPML/Swift/Londex or e speed, or treasury connect, etc?  I believe we should 
try
to be inclusive of any important venture, member value from attendance goes up
as a result.

Regards,

George

Rosemary Ryan wrote:

>         Following up on the discussion at the Strategic Planning Session
> regarding ISDA holding a forum on electronic trading, we would like to
> suggest the following and welcome your input.
>
>         We propose to hold the forum in conjunction with the ISDA Member
> Updates in London (September 12), New York (September 20), Singapore
> (October 24) and Tokyo (October 26).
>
>         The agenda would be an update on ISDA committee activities from 9:00
> AM to 12:30 PM, luncheon at 12:30PM and the afternoon would be devoted to
> electronic trading.
>
>         The forum would include presentations from ISDA broker member firms
> who are involved in the electronic trading of OTC derivatives.
>
>         These firms would include:
>
> *       Blackbird
> *       Icor Brokerage
> *       Credittrade
> *       Creditex
> *       EBS
> *       Swapswire (assuming they are joining)
> *       Garban Intercapital
> *       Prebon Yamane
> *       Tullet & Tokyo Liberty
>
>         We would ask the institutions to pay a sponsor fee which would
> include a 20 minute presentation by each firm and would also allow them to
> distribute their marketing materials if they wish.  Following the
> presentations we would allow for Q&A.
>
>         If a firm chooses to present in one location we would charge $2,000,
> two locations $3,500, three locations $5,000 or four locations $5,500.
>
>         Please let us know if you have any comments or suggestions.
>
>         Thank you.

FYI.  We should talk about attendance at these meetings re electronic trading.
	George James <George.James@msdw.com>
	06/13/2000 03:58 PM
	Please respond to George.James
		 
Rosemary,

Should we limit the presentations to ISDA members only?  What about
FPML/Swift/Londex or e speed, or treasury connect, etc?  I believe we should 
try
to be inclusive of any important venture, member value from attendance goes up
as a result.

Regards,

George

Rosemary Ryan wrote:

>         Following up on the discussion at the Strategic Planning Session
> regarding ISDA holding a forum on electronic trading, we would like to
> suggest the following and welcome your input.
>
>         We propose to hold the forum in conjunction with the ISDA Member
> Updates in London (September 12), New York (September 20), Singapore
> (October 24) and Tokyo (October 26).
>
>         The agenda would be an update on ISDA committee activities from 9:00
> AM to 12:30 PM, luncheon at 12:30PM and the afternoon would be devoted to
> electronic trading.
>
>         The forum would include presentations from ISDA broker member firms
> who are involved in the electronic trading of OTC derivatives.
>
>         These firms would include:
>
> *       Blackbird
> *       Icor Brokerage
> *       Credittrade
> *       Creditex
> *       EBS
> *       Swapswire (assuming they are joining)
> *       Garban Intercapital
> *       Prebon Yamane
> *       Tullet & Tokyo Liberty
>
>         We would ask the institutions to pay a sponsor fee which would
> include a 20 minute presentation by each firm and would also allow them to
> distribute their marketing materials if they wish.  Following the
> presentations we would allow for Q&A.
>
>         If a firm chooses to present in one location we would charge $2,000,
> two locations $3,500, three locations $5,000 or four locations $5,500.
>
>         Please let us know if you have any comments or suggestions.
>
>         Thank you.

I will not be back from my vacation until August 2.  Is it possible to delay 
your vacation for two days.  If not, I think it will be ok.  Mark

Edmund, thanks for that A&O summary.  Is anyone recommending any change in 
the ISDA agreement or schedules?  Hopefully this fact scenario would never 
apply to Enron.

Mark

I can go only if there is no Net Works meeting.  Mark
	Julia Murray@ENRON
	Sent by: Carolyn George@ENRON
	06/13/2000 06:13 PM
		 
Please come join us for lunch to wish Chris well as he and his family head 
back to Canada.  Chris will be working in our Toronto office beginning in 
July.

Date: Thursday, June 22, 2000
Time: Noon
Place: Cafe Noche
 2409 Montrose

RSVP: Carolyn ext. 3-3439

Alan, there is a good article on power trading in Japan.  Please pass it on 
as appropriate.   Mark
	Tara McAuliff <TMCAULIFF@isda.org>
	06/15/2000 10:16 AM
		 
ISDA PRESS REPORT, THURSDAY, JUNE 15, 2000

* US Regulators Find Flaws In Commodities Overhaul Bill - Capital
Markets Report, 6/14/00
* Japan Online Power Trading May Spark More Deregulation - Dow Jones
Energy Service, 6/15/00
* Philippines Relaxes Banks' Requirement To Raise Capital - The Wall
Street Journal Europe, 6/14/00
* Danger Signs - The Economist, 6/10/00

Capital Markets Report, 6/14/00
US Regulators Find Flaws in Commodities Overhaul Bill
By Dawn Kopecki

WASHINGTON -(Dow Jones)- U.S. financial regulators at a hearing Wednesday
faulted legislation aiming at rewriting the nation's commodities laws for
going too far in some areas at streamlining the laws overseeing derivatives
products and futures markets.

Some officials criticized the bill, introduced by Rep. Thomas Ewing, R-Ill.,
chairman of the House Agriculture Subcommittee on Risk Management, for
diminishing the jurisdiction of the Securities and Exchange Commission over
certain derivatives products.

The legislation, as well as a companion bill introduced by Senate
Agriculture Chairman Richard Lugar, R-Ind., would streamline the laws
overseeing derivatives products and futures markets as well as deregulate
some aspects of that industry.

Lawmakers have been struggling all year to revamp those markets. The
Commodity Exchange Act - which expires Sept. 30 - determines which agency,
the SEC or the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, has jurisdiction over
what derivatives products.

A tugging war between the two agencies over how to redraw those lines has
slowed progress on the legislation.

Annette Nazareth, director of the SEC's division of market regulation,
faulted Ewing's legislation for creating a new kind of deregulated futures
trading facility, but then giving the CFTC exclusive jurisdiction over the
securities traded on those new facilities.

"The (SEC) does not believe that there is a justification for eliminating
the traditional role of other regulators, including the SEC, in regulating
markets and intermediaries that trade such government securities and other
products," Nazareth said in written testimony.

She noted that it's especially important that the SEC retain its authority
"when these products would be traded on facilities subject to even fewer
investor protections than exist today on futures exchanges."

Treasury assistant secretary Lewis Sachs also found that section of the bill
flawed, saying that his agency was concerned that Ewing's bill makes
regulatory oversight of clearinghouses optional, not mandatory. He was
similarly concerned about giving the CFTC exclusive jurisdiction over all
transactions conducted within a clearinghouse.

"The exclusive jurisdiction of the CFTC may preclude securities regulators
from maintaining oversight of organizations that clear securities-related
products," Sachs said in his written testimony. He added that regulation of
clearinghouses should be mandatory and that the SEC should oversee
clearinghouse transactions for products currently under its jurisdiction.

Nazareth also suggested that Ewing clarify a section of the bill so that it
clearly gives the SEC direct access to audit trails, coordinated market
surveillance and inspection authority to pursue insider trading and other
fraudulent practices regarding the trading of single-stock futures.

"The SEC should not be required to seek the permission of any other entity
to protect investors," she said.

Both Sachs and Nazareth found it "troublesome" that Ewing's bill has a lower
threshold than other proposals for determining what constitutes a
"sophisticated investor." That's important because the legislation allows
sophisticated investors to conduct a wide variety of transactions with the
least amount of scrutiny from federal regulators.

"We do not believe that adequate consideration has been given to whether $10
million in total assets is a sufficient indication of sophistication," she
said. "Moreover, the bill grants the CFTC broad discretion to declare anyone
an eligible contract participant."

Lugar's bill, as well as a report released last year by the nation's top
financial regulators, defines a sophisticated investors as having at least
$25 million in assets.

Sachs also had serious reservations about the way Ewing's bill relieves
regulatory burdens for futures markets, saying that there may be some
unintended consequences for "legislating" relief.

"Once such provisions are written into law, the regulators will have no
ability to review and amend them should subsequent market developments
warrant change or should other problems arise," Sachs said.

In addition, Sachs was troubled by some changes to the rules overseeing
government securities that, he said, could "undermine the laws that Congress
put in place in recent years that were designed to uphold and strengthen the
integrity of the government securities market."

Patrick Parkinson, associate director of the division of research and
statistics for the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve, also
criticized a section of the bill that he said would "leave uncertainty about
whether some electronic trading systems for financial contracts between
professional counterparties were subject to the (Commodities Exchange Act)."

C. Robert Paul, general counsel for the CFTC, had concerns of his own about
the legislation. He highlighted problems with the way the bill handles metal
and energy commodities as they relate to electronic trading systems.

For his part, Ewing warned regulators that Congress may run out of time to
pass the legislation this year if the agencies can't agree on key aspects of
the bill.

"I hesitate to say, let's pass those parts we agree on. It's pretty easy to
pat yourself on the back and just do the easy work," Ewing said.

Several lawmakers criticized the SEC and CFTC for holding up progress for
the sake of politics. The two agencies have deep differences of opinion over
how to regulate single-stock futures.

Ewing's bill gives the CFTC almost exclusive authority over single-stock
futures. The SEC wants to share jurisdiction over the new product.

"I really don't necessarily see this as a turf battle," Nazareth said
following her testimony. "There are significant challenges in crafting a
framework that protects investors in the way they have come to expect in the
securities market."

Dow Jones Energy Service, 6/15/00
Japan Online Power Trading May Spark More Deregulation
By Mika Watanabe

TOKYO -(Dow Jones)- Partial deregulation of Japan's power industry in March
hasn't exactly charged up the country's power sector, as industrial and
commercial users have yet to take advantage of their newly-won freedom to
pick suppliers.

However, the launch of online electricity trading in Japan later this year
will likely lure more independent power suppliers into the market, spurring
trading activity and possibly prompting the government to take further
deregulation steps ahead of a scheduled review in March 2003, analysts say.

Among the early birds hoping to provide the catalyst for this process in the
form of a trading system are Japanese trading house Itochu Corp. (J.CIT or
8001) and the U.S.' Automated Power Exchange (X.AUP), which plan to launch a
Web-based electric power exchange in November.

U.S.-based Enron Corp. (ENE) has also launched its global EnronOnline
Internet trading platform for a variety of commodities and financial
products and is approaching companies here with the eventual target of
trading electricity.

"Even though the market will be limited initially, if the trading mechanism
were there, a substantial number of large-lot buyers who seek lower prices
would participate, while potential sellers who hold excess generation
capacity would also join in, to make money from their idle assets," said
Naoto Hashimoto, a senior utility analyst at Nomura Securities.

As of March, Japan's 8,000-odd high-volume industrial and commercial users -
which together represent 27% of total Japanese power demand - are now free
to choose their suppliers.

"The potential is enormous," agreed Hideki Yokoyama, general manager of
Itochu's power project group. "Though the performance (of our online
exchange) won't necessarily be stellar at first, its early launch should
pave a smooth way to grab some 65% of the Japanese electricity market, which
is slated to open in the next stage of deregulation within three years."

Yokoyama also noted a chicken-and-egg effect: while trading activity would
likely lead to faster deregulation, specific liberalization measures would
lead to more activity. Online electricity trading might take hold in Japan
sooner than expected if requirements discouraging potential entrants are
eased in response to growing complaints from various industries, he said.

Even after partial deregulation, independent power producers who want to
sell retail electricity are still fettered by several inflexible
requirements. For example, companies must sign a one-year or longer
transmission grid leasing contract and a costly back-up supply contract with
existing utilities.

Yokoyama predicts that the Ministry of International Trade and Industry
might relax such requirements before the 2003 review.

"Potential entrants' calls for online trading could set a wave of e-commerce
in motion, and that would put added pressure on the regulators," he said.

Utilities' Participation Key To Boosting Liquidity

Experts concede that online electricity trading liquidity is likely to be
thin in the initial stage, but they say volume will snowball as domestic
utility giants enter the market.

APX and Itochu plan to form a joint venture in July for their online
exchange, tentatively called JPX, and expect Japanese utilities as well as
other energy concerns to invest in the Y1.5-billion venture.

"We will keep the door open for any regional power monopolies," said
Yokoyama, adding that some utilities are now studying the trading mechanism
with keen interest.

"It's just a matter of time before some farsighted existing utilities use
the new mechanism to hedge against potential risks such as losing customers
and falling prices, and this will consequently increase market liquidity,"
predicted Nomura's Hashimoto.

Outside the power concerns, the likely participation of other domestic
heavyweights, including Osaka Gas Co. (J.OSG or 9532) and Nippon Telegraph &
Telephone Corp. (NTT or 9432) should also provide a tremendous boost to the
electricity market, said Masanori Maruo, a Tokyo-based utility analyst at
Deutsche Securities Ltd.

NTT, Osaka Gas and Tokyo Gas Co. (J.TYG or 9531) already unveiled in March
their plan to team up in entering Japan's retail electricity business.

"Gas utilities and NTT hold massive excess power generation capacity, while
NTT is the country's largest electricity user which alone represents 0.5% of
entire domestic consumption," said Maruo. "The combination will be able to
play a significant role in electricity trading by taking a two-way position
to offset risks," he said.

In addition, some domestic and foreign financial firms, including Industrial
Bank of Japan Ltd. (J.IBJ or 8302) and Morgan Stanley Dean Witter & Co.
(MWD), are set to offer various electricity-linked derivatives, designed to
manage risks from fluctuations in demand and prices. Such products could
spur further market participation of existing utilities as well as potential
sellers.

Analysts say the biggest long-term risks are those faced by utilities which
lag behind in doing business the new way. While market participation won't
bring them much financial gain, such power companies have the most
compelling need to hedge against price fluctuations, as they surrender their
price-setting monopolies to market forces.

"It may seem that power utilities have little to gain from participating in
online trading, but in fact, they have much to lose if they stay away from
the trading mechanism," as they fall behind in hedging risks, said
Hashimoto. "Eventually, they'd end up playing a loser's game."

The Wall Street Journal Europe, 6/14/00
Philippines Relaxes Banks' Requirement To Raise Capital

MANILA -- The Philippine Central Bank has decided to withdraw a requirement
for banks to raise their minimum capital for 2000, a move expected to ease
investors' concerns over the stability of the country's banking industry,
analysts said.

The decision to eliminate the third and final round of a capital increase
for banks effectively extends to Dec. 31, 2000, the deadline for compliance
with last year's minimum capital requirement of 4.95 billion pesos (122.2
million euros) for universal banks and 2.4 billion pesos for commercial
banks.

Originally, universal banks were required to raise their minimum capital to
5.3 billion pesos by the end of 2000, while commercial banks were required
to raise their minimum capital to 2.8 billion pesos.

In the Philippines, universal banks are commercial banks with expanded
licenses that allow them to venture into noncommercial banking operations
such as investment banking and fund management.

The central bank's decision to relax its capital rule will prevent a loss of
confidence in banks that would otherwise have had a difficult time meeting
the new requirement, said Angping & Associates Securities Inc. The move will
also prevent panic among depositors that could lead to heavy withdrawals at
banks or the banks' closure, Angping added.

The central bank's capital requirement for banks may be adjusted next year
in line with the new risk-based capital framework contained in the recently
passed General Banking Act.

The framework allows the central bank to impose new capital requirements
based on the activities banks are involved in and the capital risks tied to
them. Higher capitalization may be imposed, for instance, on banks engaged
in high-risk transactions such as derivatives trading, central bank Gov.
Rafael Buenaventura said.

The central bank implemented a three-stage increase of the minimum capital
of banks in 1998 in a bid to strengthen the banking system to prevent a
fallout from the Asian financial crisis. Ironically, however, the higher
capital requirements indirectly led to the closure of one commercial bank
and heavy withdrawals at two other banks earlier this year. Last month,
Urban Bank closed after experiencing a liquidity crunch after several days
of withdrawals by depositors.

The withdrawals were triggered by rumors that the bank's previous downgrade
to a thrift bank from a commercial bank was because of cash flow problems.
The bank was downgraded because it couldn't meet the original 2.4 billion
peso capital requirement deadline for commercial banks as of the end of
1999.

The Economist, 6/10/00
Danger Signs

An unusual thing happened this week in America. The prices of corporate
bonds rose. Of late they have proved a dreadful investment-worse by far than
government bonds. How much farther their prices will rise depends largely on
what happens in the market in which they are priced: the swaps market. That
market is in turmoil.

Swaps are the glue that binds together the world's financial system. First
developed in the early 1980s, they now dwarf other financial instruments. At
the end of last year there were some $46 trillion of swaps outstanding,
compared with $5.4 trillion in, for example, international bond markets.

Broadly, swaps come in two forms: interest-rate swaps and currency swaps.
Simply put, both allow parties to exchange cash-flows. In a currency swap,
the two exchange currencies and re-exchange them at maturity at the same
rate. In the meantime they exchange interest payments.  In a typical
interest-rate swap, one side exchanges a floating-rate obligation (generally
based on Libor, the rate at which the best banks lend to each other) for a
fixed one.

This simplicity has made swaps, and interest-rate swaps in particular, a
very useful tool.  They allow banks, for example, to match their assets and
liabilities much more closely. If they have lots of short-term floating-rate
liabilities (such as savings accounts) but long-term fixed-rate assets (such
as loans) they can "swap" long-term assets into short-term ones. Likewise,
companies can use swaps to convert fixed-rate debt (which investors might
prefer) into floating-rate debt, or vice versa.

The level of the fixed rate in the swap reflects, among other things, the
willingness of the market to accept corporate debt rather than government
debt, which means that the swap rate is calculated at a spread over
government bonds. Euro swap-spreads have risen in recent weeks, but dollar
swap-spreads have widened dramatically. Ten-year spreads peaked at the end
of May at 140 basis points (hundredths of a percentage point)-a higher
spread than ever before (see chart on next page). They have since narrowed,
but are still wider than at the height of the financial crisis that followed
Russia's default. At times in recent weeks, the swaps market has shut down
completely; nobody was willing to receive a fixed rate.

What on earth is going on? There are, broadly, two sets of explanations, one
relatively benign, the other emphatically not. The benign view is that the
rise in swap spreads is explicable by rising interest rates, greater default
risk, and the relative sizes of government-and corporate-bond markets.

Governments are issuing fewer bonds. On optimistic assumptions, America's
government could buy back all its debt by 2010. American companies, in
contrast, are borrowing hugely. That makes government bonds more valuable,
compared with corporate debt. It reflects what Stephen Compton, head of
bonds at Schroder Salomon Smith Barney in Europe, calls "the privatisation
of the bond markets".

Rising interest rates, too, are partly to blame for widening swap spreads.
When the market thinks that interest rates will rise, there is more of an
incentive to pay, rather than receive, a fixed rate. That incentive is
greater at times when, as now, long-term rates are lower than short-term
ones (an "inverted yield curve"). This means that anybody receiving a fixed
(long-term) rate and paying a floating one loses money.

Then there is the increase in corporate debt Credit Suisse First Boston
(CSFB) expects American companies to issue as many bonds this year as they
did last, when they sold record amounts. Importantly for swap spreads, one
reason that firms are borrowing so much is to buy back their shares. So
American companies are becoming ever more highly geared, and hence less
creditworthy. Share buy-backs are running at double last year's level and,
reckons David Goldman, a strategist at CSFB, will remain in vogue as long as
debt is relatively cheap, and firms' managers think that more leverage is
good for shareholder value.

If this were not enough, swap-market folk also point accusing fingers at
Gary Gensler, under-secretary at the American Treasury. In March, he said
that federally sponsored agencies, such as Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which
everybody assumed were guaranteed by the government, were not. The yield on
their debt rose sharply. Since they are the biggest actors in the swaps
market, so did swap spreads.

Swap knot

Taken together, these factors might seem enough to explain what has
happened. But James Bianco, who runs an eponymous research firm, thinks they
are not. Swap spreads, he points out, have been widening for the past three
and a half years-before any of these other factors cropped up. And they do
not explain why swap spreads have risen so fast this year.

Mr. Bianco argues that two things dominate the pricing of interest-rate
swaps: interest rates and credit concerns. For most of the 1990S swap rates
went up and down with interest rates. That relationship has now largely
broken down, suggests Mr. Bianco, because markets have become more concerned
over risks to the financial system, as a result of the crises of recent
years. If Mr. Bianco is right, this has important ramifications: it suggests
there are growing worries about the riskiness of the swaps market, based on
fears about the health of financial firms-by far the biggest participants.

Pshaw, say critics: there is no credit risk in the swaps market. Forget
about those telephone-number figures: no principal amount is exchanged in a
swap, so what matters is not the "notional" amount at risk but the cost of
replacing the swaps-a far lower number. Moreover, big banks post collateral
if they are on the losing side of a swap, thus eliminating even any residual
risk.

Really? "Swaps are perceived as riskless. That must be wrong," says a
treasurer at a big bank. Unlike futures exchanges, the swaps market looks
only at current exposures, not potential ones (futures exchanges demand a
dollop of cash up front to cover the second). And the market has grown so
much that these potential risks are becoming huge.

So it is at least plausible that people are starting to fret about the
banking system. But why might this be a problem in America, of all places?
Because it is taking ever more risk to generate the returns demanded by
share-holders. Bank lending is growing by 10% at an annual rate, and
property lending by 13.5%, its highest rate since 1989. If anything, these
rates are accelerating because, after nine years of growth and few defaults,
banks' backward-looking risk models tell them that lending is a fine
business.

And not just in America. In Europe, too, banks are taking more risk to
generate higher returns. At best, the swap market is merely reflecting this
increase in risk. At worst, it might be signaling that the world's financial
system is in danger of becoming unglued.

End of ISDA Press Report, Thursday, June 15, 2000.

THE ISDA PRESS REPORT IS PREPARED FOR THE LIMITED USE OF ISDA STAFF, ISDA'S
BOARD OF DIRECTORS AND SPECIFIED CONSULTANTS TO ISDA.  THIS PRESS REPORT IS
NOT FOR DISTRIBUTION (EITHER WITHIN OR WITHOUT AN ORGANIZATION), AND ISDA IS
NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY USE TO WHICH THESE MATERIALS MAY BE PUT.

test

Scott, thanks for the note.  Mark

Congrats!  It is a good ground breaking deal.  Mark

I would try Rick Shapiro.  Mark

Rick:

As you know, Clinton should sign, over the next couple of days, legislation 
on electronic signatures.  There is a big need to standardize the approach 
with respect to e-signatures on trading contracts and maybe confirmations.  I 
think this is an area that ISDA could provide leadership and possibly make 
money through a protocol.  Let me know what you think.

Mark

Bob:

I think the RFP looks great.  The one question I had was whether or not we 
wanted to put in the RFP our objective in terms of income from the facility.  
Also, should we encourage joint bids?  Take care.

Mark

Peter:

At this point, it seems to me, it may be helpful, but not materially helpful 
to bid through a separate entity.  Do you disagree with this conclusion?

Mark

Lance, it looks fine to me with exception of the reference to Kinneman.  
Please revise and send out.  Mark

Please look at this and give me your comments.  Mark
	"Fleishman, Shari" <sfleishman@AKINGUMP.COM>
	06/22/2000 09:56 AM
		 
               Mr. Haedicke,

               My name is Shari Fleishman.  I am an attorney with Akin, Gump, 
Strauss, Hauer & Feld, L.L.P. in Washington, D.C., and I was referred to you 
by Charles Moore.  

               Thank you for agreeing to help us arrange interviews with 
Enron employees Fred Lagrasta and Bill Bradford.  To give you some 
background, we are representing Statoil Energy Trading, Inc. in a breach of 
contract dispute with Central Resources, Inc. regarding losses and costs 
resulting from Central's alleged default of its obligations under the terms 
of natural gas and crude oil swap and swaption transactions.  Statoil alleges 
that Central did not provide the credit assurances required once it exceeded 
its credit limit, so Statoil terminated the transactions.  During 
negotiations, however, prior to termination, Central and Statoil were 
negotiating with Enron regarding a possible assignment of the transactions to 
Enron.  This was not consummated, but we would be inquiring into the 
circumstances surrounding the proposed assignment.  We would like to 
interview Enron employees Fred Lagrasta and Bill Bradford regarding these 
discussions concerning the potential assignment, in o!
rder to evaluate whether there is any need to depose either of these 
individuals.  

               Please let me know if you need anything further, and again, I 
appreciate your cooperation in arranging these interviews.  You can call me 
at 202-887-4387, or e-mail me, to discuss arrangements.  Thank you for your 
help.

The information contained in this e-mail message is intended only for the 
personal and confidential use of the recipient(s) named above. This message 
may be an attorney-client communication and/or work product and as such is 
privileged and confidential. If the reader of this message is not the 
intended recipient or an agent responsible for delivering it to the intended 
recipient, you are hereby notified that you have received this document in 
error and that any review, dissemination, distribution, or copying of this 
message is strictly prohibited. If you have received this communication in 
error, please notify us immediately by e-mail, and delete the original 
message. 

Pete, thanks for the memo.  Mark

George:
We have a new lawyer in Alan's group starting in a few weeks.  I want this 
lawyer to help Wayne.  I think this will take care of the issue.   Thanks.  
Mark

FYI
	Travis McCullough
	06/23/2000 06:03 PM
		 
Steve:

Attached is a series of press releases by MG Plc regarding their metals 
website, the first of which was launched on or about October 4, 1999.

I also have a message in to the attorneys at Enron that worked closely on the 
acquisition, but one of our commercial people understands the site to be an 
on-line brokerage system (like E*Trade) -- the press release on the launch of 
the system (at the bottom of this message) indicates that the site is an LME 
trading and execution system.  I'll forward over any other information I can 
find.     

USA: Metal exchanges hold firm as Web trading blooms.

06/22/2000
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2000. 

NEW YORK, June 22 (Reuters) - The world's two largest metal exchanges said 
they will retain their roles despite the rapid expansion in Internet trading 
and as another major metal dealer announced the launch of an online trading 
system on Thursday. 
The London Metal Exchange (LME) is carefully planning its introduction of 
electronic trading in the second-half of this year and refuses to be 
"spooked" by those "urging action, any action, as long as it is now," 
Jonathan Haslam, LME director of corporate affairs, told a conference in New 
York.
His comments were echoed by Patrick Thompson, president of the New York 
Mercantile Exchange (NYMEX), who said it would be very difficult for the new 
online trading systems to bring together those elements that underpinned the 
success of the traditional exchanges. 
Thompson told the Metal Bulletin E-Commerce 2000 conference that said these 
elements included the handling of counterparty credit risk, the clearing of 
trades and the existing pools of liquidity provided by the different segments 
of the metals market which use the exchanges. 
Haslam compared the LME's trading turnover averaging $8 billion a day with 
the around $1.5 billion a day traded online by U.S. energy giant Enron Corp. 
. 
Enron's expansion in the e-commerce market was earlier referred to by Thomas 
Pimpinelli, senior vice president of MG London Inc. part of U.K.-based metals 
trading group MG Plc . In May, MG agreed to a 300 pence per share cash offer 
from Enron. 
Pimpinelli said MG's own MITS online metals trading system, launched in 
October 1999, has to date processed over 135,000 contracts with an overall 
value of $5.25 billion. 
He told the meeting that between 65 percent to 80 percent of MG's order flow, 
mostly from small metals clients, was now done over the Internet. 
Pimpinelli said the success of its "Market Maker" real-time trading facility 
within MITS for tonnages of up to a 1,000 tonnes, had encouraged the company 
to create a new product for the Managed Futures industry called "CTA Trader." 
The product will differ from Market Maker in that the customer can trade 
larger volumes, request a volume quote on-line, and then have the facility to 
book the resulting live on-line quote. 
"Once executed the customers will need to breakdown or allocate the 
transaction to his individual or multiple pre-approved clearing houses by way 
of a dropdown menu," he said. Pimpinelli added that CTA Trader would be 
launched in the next month or so. 
Sharing a platform with Pimpinelli, Karl Hackert, head of e-commerce at U.S. 
trader Koch Metals, announced the impending launch of his company's own 
online metals trading system by the end of June. Koch metals is a unit of 
Koch Industries Inc. . 
Hackert said the issue of the LME's daily forward prices valuation at 5.30 
p.m. in London, meant that the level of these quotes wasn't clear during the 
rest of the trading day. Under the new Koch system prices will be updated 
every five seconds and out to 27 months. 
"Koch are the first to do this (offer near real-time forward prices) and it 
is a big step forward in terms of market transparency," he said. 
Hackert said Koch had built its system to better communicate with its clients 
and it did not intend to go into direct competition with the LME. 
"Making a generic mass system? I don't think that's the business we're in," 
he said. 
((Steve Hays, New York Commodity desk, 212 8591640)).

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

UK: UPDATE 2-MG to widen access to online metals trade.
By Andy Blamey

06/13/2000
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2000. 

LONDON, June 13 (Reuters) - U.K.-based metals trading group MG plc said on 
Tuesday it would broaden access to its online metals trading systems as the 
battle for web pre-eminence comes to the boil. 
MG, one of the world's leading metals traders, said it would allow London 
Metal Exchance clearing members to use the system, which had been restricted 
to clients, with immediate effect.
The move comes in response to strong demand for access to the system, an MG 
spokesman said. MG has so far signed up 14 Category One (ring dealing) and 
Category Two (associate broker clearing) members of the LME. 
"We have decided to broaden the availability of Market Maker following the 
rapid increase in volumes and substantial uptake by both existing and new 
clients," said Michael Hutchinson, CEO of MG's Financial Services Division in 
a statement. 
"We are confident that we have an online product which will meet demand from 
other clearing members of the LME." 
The wider access to MG's system need not necessarily pose a threat to other 
online marketplaces, said Gavin Gross, head of LME metals at brokerage 
Spectron Futures Ltd. Spectron plans to launch online systems to trade London 
Metal Exchange contracts later this month. 
"They're very different models. MG is a principal in the market, so you're 
looking at MG prices only. Spectron is neutral, we're just providing a 
platform. It's a multilateral system with lots of dealers interacting with 
each other," Gross said. 
"The two can exist side by side," he added. 
Over 80 percent of MG's clients are now using its online services, the 
company said. Market Maker turnover stood at 3,000 contracts in May - a 
growth rate of approximately 50 percent per month since the launch in January 
of this year. 
Online deals still make up a low proportion of MG's total trading turnover, 
however. 
MG's MITS system launched in October 1999 and has now processed over 95,000 
contracts with a dollar value in excess of $3.8 billion and a monthly 
turnover in excess of $1 billion. 
"We are using it (MITS) for the one or two lot small stop orders that you 
previously missed and had the customer ringing up asking if we had done his 
trade," said one user of an MG system at an ABCM. 
However, it would appear that MG is now limiting the size of the orders it 
will accept on MITS from its non-customers, he said. 
Metals e-commerce sites are proliferating, but they follow no single business 
model. There are portals run by single principals quoting their own prices; 
intranets where big market players are cooperating; different rules for 
access; and a wide variation in revenue models, the key to profitability. 
The company announced in March it had joined Internet Capital Group and 
Safeguard International Fund to form the EMETRA joint venture, in which MG 
has a 25 percent stake. 
EMETRA is building a worldwide business-to-business (B2B) e-commerce 
marketplace for the non-ferrous metals markets, including physical trading a 
futures and options contracts. 
MG contributed its Internet systems to EMETRA and continues to use MITS and 
Market Maker under a licence agreement with EMETRA. 
In May, MG agreed a 300 pence per share cash offer from U.S. energy and 
communications group Enron, a major player in the e-commerce market through 
Enron Online, which trades around 840 products in some 13 countries in 11 
currencies.

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

US Enron Bid For MG May Signal End Of LME Outcry Trading
By Adam Aljewicz

05/23/2000
Dow Jones International News 
(Copyright (c) 2000, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.) 

LONDON -(Dow Jones)- Enron's (ENE) offer to buy London Metal Exchange ring 
dealing firm MG PLC (U.MGA) could bring the exchange one step closer to 
ending open outcry trading, dealers say. 
Both the U.S.-based energy and communications group, and MG have pioneered 
electronic trading and are widely seen as being among the only participants 
on the LME trading floor capable of making the transition to on-screen 
trading. The LME, meanwhile, is also seeking to introduce on-screen 
technology for out-of-ring trading sessions.
"We're not surprised in the least to see this tie-up take place," an analyst 
at Deutsche Bank told Dow Jones Newswires. "Everything we see now is pointing 
toward the removal of the ring-dealing sessions, and it's just a matter of 
time before it ends all together," she said. 
MG's chairman Tom McKeever said the company won't abandon its position as an 
LME ring dealing member, but market watchers doubt whether - after 123 years 
- open outcry can survive on the LME as fast-paced technological change 
sweeps through the industry. 
Enron has made a GBP300 million cash offer for London-based MG in a bid to 
gain a foothold in the $120 billion-a-year world metal market. The U.S. 
company already has a substantial market share in natural gas and electricity 
markets, and with its electronic trading platform, Enron On Line, it has 
already executed more than 110,000 transactions valued at over $45 billion 
since its launch in November. 
"It's not surprising to see a strategic link up between an energy and metals 
company because they're both very big in industrial commodities," said an 
analyst for a U.S.-based commission house. "I think it's almost inevitable 
that open outcry trading will be a thing of the past," he said. 
Enron's move into the metals market has also been linked to the LME's growing 
interest in initiating an automated trading system, and has lead some market 
watchers to suggest that the Enron-MG tie-up will lead to greater 
consolidation among LME members. 
Metals trading companies and brokerage firms are struggling to survive as 
profits wane amid the growth of banks and funds in the metals trading arena. 
"Out of the 13 ring dealing firms on the LME, I think only six will be able 
to make the transition to on-screen trading," said a dealer for a 
London-based bank. "And that's only because we have a banking background," he 
said. 
The six cited are MG, the metals trading arm of the Bank of Nova Scotia, 
U.S.-based brokerage Refco Inc., Credit Lyonnais Rouse, Barclays Capital and 
Fimat Metals. 
The LME's existing system involves the trading of eight metals within its 
circular trading floor. Around 35% of the LME's trading takes place there, 
but this figure could drop if the LME decides to abandon open outcry, traders 
say. "Market participants will have to decide whether to use the ring 
or go through the Internet," said a dealer. "That's how it will start
and will probably lead to the trading floor being bypassed
altogether." 

MG, which was spun off from Germany's Metallgesellschaft last September, has 
pioneered the use of metals trading on the Internet with the launch in 
October of MITS and MARKET MAKER, its Internet trading system. 
MG is the second-largest physical merchant of copper, nickel and aluminum in 
Europe after Switzerland's Glencore. 
"When profit margins are narrowing and so many LME companies are looking more 
and more uncertain about their future, MG (is) arguably the pick of the crop 
in terms of stability and profitably," said a dealer for a North 
American-owned ring dealing firm. LME Considers Screen Trading 

Separately, the LME has considered a series of moves that would also hasten 
the demise of open outcry trading. 
It has repeatedly said it is looking to develop an electronic screen-trading 
system for use in out of ring trading sessions, and that it plans to press 
ahead with changes to its ownership structure by demutualizing in favor of 
becoming a shareholder entity. 
"We've made very clear that there are proposals for consequential changes to 
the LME's governance," said Jonathan Haslam, director of corporate affairs at 
the LME. 
The LME set up an eight-member committee in February which comprised four 
ring dealing members and four associate broker members to map out a strategy 
for the implementation of new technology. 
However, it has so far declined to comment on how this technology will be 
executed, although Haslam has said the LME is looking at around 20 companies 
with the requisite knowledge and background to provide and implement the 
on-screen technology. 
"We said we would look into setting up an interoffice screen trading system 
but we have yet to come to a decision on who our technical partner will be," 
he said. "But we should come to a decision in a couple of weeks." 
-By Adam Aljewicz; 44-20-7842-9353; adam.aljewicz@dowjones.com -0- 23/05/00 
12-56G

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

Financial Post
MG exceeds $1B Internet trade target
Martin Hayes
Reuters

04/05/2000
National Post 
National 
!@SERIES=
C14
(c) Copyright 2000 Financial Post from National Post (formerly The Financial 
Post Company). All rights reserved. 

LONDON - International metals trader MG PLC said yesterday that business on 
its six-month old Internet trading systems had comfortably exceeded its 
transaction value target of $1-billion (all figures in U.S. dollars). 
"We are at $1.5-billion as of this morning. We are are very pleased with the 
progress and the rate of growth," said Tom McKeever, MG chairman.
He noted that online trading in metals is seen growing rapidly, according to 
a recent study by Anderson Consulting. Just 2% to 3% of business in the 
non-ferrous industry is currently conducted online, while in three to five 
years it will be 40% to 60%, he said. 
Since the launch in October, volumes on MG's internet systems, known as MITS 
and MARKET MAKER, have increased by 50% a month and cumulatively exceed 
30,000 contracts now. 
MG said it had also gained customers as its systems are the only ones that 
currently offer online trading. "When we launched the system, we had requests 
from many new customers to register. We registered quite a few new customers. 
It is beyond our expectations," Mr. McKeever added. 
The increase in on-line business on MITS has been seen round the clock as 
customers have become increasingly comfortable with the system. 
"We were the first to start the system. It has been late coming to the metals 
business, but we think it is good for the industry," he said. 
Last month, MG announced it had joined Internet Capital Group and Safeguard 
International Fund to form an eMetra joint venture in which it has a 25% 
stake.

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

MG PLC - Trading Update

04/04/2000
Regulatory News Service 
Copyright (C) 2000 Regulatory News Service; Source: World Reporter (TM) 

MG INTERNET TRADING UPDATE 
MG announces that in the first six months of trading on its Internet systems, 
MITS and MARKET MAKER, it has surpassed its target of US $1 billion in value 
of transactions. The volume of transactions has been increasing by 50% a 
month since October and cumulatively exceeds 30,000 contracts.
The trading systems have attracted new customers as well as MG's existing 
customers because it is the only system currently available that offers them 
an on-line LME trading and execution service. 
The launch of MITS was announced in October 1999 by MG. In February, MG 
announced that it had joined with Internet Capital Group and Safeguard 
International Fund to form the eMetra joint venture, in which MG has a 25% 
stake. eMetra is in the process of establishing a worldwide 
business-to-business (B2B) e-commerce marketplace for the non-ferrous metals 
markets, including physical trading and the trading of futures and options 
contracts. MG contributed its Internet systems to eMetra and continues to use 
MITS and MARKET MAKER under a licence agreement with eMetra. Once eMetra is 
fully operational later this year, MG will become a user of eMetra's 
platform. 
Michael Hutchinson, Joint Chief Executive of MG plc, said: "We are delighted 
that so many customers to date have transferred their business on to the 
Internet - we see this trend as increasing significantly in the coming 
months. It is proving attractive to new customers and enables us to give our 
existing customers a more efficient service." 
For further information: 
Michael Hutchinson, Joint Chief Executive MG plc Tel: 0171 488 2244 
Nick Denton/James Longfield Hogarth Partnership Tel: 0171 357 9477

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

City: MG plans to launch metals website
James Ashton

02/11/2000
The Daily Telegraph 
Copyright (C) 2000 The Daily Telegraph; Source: World Reporter (TM) 

MG, the international metals trader, yesterday unveiled plans to develop an 
internet marketplace for trading non-ferrous metals, in direct competition 
with the London Metals Exchange (LME). 
The joint venture with the Internet Capital Group (ICG) and private equity 
fund Safeguard International will establish a worldwide business-to-business 
e-commerce platform for non-ferrous metals. This will include physical 
trading and the trading of options and futures contracts.
MG shares soared 140 1/2 to 337 1/2 p. 
"We didn't go into this venture intending to put anyone out of business," 
said chairman Thomas McKeever. 
He added that the as-yet-unnamed new venture would attract new clients, 
particularly small and medium-sized companies who regard conventional LME 
trade as too costly and complex. 
He said he also hoped to open up the derivatives market to smaller players. 
"When you develop a global marketplace you attract, presumably, most industry 
participants," he added. 
Safeguard and Nasdaq-listed ICG, which already has stakes in more than 50 
companies offering online trading in sectors such as industrial chemicals, 
plastics and cattle, have invested a total of $25 million in the venture, 
taking 30 and 45pc stakes respectively. 
MG, the world's largest copper merchant, will hold an initial 25pc, with an 
option to increase that to 50pc within eight months. The company, which 
floated last September at 205p, after being spun off from German engineering 
group Metallgesellschaft, will continue to operate its internet trading 
system Mits for existing customers. It began live internet dealing of 
aluminium and copper in January.

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

MG expects MITS to be a hit.
CHRISTIAN KOHL

10/14/1999
American Metal Market 
8
Copyright 1999 Information Access Company. All rights reserved. COPYRIGHT 
1999 Cahners Publishing Company 

DUSSELDORF -- Only one week after London Metal Exchange trader 
Metallgesellschaft Ltd. launched its web site system that allows trade 
execution services on the Internet, it is optimistic that the concept will be 
a hit. 
"It's been quite extraordinary," said Alex Health, MG's director of 
e-commerce systems. "We've had something like 300 reactions so far from both 
existing customer companies as well as new ones logging on." He said that the 
non-customers entering MG'S site (www.mgltd.co.uk) ranged from large groups 
MG had wanted to make contact with for a longtime to small companies that 
Heath said he'd never heard of. 

"Of course, it's LME Week now, so we are busy with socializing and making 
contacts there before we can reply to the requests we've received," Heath 
said. He noted that LME Week was one important factor in launching the 
Metallgesellschaft Internet Trading System (MITS) in time to display it at 
Broker's House by Tuesday evening. MG Plc's recent floatation also provided a 
major motivation for the project to raise MG's profile, he said: 
Heath said that MITS has not had an immediate effect on trading volumes 
beyond the regular market, activity, but 70. customers so far had used the 
facility for deals. He added that MITS might soon contribute to MG's customer 
base, but it would take some time for new parties attracted to the site to be 
registered as regular customers. 
At the beginning of LME Week, few LME trading companies were prepared to 
comment on MITS and its possible effect on metals trading. MG's presentations 
at the LME event were aimed at providing a clearer picture. "I'd be extremely 
disappointed if the idea didn't spread as the Internet will inevitably be a 
big factor in trading," Heath said. He noted that MG put itself under 
pressure by moving before some other company with a similar 
project-in-the-making could enter the scene. 
"Speed is a definite factor in the Internet, and we can claim to be leading 
into the new millennium in this regard," he said, adding that MG received 
many "flattering comments" from brokers. 
Peter Sellars of Barclays Bank Plc conceded that "certainly they got there 
before anybody else" but added that "they won't have very much of a lead 
time." He said that the Internet was going to be the way of the future and 
that Barclays was making similar preparations, but so far offered a web site 
order trading system only for non-metallic futures. He noted, however, that 
web site trading would not satisfy all requirements. "It's great for the 
small bread-and-butter stuff, but for long-term contracts it's gonna be 
tricky, isn't it," Sellars said. 
A spokesman at Triland Metals Ltd., another LME member, questioned whether MG 
was really embracing technology or vice versa. "It could be a gimmick for 
customers, and it doesn't really mean they're successful with enlarging their 
customer base," he said. He noted that people were always interested in 
coming close but weren't necessarily keen on taking the final step. He said 
that Triland had no immediate plans for a similar service and that it was 
confining its web site plans to statistics and other basic information. "They 
jumped the gun to a certain extent, but we'll have to see if it's successful 
or not."

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

European & Emerging Markets
MG Launches First Internet Metals Trade Service
A Wall Street Journal Europe Roundup

10/05/1999
The Wall Street Journal Europe 
16
(Copyright (c) 1999, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.) 

LONDON -- MG PLC has launched the first Internet-based metals futures trading 
system. 
MG, which went public on the London Stock Exchange in September, offers a 
full trading and execution service on the London Metals Exchange.
The system, which is called MITS, will be supported by a real-time price 
screen for all the metals traded on the LME and includes a multi-currency 
facility. The LME trades copper, aluminium, lead, zinc, nickel, tin, silver 
and aluminium alloy. 
In addition, customers can listen to a direct voice commentary from the floor 
of the LME during trading sessions. 
Technical analysis and market research on all LME metals is available and 
regularly updated. Customers can also access their position and valuation 
statements over a secure encrypted link to the firm's computer system. 
MITS can only be accessed by registered customers of Metallgesellsc haft 
Limited, MG's LME brokerage and trading arm. 
"It is a customer service and it is live now to our registered customers," 
said Michael Hutchinson, MG's joint chief executive. 
MG's customers will also be able to listen to a direct-voice commentary from 
the floor of the LME during trading sessions. They will also be able to 
access their position and valuation statements over a secure encrypted link 
to MG's computer system, MG said. 
The LME is the world's largest non-ferrous metals market with 14 ring-dealing 
members who participate in the twice-daily important open-outcry sessions. 
The LME settlement prices for metals which are realized in the official 
morning trading sessions are the benchmark reference prices for most of the 
world's physical contracts. 
Outside the open-outcry sessions, LME business takes place over a 24-hour 
period via an inter-office telephone market. 
"We are always interested in any new uses of technology. We will watch this 
with interest," an LME spokeswoman said. 
MG said it intended to develop its website to eventually include real-time 
physical metal prices and premiums. 
MG's system is the latest in a series of Internet commodity trading systems.

..............................................................................
....................................................... 
?

MG PLC - Re Internet Trading System

10/04/1999
Regulatory News Service 
Copyright (C) 1999 Regulatory News Service; Source: World Reporter (TM) 

Introduction of the first Internet LME trading system 
MG plc, the international metals trading business which floated on the London 
Stock Exchange in September 1999, today announces the launch of the world's 
first Internet based metals futures trading system, offering a full LME 
trading and execution service. The new site can be accessed at 
www.mgltd.co.uk and is designed to make dealing more efficient and more 
readily accessible to customers of Metallgesellschaft Limited, MG plc's LME 
brokerage and trading arm.
The system, which is called MITS, will be supported by a real time price 
screen for all the metals traded on the LME and includes a multi-currency 
facility. In addition customers can listen to a direct voice commentary from 
the floor of the LME during trading sessions. Technical analysis and market 
research on all LME metals is available and regularly updated. Customers can 
also access their position and valuation statements over a secure encrypted 
link to the firm's computer system. 
MITS can only be accessed by registered customers of Metallgesellschaft 
Limited. Prospective customers can view a demonstration programme at the 
website. The system will complement the company's traditional brokerage 
activities. 
Michael Hutchinson, Joint Chief Executive of MG plc, said today: 
"The development of MITS will make our business more efficient and make 
dealing for customers more accessible and cost-effective. Being the first LME 
broker to provide a comprehensive E-commerce system should further improve 
our competitive advantage, enabling us to reach all of our brokerage 
customers with timely and accurate information." 
MG plc intends to develop a site for its merchanting business, providing 
real-time physical metal prices, premiums and other related information. 
For further information: 
Michael Hutchinson, Joint Chief Executive MG plc Tel: 0171 488 2244 
Nick Denton/James Longfield Hogarth Partnership Tel: 0171 357 9477 
Background on MG plc 
MG plc is a leading independent international metals trading business 
providing services to the global metals industry. The group is organised into 
two operating divisions: Merchanting and Financial Services. The Merchanting 
division is buys, sells, stores, ships and trades non-ferrous metals as a 
principal with producers and consumers. It is the world's leading copper 
merchant, one of the top three merchants of copper concentrates and nickel 
and a leading European merchant of recycled metal. The Financial Services 
division is a leading metals broker and market-maker. It is a leading LME 
member and operates one of the leading LME metals warehousing businesses. MG 
is headquartered in London, and employs 320 people in 14 countries around the 
world. It was listed on the London Stock Exchange in September 1999 and has a 
current market capitalisation of some #175 million.

..............................................................................
....................................................... 

Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 

Travis McCullough

Thanks for asking, but my schedule does not permit speaking at that time.  
Mark

Stephen:

I would be happy to talk about that.  Give me a call at 713-853-6544.  Mark

Tim:  What's your reaction to this article on Cal Px?  Mark
	Vince J Kaminski
	06/23/2000 05:43 PM
		 
Mark,

Please, tale a look at the attached newsletter. An interesting story on 
gaming Cal
PX. Let me know if you have problems opening the document.

Vince

Energy Info Source <custsvc@energyinfosource.com> on 06/23/2000 07:24:22 AM
Energy Info Source - http://www.energyinfosource.com - is privileged to
make available to you a free trial subscription to Restructuring Today
until July 11.

Restructuring Today is the leading daily trade newsletter focused solely
on the deregulation, restructuring and convergence of the electric, natural
gas and telecommunications industries, with a special focus on emerging
markets.

You do not need to do anything to continue to receive this trial. However,
if you do not want to receive any more trial issues, please reply to us
and with the word "cancel" in the subject line.

Restructuring Today has distinctive industry news and analysis which Energy
Info Source can't deliver from the wire services, and at only $487 (regular
price for an individual subscription) for 250 issues each year, we consider
it a bargain. As a special offer to Energy Info Source users, Restructuring
Today is offering $50 off the regular subscription price.

Act before July 14 to receive your $50 off!

Check out the attached sample, and if you'd like to order an annual 
subscription,
choose your favorite way:

- Hit reply and fill out the subscriber information below.
- For fastest service call 888-986-2250 today!
- There's a handy subscription coupon on the last page of each issue of
Restructuring Today.

For credit card orders, please use the subscription coupon in the back
of the sample issue or call 888-986-2250.

For more information, feel free to email us at custsvc@energyinfosource.com
or call us at 888-986-2250.

Requires Acrobat Reader 3.1 or higher.  The latest version is available
free at:
http://www.adobe.com/prodindex/acrobat/readstep.html#reader

Name:
Title:
Company:
Billing Address:
Address cont.:
City:
ST:
Zip:
Country: USA
Phone:
Fax:
Email address:

[ ] Bill me
[ ] Call me for my credit card information

 - rt000623-EIS.pdf

The OGC meeting scheduled for Wednesday, July 5, has been cancelled.  The OGC 
meeting will resume on the normal schedule beginning Monday, July 10, at 8:30 
a.m.

Thank you.

Bob:

We are working on a "protocol" re electronic signatures.  Is this something 
isda would want to be involved in?  Maybe money could be made.  Let me know.

Mark
	Alan Aronowitz
	06/27/2000 05:31 PM
		 
Mark:

Pursuant to our discussion last week, below is a rough draft of a proposal 
for an electronic signature protocol, which could be presented to ISDA for 
further consideration and discussion after we have further discussed:

E-Signature Protocol

Objective: In light of the enactment of the US federal legislation on 
electronic signatures (effective as of 10/1/00), a simple, reliable, and 
enforceable protocol should be established to facilitate the electronic 
execution of Master Agreements (and confirmations where required).  To 
facilitate the wider use of electronic contracts, this protocol could be 
endorsed by ISDA. Hopefully, it would become a standard that others would use 
for all types of contracts. Perhaps, if necessary or helpful, the adoption of 
the protocol could be done electronically by each party unilaterally agreeing 
to abide by it, possibly using the same type of approach ISDA used in 
connection with the introduction of the EMU currency a few years ago.  
Initially, the protocol would be primarily applicable to U.S. counterparties, 
but it could be expanded to non-U.S. counterparties as e-signature laws like 
the new U.S. law are enacted across the globe.

Basic Protocol:  By adopting the protocol, each counterparty would agree that 
the relevant agreement may be electronically signed by complying with the 
following steps:

1) The parties negotiate and agree on a final form the relevant agreement, 
and appoint one of the parties ("First Party") to prepare the document for 
electronic signature;

2) The First Party prepares the final form in the PDF format (e.g., the body 
of the text could not be modified) with the exception of the blank signature 
blocks for each party to be placed on the last page of the agreement;

3) An authorized signatory of the First Party electronically signs the 
agreement (Note: this electronic signature could be accomplished by 
inscribing an electronic handwritten signature or the signatory typing in 
his/her name and title in the blank signature block);

4) The agreement, as electronically signed by the First Party, is sent via 
electronic means (e.g., by e-mail) by the First Party to the other party 
("Second Party");

5) An authorized signatory of the Second Party  electronically signs the 
agreement (Note: this electronic signature could be accomplished by 
impressing an electronic handwritten signature or the signatory typing in 
his/her name and title in the signature block);

6) The agreement, as electronically signed by the Second Party, is sent via 
electronic means (e.g., by e-mail) by the Second Party to the First Party, 
accordingly, creating the fully executed agreement; and

7) Each party would be responsible for maintaining in its own electronic 
archives the agreement as electronically signed by the parties.

Also, the following could be considered: (a) adding to the protocol that each 
party,by adopting the protocol, agrees to be bound by any agreement entered 
into by means of the protocol, and any other appropriate language to enhance 
the enforceability of the "e-signature" process and (b) adding to the 
preprinted form of the Master Agreement, a provision whereby each party 
adopts the electronic signature protocol endorsed by ISDA as in effect from 
time to time.

Mark, I would be happy to discuss this draft proposal with you further at 
your convenience.

Regards, Alan

Alan, I forwarded it on to the GC at ISDA and am looking forward to his 
comments.  Great job.  Mark

Bob:

I think we say we want the facility to be revenue enhancing and that we are 
in favor of joint bids.  Take care.

Mark

Yes I do think so.  He may want to coordinate with V&E, but that is ok.  
Please point out we are working with ISDA.   Mark

Let's try to use V&E on the e-signature things as much as possible.

Bob:

We are working on an e-signature "protocol" and wondered if ISDA wanted to 
take the lead in this matter?  Let me know.

Mark
	Alan Aronowitz
	06/27/2000 05:31 PM
		 
Mark:

Pursuant to our discussion last week, below is a rough draft of a proposal 
for an electronic signature protocol, which could be presented to ISDA for 
further consideration and discussion after we have further discussed:

E-Signature Protocol

Objective: In light of the enactment of the US federal legislation on 
electronic signatures (effective as of 10/1/00), a simple, reliable, and 
enforceable protocol should be established to facilitate the electronic 
execution of Master Agreements (and confirmations where required).  To 
facilitate the wider use of electronic contracts, this protocol could be 
endorsed by ISDA. Hopefully, it would become a standard that others would use 
for all types of contracts. Perhaps, if necessary or helpful, the adoption of 
the protocol could be done electronically by each party unilaterally agreeing 
to abide by it, possibly using the same type of approach ISDA used in 
connection with the introduction of the EMU currency a few years ago.  
Initially, the protocol would be primarily applicable to U.S. counterparties, 
but it could be expanded to non-U.S. counterparties as e-signature laws like 
the new U.S. law are enacted across the globe.

Basic Protocol:  By adopting the protocol, each counterparty would agree that 
the relevant agreement may be electronically signed by complying with the 
following steps:

1) The parties negotiate and agree on a final form the relevant agreement, 
and appoint one of the parties ("First Party") to prepare the document for 
electronic signature;

2) The First Party prepares the final form in the PDF format (e.g., the body 
of the text could not be modified) with the exception of the blank signature 
blocks for each party to be placed on the last page of the agreement;

3) An authorized signatory of the First Party electronically signs the 
agreement (Note: this electronic signature could be accomplished by 
inscribing an electronic handwritten signature or the signatory typing in 
his/her name and title in the blank signature block);

4) The agreement, as electronically signed by the First Party, is sent via 
electronic means (e.g., by e-mail) by the First Party to the other party 
("Second Party");

5) An authorized signatory of the Second Party  electronically signs the 
agreement (Note: this electronic signature could be accomplished by 
impressing an electronic handwritten signature or the signatory typing in 
his/her name and title in the signature block);

6) The agreement, as electronically signed by the Second Party, is sent via 
electronic means (e.g., by e-mail) by the Second Party to the First Party, 
accordingly, creating the fully executed agreement; and

7) Each party would be responsible for maintaining in its own electronic 
archives the agreement as electronically signed by the parties.

Also, the following could be considered: (a) adding to the protocol that each 
party,by adopting the protocol, agrees to be bound by any agreement entered 
into by means of the protocol, and any other appropriate language to enhance 
the enforceability of the "e-signature" process and (b) adding to the 
preprinted form of the Master Agreement, a provision whereby each party 
adopts the electronic signature protocol endorsed by ISDA as in effect from 
time to time.

Mark, I would be happy to discuss this draft proposal with you further at 
your convenience.

Regards, Alan

Bob:  This is something we are working on at Enron.  Is this something ISDA 
has interest in taking a lead on?  I think ISDA could add value by developing 
a standard approach to e-signatures.

Mark
	Alan Aronowitz
	06/27/2000 05:31 PM
		 
Mark:

Pursuant to our discussion last week, below is a rough draft of a proposal 
for an electronic signature protocol, which could be presented to ISDA for 
further consideration and discussion after we have further discussed:

E-Signature Protocol

Objective: In light of the enactment of the US federal legislation on 
electronic signatures (effective as of 10/1/00), a simple, reliable, and 
enforceable protocol should be established to facilitate the electronic 
execution of Master Agreements (and confirmations where required).  To 
facilitate the wider use of electronic contracts, this protocol could be 
endorsed by ISDA. Hopefully, it would become a standard that others would use 
for all types of contracts. Perhaps, if necessary or helpful, the adoption of 
the protocol could be done electronically by each party unilaterally agreeing 
to abide by it, possibly using the same type of approach ISDA used in 
connection with the introduction of the EMU currency a few years ago.  
Initially, the protocol would be primarily applicable to U.S. counterparties, 
but it could be expanded to non-U.S. counterparties as e-signature laws like 
the new U.S. law are enacted across the globe.

Basic Protocol:  By adopting the protocol, each counterparty would agree that 
the relevant agreement may be electronically signed by complying with the 
following steps:

1) The parties negotiate and agree on a final form the relevant agreement, 
and appoint one of the parties ("First Party") to prepare the document for 
electronic signature;

2) The First Party prepares the final form in the PDF format (e.g., the body 
of the text could not be modified) with the exception of the blank signature 
blocks for each party to be placed on the last page of the agreement;

3) An authorized signatory of the First Party electronically signs the 
agreement (Note: this electronic signature could be accomplished by 
inscribing an electronic handwritten signature or the signatory typing in 
his/her name and title in the blank signature block);

4) The agreement, as electronically signed by the First Party, is sent via 
electronic means (e.g., by e-mail) by the First Party to the other party 
("Second Party");

5) An authorized signatory of the Second Party  electronically signs the 
agreement (Note: this electronic signature could be accomplished by 
impressing an electronic handwritten signature or the signatory typing in 
his/her name and title in the signature block);

6) The agreement, as electronically signed by the Second Party, is sent via 
electronic means (e.g., by e-mail) by the Second Party to the First Party, 
accordingly, creating the fully executed agreement; and

7) Each party would be responsible for maintaining in its own electronic 
archives the agreement as electronically signed by the parties.

Also, the following could be considered: (a) adding to the protocol that each 
party,by adopting the protocol, agrees to be bound by any agreement entered 
into by means of the protocol, and any other appropriate language to enhance 
the enforceability of the "e-signature" process and (b) adding to the 
preprinted form of the Master Agreement, a provision whereby each party 
adopts the electronic signature protocol endorsed by ISDA as in effect from 
time to time.

Mark, I would be happy to discuss this draft proposal with you further at 
your convenience.

Regards, Alan

Let's do it in August during the week of the seventh.  Please start working 
on a short memo for Dave and me to send out.  I think we need to have at 
least two dates.  The memo should say attendance is mandatory.

Mark

Thanks for the heads up.  Keep me posted.  Mark

I think we should get either you or Sara involved in this.  Gary has 
requested a Houston lawyer help in establishing the business in London.  Mark
	Paul Simons
	06/27/2000 07:23 AM
		 
Gary

There follows a summary of the key information required in order to be able 
to estimate, under SFA capital rules, the likely regulatory capital 
requirements of the proposed bond and equity trading businesses in London.  
The summary has been prepared by Andy Cornfield who is our resident expert on 
the SFA's capital rules.

As previously discussed, EEFT - our SFA regulated agent through which we 
currently propose to run this business - is subject only to very modest 
regulatory capital rules since it does not take any principal positions.  Our 
view, however, is that a bond and equity trading desk of the type discussed 
will (sooner or later) become subject to SFA capital requirements and so it 
makes sense now to estimate the likely extent of that capital.

It would be very helpful at this stage if you (or someone in your group) 
could provide a guestimate (based on the US model, but modified where you 
think the European positions might be different) of the likely volumes and 
constituent parts of these businesses:

after 12 months of trading 
after 24 months of trading
after 36 months of trading

Please contact Andy or myself if you would like to discuss this. I look 
forward to hearing from you.

Best regards

Paul

Andrew Cornfield
23/06/2000 14:20

Paul

As requested. Please call to discuss.

Regards
Andy

Tim, thanks for the note.  Mark

This looks ok to me.  Mark
	"Gray, Ann (CPS)" <ann_gray@itc.co.harris.tx.us>
	06/30/2000 03:26 PM
		 
Mark,

George has a meeting at DePelchin Children's Home at 1:30 P.M. on Monday,
July 10th.  He wants to know if he can meet you at the River Cafe, 3615
Montrose, at 11:30 A.M. so he can go on to his meeting afterward.

Thank you.

Ann Gray

Thanks!

Bill, thanks for the invitation, but I cannot make it.  Take care.  Mark

Chris:

Thanks for the feedback on Dale.  I agree with your assessment.  Take care.

Mark

FYI on the lawyers conference.  Mark
	ENA Office of the Chairman@ENRON
	Sent by: Enron NA Office of the Chairman@ENRON
	07/10/2000 05:50 PM
		 
The approval process initiated in 1998 for all meeting and event expenditures 
in excess of $5,000 has enabled ENA to better assess the business value of 
events, accurately track our activities and save money.  These events include 
customer and employee meetings, and trade shows.  

ENA has made some modifications to the process, which are described in this 
memo.

The $5,000 threshold remains in effect for all customer events.  However, the 
threshold for approval for employee meetings and events has been lowered to 
$2,000, and some additional requirements must be met prior to approval.

Please be sure to follow the procedures described below for all meetings and 
events, so we can continue to successfully manage these events.

1) Prior to making any commitments to customers or vendors, all customer 
events with anticipated costs in excess of $5,000, and all employee events 
with anticipated costs in excess of $2,000 must be reviewed by the ENA Public 
Relations (PR) department and approved by the ENA Office of the Chairman

2) The PR department will handle the site search and hotel contract 
negotiations for all such events.  Once this is completed, the PR department 
will work with you to plan and produce your event in its entirety; or they 
can provide as much or as little assistance as you require. The PR department 
will be responsible for helping you achieve the best value for your program 
and ENA.

3) A completed expenditure request form (see attached) and supporting 
documentation is required for each event.  Employee meetings require a 
detailed agenda as part of the event documentation prior to approval.  Please 
submit the completed expenditure request form and documentation to the PR 
department at EB 3642, or work with PR department employees to complete the 
form.

4) After PR review, the expenditure will be submitted to the ENA Office of 
the Chairman for final approval.

Additionally, the PR department can assist in the procurement of tickets for 
various local sporting events and concerts.

If you have any questions regarding this process, would like assistance 
planning an event, or need tickets for a Houston event, please contact Dorie 
Hitchcock in the PR department at (713) 853-6978.

Thank you for your cooperation.

Bill, I called Shapiro about this and he said they were interested and would 
cover the meeting you told me about.  I would give Rick a call at this 
point.  Thanks.  Mark

Paul:

Great news!  Were there any difficult questions raised by the SFA?

Mark

Justin:
Thanks for the info.  Alan and I are going to work on it from this side.  It 
sure looks like we could use a lawyer in New York.  After you and Alan talk 
it through, let's agree on a plan to get the work done in NYC to make sure we 
are coordinated.   

Mark

	Justin Boyd
	07/12/2000 05:19 AM
		 
Mark,

Here are details of the number of employees based in New York

Justin

Richard Sage
11/07/2000 23:18
The information I am working from shows:
MG: 60
RW: 30
but I'm defer to Melissa for accuracy.

Justin Boyd
11/07/2000 18:58
Gentlemen,

Please could you tell me how many employees are located in New York - this 
would include both MG as well as Romulus employees.

Thanks

Justin

Chris:

Thanks for the update.  Let's try to get together in Toronto on Tuesday, 
August 15 or 22.  Do either of those days work for you?  I would envision 
getting up to speed on business opportunities in Ontario and addressing the 
questions you raised.  Your proposal makes sense, but I would like to defer 
our decision until we have had a chance to talk it through.

Mark

Yes, Michael raised it to me, so that is all clear.  With respect to the 
candidate you mentioned, I think I would need to review his resume and see 
what the arguments would be.  Let's get together and talk about this before 
you go to the recruiters.

Mark

Mary:

Never heard of Barrett.  I think it is a good trend that energy companies are 
seeing it in their interest to join ISDA!

Mark

Rosemary:

Yes, I would be happy to.  I would like to get some time on the schedule to 
review the plan for energy both in North America and Europe.  It seems to me 
that we ought to have a meeting in Frankfurt in Sept and a seminar on energy 
in Houston over the next six months.

Mark

Please add this to my schedule.  Maybe, I can fly to Toronto the next day.  
Ask Chris Gaffney if September 21 works for him instead of the dates I 
proposed in August.   Mark
	Rosemary Ryan <RRYAN@isda.org>
	07/13/2000 10:24 AM
		 
Mark,

As you may know the ISDA Members Update and E-Commerce Forum will be held in
New York on September 20. The morning session will be devoted to committee
updates and the afternoon to e-commerce.  

Would you be available to give a 10 minute update on the activities of the
Energy Committee. 

Look forward to hearing from you.

Regards,

Rosemary
212 332 2555 

Chris:

How about Sept 21?  I have to be in NYC anyway on Sept 20.  Mark

Please review the attached summary of legal risks.

Mark

In preparation for our meeting on Monday, I listed the key legal issues re 
the PPAs.

Mark

I think you need to do their reviews.  I would coordinate with Jeff Hodge to 
make sure you get the appropriate feedback from Houston.

Liz: Put me down for $50.  Mark

Alan, are we doing anything on Aer*x anymore?  Please let Mark Holsworth 
know.   Mark
	Mark Holsworth@ENRON
	07/17/2000 03:58 PM
		 
I understand from the Corporate Secretary that AER*X Inc. was a subsidiary of 
Enron Power Services.  AER*X Inc. has been dissolved according to the 
Corporate Secretary in 1994.  This company owned the mark AER*XTERT which 
subsequently was assigned to Enron Power Services.  As I said in my previous 
message, the mark is up for renewal.  Are we using the mark and if not, there 
would be no basis to renew it.  Can you please help me?

Thanks.

I updated mine last week.  Please confirm it is not there as of today.  Mark

What topics do you think would be appropriate?  I will have just a few 
minutes.  I was thinking CFTC, electronic trading, physical trading forms and 
continued opening of power markets in North America to trading.

Mark
	Rosemary Ryan <RRYAN@isda.org>
	07/14/2000 01:53 PM
		 
Mark,

We are putting together the brochure for the Members Update in London and
New York.  We would like to list the topics to be covered during each
presentation in bullet points on the agenda.   What topics would you suggest
we list for Energy.

Thanks in advance for your help.

Regards,

Rosemary

Yes, I am planning on attending.  I need directions.  Thanks.  Mark

We should include ISDA energy definitions, CFTC matters re energy and an 
overview of power deregulation developments in North America.  I might also 
add a few items about international developments and the EEI physical power 
trading form.  I am thinking 4 slides at the most.  Is that what you want?

Mark

Michael:

The September ISDA meeting is coming up and I am starting to plan my 
schedule.  I will be in London on Monday and Tuesday, Sept 12 and 13.  I will 
also be in Frankfurt on Wednesday and Thursday.  Are you free for dinner on 
either Monday or Tuesday?  Who is the best person in Frankfurt to give me an 
overview of the trading markets in Germany?  

Regards,

Mark

Jane:

There are lots of countries that at first did not allow derivatives and later 
changed the laws to allow them.  Bob Pickel, the GC of ISDA in NYC could give 
you info on this or Jeff Golden at Allen & Overy in London could give you 
info.

Mark

Yes, please check on that.   Mark

Martin:

Looks like great progress!  Mark

Thanks for the memo.  It is going to be a very interesting area!  Mark

Please set a telephone meeting with Alex for me.  Mark 
	Cathy Phillips
	07/19/2000 10:26 AM
		 
Mike McConnell asked that I forward the following message to you both and ask 
that you respond back to Alex Arrow directly.  Thank you very much for your 
assistance.

Cathy Phillips for 
Mike McConnell

Alexander Arrow <arrow@pl-x.com> on 07/18/2000 12:34:12 PM
Dear Mike,

Per direction from Cathy Phillips, here is the information about The Patent & 
License Exchange (pl-x), and its potential role in Enron's 
e-commerce/exchange initiative.

The Patent & License Exchange, Inc. (www.pl-x.com), since Jan 1999 has been 
the operator of the safest global marketplace for intellectual property 
rights.  pl-x promotes liquidity in the market through novel 
financially-oriented content and risk transfer tools backed by world-class 
companies. Strategic partners include Ernst & Young, Swiss Re, and Chicago 
Title Company (NYSE: FNF).  pl-x's most recent round of financing brought in 
$30 million in March, from a 10-member syndicate including Softbank, 
Polytechnos, Texas Pacific Group and TMCT Ventures.  The Board of Directors 
includes the most recent Commissioner of the US Patent and Trademark Office, 
Bruce Lehman and former Managing Director of Mitsubishi Electric Company, 
Takashi Kiuchi.  Subscribers include Avery Dennison, Dow Chemical, 
Bristol-Myers Squibb, Mallinckrodt, Aventis, Gateway, Honeywell, and over 190 
others.

pl-x also just received the Forbes.com "Best of the Web" award:

http://www.forbesbest.com/b2b/asp/tearsheet.asp?reviewNO=1738&industry=Miscell
aneous

Enron's leadership role in the growth of online exchanges is becoming clear.  
We believe leadership in the Intellectual Property Asset Exchange space would 
be consistent with Enron's vision, and we look forward to speaking about ways 
of potentially working together.

Very best regards,
Alex Arrow

************************************
Alexander K. Arrow, MD, CFA
Chief Financial Officer
The Patent & License Exchange, Inc.
117 East Colorado Blvd, Suite 200
Pasadena, CA 91105

V: 1.626.405.0690 x304
F: 1.626.405.0638
arrow@pl-x.com
www.pl-x.com
************************************

Please see note on Frankfurt.  Mark
=09Richard Grove <RGROVE@isda.org>
=0908/01/2000 10:47 AM
=09=09=20
To the ISDA Board:

For planning purposes, here is a list of upcoming ISDA events for the
autumn.  Corrinne Greasley of the ISDA NY office will be in touch to confir=
m
attendance at a later date.

September 12:  Members' Update and E-Commerce Forum in London

September 13:  Board Meeting in Frankfurt followed by wine-tasting and
dinner in the Rheingau region

Henning has sent the following suggestions and offer of assistance regardin=
g
accomodations in Frankfurt:
Should anybody plan for staying on for a couple of days, we would be
delighted to assist with hotel bookings in the Rheingau area, I would
recommend the hotel "Schloss Reinhartshausen" on the river Rhein. For those
flying out the next morning, I suggest a hotel near the airport to avoid th=
e
commuter=01%s traffic towards Frankfurt in the morning. Closest is the
"Sheraton" (walking distance), also close is the "Steigenberger Airport
hotel" (shuttle bus). Happy to do the bookings at any hotel.

September 20:  Members Update and E-Commerce Forum in New York

October 19:  ISDA-AFMA Conference in Sydney

October 23:  Conference and Reception to mark opening of office in Singapor=
e

October 26:  Members Update and E-Commerce Forum in Tokyo

November 15:  Board Meeting in New York

December 14:  Holiday Party in London

=20

Shouldn't we go with LeBeouf?    Mark

Yes I want these changes.

	PeopleFinder <peoplefinder@enron.com>
	08/03/2000 11:09 AM
	Please respond to peoplefinder
		 
This is a change ticket from the PeopleFinder.

The PeopleFinder received these changes to your information
from the Change Request page on 8/3/2000:

    change Confirmation email preference to "mail_internet"
    change Internet to "mark.e.haedicke@enron.com; "
    change Confirm external changes to "yes"

If you want these changes made to your information,
simply reply to this message.  (Don't change the subject line.)

If you don't want these changes, throw this message away.

We're sorry, but cc:Mail is not supported at this time.  If you
are reading this in cc:Mail, your reply will not reach the PeopleFinder.
Please set your Confirmation email preference on the Change page to
Internet until you have Lotus Notes installed on your PC.

Rob, pass on if appropriate.  Mark
rsanchez@computextos.com.pe (Sanchez Roberto) on 09/20/99 07:30:56 PM
dear mr. haedicke: i am a peruvian citizen graduated in the us working in
the international metals trading business since 1987. i work as senior
trader for a major private mining company in peru who produces precious and
base metals which are all exported to exclusively 2 endusers in the us. our
company also is involved since 1989 in hedging its output of copper, zinc,
gold and silver in comex and lme markets.
the reason i am contacting you is because i regularly receive literature
from comex and i see that your company is the largest natural gas trader in
the world and i was hoping to see if your company could be interested to
participate in the international tender of exploiting and distributing the
camisea natural gas project in south eastern peru.
if you are interested pls let me know so that i can send you detailed
information on this project by mail.
best regards,
roberto sanchez
pasaje cezanne 151,
lima 41-peru
day phone: 011-51-1-913-5174
fax: 011-51-1-225-0941

Mark:

A concern has been raised about IT service providers working on EOL or other 
Enron projects and then taking know-how to a competitor, such as Dynegy.
Since these service providers tend to work for a lot of different companies, 
it seems like this is a significant issue.  How do we address this risk in 
the contracts?
Do we need to add a non-competition clause?

Mark Haedicke

Ron:

Thanks for your help.  Let's get together for lunch some time.  Let me know 
what works for you.

Mark

NIck:

Do we have an erergy meeting scheduled in September.  Let's talk about this.  
We could do it in either London or Frankfurt doing the week of the board 
meeting.   Let me know your thoughts on this.

Mark

Rick:

Thanks for the message.  I have sent an e-mail to Nick.  I will coordinate 
with him.

Mark

Paul:

Thanks for the e-mail.  I agree with your assessment.  I also want to thank 
you for your support of the legal department.  We feel like we are part of 
the team and I appreciate your efforts in that regard.

Take care,

Mark

Nick: I will plan on being there and will be happy to comment on item 4.  I 
think we also could talk about  regulatory barriers to energy trading in 
Europe.  Please keep me posted on seminar plans in Europe re energy. 

Regards,

Mark

Bob: per our conversation.  Mark
	Mark Taylor
	08/04/2000 11:46 AM
		 
	RAISLERK@sullcrom.com
	07/31/2000 02:15 PM
		 
Attached is our first draft of a comment letter on the CFTC's Regulatory 
Reinvention proposal.  The comment letter must be submitted to the CFTC by 
next Monday, August 7.  I would appreciate your comments by COB this 
Wednesday, August 2.  Of course, I am available to discuss the draft as 
well.  At this point, I do  not think we need to have a conference call on 
this and we can just coordinate and assemble the comments.  If others feel 
differently, please let me know.

This e-mail is sent by a law firm and contains information
that may be privileged and confidential. If you are not the
intended recipient, please delete the e-mail and notify us
immediately.

 - Comment Letter.doc

It seems to me that our standard language should prohibit service providers 
from working on any similar project for a competitor or disclosing in any way 
that work was done for Enron.  Also, we may want to specify liquidated 
damages for violation of this covenant.  Any objections to this?

Mark Haedicke

Jay:

You and I can talk through the issues.  The key point is that you have to 
vote the best interest of the corporation on whose board you sit and not your 
personal interest or the interest of Enron.  Give me a call and we can talk 
through the business of Convergent and what the risks are.

Mark

I agree.  Also, I think what we do here will be cited by others.  Mark

Jeff, where we at on the project to improve the contracts with the most 
exposure.   Mark

Mark:

Would you please propose language to me along the lines I suggested.  Thanks.

Mark

Please take this comment into account when you draft up some language.  
Thanks, Mark
	Andy Zipper@ENRON
	08/04/2000 02:54 PM
		
I agree completely. However, we probably need to develop language that 
defines an Enron competitor, as people will ask and we are considerably 
broader than we used to be.

Dad:

Thanks for letting me know.  She seemed to be a wonderful person.  Things are 
going well for me and my family.  We bought a place at Silver Shells in 
Destin recently.  I am hopeful we will get there some during the summers.  

Thanks,

Mark  

I will be here next week.  Mark

Please schedule 30 minutes with Janette.  Mark

Do you think that a bill favorable to energy will be passed over the strong 
opposition of the CFTC?  What kind of odds do you put on it?  It is a 
significant change if Treasury is not longer against us -- but it is a little 
hard for me to believe that it is real.  Should I try to make a trip to 
Washington in September?  Let me know.

Mark Haedicke

Mark:  Let's start using this right away.     Mark Haedicke    
Non-competition:  Contractor covenants that it will not use for any reason 
the By accepting work under this Agreement, Contractor warrants that it will 
not perform any similar work for a competitor of Company.  Contractor 
acknowledges its obligations under section 4 of this Agreement and, as such, 
shall not accept any work in which it might divulge any information, ideas, 
concepts, know-how or techniques learned or created during (collectively the 
"Information") while providing the work services performed for theCompany, 
including without limitation, when Contractor provides services to any 
company competing with the Company.  Anytime Contractor provides 
substantially similar services to a company competing with the Company, it 
shall take all appropriate caution to protect the Information, use employees 
that did not provide services to the Company and Contractor shall provide 
written notice to the Company.

	Mark Holsworth@ENRON
	08/11/2000 03:11 PM
		 
Michelle please put this or similar language in the new agreement.
	Mark Holsworth
	08/08/2000 01:56 PM
		
I am uncertain what your people want but here is a first try.

"By accepting work under this Agreement, Contractor warrants that it will not 
perform any similar work for a competitor of Company.  Contractor 
acknowledges its obligations under section 4 of this Agreement and, as such, 
shall not accept any work in which it might divulge any information, ideas, 
concepts, know-how or techniques learned or created during the work performed 
for company." 

	Mark E Haedicke@ECT
	08/07/2000 02:40 PM
		 
Please take this comment into account when you draft up some language.  
Thanks, Mark
	Andy Zipper@ENRON
	08/04/2000 02:54 PM
		
I agree completely. However, we probably need to develop language that 
defines an Enron competitor, as people will ask and we are considerably 
broader than we used to be.

Let's talk about this when you get a chance.  Mark
	Michael R Brown
	08/09/2000 05:48 AM
		 
FYI , some interesting issues on the new exchange .
Michael
Mark Elliott
08/08/2000 14:59
Joe,

Further to our discussion yesterday, when you mentioned that you wished to 
commence trading on the EEX Spot Market on and from Wednesday 9th August, I 
set out below the main elements of legal risk, as I see them, in the various 
elements of the Exchange Rules.  You should note as a general matter that the 
Exchange Rules are largely vague and ambiguous which only heightens the 
potential legal legal risk.

The Counterparty to our trades

Enron's counterparties to trades will be the individual market participants 
with whom our bids and offers get matched - our counterparty will not be the 
Exchange itself or a clearing house.

We shall only be told the identity of the counterparty(ies) with whom we have 
neen matched after that matching process has occurred.  There is no mechanism 
to filter counterparties based on credit quality, types of counterparty etc.  
Hence, there is no effective credit control left to trading participants over 
whom they should do deals with.

Collateral Arrangements

As far as security by way of collateral for trading exposures among the 
participants is concerned, initial collateral of Euros 100,000 is posted with 
the Exchange in one of the prescribed methods (bank guarantee, cash,etc) via 
one's "clearing" bank.  The Exchange will monitor the exposures of all the 
counterparties and can require more collateral to be posted overnight, on a 
variation margin basis, if a counterparty is exposed over the level of 
collateral previously posted.  Note that the collateral which the Exchange 
may require to be posted does not seem to include cover for any unpaid 
amounts where a participant has not paid for power delivered - it appears 
that it will only cover the mark-to-market value of deals struck on the 
Exchange which remain outstanding (i.e., pre-delivery)

In terms of the amount of collateral required to be posted, it would appear 
that each trade will be calculated on a gross, rather a net, basis (even for 
buys and sells with the same counterparty and not just trades with different 
counterparties).  The rules are very vague here.  I would suggest that your 
traders and RAC touch base on this issue and understand - by speaking to the 
Exchange if necessary - exactly the methodology of calculating our collateral 
posting requirement.  

Whilst the Exchange will monitor the participants' exposures and call for 
margin from the Participants' clearing banks as appropriate, there is an 
obligation imposed on each participant itself to be able itself to monitor 
its own exposures and its own collateral posting requirement.  It is unclear 
whether the Exchange has provided sufficient information in relation to the 
model to be used to enable us to fulfill this requirement.  I suggest that 
back office and RAC look into this immediately in conjunction with your 
trading staff.  Technically we can have our membership suspended if we do not 
comply with the Rules; more importantly,  from a good buisness practice 
perspective, we should be able to comply with the rules plus be able to know 
these figures each day.   RAC and your traders should therefore check that we 
can do this immediately.    

In the event that a counterparty defaults, there are two points to note.   
Firstly, what constitutes a default is unclear.  The Rules state that a 
default is where a counterparty is, to quote, "unable" to meet its 
obligations under the Rules.  Strictly, inability (e.g., insolvency) would 
not cover unwillingness (e.g.,, counterparty can pay but does not wish to pay 
for whatever reason).  Clifford Chance Germany have advised me that they feel 
that a German court would stretch the meaning to include unwillingness to 
meet obligations  but, of course, point out that this would be for a judge 
ultimately to decide.

Secondly,  even if a counterparty is in default as defined, there is no 
absolute legal obligation on the EEX to realise / call upon the collateral 
posted with it.  This will depend upon whether the management board of the 
EEX exercsies a discretion to instruct the EEX to do so.  In my view. the 
Exchange could well take the view that as the trades are a matter between the 
individual participants (as the Exchange is not the counterparty), the 
Exchange may well be unwilling to realise collateral until the outcome of 
arbitration between the parties to a dispute.  Clearly this could be a number 
of weeks or months after the non-payment dispute arose and hence increasing 
our credit risk.  Please note that there is no clear recourse to the Exchange 
in the event that the Exchange itself refuses to realise collateral.

If the Exchange does realise the collateral however, it will hold it for the 
benefit of all Participants.  Note, however, that this does not seem to cover 
previously unpaid amounts as mentioned above. 

Taxes

End consumers can be participants on the Exchange.  As this is the case, if 
we get matched with an end consumer, then apparently we open ourselves up to 
potential liability to pay German energy taxes.   Clifford Chance have advise 
me that, whilst this remains an unresolved issue, apparently the German 
fiscal authorities appear only to ensure that German-based entities pay such 
tax, rather than foreign-based ones such as ECTRL, which is our trading 
participant.  If you require further details on this, please refer to Tina 
Ward in Tax Department.

Renewable Energy Sources Act.

Again, if we, as a seller, were matched with an end-consumer, then under this 
Act we are obliged to ensure that we source approximately 3.45% of the energy 
sold from a renewable source.  I understand that this is approximately 4 
times as expensive as normal domestic power, coming in at around 16.75 
pfennigs per kWh.  It is entirely unclear how this will be monitored and 
enforced in respect of dealings on the Exchange, although Cliffords' view is 
that this will be done in some way through the Balancing mechanism.  May be 
your traders should look into this in greater detail, should it be of 
concern. 

Settlement

On a purely logistical level, for your general information, please note that 
physical power delivery is T+1, whereas Buyer settles T+2. 

The Exchange states that bills from sellers to buyers will go to the buyers 
via the Exchnage.  It is unclear how the mechanics of this work (they are not 
dealt with in the Rules to any greater extent).  I would suggest that your 
trading staff and our settlements staff look into this immediately, by 
speaking directly to the Exchange if necessary.  It should also be borne in 
mind that I assume that invoices will have to raised and issued within the 
T+2 framework.

IMPORTANT NOTE:

Clearly we want eventually to put this trading participation thorough a 
formal and final CACs  process (the rules have totally altered since we 
CACs'd it last time three weeks ago).  However, I understand that you would 
like to be able to trade from tomorrow, which will be a few days in advance 
of the CACs  process (additional rules in German have only just been sent to 
me, and hence I cannot tell you at present what is the import of these).  In 
this respect, please note that ECTRL is joining as a Market-Maker and hence, 
under the Exchange Rules, if you wish to proceed, we would have the 
obligation from tomorrow to quote firm two way prices during normal market 
opening hours.  The Exchange can promulgate rules prescribing the length of 
time for which bids / offers are active, minimum / maximum volumes bid / 
offerred, the width of spreads, etc.,.; I understand from Clifford Chance 
that the Exchange has not yet prescribed these rules.  What we do know at the 
moment is that if we fail "too often" to quote as a market maker, then the 
exchange can remove / suspend us as a trading participant.  In order to 
mitigate your risk at present therefore, you may wish to consider the size of 
volumes we would quote and width of spreads, etc.., and discuss with RAC and 
/ or Credit beforehand.

Finally, I understand that: (a) Dresdner's banking terms for us have still 
not been agreed (apparently these are being dealt with at an Enron Houston 
Legal Department level) and therefore I cannot tell you whether Dresdner 
would be willing to provide the collateral guarantee etc before these are 
agreed and (b) I understand that the EEX still has some outstanding points re 
our Balancing arrangements which would need to be finalised before we could 
trade.  Sandip is in contact with Enron Houston over (a) and I understand 
that Heribert and Michael Schuh are dealing with the Balancing 
arrangements.   

Subject to clearing the items in (a) and (b), and discussing volumes, spread 
etc with RAC / Credit etc.,  if you wish to proceed tomorrow, please let me 
know as I shall need to write to the Exchange this afternoon informing them 
of this (our application forms were submitted under the caveat that we would 
write to them when we wished our membership to go active).

Kind regards

Mark                        

Please briefly fill-in the attached draft monthly report for Net Works by 
August 15.  Please e-mail your additions to Janette for her to compile.

Thanks,

Mark

I was happy to do it.  I really like your artwork.  Let's get together for 
lunch sometime.  

Regards,

Mark

	Frazier King@ENRON
	08/11/2000 05:31 PM
		 
Mark,

Thanks for a great presentation today.
I have already received several comments 
from people saying how much they enjoyed it.

I've attached a few orchid shots.
In fact, I will be showing them all on Saturday.
My photo organization, Houston Center for Photography is sponsoring a print 
sale.
It is from 10 am to 6 pm this Sat. at 1441 Alabama (near the Menil).

Hope you have a great weekend.
Thanks again.

Frazier

Mary:

I asked for a list of major energy trading parties.  It seems to me that we 
should try again to get those on the list that are not already members to 
join ISDA.  Let me know if I can help.

Regards,

Mark 
	Jeffrey T Hodge
	08/14/2000 01:18 PM
		 
Janette:

I meant to copy you on this, but sent it before thinking.

Jeff
	Jeffrey T Hodge
	08/14/2000 01:16 PM
		 
Mark:

Last week you requested that I give you a list of about 10 counterparties 
that you would forward on to ISDA.  Please note that the listed 
counterparties came from information given to me by the documentation group.  
In any event, the list is as follows:

  1.  AEP
  2.  Aquila
  3.  Coral
  4.  Duke Energy Trading
  5.  El Paso Merchant Energy
  6.  Koch
  7.  PG&E Energy Trading
  8.  Reliant
  9.  Southern Company Energy Marketing
  10. Williams Energy

I hope this is of some help.

Jeff

Mary:  

Here is the list on telecom companies.  Let me know how I can help.

Regards,

Mark
	Alan Aronowitz
	08/14/2000 11:25 AM
		 
At your request, see below. Certainly, I can get you contact names if you 
need them.

Alan
	Jay Hawthorn@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	08/14/2000 08:24 AM
		 
Alan,

Here's a good start on the list of the most likely of the telecom guys to be 
transacting under the Master (or who have already transacted).  With that, 
I'd say that ISDA should initially target this group in its membership.  (You 
asked for 10, but I thought of 12 -- you can cut two if you like.)

GENUiTY
Broadwing
MCI WorldCom
Level (3)
Global Crossing
360networks
Touch America (Montana Power -- might already understand ISDA from power 
trading side)
Cable & Wireless
Universal Access
AT&T
Teleglobe
Qwest

Good to hear from you, and keep in touch!  Things are really moving up here, 
and we couldn't have done it without all your help and guidance.

Let me know if I can help with anything else.

Best regards,
Jay
--
James F. Hawthorn
Enron Broadband Services
Global Bandwidth Risk Management
+1 713 853 7606 Telephone
+1 713 646 8795 Facsimile
<mailto:jay_hawthorn@enron.net>

Great resume, but too specialized for my group.  Mark

Mark, I was looking for your comments on this memo.  Thanks.   Mark H
	Robert Pickel <RPICKEL@isda.org>
	08/11/2000 02:16 PM
		 
ISDA will soon be in a position to make its documentation available
electronically. I know that many of you have been advocating this for awhile
so I am happy to say that the day will soon be here. In anticipation of
that, I would appreciate your input on how the documentation is made
available and, in particular, the pricing of that access.
 
For anyone other than an ISDA member, the documents will be made available
in electronic PDF form for purchase on a per document basis. For members,
two additional options will be made available for access to interactive
versions of the documentation: an internet version and an intranet version.
 
The internet version will consist of the complete library of ISDA
documentation in an interactive version also in PDF format. The documents
will include internal links within documents (section reference to the
section itself, use of a defined term to its definition) as well as links to
User's Guides that have been published for a particular document. We propose
that the pricing of this option will be on a per user annual fee basis.
 
The intranet option will permit users to take the full library of ISDA
documents and place it on a firm's intranet, thereby providing access to
anyone within the firm who has access to the intranet. ISDA would charge a
fixed annual fee for this service. 
 
I would appreciate your responses to the following questions:
 
1. Ignoring cost, do you think your institution would be more likely to use
the internet version of the documents or take them onto your intranet? 
 
2. If you are more likely to use the internet version, how many users would
you anticipate worldwide within your institution?
 
3. For the internet service, would you prefer to pay (a) a high initial fee
for the first user (e.g., $5,000) and a small additional fee for each
incremental user (e.g., $100) or (b) a lower initial fee (e.g., $3,000) and
a larger additional fee for each incremental user (e.g., $500)? Assume for
these purposes that the cost of the intranet service is $10,000 per annum.
 
4. Would your answer to question 3 change if the cost of the intranet
service were $15,000?
 
I will not hold you to any of these answers. I just hope to get your input
as we proceed to further consideration at the Board level of how electronic
delivery of documentation will work and how it will be priced.
 
Thank you for your input.
 
Bob Pickel
 

I cannot be there, but am very glad you are having this meeting.  Mark

No I have not.  Mark

Mary:

Spring break for most schools in Houston for 2001 is March 12 through March 
17.  Otherwise, I am open in Feb and Mar at this time.  I think London is a 
better venue for an energy conference than Amsterdam.  Also, I think we will 
eventually want to do an energy trading presentation on Japan --  maybe at 
the update on October 26.

Ragards,

Mark

I would like to change our policy regarding taping telephone trades.  I 
propose the following:

1.   Retention Period  -- change the retention period from 4 months to 2 
months

2.  Record Only Deal Terms -- change from taping everything to taping only 
the deal terms at the end of a call

The first change could be made immediately and the second change would 
require both reprogramming (Phillippe is looking at this) and training of the 
traders to press the record button at the end of a call to record the deal 
terms.  Let me know your thoughts on the proposed changes.

Mark Haedicke

Per our conversation on coordination of our efforts on California and other 
jurisdictions, we have developed the following training program:

1.    Anti-trust -- we have completed anti-trust training in Houston for 
traders and have scheduled it in Portland and Calgary.

2.    Sales Practices -- this training has been completed in Portland and is 
being scheduled in Houston and Calgary.

3.    Anti-manipulation -- this training has been completed in Portland, but 
needs to be expanded to cover local law manipulation issues.  It also needs 
to be scheduled in Houston and Calgary. 

Also, the above training needs to be supplemented with training on local 
power pool rules.  There is a similar program being prepared in London.  A 
meeting is being scheduled so we can discuss these matters further.

Mark Haedicke

I would stay out of it in light of John's message.  MARK

	Drew Ries
	08/15/2000 09:58 AM
		 
Mark,

Thanks for the help.  I have worked with Anne Koehler a number of times in 
the past; however, since this is specifically Net Works and may be more of an 
acquisition than an investment, I wasn't sure who to contact.  Please find 
attached a brief description of the Altra Gas Pipeline Software Business, 
along with CIBC's Confidentiality Agreement.  I am sure you will have changes 
to the CA, as a result, I will try to identify the appropriate contact at the 
bank.  You may want to give me a call and/or Tom Gros to make sure all of his 
concerns are addressed.

Drew
x56075

 - teaser.doc
 - enron.doc

Please prepare drafts of the slides suggested in the attached "agenda 
slide".   Mark

Paul:

I have proposed we change our procedure here and we are discussing the 
proposed changes.  I will send you a copy of my proposal.  We can talk about 
in a few weeks in London.

Regards,

Mark

I am trying to build consensus on this issue.  Take care.  Mark
	Mark E Haedicke
	08/15/2000 01:14 PM
		 
I would like to change our policy regarding taping telephone trades.  I 
propose the following:

1.   Retention Period  -- change the retention period from 4 months to 2 
months

2.  Record Only Deal Terms -- change from taping everything to taping only 
the deal terms at the end of a call

The first change could be made immediately and the second change would 
require both reprogramming (Phillippe is looking at this) and training of the 
traders to press the record button at the end of a call to record the deal 
terms.  Let me know your thoughts on the proposed changes.

Mark Haedicke

I think partnering with a lawfirm would be a good idea re documentation.  
However, I am not sure the ISDA board is likely to pick a proposal that 
includes a competitor of the stature of Enron.  I will call ISDA and try to 
get a read on what ISDA wants to do which is not clear at this point.

Regards,

Mark

Thanks for confirming the destruction of tapes.  Mark

Attached is the Enron Net Works Monthly Legal Report.  

FYI
	Alan Larsen
	08/14/2000 08:07 PM
		 
Mark--Attached for use in tomorrow's phone call  is my memo on the issue of 
special issues created by virtue of BPA being the counterparty on the 
contract with EPMI.  If you need to discuss anything before the call, please 
call. 

I vote for the monastery.  I look forward to our meeting.

Mark

Jenette: please put this tentatively on my schedule.  Mark
	Angie Collins
	08/14/2000 06:17 PM
		 
Please mark your calendars, bring a guest, and join the Enron Global Markets 
- Coal & Emissions Group for an evening at the McClellans in beautiful 
downtown Sugarland at 7:00 pm, Saturday, September 16.  More details to 
follow.

Looking forward to seeing you there,

George and Darcy

Brent, also who has the risk of Y2K under our contracts?  If energy is not 
delivered because of a Y2K problem, is that a force majeure event or 
otherwise excused?  Your are right to raise this issue.  Let me know what 
response you are getting.  Take care.  Mark

Thanks for the memo.   Mark

Please set up this meeting.  Mark
	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	08/14/2000 05:31 PM
		 
Mark - Could we arrange a telephone call with you, Mary and me this week to
discuss the North America Energy Derivatives Committee and a proposed agenda
for the near term - including the conference in Houston that you've been
discussing with Mary?  There has been no meeting for some time as you know.
Regards, Ruth 

Mark:

Thanks a lot for the lists.  If it's ok with you I will get back to you on
getting some contact names.

We are looking into hotels in Houston for the Energy conference in February
or March, 2001.  Is there any certain time in those months that wouldn't
work for you?  Houston is becoming a very difficult place to find hotel
availability.  The thinking was to hold an Energy conference in the U.S. in
the first half and in the U.K. sometime in the second half of the year.  It
has been mentioned that we should hold the Europe Energy conference in
Amsterdam.  My thinking is that we should first hold it in London.  What do
you think?

Regards,
Mary

Mary:

I asked for a list of major energy trading parties.  It seems to me that we
should try again to get those on the list that are not already members to
join
ISDA.  Let me know if I can help.

Regards,

Mark
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|
  |
|
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|

Janette:

I meant to copy you on this, but sent it before thinking.

Jeff
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|
  |
|
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|

Mark:

Last week you requested that I give you a list of about 10 counterparties
that
you would forward on to ISDA.  Please note that the listed counterparties
came
from information given to me by the documentation group.  In any event, the
list
is as follows:

          1.  AEP
          2.  Aquila
          3.  Coral
          4.  Duke Energy Trading
          5.  El Paso Merchant Energy
          6.  Koch
          7.  PG&E Energy Trading
          8.  Reliant
          9.  Southern Company Energy Marketing
          10. Williams Energy

I hope this is of some help.

Jeff

Try Sheila Tweed.  We did a few transactions there last year.  Mark

Larry:

On the resume, only one comment.  I would split out Community Affiliations or 
just delete it.  I will give the resume to a friend of my in HR and ask where 
he thinks the best fit would be in Enron.  Do you want me to e-mail your 
resume to a few people I know in other businesses? If yes, please send again 
without the note to me.  

Mark

I have talked to my friend and the areas where we need help are in coal 
product and paper product marketing and industrial customer outsourcing.  
Give me a call and I can describe the opportunities and see what your 
interest level is.

Mark

Bob:

I think Enron is more  likely to use the intranet service.  I was unclear 
however, if additional service was available in the internet service, such as 
links to the explanatory books?  I think generally we would want the 
convenience of having the ISDA materials inside for use by any Enron 
employee.  If the cost gets too high, I don't think members will pay for it.  
$10,000 sounds ok to me.

Regards,

Mark

Peter:

Thanks for the message.   I look forward to getting together.

Mark

David:

Per our conversation last week, I have attached a copy of Mr. Lipman's 
resume.  He has expressed interest in learning more about the coal, paper and 
steel business opportunities.  He will give you a call at 713-853-3557 to 
schedule a time to meet.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke
	LDLIPMAN@aol.com
	08/17/2000 01:05 PM
		 
 - LAWREN~2.DOC

Thanks for the e-mail.  I have asked Alan to find a time where we could talk 
on Thursday to make sure we are coordinated on Rudolf Wolffe.

Regards, 

Mark

Please circulate as appropriate in Portland.   Mark
	Peter Keohane
	08/21/2000 11:56 AM
		 
Please send the following message to all of Enron Canada (Calgary/Toronto).  
By copy, I will let John or Mark decide if anything needs to be circulated in 
Houston/Portland.

"The Alberta Power Purchase Auction closed this morning, but is not final 
until the Alberta has decided to accept all bids and declare the Winning 
Bidders.  Nonetheless, various media outlets have and will be calling to 
inquire if Enron bid or was successful in bidding on any of the Plants or 
Units.  I want to again confirm that under the Auction Participation 
Agreements and Auction Rules we cannot discuss this matter with any third 
parties including the media unless and until Alberta has declared the Winning 
Bidders, and this obligation is secured by a significant Letter of Credit and 
Guarantee of Enron Corp.  Accordingly, all such inquiries are to be referred 
to Rob Milnthorp, Derek Davies or Peter Keohane for their handling."

FYI
	Enron Canada General Announcement
	08/21/2000 12:00 PM
		 
"The Alberta Power Purchase Auction closed this morning, but is not final 
until Alberta has decided to accept all bids and declare the Winning 
Bidders.  Nonetheless, various media outlets have and will be calling to 
inquire if Enron bid or was successful in bidding on any of the Plants or 
Units.  I want to again confirm that under the Auction Participation 
Agreements and Auction Rules we cannot discuss this matter with any third 
parties including the media unless and until Alberta has declared the Winning 
Bidders, and this obligation is secured by a significant Letter of Credit and 
Guarantee of Enron Corp.  Accordingly, all such inquiries are to be referred 
to Rob Milnthorp, Derek Davies or Peter Keohane for their handling."

I spoke to Dr. Emilio Pinto, at the Sao Paulo lawfirm of Tozzini Freire about 
joining ISDA.  He and his firm are doing a lot of work for Enron.  He is 
familiar with ISDA and said he was interested in joining.  I told him he 
would get a call and some materials that he could present to his Executive 
Committee.  I reviewed with him the cost of $10,000.  Please give him a call 
at 011-551-1-2322100.  I think he could help build membership in ISDA in 
Brazil and eventually become a rep office for ISDA in South America.  He goes 
by Emilio.  I am working on a lawfirm in Argentina.  Let  me know if you have 
any questions.

Regards,

Mark

Congratulations to you and your team!   Mark

Thanks for the invitation but we are going on to Calgary.  Mark

FYI
	Christine Whitehead <CWhitehead@ISDA-EUR.ORG>
	08/25/2000 08:33 AM
		 
Please see attached.

Kind regards,
Christine Whitehead
P A to Nick Collier

 <<memo to ERDreMtg 11Sep.doc>>  <<agenda for 11Sep mtg.doc>> 

Bob: Thanks for the heads up.  Mark

John, I would like to get together for lunch on the 6th of Sept.  Take care.  
Mark

	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	08/24/2000 01:56 PM
		 
Mark:

It never fails.  Ironically, within an hour after hitting the "Send" button 
on my prior e-mail to you, I got a call from Stephanie, Jim's assistant, 
informing me that Jim's travel schedule for the first week in September had 
changed since I had set up the appointment and so we are going to have to 
reschedule the meeting with him.  Stephanie gave me a couple of possible 
dates in late Sept. and the middle of October that I need to follow up with 
Steve and Peter on.  Once I circle back with them, I'll follow up with you to 
see what may work for you.

Since I am scheduled to have a meeting in your offices on the morning of the 
7th, I still plan to be in Houston.  Is there a chance that you and I could 
get together for lunch on the 6th or perhaps catch up for a few minutes that 
afternoon or the afternoon of the 7th?

I'll touch base with you to see what your schedule looks like.  Thanks.  John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction 
of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

Joan:

I will talk to Susan and see what her interest is.  Thanks.

Mark

Dan, are you ok with the minutes?  Mark
	Rebecca Carter@ENRON
	Sent by: Kelly Johnson@ENRON
	08/24/2000 11:37 AM
	Please respond to kelly.johnson
		 
	

Please review the attached excerpt from the June 22, 2000 Executive Committee 
meeting by August 30th. If you approve as written, please let us 
know.Regards, Rebecca

Paul:

We do Sales Practices training which gets into some of what your are 
suggesting.  I think it is a good idea to take it further with a list of 
"don'ts".  We can get you are training materials.  We are in the process of 
uploading all training materials including videos into various websites.

Mark

	Paul Simons
	08/24/2000 06:04 AM
		 
John and Michael would like to put together training for London-based traders 
on the "dos and don'ts" of using recorded telephone lines - As part of this 
we're listening to tapes to pick up on some "don'ts" (eg racist comments, 
harrassment, breach of SFA rules etc) which we can possibly use as case 
studies (you'll be pleased to hear that so far we haven't found anything of 
this nature!).

Have you given any training on this subject to traders in Houston?  Any 
materials you may have used or thoughts you have on this would be very much 
appreciated.  Thanks a lot.

Paul

Any interest?  If yes, please contact this candidate.  Mark
	Luke.Mickum@EngageEnergy.com
	08/22/2000 10:20 AM
		 
Mark:? We had talked about my coming on board with Enron some six years ago 
prior to my moving up to New York State Electric & Gas Corporation as their 
Chief Counsel.

Right now I am with Engage Energy as their Senior Counsel, representing the 
company's power business.? 

As you may know, we are going through a merger here (Coastal/El Paso).? As a 
part of the merger-related activity, Engage (which is a limited partnership) 
is being split as between its two owners, Westcoast and Coastal. 

Virtually all of my clients (the "big deal" Structured Power Group here at 
Engage) are moving with a subsidiary of our other owner, Westcoast, while I 
am remaiining here in Houston with Engage, which is a Coastal subsidiary.? 
So, despite the fact that power is a growth area, my propsects vis a vis the 
merger are less good than if I were still supporting a substantial client 
base.? So, I am now looking at other opportunities that may be available, 
despite the fact I have been with Engage only a year.

Attached you will find a cover letter and my resume.? I hope you find my 
credentials and background of interest and I hope to hear from you soon.

I will forward a hard copy of the attached documents to you as well.? Thank 
you. 

??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????
? Regards, 

??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????? ??????
? Luke?? 

??????? ??????? ???????  <<enroncovlet.doc>>  <<RESUME.doc>> 

 - enroncovlet.doc
 - RESUME.doc

Please give me the contact names because I don't know much about this.  Mark

	Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org>
	08/28/2000 09:34 AM
		 
Mark and Ernie:

We received an application for Associate membership from TreasuryConnect, an
Internet-based electronic swaps platform designed to create an online
platform for derivatives transactions between corporations and banks.

Both AIG and Enron are investors in TreasuryConnect.  Are you familiar with
them and would you support their membership?

I have contact names at your firms who deal with TreasuryConnect if you need
them.

Thanks,
Mary

Peter, let's set aside at least one-half hour to talk about the approval 
process and general communication and any issues you want to.  Please get it 
scheduled. Thanks.  Mark

I am ok with a memo as you proposed.  Mark

Susan:

Thanks for the note.  Glad to hear that you are doing well.  Please send me a 
brief description of what ICor does.

Regards,

Mark

Attached is the Monthly Legal Report for Enron Global Markets.

Please carry your cell phone with you (with the power on) while you are at 
work during normal business hours.  It is important that I can reach you when 
it becomes necessary.  Thank you for your cooperation.

  

Rob, I want to keep a relatively low profile until we settle Project 
Stanley.  With respect to cooperating with TransAlta while the lawsuit is 
pending -- that seems to send the wrong signal to TransAlta.

Mark

Wes, I am forwarding the monthly report on Legal.  It seems to be 
inconsistent with the legal budget numbers in the QBRs.  Overall, it shows 
Legal is slightly over budget for the year.  Could you have someone compare 
the numbers and let me know if the monthly report is correct.

Mark
	Kristin Armstrong
	09/01/2000 02:58 PM
		 
Mark - see attached.  Call with any questions.

Thanks,
Kris
x3-1927

Please update as you fill in the rest of the dates.  Thanks.

Mark

Joan:  Great!  Susan said she would like to go to a few shops as you 
suggested.  We can talk about that.  

Mark

That looks good.   Our call next week will be on Tuesday and Julia will be 
leading it.  I will see you in London soon.   Mark

We will look into it.  It may be an infringement.  Mark

	Mark E Haedicke
	08/30/2000 12:03 PM
		 
Please find attached my draft summary slide.

Regards,

Mark

I am ok with it.  Mark

I agree.  I want to change the reporting to be directly to me anyway.  Let's 
discuss.  Mark

John, I think I can meet for lunch on the 7

	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	08/24/2000 01:56 PM
		 
Mark:

It never fails.  Ironically, within an hour after hitting the "Send" button 
on my prior e-mail to you, I got a call from Stephanie, Jim's assistant, 
informing me that Jim's travel schedule for the first week in September had 
changed since I had set up the appointment and so we are going to have to 
reschedule the meeting with him.  Stephanie gave me a couple of possible 
dates in late Sept. and the middle of October that I need to follow up with 
Steve and Peter on.  Once I circle back with them, I'll follow up with you to 
see what may work for you.

Since I am scheduled to have a meeting in your offices on the morning of the 
7th, I still plan to be in Houston.  Is there a chance that you and I could 
get together for lunch on the 6th or perhaps catch up for a few minutes that 
afternoon or the afternoon of the 7th?

I'll touch base with you to see what your schedule looks like.  Thanks.  John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction 
of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

Thanks for the invitation, but I will be returning from Europe.  Mark

Thanks for the message!  It was a complete victory!   Mark

For your use if the materials don't make it here in time.  Mark
	Corrinne Greasley <CGREASLEY@isda.org>
	09/05/2000 11:54 AM
		 
Dear All:
Written materials for the meeting scheduled for September 13, 2000 were sent
to the Board by express mail on Friday.  Attached please find the executive
summary, the table of contents and some of the materials contained in the
Board book.

I can be reached by reply email or by telephone on 212 332 1200 should you
encounter any problems accessing the attached documents or if you would like
to confirm your attendance at the Board meeting.

Regards
Corrinne

Executive Summary and Table of Contents
 <<Executive Briefing September 2000.doc>>        <<Table of Contents
Sept2000.doc>>

Operations Benchmarking Survey
 <<OBS Sep 2000 Board.doc>>

ISDA's Committees Agenda and Timelines
 <<all committees.doc>>

ISDA's view on a Single European Regulator

 <<wise men mandate july 2000.doc>>  <<wise men questionnaire aug 2000.doc>>
 <<wise men consultation letter aug 2000.doc>>  <<board book wise men item
sep 2000.doc>>

Energy Committee
 <<memo to ERDreMtg 11Sep.doc>>    <<agenda for 11Sep mtg.doc>>    <<ISDA
European Energy Committee.doc>>

European Regulatory Committee

 <<ISD  - paper on communication 4 august  2000.doc>>

South East Asia and Hong Kong Committee

 <<gitic.doc>>  <<gitic1.doc>>

 - Executive Briefing September 2000.doc
 - Table of Contents Sept2000.doc
 - OBS Sep 2000 Board.doc
 - all committees.doc
 - wise men mandate july 2000.doc
 - wise men questionnaire aug 2000.doc
 - wise men consultation letter aug 2000.doc
 - board book wise men item sep 2000.doc
 - memo to ERDreMtg 11Sep.doc
 - agenda for 11Sep mtg.doc
 - ISDA European Energy Committee.doc
 - ISD  - paper on communication 4 august  2000.doc
 - gitic.doc
 - gitic1.doc

Yes, I am happy to do that.  Mark

We sent a letter asking him to stay away from the families and INS is 
supposed to show up today and deport him.  We'll see what happens.  Mark

Please hold for me.  I will see you soon.  Mark

Stacy, please look into this ASAP and report back to me.   Mark

Sent by: Philippe A Bibi
Can someone look at this Enron Software Co?

IS there a name infringment issue?

Thanks

P.

????
Eric Virro
21/09/99 20:55
Heard of this?

Eric

September 21, 1999
Work Week
COMPANIES CRACK DOWN on the increasing sexual harassment by e-mail.

Using computer-monitoring devices provided by Enron Software Inc., 
Burlington, Mass., 20th Century Fox scans employees' e-mail to stop the flow 
of sexually offensive messages, says Jeff Uslan, manager of information 
protection. After an e-mail harassment incident, Image First, a New Castle, 
Del., uniforms maker, notified workers that e-mail will be reviewed for any 
violation of its antiharassment policy.

Fully 31% of more than 1,000 human-resources officials surveyed by 
Philadelphia labor-relations lawyer Stephen Cabot and the American Management 
Association reported that employees have sometimes gotten sexually harassing 
e-mails; 85% of the employers have policies to avert problems. Employers 
including First Union Corp., Charlotte, N.C., have fired people recently for 
sending harassing e-mail.

Unlike in-person conduct, e-mail harassment is easy to prove since the 
electronic trail documents allegations, says Kathleen Neville, a 
sexual-harassment consultant.

[...]

--Albert R. Karr

Copyright , 1999 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
Printing, distribution, and use of this material is governed by your 
Subscription Agreement and copyright laws. 

For information about subscribing, go to http://wsj.com 

 

Let's plan on talking about BT's hedge claim.   Mark

Peter:

Please give me a two or three sentence summary of the trading issue and court 
decision thereon in Blue Range.  I want to report on it over the next two 
weeks in ISDA energy committee meetings.

Regards,

Mark

Peter:

You are asking good questions.  Generally, most employees are part of ENA and 
provide services to all the wholesale businesses.  The executives tend to 
have their own company business cards and stationary.  But, most of the 
business continues under ENA or an existing company.  Occasionally, 
litigation concerns dictate not following the general rules.  You can get 
more specific info from Julia.

Mark

Niki:

I would be happy for 2 students to be assigned to Legal.

Mark

large

A few of my pictures.   Mark
	markehaedicke@hotmail.com
	09/04/2000 05:49 AM
		 
HI:

Just a few pictures from our trip.

Mark

Please print these out for me and forward to Mark Taylor, Alan, Elizabeth and 
Jeff Hodge.
	Corrinne Greasley <CGREASLEY@isda.org>
	09/07/2000 08:29 AM
		 
Following are additional materials to be included in the Board books
distributed last week.
We encourage you to share this with lawyers and others within your
organization to solicit their input for the discussions at the Board meeting
next week.

Tab 4 - Electronic Delivery of ISDA Documentation
 <<ED ISDA Docs.doc>>    <<E-delivery spreadsheet.xls>>   <<RFP for
e-docs.doc>>

Tab 5 - Single Multi-Product Master Agreement and Related Issues
Attached is the memorandum on Single Multi-Product Master Agreement and
Related Issues.  There are several attachments referred to in the memorandum
which will be forwarded to you later today.
 <<SAFT.doc>>

Bob Pickel

 - ED ISDA Docs.doc
 - E-delivery spreadsheet.xls
 - RFP for e-docs.doc
 - SAFT.doc

Accord should be a primary member.  It is the trading arm of British Gas.   
Mark

Thanks for the summary.  I had missed your prior e-mail on the topic.  Mark

Great!  Let me know how it goes.  Mark

Yes, go ahead and send it to Kevin.  It does not look very helpful in that we 
cannot argue ENA assigned EES a lot of value.  Mark

Dan, let's go with the following as modified.  Thanks,  Mark
	Dan Lyons
	09/01/2000 05:26 PM
		 
Mark, attached is the draft of the email to the deal team (with copies to you 
and Dave D)

[Distribution]

Prior to the equity investment in and joint venture with Power Systems 
Manufacturing ("PSM"), we will need to take the following actions:

+ Conduct additional due diligence on the PSM/General Electric ("GE") lawsuit 
regarding infringement of GE patents.  We will need to determine if the 
litigation will affect the viability of PSM as the operator or ENA as owner 
of the equipment involved in the litigation.  This will commence immediately 
and a brief legal opinion obtained on these points.

+Conduct legal patent due diligence on the mobile power units that are the 
subject of the proposed joint venture and obtain legal opinions with respect 
to both the component parts being acquired and the proposed modified  units 
themselves.  [Timing]

I appreciate all the work you did for us!   Mark

Well done!  Please send a copy of the plan to the OGC and work with Janette 
to schedule a meeting of the OGC to review the plan and get buy-in across the 
group.  Let's schedule the meeting for 1and 1/2 hours.  I would like you in 
the mean time to focus on a time line to implement the program.  Also, please 
set up a meeting for you and me with Phillippe Bibi to discuss getting help 
from IT to implement our plan.

Mark

I don't know anything about this.  Mark

Put me on the 11:50 flight and let's see if we can do dinner at 7:00 rather 
8:00.  Thanks, Mark

We are looking at buying several paper companies.  I think you should send 
them to me.  Thanks.  Mark

Thanks for the resume.  I do not need a regulatory lawyer at this time.   
Mark

John, I don't see that as a problem.  It was good to see you.

Regards,

Mark

Send the docs to Julia.  Mark

Please see below from ISDA.  Do we ever want to go to using the ISDA for 
physical and financial deals?  Should this be a long range plan?   Mark
	Robert Pickel <RPICKEL@isda.org>
	09/19/2000 08:06 AM
		 
As we discussed at the Board meeting last week, the impetus for a single
master agreement will need to come from several fronts, but especially from
within each of your firms. The various trade associations will be most
responsive to the idea if they are hearing strong support for a single
agreement from decision-making levels within member firms. We will
separately continue or commence a dialogue with the trade associations that
sponsor various agreements or are active in the areas of the financial
products that would be covered by such an agreement.

The trade associations we have identified as likely to be important to this
project are the following:

Securities Industry Association (US)
The Bond Market Association (US)
International Securities Market Association (principally Europe)
European Banking Federation (Europe)
The Foreign Exchange Committee (NY, London, Tokyo)
Emerging Markets Traders Association

The following associations may also be helpful to the process:

Australian Financial Markets Association
British Bankers Association
Japan Securities Dealers Association
Canadian Bankers Association
International Primary Markets Association (London-based)
ACI (The Foreign Exchange Association)(Paris-based)_

If your firm is active in any of these organizations, we encourage you to
discuss as soon as possible with your representative within that
organization the need to support the development of a single agreement for
financial products and urge them to express their support to the
associations. If it would be useful to share with them the thoughts in my
memorandum to the board, please feel free to do so. I have attached an
edited version which deletes the last couple of sections on my discussions
with the BMA, the Russo-Carlin group, Ernie Patrikis's letter and possible
approaches for ISDA.

I will try to contact each of you over the course of the next week to get
your feedback. In the meantime, if you have any questions, please do not
hesitate to email me or call me (212-332-2554)

Bob

 - SAFT.doc

I plan on playing golf.  Mark

I have responded below.  Also, my title is Managing Director and General 
Counsel of Enron Wholesale Markets.  I would add a bullet " comparison of 
masters in use in North America."   Mark
	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	09/19/2000 12:34 PM
		 
   Mark

 Bob, Mary and I have been discussing a variety of issues and need
your input before sending out the invitation, which we should do soon.
Please advise on the following:

   1.  We continue to feel the name of the committee
(including Power) is not sufficiently expansive to accommodate the growing
markets involving energy and other new derivatives. We were considering
something like Energy and Developing Derivative Markets?  We thought the old
name Commodities had a traditional rather than a forward-looking sound to
it. What are your thoughts?  I like Energy/Emerging Markets Committee or 
Energy and Emerging Markets Committee.

   2.  As we discussed a couple of weeks ago, invites
should go to US companies and non-US companies with a US presence in the
energy/commodity markets. Non-members should be invited as in London. We
told people at the London meeting about the Houston meeting so they are on
notice. Also, if there are minutes of that meeting produced soon they will
probably refer to the meeting so there may be no need to invite them.
Individual call-ins should be discouraged, but we might consider giving
people an opportunity to gather at ISDA NY and plug a small group in from
there. It's unlikely we will get many people from NY to go to Houston just
for this meeting.  I am ok with plugging people in from NYC so long as we 
know exactly who we are plugging in.

   3.  When you suggested Enron as the venue, were you
offering a conference room or should we be considering the Doubletree or
somewhere else?  .  Did we ever settle hours, etc. and whether there should
be some kind of "social event" afterwards and for whom?  All of this is
obviously intended to increase the profile/activity of the committee;
highlight the upcoming conference; focus on the issues that are not as
significant to the European committee. Should we agree to a general social
event, we'll include in the attached draft invitation.  I am ok having a 
social event, but wonder if we shouldn't see how this meeting goes and plan 
next time accordingly.  Please schedule a room at the Doubletree.  I would 
suggest 3:30 and plan on a two hours meeting.

   4. Attached is a draft invitation. Please
comment on the text, etc.   Would you prefer to be the signatory? No
    <<Energy Agenda Draft.doc>>

   I look forward to your thoughts.
   Many thanks, Ruth

 - Energy Agenda Draft.doc

Please fix this for me.    Mark
	Hal McKinney
	09/15/2000 04:45 PM
		 
Mr. Haedicke,

I'm a new hire and was recently advised to become familiar with the NYMEX.com 
website.  While I was there, I looked up Enron under NYMEX.com's "member 
firms" section.  I found Enron's name and your name as a contact point.  What 
was odd though was that although your email address appears correctly as a 
hyperlink ("mhaedic@ect.enron.com"), I noticed that the actual email 
reference was to someone at El Paso Energy, "morrissont@epenergy.com".  You 
can see this by right-clicking on the hyperlink and looking at the link's 
properties.   I believe this will cause emails intended for you to go to El 
Paso Energy.

I don't know how often this link would even be used so this may not be a big 
deal...

If you have any questions I may be reached at extension 53707.

Hal

Thanks for the message.  I will try to get that fixed.  Mark

Yes, include me on the list.  Mark Haedicke

What is the status of setting up Chinese Walls?   Mark

Bill:  

I would talk to Lisa Mellencamp about representing ENA re East Coast Power.

Mark

FYI
	"Oller, Jeremy" <Jeremy.Oller@chguernsey.com>
	09/22/2000 12:14 PM
		 
      We at C.H. Guernsey & Company are actively engaged in providing
resources to our clients in the areas of antitrust and the deregulating
industries. To this end, we have compiled a set of web pages linking
directly to federal and state antitrust legislation and to antitrust cases
of specific interest to analysts of the markets for electricity, natural gas
and telecommunications. Since they may be useful research tools for other
analysts in the field, we are now making these pages publicly available
though our web site. The address for "C.H. Guernsey's Antitrust Links" is:

http://www.chguernsey-econ.com/antilinks.html

     We invite you and interested members of your organization to review
these materials and to comment thereon; note that other comprehensive links
pages specific to electric and natural gas deregulation are also available
through our site (click "links" from our home page,
http://www.chguernsey-econ.com). All pages are updated bi-weekly.

     Should you or your organization maintain a web presence, you are
welcome to add a link to our web page from your site. If you have any
observations concerning the information on our site or any issues concerning
forming a link to us, please reply to this e-mail
(shaun.ledgerwood@chguernsey.com) or contact us between 9:00 and 6:00
CST/CDT at (405) 416-8183.

Sincerely,

Shaun D. Ledgerwood, J.D., Ph.D.
Economist/Attorney at Law

Jeremy Oller, J.D.
Economic Analyst/Attorney at Law

Mary:  Sorry, I can't make the lunch.  Historically, the interest in Enron 
sponsoring any event has been very low.  I will raise it but I am not 
optimistic.

Mark

Looks good to me.  Mark

non-smoking

Rappaport's comments are potentially very negative to us.  I think we should 
write him a letter in protest.    Mark

Please handle re Paul Nelson.
	"Philo, Andrea" <andrea.philo@linklaters.com>
	09/22/2000 05:51 AM
		 
Paul Nelson has asked me to forward to you details of the agency that
organises our art collection.

Lynne Stern and Linnet Feilding
Linnet Feilding Limited
200 Goldhurst Terrace
No 7 
NW6 3HL

Tel: 020 7491 8905
Fax: 020 7624 3749

I hope this is of help.

I wonder whether you could help on the following point. 
Paul is coming out to Houston to speak at an Enron conference on 4 October.
Although we have received a programme for this there is no mention of the
venue. I believe it is at the Woodlands Resort and Conference Centre and
wondered whether you would be so kind as to let us have the address and also
confirm that this is where Paul will be staying.

Many thanks

Regards
Andrea Philo
PA to Paul Nelson

____________________________________________________________

This message is confidential. It may also be privileged or
otherwise protected by work product immunity or other legal
rules. If you have received it by mistake please let us know
by reply and then delete it from your system; you should not
copy the message or disclose its contents to anyone.
____________________________________________________________

Please schedule.
	Coralina Rivera@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	09/20/2000 11:30 AM
		 
Frank Sayre asked that I coordinate a visit with you on Friday, Sept. 22. 
Please let me know what time will be convenient for you.

Thanks,
Corlaina x67926

	"mark haedicke" <markehaedicke@hotmail.com>
	09/24/2000 01:11 PM
		 
Rob:

The web site for the live cam at U of M is:

http://www.mlive.com/cams/stadium/

Mark
Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at 
http://profiles.msn.com.

	David W Delainey
	09/22/2000 06:32 PM
		 
Guys, I have spoken to Cliff and Mark and we are comfortable moving forward 
under the structure we have discussed.

 FCEL: - $5MM in equity and 1.3MM warrants from corporate treasury stock that 
vest based upon 60MW of orders;
  - discussion with FCEL in which we disclose ALL infromation we have about 
the potential Conn. deal - I will require that myself and Mark be on   that 
call;
  - the transaction is fully press released immediately.

 CRRA: - subject to final due diligence on the development risks, we provide 
the management and wrap for CRRA on the potential fuel cell development   
opportunity that consists of between 25 and 50 MW;
  - any appropriation of funds from the government will require DPUC hearing 
at which we will fully disclose in a factual manner our interest in    FCEL.

I will require that Mark Haedicke manage this process and sign off on all 
press releases, term sheets, disclosure discussions, contracts and regulatory 
filings.  I believe that we have this managed appropriately as long as we 
manage the process as per the script and in a factual manner.

Thanks
Delainey

We have purchased 30 copies of the referenced book.  It is a short read -- 
about 30-45 minutes.  The copies are located at the clerks' station, EB3808.  
Please read this short story prior to our ENA Legal Conference and then 
return it to the clerks' station so everyone attending the conference will 
have an opportunity to read it prior to the conference.      

I am working on the scheduling the meeting this afternoon with Power Systems 
and their outside lawyers to ask for the legal opinion we need on this 
matter.  We have to nail down all the facts and then get Power System's 
outside lawyers to write the appropriate opinion.  I will keep you posted.

Mark

Please send an e-mail copy of the speech I gave shortly after meeting with 
Mr. Ford.   Mark
	"Ford, George (CPS)" <george_ford@itc.co.harris.tx.us>
	09/25/2000 10:54 AM
		 
Mark

When you have the opportunity, I would like to get a copy of the speech you
were planning to give when we had lunch. Thanks.

George

George:

I will send it by e-mail.  Take care.   Mark

Please call John Arnold and ask him where the traders are coming out on 
this.  Let me know.  Mark

Jim, I am looking for weather data by region for 98 and 99.  I believe that 
there was a lot of extreme weather this year and I am looking to support 
that.  This is background info to support the arguments for standardized 
power contracts,  which are nearly agreed to.  Let me know what there is and 
who I should talk to.  Thanks for your help.     Mark

I think it is both Rappaport and his target audience.  I think Dan needs to 
hear directly from us that we are not happy with the position he has taken re 
electronic trading.  Silence by us could be misinterpreted by him.  Let me 
know what you think.

Mark

	Louise Kitchen
	09/25/2000 11:12 AM
		
Do you really this the right avenue would be directly to Rappaport - isn't it 
his target audience?

Do we need to do this - do you think the other exchanges will do something?

Rappaport's comments are potentially very negative to us.  I think we should 
write him a letter in protest.    Mark

	Dale Rasmussen
	09/25/2000 01:19 PM
		
Would it be possible to send a copy or two to Portland so we can do our due 
diligence?

Thanks.

We have purchased 30 copies of the referenced book.  It is a short read -- 
about 30-45 minutes.  The copies are located at the clerks' station, EB3808.  
Please read this short story prior to our ENA Legal Conference and then 
return it to the clerks' station so everyone attending the conference will 
have an opportunity to read it prior to the conference.      

Dan, please prepare a list of items you think I should sign off on and then 
set up a meeting where we can review that list with the whole team.     Mark
	David W Delainey
	09/22/2000 06:32 PM
		 
Guys, I have spoken to Cliff and Mark and we are comfortable moving forward 
under the structure we have discussed.

 FCEL: - $5MM in equity and 1.3MM warrants from corporate treasury stock that 
vest based upon 60MW of orders;
  - discussion with FCEL in which we disclose ALL infromation we have about 
the potential Conn. deal - I will require that myself and Mark be on   that 
call;
  - the transaction is fully press released immediately.

 CRRA: - subject to final due diligence on the development risks, we provide 
the management and wrap for CRRA on the potential fuel cell development   
opportunity that consists of between 25 and 50 MW;
  - any appropriation of funds from the government will require DPUC hearing 
at which we will fully disclose in a factual manner our interest in    FCEL.

I will require that Mark Haedicke manage this process and sign off on all 
press releases, term sheets, disclosure discussions, contracts and regulatory 
filings.  I believe that we have this managed appropriately as long as we 
manage the process as per the script and in a factual manner.

Thanks
Delainey

Steve:

It looks like a great program!  I am happy to participate.  I would like to 
have a teleconference of the panel within a few weeks so that I can make sure 
I have time to get my materials together. 

Regards,

Mark

	SKramer@milbank.com
	09/20/2000 04:14 PM
		 
Mark, 

Per my telephone conversation with Margaret Gerhardt, I want to thank you 
very much for your interest in participating on the e-commerce panel for the 
Energy Bar Association mid-year program.? Margaret suggested that you be 
listed on the program brochure as "invited," in case a conflict should arise. 
The Association will be distributing a final brochure at a later date which 
will reflect any changes in speakers.? Attached for your information is a 
draft program brochure and a brief overview of the? e-commerce panel.? The 
Association believes that the e-commerce panel is timely given the dramatic 
impact that electronic commerce is having on the economy generally, and in 
particular due to the unprecedented changes taking place in the energy 
industries.? Having the perspective of EnronOnline, the industry leader, will 
be a great addition to the program. 

Please let me know if you have questions or need additional information.? I 
look forward to seeing you at the program. 

Steve 

Steven M. Kramer 
Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP 
International Square Building 
1825 Eye Street, N.W. 
Washington, D.C. 20006 
TEL:? 202-835-7508 
FAX:? 202-835-7586 
skramer@milbank.com 

 <<EBA-MidYear2000-Agenda-Draft-9-12-00.doc>>  <<EBA Mid-Year Meeting.doc>> 

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential 
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee 
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended 
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited. 
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify 
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer. 

 - EBA-MidYear2000-Agenda-Draft-9-12-00.doc
 - EBA Mid-Year Meeting.doc

For your files.  Mark
	SKramer@milbank.com
	09/20/2000 04:14 PM
		 
Mark, 

Per my telephone conversation with Margaret Gerhardt, I want to thank you 
very much for your interest in participating on the e-commerce panel for the 
Energy Bar Association mid-year program.? Margaret suggested that you be 
listed on the program brochure as "invited," in case a conflict should arise. 
The Association will be distributing a final brochure at a later date which 
will reflect any changes in speakers.? Attached for your information is a 
draft program brochure and a brief overview of the? e-commerce panel.? The 
Association believes that the e-commerce panel is timely given the dramatic 
impact that electronic commerce is having on the economy generally, and in 
particular due to the unprecedented changes taking place in the energy 
industries.? Having the perspective of EnronOnline, the industry leader, will 
be a great addition to the program. 

Please let me know if you have questions or need additional information.? I 
look forward to seeing you at the program. 

Steve 

Steven M. Kramer 
Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP 
International Square Building 
1825 Eye Street, N.W. 
Washington, D.C. 20006 
TEL:? 202-835-7508 
FAX:? 202-835-7586 
skramer@milbank.com 

 <<EBA-MidYear2000-Agenda-Draft-9-12-00.doc>>  <<EBA Mid-Year Meeting.doc>> 

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential 
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee 
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended 
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited. 
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify 
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer. 

 - EBA-MidYear2000-Agenda-Draft-9-12-00.doc
 - EBA Mid-Year Meeting.doc

I got the chart in electronic form.  Mark
	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	09/20/2000 06:54 AM
		 
As requested.

 - memo for item 1 sep 11 2000.doc

John:

Let me know if you are ok with the following memo which would come from you 
and me to  the traders and senior originators:

Effective October 15, 2000, the retention period on tape recordings of trades 
done by telephone will be reduced from four months to one month.  The tapes 
regarding significant transactions may be retained for such longer period as 
approved in writing by both the Head Trader and the General Counsel.  Please 
propose those significant transactions on which you may wish to retain the 
tapes, prior to October 15, 2000, since the tapes on conversations older than 
one month will be destroyed on that date.  If you have any questions, please 
contact Mark Haedicke or Richard Sanders. 

We are still looking at moving to recording only the deal terms -- but that 
is a long term project.

Mark

Dan, I would like to have a brief meeting with the team to talk through the 
list -- to make sure we are all on the same wavelength.  Let's do it soon 
with the idea we would have another meeting to wrap things up as 
appropriate.  Mark

	Dan Lyons
	09/25/2000 03:23 PM
		
With respect to the laundry list Dave D sent you:

1. Press Releases-the press release has not yet been prepared, but a first 
draft was worked up by FCEL's consel. Cle Dade and I are going to look at it 
with respect to what we think it should say, but have not yet done so.

2.Term Sheet -I will send you a draft of the most recent term sheet I am 
aware of by separate email..I believe they are in discussions with FCEL on 
that draft, but nothing has been signed.

3.Disclosure Discussions-I will also send you under separate email the 
initial draft of the "talking points" for the disclosure discusison. It is 
new and has not been discussed internally yet.

4.Contracts-Initial drafts of the documents for the purchase of the equity 
have been drafted and we await comments from FCEL's counsel.  Kay Mann is 
handling the "State" side of the deal and I request Kay by copy of this memo 
to advise you on what the status of any dealings with the state might be.

5.Regulatory Filings-There will be no filings required with respect to the 
purchase of the equity, unless we have to file a Sched. 13D, which will 
depend upon the timing of the option vesting.  My gut reaction is that we 
will probably need to file the 13D, but it is a routine filing.  I do not 
know what will be required in terms of hearings in the state process and 
again request Kay to please advise us on that.

It seems to me thay we should get a little farther along before we meet with 
the team on this, but I defer to your judgment.  Let me know what you want to 
do.

                                                                Dan

	Mark E Haedicke
	09/25/2000 02:31 PM
		 
Dan, please prepare a list of items you think I should sign off on and then 
set up a meeting where we can review that list with the whole team.     Mark
	David W Delainey
	09/22/2000 06:32 PM
		 
Guys, I have spoken to Cliff and Mark and we are comfortable moving forward 
under the structure we have discussed.

 FCEL: - $5MM in equity and 1.3MM warrants from corporate treasury stock that 
vest based upon 60MW of orders;
  - discussion with FCEL in which we disclose ALL infromation we have about 
the potential Conn. deal - I will require that myself and Mark be on   that 
call;
  - the transaction is fully press released immediately.

 CRRA: - subject to final due diligence on the development risks, we provide 
the management and wrap for CRRA on the potential fuel cell development   
opportunity that consists of between 25 and 50 MW;
  - any appropriation of funds from the government will require DPUC hearing 
at which we will fully disclose in a factual manner our interest in    FCEL.

I will require that Mark Haedicke manage this process and sign off on all 
press releases, term sheets, disclosure discussions, contracts and regulatory 
filings.  I believe that we have this managed appropriately as long as we 
manage the process as per the script and in a factual manner.

Thanks
Delainey

	Sylvia Hu@ENRON
	09/25/2000 05:46 PM
		 
Reminder

Lexis-Nexis Luncheon is Wednesday, 9/27 from 11:30 AM to 1:00 PM.   Please 
note the training room has changed to EB49C1, a bigger conference room to sit 
30 people that have signed up for this luncheon.  The presentation is on 

Lexis Public Records  & lexis.com new features
Come see Certifinder & Company Dossier
LEXIS-NEXIS EASY SEARCH PAGES

See you Wednesday!

Sylvia Hu
Corporate and Law Information Services
x36775

Let me know if you see any problem.  Mark
	Mark E Haedicke
	09/26/2000 10:19 AM
		
I talked to Mark Frevert and John Sherriff and they are ok with the 
provision.  Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	Sent by: Liz N Martinez@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	09/25/2000 04:54 PM
		 
General Counsels -

At the direction of the Enron APACHI Office of the Chairman, I am sending 
this e-mail to you pursuant to the Enron Corp. Policy on Noncompetition.  I 
would appreciate if you would check with your CEO/COO regarding this e-mail 
and respond to me by Friday, September 29 if you have questions or concerns.  
Enron APACHI may need to commit to the following provisions (that bind Enron 
affiliates) by Monday, October 2.

Given the consolidating power generation market in Asia Pacific, Enron Asia 
Pacific/Africa/China (Enron APACHI) is proposing to enter into a transaction 
with Marubeni and Sithe Asia to combine the respective power generation 
portfolios into a single company (Newco).  Newco would be charged with making 
the shareholders' investments as liquid as possible to allow for sale of the 
shareholders' respective stakes in Newco.  

The shareholders believe that Newco must not be seen by the market as a 
"dumping ground" for existing power projects but rather as the vehicle 
through which the investors will continue to pursue power generation 
opportunities in Asia.  As a result, Enron APACHI proposes to include 
competition restrictions in the Marubeni/Enron Shareholder Agreement that 
would bind their respective affiliates.  

The following is a summary of these competition provisions:

Enron affiliates (with the exceptions stated below) could only develop or own 
power projects in the Asia Pacific Region (as defined below) after first 
offering the opportunity to Newco.  If Newco declines the opportunity, Enron 
would be free to own the project itself or offer the project to third parties 
provided that the terms do not materially improve.  Development or ownership 
does not include the provision of construction, O&M, offtaker or risk 
management services.

There are a number of exceptions to this rule:  (a) small projects involving 
20 MW or less; (b) projects in which Enron owns less than a 1/3 interest; (c) 
projects initiated by our SK joint venture; (d) Korean projects using natural 
gas produced by Enron; (e) projects obtained in a corporate acquisition in 
which Asia generation is less than 20% of the value of the acquisition; and 
(f) situations in which any Enron company would be exposed to fiduciary 
liability to another shareholder in complying with the competition 
restriction.

"Affiliates" will be defined to exclude Enron affiliates which are 
publicly-owned (e.g., Azurix).

"Asia Pacific Region" will be defined to include Brunei, China (including 
Hong Kong and Macau), South Korea, North Korea, Taiwan, Vietnam, Laos, 
Cambodia, Thailand, Myanmar, the Philippines, Malaysia, Indonesia, East 
Timor, Singapore, Papua New Guinea and the Pacific Islands (including Guam, 
Saipan, the Federated States of Micronesia, and Fiji, but excluding Hawaii).  
It does not include Japan and Australia.

The competition clause would survive until the earlier of (a) Enron selling 
its interest in Newco or (b) December 31, 2003.

Thank you,
Bruce Lundstrom, General Counsel, Enron APACHI

Can you look into this and get back to me.  Thanks.  Mark
Randal T Maffett
10/04/99 06:03 PM
	

A vendor with whom we do a lot of business with called me today and brought 
to my attention a very close copy of our patented "E."  Pinnacle West (the 
holding company parent of Arizona Public Service) has a subsidiary, El Dorado 
Investment Company, who has a logo consisting of a three-dimensional capital 
E turned on 45 deg. angle.  You can access the website at 
www.pinnaclewest.com and then go to the Who We Are page to review.

Just thought you'd like to know!

RANDY

Steve:  It's ok to put confirmed.  Mark

=09SKramer@milbank.com
=0909/25/2000 03:03 PM
=09=09=20
Mark,=20
I appreciate your taking the time out of your busy schedule to participate =
in=20
the program.  I will plan to arrange a conference call during the early par=
t=20
of October among the e-commerce panelists.  Can the program reflect that yo=
u=20
are confirmed, or should we list you as invited?
Steve=20

Steve:=20
It looks like a great program!  I am happy to participate.  I would like to=
=20
have a teleconference of the panel within a few weeks so that I can make=20
sure I have time to get my materials together.=20
Regards,=20
Mark=20

                                                                           =
  =20
                                    =20
                   =20
SKramer@milba                                                              =
  =20
                =20

Mark,=20
Per my telephone conversation with Margaret Gerhardt, I want to thank you=
=20
very much for your interest in participating on the e-commerce panel for=20
the Energy Bar Association mid-year program.=01;  Margaret suggested that y=
ou=20
be listed on the program brochure as "invited," in case a conflict should=
=20
arise. The Association will be distributing a final brochure at a later=20
date which will reflect any changes in speakers.=01;  Attached for your=20
information is a draft program brochure and a brief overview of the=20
e-commerce panel.=01;  The Association believes that the e-commerce panel i=
s=20
timely given the dramatic impact that electronic commerce is having on the=
=20
economy generally, and in particular due to the unprecedented changes=20
taking place in the energy industries.=01;  Having the perspective of=20
EnronOnline, the industry leader, will be a great addition to the program.=
=20
Please let me know if you have questions or need additional information.=01=
;  I=20
look forward to seeing you at the program.=20
Steve=20
Steven M. Kramer=20
Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP=20
International Square Building=20
1825 Eye Street, N.W.=20
Washington, D.C. 20006=20
TEL:=01;  202-835-7508=20
FAX:=01;  202-835-7586=20
skramer@milbank.com=20
 <<EBA-MidYear2000-Agenda-Draft-9-12-00.doc>>  <<EBA Mid-Year Meeting.doc>>=
=20
This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential=20
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee=20
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended=20
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination,=20
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited.=20
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify=20
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer.=20

(See attached file: EBA-MidYear2000-Agenda-Draft-9-12-00.doc)=20
(See attached file: EBA Mid-Year Meeting.doc)=20
 << File: EBA-MidYear2000-Agenda-Draft-9-12-00.doc >>  << File: EBA Mid-Yea=
r=20
Meeting.doc >>=20

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential=20
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee=20
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended=20
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination,=20
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited.=20
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify=20
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer.=20

Please briefly review the slides attached below and give me your reaction.  
Please forward on to our clients if you think it would be helpful.   Mark
	"Ingram, Kay" <KIngram@lockeliddell.com>
	09/20/2000 10:50 AM
		 
As a follow-up to my earlier e-mail regarding Steve Brownell's experience
regarding municipalization strategies as a way to facilitate Enron's efforts
to be the energy manager for communities, I have attached a proposal
pursuant to which you can potentially use tax-exempt financing to
restructure power contracts.  Let me know if you or anyone else over there
are interested in talking about this further.  I think it's an interesting
idea.

Kay Ingram
Assistant to H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp
(713) 226-1317
kingram@lockeliddell.com

 - 1

I think you must be looking for Mark Holsworth at Enron Corp.  Mark Haedicke

	Mike Haney@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	09/20/2000 09:12 AM
		
Mark:

Robin Hill gave me your name as a contact for a potential NDA with one of our 
prospective clients.  Would you please let me know how we would obtain an NDA 
between i2 and Enron Corp. for this transaction?

Please call or e-mail me if you have comments or questions about this.

Thanks,

Mike Haney
x58968

	Robin Hill
	09/20/00 08:43 AM
		
Mark Haedicke

Robin L. Hill, Legal Specialist
Enron Broadband Services
1400 Smith, Suite 4545
Houston, Texas 77002
(713)853-3255
(713)646-8537 fax
Robin_Hill@Enron.net

	Mike Haney
	09/20/00 08:38 AM
		
Robin:

This NDA will be between i2 and Enron, not EBS, as you pointed out.  Who do 
we talk to in order to obtain an NDA with Enron Corp.?

Please call or e-mail me if you have questions.

Thanks,

Mike

	Robin Hill
	09/19/00 09:54 AM
		
This NDA is with Enron Corp. and EBS is not permitted to bind Enron Corp.  
The legal department would like for all potential clients to review our form 
for execution.  If they present their own form we are happy to review it, 
however there is almost always terms of their form that need to be 
negotiated.  Therefore, if they review our form NDA and it is acceptable the 
process is a lot quicker.  

Attached is the NDA with EBS and C-Store Matrix to send to them for 
execution.   Please select the "Read Only" option in order to open and 
print.  Please print 2 originals for signature so each party has an original 
executed NDA, or you may e-mail it to them as long as they follow up with 2 
originals.  After the other party executes it, you will need to get an EBS 
attorney to initial it before an EBS VP or above can execute it on our 
behalf.  If you have any questions please call me and please make sure I get 
an executed original back.  Thanks.

Robin L. Hill, Legal Specialist
Enron Broadband Services
1400 Smith, Suite 4545
Houston, Texas 77002
(713)853-3255
(713)646-8537 fax
Robin_Hill@Enron.net

	Shelly Friesenhahn
	09/19/00 09:10 AM
		 
Robin,

Attached is an NDA from C-Store Matrix, an i2 exchange platform company.  
Please review the document and note any necessary modifications so we can 
continue to move forward on this transaction.  Thanks.

Please call me with any questions.

Thanks,
Shelly Friesenhahn
3-3442

	Cam_Reed@i2.com
	09/13/00 03:27 PM
		 
Rex and David,

Here is a copy of the NDA for C-StoreMatrix.  I am not sure if this has
been forwarded to you yet, but I wanted to make sure you have it.

Call Steve/Tom/myself if you have any questions.

(See attached file: Enron Mutual Disclosure of Information.zip)

Thanks,

Cam

 - Enron Mutual Disclosure of Information.zip

Paul:

It is true that there is no wall -- however, it is geographically separate.  
The equity trading is the end portion of the floor.  There are three hallways 
that go to equity trading, each about 10 feet long.  It would not be possible 
to hear anything said outside of the equity trading area.  Robert Bruce is 
working on updating our policy and procedures in Houston and by copy hereof 
ask him to update you.

	Paul Simons
	09/19/2000 01:53 PM
		
Mark

Thanks for the enquiry.

I've had discussions with Gary this week and am now working out how soft the 
wall can be in light of that!  I understand from Gary that in Houston the 
Chinese walls are not as hard as I imagined ie no physical wall or separate 
security pass system.  Please confirm. Many thanks

Paul

What is the status of setting up Chinese Walls?   Mark

Please confirm we send this memo to MDs and key commercial employes.    Mark
	Brenda Whitehead
	09/11/2000 09:16 AM
		 
per the request of Mark Haedicke/Elizabeth Sager, please see this 
attachment:   

Everyone was intrigued that Enron submitted a proposal.  However, it is 
difficult to guess the outcome.  Mark

Rick:  I would like to have a presentation on local rules such as ISO rules 
in the various locations where we operate.  Can your group do this as we work 
on the legal presentations.  I believe this is already happening in part, but 
I would like to make more institutionalized.  Let me know.   Mark

	Richard Shapiro@EES
	09/08/2000 09:42 AM
		
I agree and am copying this message to Mark and Jeff- Thanks.

I sent you along yesterday a copy of the e-mail re the participation by Rob 
and me in the seminars that Blakes is doing for the traders and originators 
in Canada.  Thinking about it more this morning, I am wondering whether the 
seminars that Sullivan & Cromwell are doing in the US are too narrow in 
their  focus.  That is, it is important for traders not merely to understand 
the competition/anti-trust rules but also  the rules and practices of the 
market surveillance panels or committees that operate, I think, in each of 
the ISO jurisdictions.   It is that piece that Rob and I will be  trying to 
add in Canada.  Just a thought in case you want to raise it withJeff Hodge or 
Mark Haedicke. 

Please work with Richard Sanders to decide on the distribution list which 
should include all MDs and Robert Knight.  I want to get it out by 
Wednesday.  Mark
	Mark E Haedicke
	09/25/2000 07:03 PM
		 
John:

Let me know if you are ok with the following memo which would come from you 
and me to  the traders and senior originators:

Effective October 15, 2000, the retention period on tape recordings of trades 
done by telephone will be reduced from four months to one month.  The tapes 
regarding significant transactions may be retained for such longer period as 
approved in writing by both the Head Trader and the General Counsel.  Please 
propose those significant transactions on which you may wish to retain the 
tapes, prior to October 15, 2000, since the tapes on conversations older than 
one month will be destroyed on that date.  If you have any questions, please 
contact Mark Haedicke or Richard Sanders. 

We are still looking at moving to recording only the deal terms -- but that 
is a long term project.

Mark

Effective October 15, 2000, the retention period on tape recordings of trades 
done by telephone will be reduced from four months to one month.  The tapes 
regarding significant transactions may be retained for such longer period as 
approved in writing by both the Head Trader and the General Counsel.  Please 
propose those significant transactions on which you may wish to retain the 
tapes, prior to October 15, 2000, since the tapes on conversations older than 
one month (except with respect to litigation matters) will be destroyed on 
that date.  If you have any questions, please contact Mark Haedicke or 
Richard Sanders. 

John Lavorato and Mark Haedicke

per our conversation.  Mark
	"Al Kimball" <akimball@bracepatt.com>
	09/27/2000 02:58 PM
		 
Pursuant to our telephone conversation today, here is the letter we indicated 
we would be sending.  A signed original is also being sent by regular mail.

 - 1166833v2.doc

Alan, please handle and respond directly to Rick.  It looks like it would be 
a good opportunity for ECT to speak.  Mark

Mark,

Would any of your colleagues be interested in speaking in Singapore in
September on the Global Energy Derivatives Market (see the attached
invitation).  None of the ISDA staff can speak at this conference because
our September Board meeting will be held the same week.

Rick

For the attention of :
Mr Richard E Grove Jr
Executive Director &
Chief Executive Officer
International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc
New York, USA

[[ SWAPSPKR.DOC : 2566 in SWAPSPKR.DOC ]]                  [[ APPECH~1.DOC :

2567 in APPECH~1.DOC ]]

From :

Patrick Soh
Conference Manager
APPEC 99
Times Conferences & Exhibitions
Singapore

 - SWAPSPKR.DOC
 - APPECH~1.DOC

The schedule looks good.  I don't think there is any need for me to meet with 
Stikeman.  Thanks.  Mark

The lunch for October will be at Dong Ting, 611 Stuart at Smith, from Noon to 
1:00 PM.  The telephone number is 713-527-0005.  Please RSVP to my assistant, 
Janette Elbertson, at extension 37906 to let her know if you will be 
attending.

Thanks.

The luncheon will be on Tuesday, October 3rd.

If you have a copy of Who Moved My Cheese? please read it at your earliest 
convenience and return it to the clerks' station so everyone attending the 
conference has an opportunity to read it.

Thank you.

Per our conversation.  Mark

There is no attachment.  Mark

	Angela Davis@ENRON
	10/02/2000 05:57 PM
		 
Attached is a legal risk memo for the above referenced investment.

Angela D. Davis

Please retype and send the memo directly within e-mail.  Thanks,  Mark

	Deb Korkmas
	10/02/2000 04:38 PM
		 
Mark,
Please see attached memo regarding ENA 2000 Legal Budget.  Also, I hope to 
have the Legal Expenditures memo completed by tomorrow.  Kris Armstrong is 
updating the ENA Team List that appears as a Schedule to the memo.  Deb

Deb Korkmas

	Jeffrey A Shankman
	10/02/2000 12:02 PM
		
We need to get joe hirl, and mark haedicke involved in this.  Thanks.  Jeff

Rick Bergsieker@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
10/01/2000 06:32 AM
I have left Jeff and Mike a voicemail suggesting that we sign the CA and take 
the lead on this.  Will advise when I hear a reply from them

Clay Harris
09/30/2000 03:10 PM
Rick,

As you recall we had previously decided to have E Power be the counterparty 
to BHP for formal arrangements in pursuing the terminal opportunity is Japan. 
Should we reconsider this approach given the new organization. E Power 
interest is in cheap fuel and not the terminal or pipelines. Please advise 
and I will handle with Carey. We have a meeting in Japan with BHP on Oct 16th 
to execute the CA.

Clay 

FYI.  I am working on new procedures requiring a "budget" for outside counsel 
on our more complex deals to improve cost control.  Mark
	Deb Korkmas
	10/03/2000 09:08 AM
		 
I have reviewed the O&M Expenses for ENA Legal for month-ended August 31, 
2000, as compared to the budgeted amount for the same period.  The overall 
legal budget was $4,835,184 over budget as of August 31, primarily due to 
Outside Costs which went over the planned amount by $5,094,838.  The most 
significant outside costs were incurred in litigation, power plant 
development, legally intensive deals such as United Illuminating, and 
misallocated costs for Projects Summer and California.  The Inside Costs were 
under budget in the amount of $259,654.

If you have any questions, please call me at extension 35448.

Deb Korkmas

Thanks.  Mark

Please delete the referenced meetings from your calendars.  It is no longer 
necessary to have this meeting on Thursdays, from 11:00 to 11:30 AM.

Thank you.

Should the first order of business be to decide who is responsible for each 
form and then review who must approve the changes?  Maybe we should do that 
ahead of time?  Also, should we set a time schedule?  Mark

	Mark E Haedicke
	09/06/2000 04:49 PM
		 
A few of my pictures.   Mark
	markehaedicke@hotmail.com
	09/04/2000 05:49 AM
		 
HI:

Just a few pictures from our trip.

Mark

Hi Larry:

I think your best shot at Enron would be in paper with Bryan.  I think we got 
a gift -- I remember Susan saying something.  I am just the Dad!  Everything 
is going well.  Keep me posted on your job opportunities or if you want me to 
follow up with anyone here.

Mark

	LDLIPMAN@aol.com
	10/02/2000 08:50 PM
		 
Hi Mark:

I heard from Ted Bland last week. He said that George still has not tested 
the equipment and Bryan has not met with the COO about hiring yet. 

I am looking forward to an offer coming in this week from a small public 
company that wants me to develop a new business development group and 
increase their sales from $10MM to $50MM over the next couple of  years and 
get the stock price up. 

I am still operating the fitness company but it is quickly coming to an end 
due to running out of money so I am looking forward to finding a new position 
in the next couple of weeks. 

Everyone is settled into school and doing well. What is new with you and your 
family? 

Debbie and I sent you and Susan a gift a month or so ago for having Bryan 
stay with you. Did you receive it? 

I look forward to hearing from you.

Larry

Joe:

Thanks for the invitation.  I would love to be there but unfortunately I 
can't make it.  

Mark

Only the 3 slides on power point.  Mark

Does Rob want to meet on Oct 5?  If yes, I want to be done by 10:00.   Mark
	Rob Walls@ENRON
	09/28/2000 04:57 PM
		 
Three things:

I attach a copy of the memo on the federal electronic signature law that we 
discussed this morning.  Mark and I will discuss with Alan his original 
proposal of adding a footer to company emails and get back to the group.  
Until then no footer will be added.  

With respect to Paulette, I understand that each of you agree to bear your 
proportionate share of her cost for the budget year 2000--although the basis 
of that allocation is still to be agreed.  

Finally, we agreed to discuss what projects we would like for our technology 
committee to undertake.  I propose that we discuss this topic during next 
Thursday's meeting--since Jim will be out of town we can have this meeting in 
lieu of the regular meeting.  I think having this discussion now would be 
helpful and I think the technology group would greatly benefit from the 
meeting as well.  Let me know if that is acceptable to you.  

Thanks.

	Nora Dobin
	09/20/2000 03:53 PM
		 
As I mentioned at our last meeting, we have been working with issues of 
electronic contracts and signatures in Global Finance, especially in the 
development, implementation and ongoing operations of the DealBench Internet 
site.  Vinson & Elkins has been working with us on DealBench and related 
e-commerce matters.  Attached for your information is a V&E memorandum on 
electronic contracts and signatures under federal, Delaware, New York, Texas 
and certain uniform laws.  

As a postscript to the meeting minutes circulated today, Enron Corp., some of 
its affiliated entities and third parties successfully are using the 
DealBench site for various types of transactions.  

Let me know if I can help or provide additional information on any of these 
matters.

Regards, NJD

Yes for the choice of law but not for jurisdiction.  We could agree to 
non-exclusive jurisdiction in Ohio.

Mark

	James Grace@ENRON
	10/03/2000 01:22 AM
		 
Mark:

I am reviewing a CA that has an Ohio choice of law provision and an Ohio 
exclusive jurisdiction provision, although this latter provision would only 
apply to any injunction actions since the CA has our standard arbitration 
provision.  The opposing side has already rejected New York as the governing 
law.  Can we live with Ohio?

Jim

It is ok with me.  Mark

 The attached legal report summarizes current significant legal activities of 
ENA Legal as of September 15, 2000.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.

 Please let me know if you have any questions.

I am ok with the seminar.  People may have figured out other ways like self 
study to get their ethics hours in.  Mark

FYI
	David W Delainey
	10/10/2000 10:12 AM
		 
Guys, please mark your calendars for the 2000 ENA Management Offsite 
scheduled for December 14th and 15th at the Venetian in Las Vegas.  We 
envision people flying in the afternoon/evening of December 13th with the 
offsite being held on December 14th and 15th.  Departure would occur the 
morning of December 16th.  It is important that everyone stays for the entire 
period including Friday night.  Jeff Skilling and Greg Whalley have taken 
time out their schedule to speak to us on Thursday and Friday night about 
Enron Corps strategy and our eCommerce/Networks strategy respectively.

A complete agenda will follow shortly.

Dorie Hitchcock will manage all the logistics.

Regards
Delainey

No problem.

FYI
=09"IssueAlert" <IssueAlert@scientech.com>
=0910/10/2000 06:32 AM
=09=09=20
http://www.consultrci.com

Miss last week? Catch up on the latest in the energy industry at:=20
http://www.consultrci.com/web/infostore.nsf/Products/IssuesWatch=20
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D
SCIENTECH IssueAlert, October 10, 2000
PG&E's Rate Cap Proposal: Leading the Charge for Re-Regulation, or Protecti=
ng=20
Itself from Economic Disaster?=20
By: Will McNamara, Director, Electric Industry Analysis
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D

Pacific Gas & Electric Co. (PG&E), in filings with the California Public=20
Utilities Commission (CPUC) and California Independent System Operator=20
(Cal-ISO), has requested that a rate cap be placed on wholesale purchases=
=20
in the state. The utility is asking the CPUC to lower the current rate=20
cap from $250 per megawatt hour to $100, or 10 cents per kilowatt hour.=20
In seeking the rate cap, PG&E is joined by Edison International, the parent=
=20
company of Southern California Edison, and The Utility Action Network (TURN=
),=20
a ratepayer advocacy group.

ANALYSIS: The current rate cap of $250 per megawatt hour in the wholesale=
=20
market of California resulted from the price spikes experienced in San=20
Diego this summer. As San Diego Gas & Electric had paid off its stranded=20
costs, the retail rate freeze in its area was lifted and SDG&E customers=20
were exposed to market-based prices, which doubled and at times tripled=20
due to increased demand in the state and power supply concerns. PG&E=20
customers=20
were not exposed to the price spikes because, at the time, PG&E had not=20
paid off its own stranded costs and was still under a retail rate freeze.

Yet the company has felt the impact from the price spikes just the same.=20
PG&E buys a great deal of its power on the wholesale market, and as a resul=
t=20
is about $2.2 billion in debt (some figures suggest it is as high as $2.7=
=20
billion). Due to the retail rate freeze still in effect, PG&E has been=20
unable to pass this debt on to customers by raising its rates. In real=20
terms, PG&E was paying up to 19 cents per kilowatt hour on the wholesale=20
market this summer, when by law it was only allowed to charge its customers=
=20
on average 5 cents per kilowatt hour. In total, PG&E has paid about $2.7=20
billion more to suppliers than it can bill customers for, and this amount=
=20
is growing by hundreds of millions each month. This explains the utility's=
=20
motivation in wanting to see the CPUC further lower the cap on wholesale=20
rates in California.

However, even though PG&E as a whole is in debt, the utility=01*as well as=
=20
other divisions under parent company PG&E Corp.=01*is still making money of=
f=20
deregulation in California. For instance, PG&E's Diablo Canyon nuclear=20
plant has been able to capitalize on the high value of power on the wholesa=
le=20
market. The utility confirmed recently that altogether its power facilities=
=01*
the=20
ones left after the utility was forced to divest the bulk of its power=20
assets=01*still provide about $150 million a month to the utility. In addit=
ion,=20
PG&E Corp.'s unregulated energy commodity trading operation has been doing=
=20
very well. And the unregulated National Energy Group=01*which operates in=
=20
markets outside of California, such as Massachusetts, Rhode Island and=20
New Hampshire=01*posted a 233-percent profit increase for the second quarte=
r.=20
Thus, it is important to note the distinction between PG&E and its parent,=
=20
PG&E Corp. Ironically, as a whole, PG&E Corp. has stated that it does not=
=20
support rate caps, and has opposed the issue when it has surfaced in other=
=20
states.

PG&E reported second-quarter earnings of $216 million on $2.3 billion in=20
revenue, representing a 26-percent increase over the same quarter last=20
year. Third quarter earnings also reportedly will be strong. This puts=20
PG&E in an awkward predicament. On one hand, PG&E wants to convince=20
shareholders=20
that the company is doing well and making money from the commodities that=
=20
it sells. On the other hand, PG&E is attempting to convince regulators=20
that it is losing money due to the high wholesale prices that it must pay=
=20
for power. In fairness, though, the revenue PG&E has earned cannot come=20
anywhere near to paying off the massive debt the company has accrued due=20
to its obligation of serving customers.

PG&E's rate freeze is scheduled to end March 31, 2002, at the very latest,=
=20
or sooner if it is determined that PG&E's stranded costs have been repaid,=
=20
something that utility executives say may already have taken place. Due=20
to higher-than-expected revenues and higher-than-market valuations of the=
=20
utility's assets, it may very well be the case that PG&E's stranded costs=
=20
are already paid off. When this is officially determined by the CPUC, PG&E=
=20
will argue that customers should be liable for some or all of the debt=20
it has assumed while the rate caps were in place. The CPUC has scheduled=20
a hearing to address these issues on Oct. 19. The core question of these=20
proceedings will be whether or not PG&E should be allowed to turn over=20
its debt to customers through rate increases once the rate freeze is lifted=
.=20
PG&E wants to be able to retroactively bill customers for its debt, based=
=20
on the date which the CPUC determines that PG&E had in fact paid off its=20
stranded costs, a point groups such as TURN will surely protest.

It may seem surprising that TURN was among the group with PG&E that filed=
=20
the petition to lower the rate cap on wholesale prices. Typically, TURN=20
and PG&E (along with most utilities) are at polar opposites regarding most=
=20
issues. However, both agree that wholesale rates are too high and want=20
to see a new cap put into place, but for completely different reasons.=20
TURN says that PG&E and other utilities took a risk when agreeing to the=20
rate freeze and they should not be allowed to pass debts that resulted=20
from that risk onto customers. TURN continues to retain a watch over the=20
proceedings related to PG&E's proposal, specifically with regard to the=20
possibility that the CPUC will allow the utility to raise rates on customer=
s.

Within the course of these new developments, it's important to be clear=20
on PG&E's motivations. Some California lawmakers and consumer advocates=20
have called for a complete return to regulation, arguing that deregulation=
=20
in California has become a failed experiment. Many have surmised that PG&E'=
s=20
proposal for wholesale caps is essentially a call to return California=20
to a regulated structure. I think this is a misinterpretation. PG&E has=20
very clearly stated that its proposal is a "necessary short-term step to=20
try to bring prices back in line." PG&E's efforts really shouldn't be viewe=
d=20
as a move to return California to a regulated market. Rather, PG&E is merel=
y=20
attempting to protect its own interests. The utility wants to secure=20
temporary=20
lower rates for the power it needs to buy on the wholesale market and=20
transfer=20
its debts to customers once the rate freeze is lifted. A return to regulati=
on=20
via a permanent rate cap would not be in PG&E's best interests as it=20
continues=20
to sell power from its nuclear plant. In addition, PG&E probably recognizes=
=20
that regulation would discourage additional companies from building new=20
power plants in California, which would not be good for the long-term econo=
my=20
of the state. This also would do little to lower wholesale prices in=20
California.=20
As we discovered this summer, the less supply, the higher the price for=20
power.=20

PG&E's proposal to lower rate caps on wholesale prices is, more than anythi=
ng=20
else, an attempt to protect itself from what it perceives as disastrous=20
economic impact if it is not able to transfer its debt to customers. A=20
recent Wall Street Journal report inferred that if wholesale prices continu=
e=20
to exceed what PG&E can charge customers, the utility could become=20
"technically=20
insolvent" sometime next year. It will be interesting to see if the CPUC=20
has the same perception when it evaluates PG&E's proposal later this month.=
=20

=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D
Need to design and implement your IT infrastructure? Learn more about=20
SCIENTECH's=20
Information Technology team and what they can do for you at:

 http://www.consultrci.com/web/rciweb.nsf/web/Depts-IT.html
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D

SCIENTECH is pleased to provide you with your free, daily IssueAlert. Let=
=20
us know if we can help you with in-depth analyses or any other SCIENTECH=20
information products including e-commerce and telecom in the electric utili=
ty=20
industry. If you would like to refer a colleague to receive our free, daily=
=20
IssueAlerts, please reply to this email and include their full name and=20
email address or register directly at:

http://www.consultrci.com/web/infostore.nsf/Products/IssueAlert

Sincerely,

Will McNamara
Director, Electric Industry Analysis
wmcnamara@scientech.com
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D
Feedback regarding SCIENTECH's IssueAlert should be sent to=20
wmcnamara@scientech.com
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=
=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D=3D

SCIENTECH's IssueAlerts are compiled based on independent analysis by=20
SCIENTECH=20
consultants.  The opinions expressed in SCIENTECH's IssueAlerts are not=20
intended to predict financial performance of companies discussed or to=20
be the basis for investment decisions of any kind.  SCIENTECH's sole purpos=
e=20
in publishing its IssueAlerts is to offer an independent perspective=20
regarding=20
the key events occurring in the energy industry, based on its long-standing=
=20
reputation as an expert on energy and telecommunications issues.

Copyright 2000.  SCIENTECH, Inc.

If you do not wish to receive any further IssueAlerts from SCIENTECH, pleas=
e=20
reply to this message and in the body of the email type "remove."

	Dave Martinez@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	10/10/2000 09:31 AM
		 
My name is Dave Martinez and I am the new Team Lead over the Executive 
Support Team.  I have worked Executive Support before so some I know and some 
I don't.  If you have any question and or issues that need to be resolved 
please let me know,,  my information is located below.  I need to get some 
information so that we can better Support the Execs and all their 
Assistants.  I would appreciate any assistance possible. Thank you for your 
time. 

Executive Name                                          
Title- 
Company-
Office Phone-
Location- 
Cell Phone- 
Car Phone-
Pager-N/A
(Optional) International Cell and Office Phone- 

Assistants Name - 
Title- 
Company-
Office Phone-
Location-
Cell Phone-
Car Phone-
Pager-
(Optional) International Cell and Office Phone- 

Dave Martinez 
Executive Support Team Lead 
713-503-6651 cell
713-853-5447 Wk
877-810-8119 pgr
8778108119@skytel.com (email pgr)

Dave:

This is for routine and "small" matters only.  The resolutions are drafted so 
that the signature authority is narrow and specific.   Frequency is only one 
factor.   An example would be certain defined right-of-way agreements and 
certain defined confirms.  I will review the authority that has been 
delegated currently.  [Julia and Deb, please pull the existing resolutions 
with delegation of authority and let's review.] 

	David W Delainey
	10/09/2000 01:37 PM
		 
Janet, I completely disagree with legals position.  I have difficulty with 
some of our VP's having signing authority.  I believe this is a significant 
control issue.

Mark, is this widespread in ENA?

Regards
Delainey
Janet R Dietrich
10/09/2000 12:54 PM

Well, I talked with legal about this and I understand that they can and do 
give signature authority to directors on a relatively frequent basis. I gave 
them the parameters for Ben to make it even easier. If they end up saying 
it's a bigger issue than originally articulated, I'll continue with Ben as we 
currently have it.  Thanks.

Bonnie:  Thanks for your note.  I would be happy to meet with you and review 
opportunities.  Give my assistant a call.  Mark

	Bonnie Nelson@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	10/09/2000 12:55 PM
		 
Mark,

I am a lawyer with APACHI and as APACHI is winding down, I am looking for 
other job options at Enron.  Rob Walls advised me to get in touch with you as 
you may be looking to hire more lawyers.  I would very much like to meet with 
you at your convenience.  Attached please find a copy of my resume for your 
information.

Bonnie Nelson

You are meeting with Bowen who has authority to hire.  Give me a call and we 
can talk through each of the people.  Take care.  Mark

	LDLIPMAN@aol.com
	10/12/2000 08:53 AM
		 
Hi Mark:

Luann Mitchell called me to schedule a trip to Houston on Wednesday 10/18 to 
meet with the paper group.

She has me set to meet with 

Bob Crane 10:30 , Ray Bowen 11:00,  Steven Klein 11:30, and Ed Quinn 12:00. 
Bryan will be out of town but told her that he has spoken with me several 
times and was confident in what these gentleman had to say.

Any thoughts, input, or suggestions?

Larry

Primary.  I think we should give an ultimatum to Cargill.  I could say that 
all Enron trading is to hedge risk too!

Mark

Please schedule this call.  Mark
	SKramer@milbank.com
	10/11/2000 05:20 PM
		 
I would like to convene a brief conference call next week among the speakers 
participating in the Energy Bar Association E-Commerce panel so that each 
speaker is aware of the topics that will be covered in the presentations and 
to answer any question that panelists may have.  I would expect the call to 
run approximately a half hour.  Please let me know if you would be available 
for a call on either Wednesday, October 18, or Thursday, October 19, at 1:30 
p.m. eastern time.  If those times do not work, please let me know when you 
would be available.  Thank you, and I am looking forward to an interesting 
panel.
Steven M. Kramer 
Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP 
International Square Building 
1825 Eye Street, N.W. 
Washington, D.C. 20006 
TEL:  202-835-7508 
FAX:  202-835-7586 
skramer@milbank.com 

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential 
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee 
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended 
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited. 
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify 
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer. 

Please give Michelle Cash a call or Karen Jones in Portland.     Mark

	Eric Thode@ENRON
	10/11/2000 02:44 PM
		 
I received a call from Sam Wehn, who is in our California office.  He needs a 
consulting contract written up for Gene Tackett, who provides public and 
government affairs support to our California development activities.  Who 
would handle writing up such a contract?  Please advise.

Eric

Set me up for a lunch or a Rockets game.  The tickets should be coming soon.  
Mark
	Alan Aronowitz
	Sent by: Joya Davis
	10/09/2000 10:27 AM
		 
David will be spending a couple of weeks with us in Houston (October 9 - 20) 
before he goes to London for a week.  It would be great if each of you could 
set up a lunch or dinner with him while he's here.  He will be in EB3878C at 
extension 5-3757, while he's here and his assistant will be Chaundra Woods at 
extension 5-7621. 

Thanks in advance for your assistnace in making David's stay here in Houston 
enjoyable.

Regards, 

Alan

Please handle.  Mark
	"Theaker, Helen" <htheaker@velaw.com>
	10/07/2000 10:42 AM
		 
>    
> Mr. Haedicke,
> 
> I'm updating V&E's contact list for Joe Dilg and would like to
> confirm/correct the information we have in our system for you and/or fill
> in any blanks.  In that we may have deliveries to make, I am including
> your home address in this request.  Here's what we show:
> 
> Name:         Mark E. Haedicke
> Title:          Managing Director and General Counsel

Terry:

Greetings.  I have been reading about lliberalization of power markets in 
Japan starting next year.  I wondered if you expect IBJ or any of the other 
large financial institutions in Japan to make a market in power?  Would you 
or someone else you know want to talk about that?  Let me know.  Hope things 
are going well.

Take care.

Mark

 In order to provide better oversight and control of ENA legal expenditures 
on large transactions, please continue to follow the procedures set forth 
below for transactions where outside legal fees and expenses are expected to 
exceed $25,000.00.  The purpose of these procedures is to (i) improve 
communication with counsel (inside and outside) on issues, fees and services 
and (ii) send price signals on legal costs (with respect to specific 
transactions) on a timely basis to the business units.  Every effort should 
be made to continue to provide high quality legal work that has become 
standard at ENA.

 1.  A written estimate of proposed fees and expenses and a written 
description of the services shall be provided by our outside counsel.  The 
responsible business unit and the General Counsel shall review and approve 
such written estimate before our outside counsel is directed to provide 
substantial professional services.

 2.  Our outside counsel shall be instructed to promptly submit a revised 
written estimate if such outside counsel determines that legal fees and 
expenses for such transaction will exceed the previous written estimate by 
$25,000.00.  Such revised written estimate shall be reviewed and approved by 
the responsible business unit and the General Counsel or his/her designee 
before our outside counsel is directed to provide substantial additional 
professional services. 

 3.  In order to accurately track such expenses so that the expenses can be 
properly allocated to the various business units, a work order number should 
be obtained for each transaction.  

 Thank you for your cooperation.  If you have any questions or any other 
suggestions for controlling expenses, please call me at extension 36544.

Please update me on the issues.  Mark
	Kevin M Presto
	10/06/2000 02:25 PM
		
Although I know there are specific circumstances for Entergy and Southern's 
case (inadequate corp. guarantee language in the master agreements), I echo 
Rogers comments.  We must resolve these issues quickly.

In order to make the P&L and EOL targets that Lavo and Delainey have imposed 
on East Power for 4th qtr 2000 and calender year 2001, we must be able to 
transact with all load serving utilities and all merchant marketing shops.  
We are agressively making markets in all regions in an effort to build 
liquidity, and it is imperative to remove encumberances.

Bill Bradford & Elizabeth Sager,
Please place a high priority on cleaning up our "paper" with these 
counterparties so my traders can make markets and transact freely.

Thanks.

Please schedule something either in my office or a lunch.  Whatever they 
prefer.  Mark
	"Swanstrom, Bill" <BSwanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
	10/06/2000 07:51 AM
		 
Mark,
 
I know you're at the law conference today, but I wanted to check with your
schedule and see if you have time to get together with Don Wood and me
sometime in  the next few weeks to catch up on things.  Let me know what
your schedule looks like.
 
Bill
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com <mailto:bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com> 
(713) 226-1143
 
 

Mark Haedicke is available for the conference call on Thursday, October 19, 
at 1:30 p.m. Eastern time.  Please confirm what time you were able to convene 
the call.  Thank you.

 

This is a reminder that I need to approve all expense reports for all members 
of the OGC.

Effective immediately, any out of town travel not directly related to a work 
project needs to be approved in advance by me.  

In Julia's absence from the office, I need you to prepare an Enron Industrial 
Monthly Legal Report for October and submit it to me as soon as possible.  
Attached is the ENW Monthly Legal Report to use as a guide.  The report 
should be concise, in bullet format, and submitted via e-mail to me by the 
15th of each month.  

Please prepare a Monthly Legal Report for your group for October and submit 
it to me as soon as possible.  Attached is the ENW Monthly Legal Report to 
use as a guide.  The report should be concise, in bullet format, and 
submitted to me via e-mail by the 15th of each month. 

Please prepare an LNG Monthly Legal Report for October and submit it to me as 
soon as possible.  Attached is the ENW Monthly Legal Report to use as a 
guide.  The report should be concise, in bullet format, and submitted to me 
via e-mail by the 15th of each month.

I sent the e-mail below to our lawyers in ENA Legal.

 In order to provide better oversight and control of ENA legal expenditures 
on large transactions, please continue to follow the procedures set forth 
below for transactions where outside legal fees and expenses are expected to 
exceed $25,000.00.  The purpose of these procedures is to (i) improve 
communication with counsel (inside and outside) on issues, fees and services 
and (ii) send price signals on legal costs (with respect to specific 
transactions) on a timely basis to the business units.  Every effort should 
be made to continue to provide high quality legal work that has become 
standard at ENA.

 1.  A written estimate of proposed fees and expenses and a written 
description of the services shall be provided by our outside counsel.  The 
responsible business unit and the General Counsel shall review and approve 
such written estimate before our outside counsel is directed to provide 
substantial professional services.

 2.  Our outside counsel shall be instructed to promptly submit a revised 
written estimate if such outside counsel determines that legal fees and 
expenses for such transaction will exceed the previous written estimate by 
$25,000.00.  Such revised written estimate shall be reviewed and approved by 
the responsible business unit and the General Counsel or his/her designee 
before our outside counsel is directed to provide substantial additional 
professional services. 

 3.  In order to accurately track such expenses so that the expenses can be 
properly allocated to the various business units, a work order number should 
be obtained for each transaction.  

 Thank you for your cooperation.  If you have any questions or any other 
suggestions for controlling expenses, please call me at extension 36544.

Mary:

That is good news.  At the rate we are going, we will have enough energy 
companies before long to have substantial commodity committee meeting in 
North America.  I am still thinking about the breakfast in New York. 

Take care.

Mark

Peter:  Please send these updates to Lance Schuler, Travis McCullough and me 
going forward.  Mark

	Peter Keohane
	Sent by: Sharon Crawford
	10/13/2000 01:19 PM
		 
Attached are blacklined and clean copies of the Legal Status Report for Enron 
Canada.  This Legal Status Report is intended to update each of you and may 
include matters of interest to some, but not all of you.  By copy of this 
e-mail to Kay, I ask that she pull from this list whatever she needs for the 
Legal Finance/Transactions Group Status Report.

Regards,
Peter

Thanks.   Mark

Pete, the report is fine.  Go ahead and send it out to Frevert, McMahon, 
Bowen and Haedicke.  Thanks.  Mark

	Peter del Vecchio
	10/13/2000 03:53 PM
		 
Mark,

Attached is the EIM Monthly Legal Report for Oct. 2000.  I'd appreciate your 
input whether this meets your expectations as to form and content.  Julia has 
not had the opportunity to review the attached.

Pete

I want to get this started.  Let's get together at the time provided below.  
Mark
	Mark Greenberg@ENRON
	10/13/2000 03:49 PM
		 
Bryan -

I have a meeting scheduled with Mark on Monday at 4:00 to update him on the 
status of a number of item associated with our Department's technology 
plans.  I had hoped to update him on the status of the intraweb site; 
however, since no one from your group has contacted me to follow-up on our 
Sept. 29 meeting, I was wondering if you would be available to attend the 
meeting I have with Mark.  If so, I would hope that we could discuss issues 
pertinent to moving the process along as our goal is to have a functioning 
web site as soon as possible.  

Please let me know your availability and when I can expect some movement on 
this project.

Thanks.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

Do you know what this is about?   Mark
	George McClellan
	04/11/2000 02:45 PM
		
Rogue cargo?  What the hell!

Stuart Staley
04/11/2000 09:43 AM
Robert - is this legit?

George - the beat goes on

Stu,
I am sure you will be aware from your market intelligence of the problems at 
FF
Unit 2, which we are advised is an event of Force Majeur. I believe it would 
be
counter-productive to the spirit of current negotiations to prosecute an FM
claim and do not therefore propose to do so at this time. However, in the 
event
of an unsatisfactory outcome to these negotiations we do reserve the right to
ultimately pursue a Force Majeur claim in respect of the failure of FF Unit 2.
I am also holding back FF's claim for mill damage from the rogue cargo of hard
La Loma coal on the same principle.
Please respond if you disagree with this approach.
Regards
Max

Mary: 
This is complicated for oil companies.  Mobil Exxon only does hedging.  Shell 
has at least two groups, with one doing mostly hedging and one doing mostly 
trading for profit.  BP Amoco is sort of in between.  It is very clear with 
respect to Cargill and El Paso and Shell -- each should be primary.  The 
companies may be trying to manipulate the rules by having the hedging 
organization send in the application.  
Let me know if you need other info.

Mark

	Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org>
	10/16/2000 09:59 AM
		 
This is the response I received from Shell when I requested that they
reapply at the Primary level.

I did tell him that there will be some energy/gas companies in the
Subscriber category who will be asked to move to the Primary category in
2001.  Those were firms that were members before we made the by-law change
to 'solely'.

I am of the thinking that in addition to Cargill, El Paso Energy and TXU
Europe Power, we would also ask BP Amoco and Mobil Exxon to all move to
Primary.  

Any suggestions...

Thanks,
Mary

Mary,
Thanks for your reply. Unfortunately I have to disagree with the Board of
Directors in this case! We are an end user of derivatives purely for hedging
purposes as part of our asset and liability management. This seems to
specifically exclude us from primary membership according to your website
definition. As I see that BP Amoco and Mobil Exxon are subscriber members,
it would seem strange that Shell would be considered in a different light.
Grateful if you could re submit our application for Subscriber Membership on
this basis.
Many thanks!

Best Regards,

STUART LAW
Stuart Law,
Back Office Manager, Treasury Operations(FSTO)
Shell Finance Services,
Shell Centre,
London,
SE1 7NA

Tel: +44 (0)20 7934 6270
Fax +44 (0)20 7934 6949
E-mail: Stuart.F.Law@si.shell.com
Please note new dialling code for London 020 and new 8 digit number.

Stuart:

I forwarded your membership application to our Board of Directors and they
have indicated to me that Shell International Limited would appropriately
fall under our Primary membership category which is for institutions that
act as dealers in derivatives.  The annual dues would be US $25,000.

The Subscriber category is for end-users of derivatives.  

If you are still interested in joining, you can download the Primary
application form from our website (www.isda.org).

Please let me know if you have any further questions.

Sincerely,
Mary Cunningham

  

Dear Ms. Cunningham,
We are hoping to apply for ISDA Subscriber Membership, but cannot find any
mention on your website of the membership fees. Could you please advise what
is the membership fee for Subscriber Membership?
Many thanks!

Best Regards,

STUART LAW
Stuart Law,
Back Office Manager, Treasury Operations(FSTO)
Shell Finance Services,
Shell Centre,
London,
SE1 7NA

Tel: +44 (0)20 7934 6270
Fax +44 (0)20 7934 6949
E-mail: Stuart.F.Law@si.shell.com
Please note new dialling code for London 020 and new 8 digit number.

It's ok to use Blakes given the conflicts.  On the structure, I will forward 
this message to Steven Douglas and ask for his advice.

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	10/16/2000 01:01 PM
		 
Mark I am following up with you regarding legal support for this matter.

Mark P. is dedicated to this project and getting up the learning curve by 
focusing his time on understanding the regulatory/statutory/licensing 
requirements for a retail affiliate for Alberta electricity.  We hope to have 
a recommendation shortly on an action plan for the regulatory compliance 
requirements, a recommendation on contracting forms (separate commercial and 
residential consumer forms) and to begin drafting forms.

However, as discussed, outside counsel legal support will be required (i) to 
set up/register the retail entity to do business (subject to confirmation of 
the outstanding structuring issue, on which I await an answer); (ii) confirm 
all regulatory/statutory/licensing requirements for a retail affiliate; (iii) 
review and advise on contracting forms; and (iv) take an advocacy position 
for us at upcoming regulatory hearings.  In this regard we had agreed to talk 
to Stikeman Elliott about representation.  It turns out the Stikemans has an 
unresolveable conflict, as it acts for Enmax, the City of Calgary's retail 
affiliate and a direct competitor.  From asking around, it also seems that 
any of the firms which have/may have experience in the developing retail 
market, have acquired that experience for a client that would put them in 
direct conflict as well (ex. Bennet Jones - Atco/Canadian Utilities;  Macleod 
Dixon and McCarthy Tetrault - TransAlta;  Burnet Duckworth - City of 
Calgary/Enmax/City of Medicine Hat;  Borden Ladner Gervais - EPCOR), many of 
whom we have no experience in dealing with in any event.  It seems to me that 
the available alternatives are Blake Cassels & Graydon and Osler Hoskin & 
Harcourt, neither of whom to my specific knowledge have specific expertise in 
this area.  However, as noted, those with any actual (or purported) expertise 
tend for that reason to be conflicted.  Accordingly, my suggestion is that I 
speak to Blakes to see what expertise they have, but likely nonetheless 
retain them (assuming there is no conflict) on the basis of their general 
capabilities and their understanding and commitment to Enron.  At the end of 
the day, even if there is a learning curve, it is seemingly learnable and 
inevitable.  Please let me know if you have a problem, as we need to move 
quickly to get on with the project.

To confirm, you were going to let me know how we should proceed with 
structuring the affiliate (liability vs. tax efficiency), which may be 
affected by how and if EES participates.

Once the ball is rolling on the Alberta electricity front, we will re-focus 
on gas and other jurisdictions, such as Ontario.

Regards, Peter.

Here are a few.  Take care.   Mark
	Mark E Haedicke
	09/06/2000 04:49 PM
		 
A few of my pictures.   Mark
	markehaedicke@hotmail.com
	09/04/2000 05:49 AM
		 
HI:

Just a few pictures from our trip.

Mark

I am fine with your recommendations except I see no need to have an outside 
director if not legally required.  Who would you recommend as filling that 
director position?

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	Sent by: Nella Cappelletto
	04/12/2000 12:03 PM
		 
Please see the attached memo.

Regards, Peter

Rebecca:

This is the response I got back from my contact at IBJ.  Let me know if you 
would like to meet Terry.  Mark
teruo.tanaka@ibjbank.co.jp on 10/14/99 10:56:06 PM
Dear Mark,

Thank you for your e-mail. I have asked around our business people about
your inquiry.

At the moment, there are no institution that stands out in that field in
the Tokyo market. However, we, IBJ, are probably the most enthusiastic
about it. Historically, we have kept the strongest relationship with the
electricity companies and oil refineries. Their bond issues keep our
securities subsidiary on the top book runners list. Therefore, we are
researching on the product. Other Japanese firms seem to be less
interested.

Although I would think it should take a while to persuade those most
conservative companies like Tokyo Electricity et al., the product does
have a potential here.

In fact our derivatives and math men were really keen to talk to you and
learn more about the product.

Please let me know if I can be of any further help.

Terry

FYI
	Rob Walls@ENRON
	10/17/2000 02:43 PM
		 
	"Buddy Clark" <CLARKB@haynesboone.com>
	10/17/2000 02:22 PM
		 
Rob,

I would like to visit with you on staffing your upcoming 4th Quarter legal 
I would like your advice on how Haynes and Boone can best approach your 
production payment group. Please give me a call.

Buddy Clark
Haynes and Boone, L.L.P.
1000 Louisiana, Suite 4300
Houston, Texas 77002
phone 713-547-2077
fax 713 236-5577

You are the man!  I will be out of town on Dec 23 through 28 and March 11 
through 18.      Mark

	"Baird, Bob" <RBaird@velaw.com>
	10/18/2000 02:57 PM
		 
In a moment of weakness I agreed to divide up the tickets.   I will divide
the tickets up in a manner that is absolutely perfect and totally equitable.

Please let me know if you know of any particular time or times when, for
example, you'll be on vacation or otherwise absent where you would prefer
not to be assigned games.  In addition, I am assuming that both of you would
prefer weekends to week nights (let me know if that's not the case).  And
let me know if you have any other scheduling issues.

Also, the third exhibition game is this Saturday night against the Spurs.  I
believe each of you said you couldn't make it.  I'll plan to give them away
unless you will be able to use them.  I need to know by tomorrow, however.

Here's the regular season schedule, and I will also be glad to take into
account your preferences on particular games if you'll send me an email
indicating the games you'd like. (or print this out, check games you'd like
and fax it to me at 512/236-3210).

Tuesday, 10/31, Minnesota Timberwolves
Thursday, 11/2, Milwaukee Bucks
Tuesday, 11/7, Los Angeles Lakers
Thursday, 11/9, Vancouver Grizzlies
Tuesday, 11/14, Chicago Bulls
Thursday, 11/16, Charlotte Hornets      
Saturday, 11/18, Phoenix Suns
Tuesday, 11/28, Sacramento Kings
Saturday, 12/2, Portland Trailblazers
Tuesday, 12/5, Dallas Mavericks
Saturday, 12/16, Denver Nuggets
Tuesday, 12/19, San Antonio Spurs
Thursday, 12/21, Los Angeles Lakers
Saturday, 12/23, Golden State Warriors
Wednesday, 12/27, Seattle Supersonics      
Thursday, 1/4, Detroit Pistons         
Saturday, 1/6, Utah Jazz
Saturday, 1/13, Sacramento Kings
Tuesday, 1/16, Toronto Raptors
Wednesday, 1/24, Philadelphia 76ers
Friday, 1/26, Vancouver Grizzlies
Tuesday, 1/30, Miami Heat
Thursday, 2/1, Los Angeles Clippers      
Monday, 2/5, New York Knicks
Tuesday, 2/13, Washington Wizards      
Saturday, 2/17, Cleveland Cavaliers
Tuesday, 2/20, Boston Celtics
Friday, 2/23, Orlando Magic
Monday, 2/26, Portland Trailblazers
Thursday, 3/8, Los Angeles Clippers   
Saturday, 3/10, Golden State Warriors
Tuesday, 3/13, Indiana Pacers
Thursday, 3/15, New Jersey Nets
Saturday, 3/17, San Antonio Spurs
Tuesday, 3/27, Utah Jazz
Thursday, 3/29, Phoenix Suns         6
Tuesday, 4/3, Dallas Mavericks
Thursday, 4/5, Seattle Supersonics         
Saturday, 4/7, Atlanta Hawks
Tuesday, 4/10, Denver Nuggets         
Tuesday, 4/17, Minnesota Timberwolves

Robert S. Baird
Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
One American Center
600 Congress
Austin, Texas 78701
Telephone: (512)495-8451
When calling from Houston (713)758-2414
Fax: (512)236-3210
Email: rbaird@velaw.com
Home telephone (512)347-8065
Home fax: (512)347-8065
Pager: 1-888-487-2651

Paul:  The ISDA meeting is tentatively set for Jan 18.  So it may be possible 
for me to be there on the 21st.  As always, the schedule could change, but I 
would make every effort to be there.  Again, congratulations!

Mark

	Paul Simons
	10/18/2000 12:49 PM
		
Belated thanks for this, Mark.  I'm scheduled to speak to Robert tomorrow.  

Good speaking with you earlier - please let me know your plans in January 
(we're aiming for 21st).  Regards

Paul

Paul:

It is true that there is no wall -- however, it is geographically separate.  
The equity trading is the end portion of the floor.  There are three hallways 
that go to equity trading, each about 10 feet long.  It would not be possible 
to hear anything said outside of the equity trading area.  Robert Bruce is 
working on updating our policy and procedures in Houston and by copy hereof 
ask him to update you.

	Paul Simons
	09/19/2000 01:53 PM
		
Mark

Thanks for the enquiry.

I've had discussions with Gary this week and am now working out how soft the 
wall can be in light of that!  I understand from Gary that in Houston the 
Chinese walls are not as hard as I imagined ie no physical wall or separate 
security pass system.  Please confirm. Many thanks

Paul

What is the status of setting up Chinese Walls?   Mark

It is ok.  Mark

	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	10/17/2000 06:50 PM
		 
Mark:  Hydro-Quebec has asked us to assist them on documenting an ISDA 
agreement with ENA (I think it is a multi-currency cross border 
arrangement).  The associate here who has been asked to work on it said Mary 
Cook is the ENA in house lawyer working on the deal.  Before he left us a few 
months ago, Kevin Leitao had from time to time worked on behalf of some of 
our utility clients in transactions with ENA where, for example, Sara 
Schackleton or Shari Stack handled the transaction for ENA.  Before we go 
forward on this for Hydro-Quebec, however, I wanted to double check with you 
to make sure thare was not any problem from ENA's standpoint.  Could you 
reply to this and just let me know.  Thanks.  We look forward to seeing you 
on Friday.  John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction 
of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

Dave:

Based on our discussions this morning:

1.  Internal Costs -- a capacity charge will be determined for each wholesale 
business unit based on a time allocation matrix that each lawyer and 
paralegal prepares.  The time allocation matrix will be revised  during the 
year if material changes in the work occur.

2.  Outside Costs -- require internal sign-off by GC and COO to spend more 
than $10,000 on a potential transaction AND a written transaction budget for 
proposed outside legal expenses more than $10,000.  Wherever possible, a firm 
cap on legal fees should be negotiated.  A memorandum will be sent from the 
GC and [Chairman of the Wholesale Group?] laying out the procedure to all 
employees.  

3.  Selection of Outside Lawyers -- expressly add billing rates and 
efficiency as key considerations, in addition to quality, in the selection of 
outside counsel.  [Dave, we need to complete our discussion on this point.]  
Our new policy needs to be reviewed with outside counsel.

4.  Reopener!  -- need to review where business changes significantly.

	David W Delainey
	10/19/2000 12:33 PM
		 
Guys, notes from the morning meeting.  Please review and comment.

Specific action items:
 a) i)further calculation of ENA/Non- ENA capacity charges, ii) estimation of 
outside legal and iii) formulation of charge out/feedback process to the 
business units;
 b) need budget/review for competitive analysis, technical and restructuring.

Regards
Delainey

Dave:

I have attached the "time allocations" (which are used for inside costs only) 
by attorney to the various business groups.  We can derive the percentage of 
total legal department inside costs from this chart, in order to calculate 
the capacity charge, for ENA and the other wholesale groups and ENW.  We had 
used this chart to bill back to the various business units within ENA, but we 
will stop doing that now per our conversation.  Are you in agreement? 

Mark
	Deb Korkmas
	10/20/2000 08:53 AM
		 
See attached per your request.  Deb

Deb Korkmas

Attached is our organizational chart which will be prettied up over time.

Sorry, here's the attachment.

I would like to do fewer resolutions authorizing non-vps to sign contracts, 
and when we need such authorizations, let's make sure the resolutions are 
appropriately limited.  My thoughts are as follows:

1.   We have a lot of vps that can sign contracts.
2.   It is generally ok to have confirmations signed by certain carefully 
selected directors since we are confirming a trade that already took place 
and there is master agreement already signed.
3.   There are certain very routine agreements like pipeline right-of-way 
agreements that are ok for carefully selected directors to sign.
4.   Confidentiality agreements should be signed by a vp.
5.   Any authorization for a director to sign should expire within not more 
than one year and revoke all prior authorizations.

Please give me your comments.

Mark   

Keep me posted on this matter.  Mark
	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	10/20/2000 09:36 AM
		 
I am copying Frank Sayre and Mark Haedicke on this memo because I understand 
that responsibilty  for this project is now somewhere between you two gents 
and therefore you both need a heads up. Vicki, you also need to be aware of 
this as well.

I attach a letter EECC signed and sent out to the EcoElectrica project 
yesterday re the need to schedule a senior management meeting to try and 
resolve outstanding issues and payments due EECC for this project, We have 
been trying to schedule meetings to resolve these matters since September, 
but the project, perhaps because of Mission Energy's impact, has not yet 
agreed to a meeting to resolve the matter.    

With David Haug's help  we were able to get a significant portion of 
undisputed payments that had been delinquent for some time (in some cases 
since before the first of the year) paid. including a recent payment of $6 
million. Even so, approximately $18 million still remains unpaid to EECC and 
seriously delinquent.  EcoElectrica has identified $8.4 million as being 
withheld in connection with disputed liquidated damage payments, but there 
remains an undisputed, unpaid balance of approximately $9.6 million that 
EcoElectrica has not offered any contractual or other explanation for 
withholding other than that  they are working on other matters.

Larry Izzo needs to get these claims resolved, and at least needs a 
commitment from EcoElectrica to a date for formal senior management 
discussions under the contract from the project. Failing that, he will be 
directing EECC to seek clearance to institute arbitration proceedings.

 

Terry, thanks for your reply.  As our thinking starts to mature, I would like 
to talk to you about what we see in the Japanese markets re energy.  Perhaps, 
we can talk in New York in November at the ISDA board meeting.  Take care.  
Mark

Bruce:  I am tied up for lunch, but let's get together during the day on 
Monday or Tuesday.   Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	10/20/2000 09:25 AM
		 
Mark -

Are you free for lunch next week?  Breakfast or a beer after work would work 
as well.  

In my view, APACHI has a limited life span and I'd like to see what 
opportunities there still might be for the remaining lawyers/legal 
specialists in my group.

Thanks,
Bruce

	Frank Sayre@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	10/19/2000 06:38 PM
		 
I know this is a bit longer than you usually get from your reports, but I 
thought I would give you a more detailed report to begin the transition. Hope 
this is ok.

It looks good to me.  How do we keep up with changes in a counterparty's 
business?  What if it no longer physically handles a particular commodity?  
Mark

	Robert Bruce@ENRON
	Sent by: Robert Bruce@ENRON
	10/17/2000 06:21 PM
		 
per my voice message to you; have tried to make memo brief

Robert E. Bruce
Senior Counsel

Thanks.   Mark

	Cynthia Sandherr@ENRON
	10/20/2000 05:14 PM
		 
Mark:  just a "heads up" that we may be called to react to this attached 
NYMERX press release since Enron added the provisions they oppose in the 
release.  H.R. 4541 passed the House 377-4 last evening and Enron strongly 
supports the legislation (I will e-mail Ken Lay's letter to Chairman Combest 
which expresses our support plus some talking points for your information.)  
There is a real opportunity to enact this legislation this Congress.  The 
last deal which needs to be cut is with Senator Gramm (he is the only 
obstacle to enactment in the Senate.)  The "Energy Provisions" discussed in 
this press release are NOT IN PLAY and will not be changed in the Senate.  It 
is other provisions which do not directly affect Enron which are being 
negotiated.

Contrary to this release's statement, no House member (other than one member 
who didn't make it for the vote,Congressman Baker) is asking for changes in 
the Senate.  The overwhelming numbers speak for themselves.  All and all, 
this press release is outlandish.

This will be our highest priority next week and changes occur by the hour.  
Please call if you do indeed get press calls and need our assistance.  Many 
thanks.

EXCHANGE EXPRESSES OUTRAGE AT HOUSE PASSAGE OF H.R. 4541

NEW YORK, NY, October 20, 2000 -- In response to passage by the House of
Representatives last night of H.R. 4541, the Commodity Futures
Modernization Act of 2000, New York Mercantile Exchange Chairman Daniel
Rappaport issued the following statement:

      The New York Mercantile Exchange finds it particularly egregious
that, by approving subsection (g) (3) of Section 106, the House would
not only remove the energy and metals marketplaces from public scrutiny
and regulatory oversight, but also do this in a fashion that
discriminates between established markets versus start-up electronic
forums.

It is particularly outrageous, at a time when every U.S. consumer is
feeling the impact of high energy prices, to allow lobbying by a small
group of vested interests to influence Congress to take these markets
out of the public eye and create an advantage for people to trade on
private, proprietary systems lacking the protections of a neutral
self-regulatory organization. Policy makers, regulators, and the
American public will be deprived of currently available information on
market participation, concentration, and financial performance.

This is not only a matter of ill-conceived public policy but is also
anti-competitive and directly contrary to the recommendations made by
the President'sWorking Group on financial markets.

Even House members who voted in favor of the bill have been publicly
quoted as saying that it must be changed in the Senate.

The New York Mercantile Exchange plans to fight adamantly at the Senate
level to demand that this subsection either be eliminated or be amended
to create a consistent regulatory policy for electronic and open outcry
markets.

# # #

This e-mail is sent by a law firm and contains information
that may be privileged and confidential. If you are not the
intended recipient, please delete the e-mail and notify us
immediately.

I will be happy to help if I can.  What is the timing?   Mark

	"Fruge, Ernest D." <EDFRUGE@txccc.org>
	10/20/2000 03:31 PM
		 
Dear Mark,
I hope you are doing well.  You may be getting a call from JoAnne Pinkett
regarding a proposal for future funding of the BEAR program.  There has
apparently been some difficulty in communication between the BEAR board and
our board.  

Any proposal has to make its way through the Children's Services Committee
then the Executive Committee.  It is then put before the whole board for a
vote.  I thought that you would be an idea person to advise the BEAR
representatives as to how to structure the proposal to the Children's
Committee to ensure that it is given a fair and expeditious review and
decision - a proposal that would be comprehensible to board members who are
not directly involved with the BEAR program.  I also thought you could give
this advice without having to commit a great deal of time (including travel
time for meetings).

I think everyone agrees that it is a great program and that we should be
supportive of such public-private partnerships.  There is probably some
difference of opinion amongst the board as to how much support (and at what
pace) we should give the program.  I would deeply appreciate your helping
the BEAR folks make the clearest proposal possible.  I, for one, want this
program to succeed.  As good as its current work is - I think it holds even
greater potential for benefiting the children we serve.
Thanks for your help,
Ernest

Ernest Frug,, Ph.D.
Assistant Professor
     Department of Pediatrics
     Department of Family & Community Medicine
          Baylor College of Medicine
Director of Psychosocial Programs
     Texas Children's Cancer Center
     6621 Fannin St., MC 3-320, Houston, Texas 77030 USA
Email: efruge@bcm.tmc.edu               Phone: 832-824-4200

	Maureen Benjamin <MaureenB@marcusevansch.com>
	10/17/2000 02:58 PM
		 
Please see the attached course outline, driving directions and final
details.    My name is Maureen Benjamin and I will be your on site contact
for this course.  If you have any questions please do not hesitate to
contact me.

 <<Directions to the St Regis Washington.doc>>  <<course outline.pdf>>
<<final details.doc>>

Maureen Benjamin
Training Course Operations Manager
Phone: (312) 894-6342
Fax: (312)894-6358
www.marcusevans.com

 - Directions to the St Regis Washington.doc
 - course outline.pdf
 - final details.doc

Thanks.  Mark

	"Hibbert, Ann (CPS)" <Ann_hibbert@itc.co.harris.tx.us>
	10/23/2000 12:35 PM
		 
Mark, I need the info NLT Wed. 10/25.  We are in the middle of the budget
process and I will be putting the Bear requests in to my budget.  Ann

Ann D. Hibbert, Director of Administration       
2525 Murworth, Houston, Tx. 77054-1618
ph 713/394-4063           fax 713/394-4150

I had a brief conversation with Vicki about splitting the costs 50/50 on the 
legal side to be consistent with the business arrangement.  She asked to use 
the European operation as  a model.  At some point, Peter you should just 
give Vicki a call and talk it through.

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	10/23/2000 01:02 PM
		 
To be brief, this project is percolating but being held up on the following 
fronts:  

1.  ENA/EES issues.  I have not been involved so I don't know where it is 
at.  As request by Dave P., Mark P. has sent a copy of his preliminary issues 
memo to Vicki S.  

2.  Market Achievement Plan for unsold PPAs.  The Government is expected to 
announce October 31st.  This will impact the market in many aspects, 
including the viability of competitive retail market options v. regulated 
rate options.  

3.  We have proposals from two law firms.  Donahue Ernst & Young and Blakes.  
My preference would be DEY for diversification reasons, but DEY may have 
unresolvable conflicts which I would have to discuss with you if we are to 
proceed.  Blakes proposal may also have significant conflicts, which may be 
resolvable but which may limit the effectiveness of their representation.  
Nonetheless, it seems a decision will not need to be made until the end of 
October.  In the meantime, Mark P. is working on scoping out legal and 
compliance issues, as well as forms.

Peter.

Please delete me from the list.  Mark

	Jaroslaw Ferenc
	10/23/2000 04:50 AM
		 
	

Dear all,

As we know, some of the persons on the distribution list of Polish weekly 
updates still receive the updates, although they have changed their positions 
and/or responsibilties. As we would not like to bother you with our e-mails 
with the reports that you do not need, please confirm that you wish to 
continue receiving the reports on Enron's activities in Poland. 

The common address ECT London European Trading will be deleted from the list 
as a whole. Only the persons who send the confirmation will be added to the 
list.

Thank you.

With best regards,

Jarek Ferenc

Could you please respond for me.   Mark
	Mark Scott@ENRON
	10/16/2000 06:52 PM
		 
According to our records all of you have some sort of high speed internet 
access to your home.  Either Cable Modem or DSL service.  When most of these 
lines where installed, we did not have a standard on how to connect back to 
the Enron network.  Most if not all of you are using the Client software on 
your PC's.  In order to provide more security to both Enron and Your PC.  We 
need to configure and deploy a Nortel Instant Internet Box.   the way the 
Nortel box works is what they call splitt tunnelling.  If it sees traffic 
that needs to go to enron it will go through the tunnel, other wise it goes 
directly to the internet.

We will need to know the following information to configure and deploy the 
Router
1. UserName and Login if required by the ISP.
2. If you have static IP addresses, We need to know that as well.
3. Co/RC to charge for the Nortel Box (Approx $500.00)

If you no longer have DSL or Cable service or You do not have either please 
let us know.  Other wise Please return the above information back to Enron 
network security.

Thanks

Mark Scott

Is your new address working?

I am ok with it so long as you don't spend much time at it.  If there is a 
material time commitment or the company is competing head to head with Enron, 
then it would be a problem.  Mark

	Randal Maffett
	10/16/2000 02:10 PM
		 
Mark - back in June you and I had a brief discussion re: the topic below.  
Nexus has now extended a formal invitation for me to join their board so 
complying with the Code of Ethics I sent the e-mail below to Sharon Butcher 
this morning.  She responded by asking if I'd discussed this with you and I 
relayed the essence of our brief conversation and forwarded to her the first 
e-mail I'd sent to you.  Call if you have any questions.  x33212.

RANDY
Randal Maffett
10/16/2000 09:44 AM
Sharon - eight years ago before coming to work for Enron, I was a partner in 
a cogen development company which we sold in 1993.  It was through that 
company that I developed a relationship with Enron and subsequently came to 
work here in 1993.  

Since coming to Enron, I have maintained regular contact and networks with 
several of my former partners.  One of them, Barry Curtiss-Lusher, started up 
his own oil and gas exploration and production company, Nexus Resources, in 
Denver.  Barry has recently asked me to join his Board of Directors.  
Reviewing the Enron Code of Ethics (specifically, page 57, July 2000 edition) 
I wanted to provide the following information:

Nexus Resources, 650 S. Cherry St., Suite 420, Denver, CO  80246
Barry Curtiss-Lusher, President/CEO
privately owned
principle business is oil and gas exploration and production in various 
basins throughout the U.S., primarily in Louisiana, Kansas and the Rocky 
Mountain states

My role as a Board member would be similar to any other Board role with 
regular meetings on a quarterly basis (teleconferencing is permitted under 
Nexus' bylaws) with all expenses, if any, paid by Nexus.  Currently, Nexus 
does not pay any cash stipend to its Directors.  It does, however, compensate 
Board members with Nexus stock.  Additionally, I would be making a minor 
personal investment in Nexus stock.

Pursuant to the Enron Code of Ethics, I would/will NOT be performing any 
managerial, professional or other duties which would interfere with my own 
specific job performance at Enron.  Nor is Nexus currently involved in any 
business which competes, directly or indirectly, with that of Enron Corp. or 
any of its subsidiaries.

Although I have been nominated and approved by the current Board of Directors 
of Nexus Resources, I have NOT yet accepted the position pending resolution 
and approval by Enron Management pursuant to the Code of Ethics.  Please let 
me know if you have any questions regarding the information above and/or what 
other steps need to be taken.  

RANDY MAFFETT

It looks good.  I am in the process of confirming.  Mark

	Richard Grove <RGROVE@isda.org>
	10/04/2000 10:23 AM
		 
Mark,

How does it look for Enron hosting the January Board meeting in London?

Rick 

Dave and John:

I am rethinking the legal reports.  I am preparing a monthly trading and 
transactional summary, a litigation report and the TOP TEN legal risk 
report.  To me the last two are the most important.  On a conceptual basis, 
is that what you need or want to see?

Mark

Mike and Jeff:

I am rethinking the legal reports.  Alan and I am preparing a monthly trading 
and transactional summary, a litigation report and the TOP TEN legal risk 
report.  To me the last two are the most important.  On a conceptual basis, 
is that what you need or want to see?

Mark

Please start working on a top ten legal risks list.  I want to include that 
list for each of your companies (EGM, EIM and ENW) in the monthly report.  
This list should be in bullet format.  If you have any questions, please give 
me a call.

Mark

Per our conversation.   Mark
	Mark E Haedicke
	10/23/2000 04:53 PM
		 
Please start working on a top ten legal risks list.  I want to include that 
list for each of your companies (EGM, EIM and ENW) in the monthly report.  
This list should be in bullet format.  If you have any questions, please give 
me a call.

Mark

Please delete me from your e-mail list.  Mark

	David Maxwell
	10/25/2000 07:58 AM
		 
Please see attached.
Aneela Charania
10/24/2000 05:30 PM
Please find attached the updated detail of the merchant activity.  

Do not hesitate to contact me if you need any additional information.

Regards,

Aneela Charania
x3-0951

Please delete me from your e-mail list.  Mark

=09State Bar of Michigan E-Journal <e-journal@michbar.org>
=09Sent by: bounce-ejournal-255481@lists.michbar.org
=0910/24/2000 04:00 PM
=09Please respond to "E-Journal"
=09=09=20

If you cannot read today's e-Journal, please visit this link:?=20
http://www.michbar.org/e-journal/102500.html Or to receive a plain text=20
version, please send an e-mail to lyris@lists.michbar.org? In the body,=20
type:? unsubscribe ejournal and on the next line type:? subscribe=20
ejournal-text=20
?

[IMAGE]

Ad 1

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]

The e-Journal is available to members of the State Bar of Michigan at no=20
additional charge thanks in part to the generous support of our advertisers=
.=20
Please be sure to support these State Bar partners and visit their Internet=
=20
sites frequently for information about their products and services.

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

?

Ad 1

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]

[IMAGE]
?

[IMAGE]State Bar of Michigan e-Journal for Wednesday, October 25, 2000

?qlink

?Use our specifically designed hypertext links --Quicklinks--to jump to the=
=20
desired area of today's e-Journal

?cases
Cases affecting the following practice areas are summarized in today's=20
e-Journal:=20

Constitutional Law=20
Criminal Law=20
Family Law=20
Litigation=20
Malpractice=20
Worker's Compensation=20

Special Note: Today's e-Journal contains a summary of one 6th Circuit Court=
=20
of Appeals opinion in the following practice area: Litigation.=20

?classified
Listings in the following areas are in today's Classified Section: ?=20

Confidential Records Destruction=20
Expert Witness=20
Lawsuit Financing=20
Legal Research=20
Positions Available=20

?editorial
Other editorial included in today's edition:=20

Interim Amendment of Rule 3.208 of the Michigan Court Rules (Allocation and=
=20
Distribution of Court-
Ordered Monies on Friend of the Court Accounts)=20
The State Bar Committee on Libraries and Legal Research hopes to create a w=
eb=20
page that publicizes and tracks listservs used by Michigan practitioners. I=
f=20
you know of any useful law-related listservs, please e-mail Carol Parker=20

?fieldspractice

Need to refer a case? See today's Fields of Practice Listings:=20

ADR/Arbitration/ Mediation=20
Admiralty/Maritime & Railroad Law=20
Antitrust/ Advertising/ Trade Regulation=20
Appeals=20
Automobile Warranty Law=20
Business & Taxation=20
Employment Discrimination/ Harassment Investigations=20
Federal False Claims=20
Hospital & Medical Negligence=20
Immigration Law=20
Labor & Employment=20
Liquor Law=20
Long Term Care=20
Medical Malpractice=20
Securities Law & Commercial Litigation=20
Special Education Law=20
Tax Litigation & Disputes=20

?newsandmoves

See today's News & Moves for information about your colleagues:=20
Crowley Noorman, P.C. & Cummings, McClorey, Davis & Acho, P.L.C.=20
Lawrence M. Dudek=20
James J. Giszczak, Robin K. Luce, Patricia Erhart Nessel, Laurie J.=20
Michelson, Rosalie B. Harrison, David B. Braun, Todd M. Fink, and David A.=
=20
Gardey=20
Victor G. Marrocco=20
Juliet E. Pressel and Deborah A. Strain=20
Keith P. Theisen=20
The Thomas M. Cooley Law School=20

barevents?

See today's Bar Events section for news about upcoming programs and=20
activities:
36th District Court Case Evaluation=20
Medical Malpractice Settlements: The Licensing Impact=20
MAMA Attorney's Institute--Municipal Law from A to Z=20
Hellenic Bar Association 2nd Annual Meeting=20
Pro Bono Attorneys from Blue Cross & Blue Shield of Michigan=20
Admiralty Law Section Meeting=20
Trust Administration Issues Identified Under EPIC=20
Thomas M. Cooley Law School Law Review Symposium=20
FBA Bankruptcy Section Luncheon=20
Meet the Judges of the 36th District Court=20
Uncensored and Unplugged: Informational Breakfast with Federal Judge Bernar=
d=20
Friedman=20
Pro Bono Attorneys from Dickinson Wright P.L.L.C.=20
Catholic Lawyers Society Family Retreat=20
FBA Luncheon & Rakow Scholarship Awards=20
Real Property Law Homeward Bound Series =20
Pro Bono Attorneys from Garan Lucow Miller, P.C.=20
A Night at Mark Ridley's Comedy Castle=20
Hot Topics in Estate Planning=20
ACLU Annual Dinner & Silent Auction=20
MDTC Annual Winter Meeting=20
Taking & Defending Depositions=20
Seminar on ADR in Courts=20

case summariesConstitutional Law

Back to Quicklinks

This summary also appears under Family Law

Issues: Jurisdiction over the minor child; Whether the term "cruelty" in o=
=20
2(b) is unconstitutionally vague; Jury instructions
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: In re Herronen
e-Journal Number: 8384
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Fitzgerald, Hood, and McDonald

The term "cruelty" as used in the statute is not unconstitutionally vague=
=20
because it gives fair notice to a person of ordinary intelligence and a=20
reasonable opportunity to know what is prohibited or required. In this case=
 a=20
person of ordinary intelligence would understand that hitting a 13-year old=
=20
girl more than once in the face severe enough to necessitate a hospital=20
visit, pulling her hair, or pushing her into a wall causing her to become=
=20
dizzy would fall within the purview of cruelty. The family court order taki=
ng=20
jurisdiction over the minor child was affirmed.

Full Text Opinion

Criminal Law

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Denial of defense motion for a lineup; Prosecutorial misconduct
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: People v. Cain
e-Journal Number: 8381
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Neff, Talbot, and Sullivan

The trial court did not abuse its discretion when it denied defendant's=20
untimely motion for a lineup. An eyewitness testified that she was only an=
=20
arm's length away from defendant when she saw him "key" the complainant's=
=20
vehicle, then enter a business. The manager of the business, notified of th=
e=20
keying incident shortly after it occurred, testified that defendant was the=
=20
only person in the building lobby matching the perpetrator's description.=
=20
Although eyewitness identification was a material issue, a lineup would not=
=20
have resolved any "mistaken identification" in this case. The trial court=
=20
also properly considered the untimeliness of the motion, and the possible=
=20
hardship a delay for a lineup could have had on the eyewitness, who resided=
=20
in another state. Defendant's conviction of malicious destruction of proper=
ty=20
over $100 was affirmed.

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Whether the trial court erred in finding that defendant was the=20
carjacker; Identification; Witness credibility; Whether the lineup was undu=
ly=20
suggestive; Sufficiency of evidence to convict of carjacking
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: People v. Fordham
e-Journal Number: 8380
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Neff, Talbot, and Sullivan

Since both the victim and a police officer identified the defendant as the=
=20
man who stole the victim's car and the trial court concluded that the victi=
m=20
was not confused when he identified the defendant as the carjacker, the tri=
al=20
court's finding that defendant was one of the carjackers was not clearly=20
erroneous. There was sufficient evidence based on the identification eviden=
ce=20
for a rational trier of fact to have concluded that defendant committed the=
=20
carjacking. Affirmed.=20

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Sufficient evidence of intent to convict for arson of a dwelling=20
house; Whether defendant was too intoxicated to have formed the requisite=
=20
intent
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: People v. Moss
e-Journal Number: 8387
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Neff, Talbot, and Sullivan

The prosecution introduced sufficient evidence for a rational trier of fact=
=20
to conclude that defendant acted willfully and maliciously, regardless of=
=20
whether he was intoxicated to some degree, when he set fire to the victims'=
=20
home. Even if defendant was drunk when arrested approximately 22 hours afte=
r=20
the fire, his intoxication did not bear any relation to his state of mind o=
n=20
the night of the fire. The testimony indicated that even if defendant was=
=20
intoxicated, he remained fully capable of entertaining the necessary specif=
ic=20
intent. The evidence established that (1) defendant appeared at the victims=
'=20
home three times and was there purposely prior to the fire, (2) defendant h=
ad=20
no reported difficulty safely traveling to and from the victims' house, (3)=
=20
defendant threatened the victims that he would return to harm them, and (4)=
=20
defendant followed through with the threats later that night when he=20
purchased kerosene, transported it to the victims' home, poured it onto the=
=20
porch and into the mail slot, and set fire to the home. Affirmed.

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Whether there was sufficient evidence to support convictions for=20
aiding and abetting false pretenses, attempted false pretenses, and stealin=
g=20
or retaining a financial transaction device
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: People v. Pitts
e-Journal Number: 8395
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Neff, Talbot, and Sullivan

There was insufficient evidence that defendant performed acts or gave=20
encouragement that assisted the commission of the crimes to support his=20
convictions for aiding and abetting false pretenses and attempted false=20
pretenses. Although defendant threw torn pieces of paper from the passenger=
=20
door of the vehicle during the pursuit by the police, the credit card numbe=
rs=20
recovered from the torn pieces of paper were not similar to the credit card=
=20
numbers given by defendant's brother to purchase merchandise. There was no=
=20
evidence associating defendant with the representations that were made to t=
he=20
employees by his brother regarding the validity of the credit card numbers.=
=20
Defendant's convictions for aiding and abetting false pretenses and attempt=
ed=20
false pretenses were reversed.=20

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Suppression of defendant's inculpatory statements; Whether=20
interrogation was custodial; Whether defendant's statements were knowingly=
=20
and voluntarily made; Totality of the circumstances
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: People v. Rose
e-Journal Number: 8385
Judge(s): Per Curiam - McDonald, Sawyer, and White

The trial court erred in suppressing defendant's statements to police on th=
e=20
basis that defendant was in custody and thus entitled to Miranda warnings=
=20
from the outset of the interview. Defendant agreed to speak with the police=
,=20
drove himself to the station, and was informed prior to the interview that =
he=20
was not under arrest and was free to leave. At no time was he told that he=
=20
was not free to leave, and the door was left open. The officer's failure to=
=20
tell defendant that he was being investigated for CSC did not alter the fac=
t=20
that defendant was told he was free to leave, or render the interview a=20
custodial one. Further, under the totality of the circumstances, defendant'=
s=20
statements were knowingly and voluntarily made, and were not the product of=
=20
psychological coercion. Defendant was 21-years old, had completed three yea=
rs=20
of college, and discerned the focus of the officer's inquiries soon after t=
he=20
interview began. The trial court's order suppressing defendant's statements=
=20
was reversed, and the case remanded for further proceedings.

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Prosecutorial misconduct; Other acts evidence; Admission of witness=
'=20
testimony; Jury instructions
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: People v. Vaughn
e-Journal Number: 8383
Judge(s): Per Curiam - O'Connell, Kelly, and Whitbeck

Although the defendant argued that the prosecutor improperly referred to an=
=20
accomplice's plea agreement to bolster that witness' testimony, defendant d=
id=20
not show that he was prejudiced. The prosecutor did not engage in misconduc=
t=20
by eliciting testimony and arguing that the plea agreement required the=20
witness to testify truthfully, because the prosecutor did not personally=20
vouch for the witness' credibility. Affirmed.

Full Text Opinion

Family Law

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Modification of a custody order without conducting an evidentiary=
=20
hearing; Trial court's failure to identify the change of circumstances,=20
whether an established custodial environment existed, or an analysis of the=
=20
best interest factors; Reassignment of custody matter to a different judge
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: Belgiorno v. Belgiorno
e-Journal Number: 8389
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Wilder, Smolenski, and Whitbeck

The trial court erred because it did not conduct an evidentiary hearing=20
before it entered an order modifying the parties' custody. The trial court'=
s=20
order placing physical custody of the parties' minor child with=20
plaintiff-mother was vacated and remanded to (1) conduct an evidentiary=20
hearing, (2) state specific findings of fact and conclusions of law on the=
=20
record, (3) determine whether an established custodial environment existed,=
=20
(4) determine whether proper cause or a change of circumstances existed tha=
t=20
justified a change of custody, and (5) address the best interest factors to=
=20
determine the best interest of the child.

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Termination of parental rights pursuant to oo 19b(3)(a)(ii), (c)(i)=
,=20
(g), and (j); Proper service of summons for adjudicative hearing; Failure t=
o=20
challenge one of the statutory grounds for termination
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: In re Glover
e-Journal Number: 8379
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Neff, Talbot, and Sullivan

The family court did not err in finding that statutory grounds for=20
termination of respondent-mother's parental rights were established by clea=
r=20
and convincing evidence. Respondent did not begin to work on her treatment=
=20
plan until approximately one month before the termination hearings. Further=
,=20
while she was required to seek substance abuse treatment or submit to drug=
=20
testing, she failed to do either. Since respondent made no significant=20
progress in these areas, and considering her past history, respondent's=20
parental rights were properly terminated under oo 19b(3)(c)(i), (g), and (j=
).=20
Affirmed.

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

This summary also appears under Constitutional Law

Issues: Jurisdiction over the minor child; Whether the term "cruelty" in o=
=20
2(b) is unconstitutionally vague; Jury instructions
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: In re Herronen
e-Journal Number: 8384
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Fitzgerald, Hood, and McDonald

The term "cruelty" as used in the statute is not unconstitutionally vague=
=20
because it gives fair notice to a person of ordinary intelligence and a=20
reasonable opportunity to know what is prohibited or required. In this case=
 a=20
person of ordinary intelligence would understand that hitting a 13-year old=
=20
girl more than once in the face severe enough to necessitate a hospital=20
visit, pulling her hair, or pushing her into a wall causing her to become=
=20
dizzy would fall within the purview of cruelty. The family court order taki=
ng=20
jurisdiction over the minor child was affirmed.

Full Text Opinion

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Termination of parental rights; Trial court inquiry into respondent=
's=20
ability to pay support where there was an existing support order; Appointme=
nt=20
of counsel in a stepparent adoption
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: In re Keller
e-Journal Number: 8378
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Fitzgerald, Hood, and McDonald

The termination of respondent-father's parental rights was reversed because=
=20
the trial court erred by finding that o 51(6)(a) was satisfied on the basis=
=20
that respondent had the ability to pay child support and failed to do so. I=
t=20
was improper for the trial court to inquire into respondent's ability to pa=
y=20
child support under o 51(6)(a) where there was an existing support order. T=
he=20
order that reserved the question of support because respondent was=20
incarcerated constituted a judicial determination that respondent lacked th=
e=20
ability to pay. The trial court also erred by failing to appoint counsel fo=
r=20
respondent upon his request because in a stepparent adoption proceeding und=
er=20
o 51(6)(a), the trial court has discretion to appoint counsel for an indige=
nt=20
nonconsenting parent.

Full Text Opinion

Litigation

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Standing; Case or controversy; Absence of an injury-in-fact;=20
Challenge to constitutionality of a legalized gambling scheme; Standard of=
=20
review; Lac Vieux Desert Band of Lake Superior Chippewa Indians v. Michigan=
=20
Gaming Control Bd.
Court: U.S. Court of Appeals Sixth Circuit
Case Name: Barden Detroit Casino, L.L.C. v. The City of Detroit
e-Journal Number: 8399
Judge(s): Nelson, Moore, and Wilhoit

The district court correctly dismissed plaintiff's suit against both the ci=
ty=20
and state defendants because plaintiff, an unsuccessful bidder for a licens=
e=20
to operate a Detroit casino, lacked standing. The court in Lac Vieux=20
previously held that the state law preference exempting certain preferred=
=20
developers from the competitive bidding process and allowing a tie-breaking=
=20
preference for applicants that had supported the initiative legalizing casi=
no=20
gambling in Detroit had been eliminated. Since the preference was=20
ineffective, there could be no injury and no case or controversy against th=
e=20
state defendants in regard to the state statute. As to the city defendants,=
=20
the mayor unequivocally testified that no preference was applied at any sta=
ge=20
of the competitive selection process until after plaintiff had already been=
=20
eliminated from the competition. Therefore, the preference was never applie=
d=20
to plaintiff's detriment, and plaintiff suffered no actual injury. Affirmed=
.

Full Text Opinion

Malpractice

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Medical malpractice; Statute of limitations; Discovery rule; Whethe=
r=20
defendant's failure to produce plaintiff's medical records excused timely=
=20
filing of a pre-suit notice
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: Cabell v. Carino
e-Journal Number: 8382
Judge(s): Per Curiam - McDonald, Sawyer, and White

The trial court properly granted defendant-orthopedist summary disposition =
on=20
the grounds that plaintiff's pre-suit notice was not filed within two years=
=20
of the act or omission that was the basis of the claim. While plaintiff's=
=20
claim accrued in March 1995, he did not file a notice of intent to sue unti=
l=20
June 1997. Plaintiff's assertion that he did not discover his claim until h=
e=20
received his medical records from defendant in April 1997 was without merit=
.=20
Plaintiff's deposition testimony established that by June 1995, at the=20
latest, he was aware of a problem with his toe following defendant's=20
treatment for an ankle fracture, and actually believed that the cast=20
defendant placed on his ankle and foot had caused the problem. Plaintiff's=
=20
attorney was investigating his claim in October 1995. Plaintiff's claim tha=
t=20
defendant's failure to produce plaintiff's medical records in response to h=
is=20
request excused the timely filing of the notice of intent also failed.=20
Affirmed.

Full Text Opinion

Worker's Compensation

Back to Quicklinks

Issues: Claim for weekly wage loss benefits based on mental disability; The=
=20
Gardner formulation of the statutory test for determining whether an employ=
ee=20
has suffered a compensable mental disability; The Worker's Compensation=20
Appellate Commission (WCAC)
Court: Michigan Court of Appeals (Unpublished)
Case Name: White v. Department of Agric.
e-Journal Number: 8393
Judge(s): Per Curiam - Owens, Jansen, and Burns

The magistrate properly determined that although an incident where=20
plaintiff's supervisor kicked him to wake plaintiff up after he nodded off =
on=20
the job may have appeared objectively insignificant to the average person,=
=20
there was substantial evidence from plaintiff's physician establishing that=
=20
because it would not take much of a stimulus to trigger a response in a=20
patient with a preexisting borderline personality, the kicking incident=20
contributed to, aggravated, or accelerated plaintiff's mental condition in =
a=20
significant manner. All that is statutorily required are actual events of=
=20
employment, even if objectively unimportant, that contribute to, aggravate,=
=20
or accelerate a mental disability in a significant manner. The decision of=
=20
the WCAC reversing the magistrate and denying plaintiff's claim for weekly=
=20
wage loss benefits on the basis of a mental disability was reversed, and=20
remanded the case for reinstatement of the magistrate's award.

Full Text Opinion

fields of practice listingsADR/Arbitration/Mediation

ASHER N. TILCHIN, a member of the American College of Civil Trial Mediators=
=20
and Michigan Arbitration and Mediation Association provides mediation for=
=20
pre, early and matured lawsuits. He has been a successful mediator since=20
1991. Tilchin also provides arbitration services as a single or multi-panel=
=20
arbitrator. Cases involving construction, real estate, commercial=20
transactions, and legal malpractice invited. Asher N. Tilchin, 31731=20
Northwestern Hwy., Suite 106, Farmington Hills, MI 48334, (248)855-0995 or=
=20
Fax (248) 855-0850, e-mail antilchin@aol.com

Back to Quicklinks

Admiralty/Maritime & Railroad Law

DENNIS M. O'BRYAN is a Proctor in Admiralty whose firm handles injury and=
=20
death cases involving: marine (Jones Act) and railroad (FELA) employees,=20
recreational maritime accidents and car/train collisions. Millions won.=20
National practice. Referrals guaranteed. 401 S. Old Woodward, Suite 320,=20
Birmingham, MI 48009. Phone (248) 258-6262. E-mail=20

Back to Quicklinks

Antitrust/Advertising/Trade Regulation

DAVID G. CHARDAVOYNE specializes in the regulation of business competition,=
=20
including: antitrust law, unfair competition, and the regulation of=20
advertising, labeling, and other trade practices. Former Chairperson of Sta=
te=20
Bar antitrust and trade regulation section, more than 15 years' experience =
in=20
this field. Will consult regarding antitrust issues (monopolies, mergers,=
=20
price fixing, exclusive dealing, tying arrangements, price discrimination,=
=20
dealer termination, market allocation); premerger notice filings under=20
Hart-Scott-Rodino Act; discussions with State and Federal regulatory agenci=
es=20
(FTC, Justice Department, Attorney General); compliance with laws regulatin=
g=20
advertising (substantiation of claims, product labels, consumer price=20
displays); and all other matters relating to business competition. David G.=
=20
Chardavoyne, 26755 La Muera Ave., Farmington Hills, MI 48334-4613, (248)=20
477-6308, e-mail

Back to Quicklinks

Appeals

JAMES F. TROESTER, experienced in appeals to State and Federal Courts, will=
=20
provide quality appellate consultation, briefing, research, and argument at=
=20
reasonable cost. Contact Mr. Troester at AV rated/Primerus law firm Smith,=
=20
Bovill, Fisher, Meyer & Borchard, P.C., 200 St. Andrews Road, Saginaw, MI=
=20
48603; (517) 792-9641; e-mail jtroester@smithbovill.com; www.smithbovill.co=
m

Back to Quicklinks

Automobile Warranty Law

LIBLANG & ASSOCIATES: Specializing in "Lemon Law", UCC, Magnuson-Moss,=20
Odometer Fraud and Consumer Protection Act. Available for trials,=20
consultations or referrals. Cases accepted statewide. Over 17 years and 5,0=
00=20
cases. Michigan's most experienced lemon law attorneys, Dani K. Liblang and=
=20
Scott J. Sinkwitts. Please call (248) 540-9270 or e-mail

Back to Quicklinks

Business & Taxation

LAW OFFICES OF RALPH W. PEZDA. Oakland County practitioner with an LL.M.=20
degree in taxation from New York University will assist your clients or fir=
m=20
with taxation, business, interdisciplinary, and white collar criminal=20
matters. Referrals paid. 27700 Northwestern Hwy., Suite 411, Southfield, MI=
=20
48034. (248) 352-5632. E-mail address: rwp@cdlcorp.com.

Back to Quicklinks

Employment Discrimination/Harassment Investigations

PROPER HANDLING of employee discrimination and harassment claims requires=
=20
outside counsel. Selecting an attorney=20
experienced in employment litigation and the EEO investigative process=20
ensures the integrity (i.e., fairness and objectivity) of the=20
internal investigation. It also avoids in-house conflict of interest=20
problems. An independent investigative summary gives=20
management a credible basis for evaluating an employee's claims, taking any=
=20
necessary workplace corrective action, and=20
minimizing liability exposure. Attorney Lori K. Shemka, who is also an=20
EEO-certified investigator, is presently accepting new=20
employment investigation assignments. (248) 568-6494 or shemka@concentric.n=
et

Back to Quicklinks

Federal False Claims (Qui Tam) Actions

HaronDAVID HARON represents whistleblowers in civil false claims actions an=
d=20
works with referring attorneys nationwide who specialize in employment law=
=20
and other fields. Under the federal False Claims Act, private individuals=
=20
with knowledge of fraud against federal programs can file suit on behalf of=
=20
the United States and receive a substantial share of any recovery.=20
Representing such claimants, Mr. Haron has recovered millions of dollars in=
=20
Medicare and Medicaid funds that had been fraudulently obtained by=20
health-care providers, primarily through abusive billing practices. To lear=
n=20
more, visit his qui tam web site at www.QuiTamOnline.com or contact him=20
directly by e-mail at dharon@fsh-law.com or phone (248) 952-0400 at Frank,=
=20
Stefani, Haron & Hall in Troy http://www.fsh-law.com/

Back to Quicklinks

Hospital & Medical Negligence

THE LAW OFFICES OF JOHN S. HONE, P.C., representing victims of hospital and=
=20
medical negligence resulting in serious injury, permanent cognitive and=20
physical disability and wrongful death. Millions won, available for=20
consultation and referral, cases accepted statewide. Phone Hone: (248)=20
888-7585; Toll Free: 888-HMO-1010; Fax: (248) 473-8895; E-mail to=20
mmhmolawsuit@aol.com

Back to Quicklinks

Immigration Law

MARSHAL E. HYMAN & ASSOCIATES. All aspects of immigration law including=20
employment-based immigration for professionals and skilled workers. Labor=
=20
certifications. Family-based immigration. Immigration from Canada. Politica=
l=20
asylum, all waivers and appeals. Corporate transfers for multinational=20
employees. Representation in Immigration courts and Federal courts since=20
1981. 3250 West Big Beaver, Suite 529, Troy, MI 48084. (248) 643-0642, Fax:=
=20
(248) 643-0798. E-mail: marshalhyman@msu.com

Back to Quicklinks

Labor & Employment

THE LAW OFFICE of Gregory T. Gibbs has 31 years combined experience in=20
employment law. We can answer questions about: handbooks, sexual harassment=
,=20
wrongful discharge, discrimination, family medical leave, collective=20
bargaining, wage-hour issues or any other employment related matter under=
=20
state or federal law. We work with you and your clients under referral fee=
=20
arrangements. 328 S. Saginaw St., Ste. 9001, Flint, MI 48502. (810) 239-947=
0,=20
fax (810) 235-2468.

Back to Quicklinks

Liquor Law

THOMAS J. GIACHINO, a recently retired assistant attorney general with 24=
=20
years of experience in representing the Michigan Liquor Control Commission,=
=20
is now in private practice and available for consultation or representation=
=20
of clients in all phases of liquor licensing and enforcement matters. Mr.=
=20
Giachino is familiar with liquor trade practices, state and local liquor=20
license and regulations, and licensing requirements in the hospitality=20
industry. He may be contacted at Abbott, Nicholson, Quilter, Esshaki and=20
Youngblood, 300 River Place, Suite 3000, Detroit, Michigan 48207-4225. Phon=
e=20
No. 313-566-2500, fax 313-566-2502, e-mail or visit our website=20

Back to Quicklinks

Long Term Care

THE HEALTH LAW DEPARTMENT of Smith Haughey Rice & Roegge specializes in the=
=20
representation of Long Term Care provider facilities. Areas of representati=
on=20
include pre, during and post licensing and certification surveys, plans of=
=20
correction, informal deficiency dispute resolution process, state and feder=
al=20
appeals, corporate compliance, fraud and abuse, reimbursement via=20
Medicare/Medicaid and all areas of regulatory compliance. Smith Haughey Ric=
e=20
& Roegge, 1400 Abbott Road, Suite 410, E. Lansing, MI 48823.=20
mchamberlain@shrr.com. Visit our website.

Back to Quicklinks

Medical MalpracticeWANT A SECOND OPINION ON A MEDICAL MALPRACTICE CASE? The=
=20
law offices of Anthony M. Malizia, P.C., is a statewide firm that handles=
=20
only medical malpractice cases. I am Martindale-Hubbell "AV-rated." I sit a=
s=20
a plaintiff's medical malpractice mediator. I have 20 years experience in t=
he=20
review and development of these cases, many trials to jury verdict, and man=
y=20
more settlements. Over the years, upwards of 20% of my case inventory has=
=20
consisted of meritorious cases initially rejected by others, including "nam=
e=20
firms." Oftentimes these cases were subjected to incomplete analysis becaus=
e=20
of the firm's lack of in-depth, medico-legal background. Sometimes medical=
=20
sleuthing or a new perspective was required. Send me your rejected case for=
 a=20
"de novo" review. We also welcome the referral of "new" cases. Anthony M.=
=20
Malizia, P.C., 37000 Grand River, Suite 340, Farmington Hills, MI 48335,=20
1-800-555-5107 or e-mail: amlmalizia@aol.com

Securities Law & Commercial Litigation

HERTZ, SCHRAM & SARETSKY, P.C. will assist you or your clients in all aspec=
ts=20
of securities law, including securities arbitration, litigation and=20
regulatory representation. Areas of expertise include customer disputes,=20
employment issues (such as enforcement and defense of noncompetition=20
agreements, trade secret obligations, agreements to pay training costs and=
=20
promises to repay forgivable loans) regulatory inquiries and reporting and=
=20
broker-dealer/ investment advisor creation and registration. The firm is al=
so=20
available to accept referrals of complex commercial litigation to be handle=
d=20
on a cost-effective and personalized basis. The firm handles a wide variety=
=20
of business litigation matters, including contract, shareholder, employment=
,=20
trade secret, collection, dissolution, and leasing disputes. Brad Schram,=
=20
Gary Saretsky, and Mark Kowalsky, 1760 South Telegraph Road, Suite 300,=20
Bloomfield Hills, Michigan 48302-3346; E-mail mkowalsky@hsspc.com.

Back to Quicklinks

Special Education Law

LAW OFFICES OF MARSHA LYNN TUCK with 20 years experience, Martindale-Hubbel=
l =0F"
AV-rated,=0F" representing students with and without disabilities in suspen=
sion,=20
expulsion, integration, inclusion, and similar cases. Marsha Lynn Tuck, 307=
00=20
Telegraph Road, Suite 4646, Bingham Farms, MI 48025. (248) 585-9338.

Back to Quicklinks

Tax Litigation & Disputes

JOSEPH FALCONE is available to assist attorneys with Federal and State Civi=
l=20
and Criminal Tax Litigation and Dispute matters. Joseph Falcone, a former I=
RS=20
Detroit District Counsel Trial Attorney, has handled thousands of tax matte=
rs=20
and has 27 years experience working in the specialized area of Tax Litigati=
on=20
and Disputes. If you require assistance with a major tax dispute, wish to=
=20
refer a matter, or just need a few minutes consultation over the phone with=
=20
your specific problem or question, telephone or e-mail us. Visit our websit=
e.=20
Falcone & Rolfe, P.C., 3000 Town Center, Suite 2370, Southfield, MI 48075.=
=20
(248) 357 6610. Fax (248) 357-6613.

Back to Quicklinks

To receive information on how to place a Fields of Practice listing, contac=
t=20
Stacy Sage

Back to Quicklinks

classified advertisingConfidential Records Destruction

SHRED-IT. Confidentiality, Privacy and Document Security are vital in today=
's=20
environment. SHRED-IT provides solutions for secure destruction of=20
confidential, sensitive and proprietary information, utilizing a unique,=20
mobile, ON-SITE document destruction system. Call 1-800-69-SHRED or=20
1-800-697-4733. E-mail Eastern Michigan; e-mail Out state Michigan or visit=
=20
our website

Back to Quicklinks

Expert Witness-Building

EXPERT WITNESS services for construction issues. Our cases include issues o=
f=20
faulty construction, failure to disclose, personal injury and ADA. Mr. Tyso=
n=20
is a member of many model code organizations including BOCA, ICBO, NFPA and=
=20
ASTM. Our attorney clients represent plaintiffs and defendants. Rendering=
=20
independent and unbiased opinions. Ortonville, MI. Phone (248) 627-6859.

Back to Quicklinks

RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION--Jack W. Belkin in conjunction with AR Decker &=20
Associates, Inc., civil and structural engineers are offering expertise in=
=20
all phases of residential construction related to workmanship, cost, time,=
=20
structural analysis, civil analysis and other related problems. Jack W.=20
Belkin, (248) 443-4063, cell (248) 867-5042, e-mail jwbelkin@Mich.com=20

Back to Quicklinks

Expert Witness-Economics Consulting

ECONOMIC LOSS CALCULATION and litigation support in personal injury, wrongf=
ul=20
death and wrongful discharge cases. Over 25 years experience including Chie=
f=20
Economist for the Michigan Department of Commerce. John F. Hanieski, Ph.D.,=
=20
Economics Consulting Services, LLC, 8583 W. Eaton Hwy., Grand Ledge, MI.=20
48837. (517) 627-6968. E-mail

Back to Quicklinks

Expert Witness-Legal Malpractice

LEGAL MALPRACTICE - EXPERT EVALUATION, pre- and post-litigation analysis,=
=20
written opinions, deposition and trial testimony in plaintiff originated or=
=20
defendant defended legal malpractice cases that involve Real Estate and=20
Commercial Transactions and Civil Litigation. 18 years' experience as legal=
=20
malpractice expert. Asher N. Tilchin, Tilchin, Hall & Reynolds P.C., 31731=
=20
Northwestern Hwy., Suite 106, Farmington Hills, MI 48334. (248) 855-0995, f=
ax=20
(248) 855-0850. E-mail antilchin@aol.com

Back to Quicklinks

Lawsuit Financing

DOES YOUR CLIENT NEED CASH NOW to pay bills while waiting for his case to=
=20
resolve? Get full value. Lawsuit Financial contingent advances afford you a=
=20
most precious commodity=0F.Time! Lawsuit Financial, L.L.C., Suite 304, 6960=
=20
Orchard Lake Road, West Bloomfield, MI 48322. Call (248) 948-1800 or (877)=
=20
377-SUIT.

Back to Quicklinks

Legal Research

OPEN is a national online information service providing point and click=20
access to business and individual background data. Available information=20
includes driving and criminal records, UCC filings, corporation records, re=
al=20
property records, bankruptcies, liens, judgements and other public record=
=20
information. OPEN offers discounted database searches to SBM members. Visit=
=20
our website at www.openonline.com

Back to Quicklinks

Positions Available

ASSOCIATE WANTED--For a nine attorney plaintiffs general practice firm in=
=20
Grosse Pointe, established in 1970. 10 or more years of experience preferre=
d.=20
Excellent compensation and benefits. All inquiries will be kept confidentia=
l.=20
Send resume to Dietrich Associates, 718 Notre Dame, Grosse Pointe, MI=20
48230-1240 and call (313) 884-6600, fax: (313) 884-1169.

Back to Quicklinks

ASSOCIATE WANTED--Law, Weathers & Richardson, P.C., a full-service firm in=
=20
Grand Rapids is seeking three associates with two to four years of experien=
ce=20
each in the following areas: Litigation, Municipal Law, and Business Law. T=
he=20
ideal candidates should have a strong academic background and excellent=20
professional skills. Please send resume to David Centner, 333 Bridge Street=
=20
NW, Suite 800, Grand Rapids, MI 49504, or via fax at (616) 732-1740 or emai=
l=20
at davidcentner@lwr.com For more information on Law, Weathers & Richardson,=
=20
P.C., visit our website at www.lwr.com

Back to Quicklinks

ESTATE PLANNING ATTORNEY--"AV-rated" Southwestern Michigan firm is seeking =
an=20
experienced estate-planning=20
attorney to join our well-established and growing Estate Planning Section. =
An=20
ideal candidate will have substantial (4 years or=20
more) experience in drafting a variety of tax-sensitive trusts, handling=20
probate matters, administering trusts and counseling with=20
clients concerning alternative plans to suit their needs. We will treat you=
r=20
application/inquiry with utmost confidentiality. Please=20
send your resume, references and salary requirements to Box 1673, c/o State=
=20
Bar of Michigan, 306 Townsend Street, Lansing,=20
MI, 48933-2083.

Back to Quicklinks

TEMPORARY EXECUTIVE LEGAL EDITOR--The Institute of Continuing Legal Educati=
on=20
is seeking an attorney with 1-2 years' practice experience, strong academic=
=20
background, and excellent research and writing skills to work on a temporar=
y=20
basis. Background in civil litigation, family law, real estate, or business=
=20
law is highly desirable. Proficiency with WordPerfect or Microsoft Word is=
=20
required. 25-30 hours per week. Hourly rate will depend on background and=
=20
skills. Please send resume and writing sample to: Joyce Baker Gates, ICLE,=
=20
1020 Greene Street, Ann Arbor, Michigan 48109-1444. The University of=20
Michigan is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer.

Back to Quicklinks

To receive information on how to place a classified advertisement, contact=
=20
Stacy Sage

Back to Quicklinks

News & Moves

Crowley Noorman, P.C. has merged with Cummings, McClorey, Davis & Acho,=20
P.L.C. to operate under the name of Cummings, McClorey, Davis & Acho, P.L.C=
.=20
Philip Crowley joins the new firm as a partner, managing the firm's Travers=
e=20
City office. Jeffrey Noorman joins the firm as an associate.

Back to Quicklinks

News & Moves

Lawrence M. Dudek, a principal in the Detroit office of the law firm of=20
Miller, Canfield, Paddock & Stone, P.L.C., has been elected Secretary of th=
e=20
State Bar of Michigan's Real Property Law Section for 2000-2001. Mr. Dudek =
is=20
a commercial litigator.

Back to Quicklinks

News & Moves

James J. Giszczak, Robin K. Luce, Patricia Erhart Nessel, Laurie J.=20
Michelson, Rosalie B. Harrison, David B. Braun, Todd M. Fink, and David A.=
=20
Gardey have been named supervisory attorneys with Butzel Long.

Back to Quicklinks

News & Moves

Victor G. Marrocco has joined the law firm of Kienbaum Opperwall Hardy &=20
Pelton. Mr. Marrocco will practice employment litigation and preventive=20
counseling in the Detroit office.

Back to Quicklinks

News & Moves

Juliet E. Pressel and Deborah A. Strain have joined Plunkett & Cooney, P.C.=
=20
Ms. Pressel, who joins the firm's Ann Arbor office, is a member of the firm=
's=20
Insurance Law Practice Group, concentrating primarily in the area of civil=
=20
litigation. Ms. Strain joins the Mt. Clemens office and practices primarily=
=20
worker's compensation law.

Back to Quicklinks

News & Moves

Keith P. Theisen has joined the law firm of Conklin, Benham, Ducey, Listman=
 &=20
Chuhran, P.C. as an associate in the firm's Traverse City office. Mr. Theis=
en=20
practices primarily in the area of worker's compensation defense law.

Back to Quicklinks

News & Moves

The Thomas M. Cooley Law School is a winner of the 21st Annual Telly Awards=
=20
in the category of recruitment videos.

Back to Quicklinks

Please send information for the News & Moves section to Carrie Peplinski

Back to Quicklinks

bar events36th District Court Case EvaluationMedical Malpractice Settlement=
s:=20
The Licensing Impact

Sponsor: Medical Legal Section and Wayne County Medical Society
Date: Wednesday, October 25, from 12:30 p.m. to 2 p.m.
Location: Wayne County Medical Society Headquarters, 1010 Antietam, Detroit
Pricing Information: $12 per person (includes lunch)
Contact: For credit card reservations or questions, call (313) 567-1640

Back to Quicklinks

MAMA Attorney's Institute--Municipal Law from A to=20

Sponsor: Michigan Association of Municipal Attorneys
Dates: Wednesday, October 25 and Thursday, October 26. Check-in is at 8:00=
=20
a.m. both days. Session from 8:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. on Wednesday; 8:30 a.m.=
=20
to 3:30 p.m. on Thursday
Location: Bavarian Inn Lodge, Frankenmuth, One Covered Bridge Lane. Call=20
(517) 652-2651
Pricing Information: Municipal Attorneys $225; Non- Governmental Attorneys=
=20
$300; If Local Government Law and Practice in Michigan is needed, include=
=20
$195 in your registration payment. If registering less than one week before=
=20
the program, add $35 to the registration fee.
Contact: To register, call the Michigan Municipal League at (734) 669-6368.=
=20
For more information, contact Phil Balkema, President (616) 456-3181 or Pet=
er=20
A. Letzmann, Program Chair (231) 526-7629.

Back to Quicklinks

Hellenic Bar Association 2nd Annual Meeting

Sponsor: Hellenic Bar Association
Date: Wednesday, October 25, 6:00 p.m. cocktails; 6:45 p.m. dinner
Location: Scarab Club, Detroit
Pricing Information: $30
Contact: Call Ginger Bouchard (313) 965-1688 or e-mail:=20
papista@worldnet.att.net

Back to Quicklinks

Pro Bono Attorneys from Blue Cross & Blue Shield of Michigan

Sponsor: Detroit Legal Services Clinic
Date: Thursday, October 26, from 2 p.m. to 5 p.m.
Location: SMART Detroit, 13th Floor Penobscot Building

Back to Quicklinks

Admiralty Law Section Meeting

Date: Friday, October 27, 11:30 a.m.=20
Location: SMART Detroit, 13th Floor Penobscot Building

Back to Quicklinks

Trust Administration Issues Identified Under EPIC

Sponsor: Macomb County Probate Bar Association
Date: Friday, October 27, noon to 1:30 p.m. (light lunch provided)
Location: Verkuilen Building Auditorium, 21885 Dunham, Clinton Township
Pricing Information: No charge for members, $10 for non-members
Contact: Send name, phone number, and payment (if a non-member) to: PJ=20
Tomlian - 10/27/2000, Administrative Assistant, 77017 Omo Road, Armada, MI=
=20
48005. Checks should be made payable to "Macomb County Probate Bar=20
Association"

Back to Quicklinks

Thomas M. Cooley Law School Law Review Symposium

Sponsor: The Thomas M. Cooley Law School Law Review
Date: Friday, October 27, from 1 p.m. to 7 p.m.
Location: Cooley Law School Auditorium, 217 South Capitol Avenue, Lansing
Pricing Information: Free, public is welcome
Contact: Cooley Law Review at (517) 371-4650 ext. 4501

Back to Quicklinks

FBA Bankruptcy Section Luncheon

Sponsor: Federal Bar Association Bankruptcy Section=20
Date: Tuesday, October 31, noon
Location: Broadstreet North, 6378 W. Pierson Rd., Flint
Pricing Information: $28 for members, $30.00 for non-members
Contact: For more information, call David Lerner at (248) 901-4010 or=20
Claretta Evans at (313) 226-7912 anytime.

Back to Quicklinks

Meet the Judges of the 36th District Court

Sponsor: 36th District Court Section
Date: Wednesday, November 1, from 12:30 p.m. to 2 p.m.
Location: SMART Detroit, 13th Floor Penobscot Building
Pricing Information: $20 Detroit Metropolitan Bar Association members; $30=
=20
non-members; Additional $5 at-the-door
Contact: DMBA at (313) 961-6120 for reservation information

Back to Quicklinks

Uncensored and Unplugged: Informational Breakfast with Federal Judge Bernar=
d=20
Friedman

Sponsor: Jewish Federation of Metropolitan Detroit=20
Date: Thursday, November 2, 7:30 a.m. to 9 a.m.
Location: Max M. Fisher Federation Building (Maple/Telegraph)
Pricing Information: Free
Contact: For more information, please call Kara Weiner at (248) 203-1499 or=
=20
e-mail kweiner@jfmd.org

Back to Quicklinks

Pro Bono Attorneys from Dickinson Wright P.L.L.C.

Sponsor: Detroit Legal Services Clinic
Date: Tuesday, November 2, from 2 p.m. to 5 p.m.
Location: SMART Detroit, 13th Floor Penobscot Building

Back to Quicklinks

Catholic Lawyers Society Family Retreat

Sponsor: The Catholic Lawyers Society
Date: Sunday, November 5, from 11:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m.
Location: Our Lady of Sorrows Parish Activity Center, Farmington
Pricing Information: $20 per family (includes lunch)
Contact: If there are any questions, please contact John Sier (313) 965-291=
5=20
or sierj1@kitch.com

Back to Quicklinks

FBA Luncheon & Rakow Scholarship Awards

Sponsor: Federal Bar Association and Historical Society for the U.S. Distri=
ct=20
Court, Eastern District of Michigan
Date: Thursday, November 9, noon
Location: Downtown Courtyard Hotel, Detroit (across from the Renaissance=20
Center)
Pricing Information: Members $25; Non-members $30
Contact: For ticket information, call Julia Pidgeon at (313) 226-9772

Back to Quicklinks

Real Property Law Homeward Bound Series 2

Sponsor: Real Property Law Section
Date: Thursday, November 9, from 3:30 to 6:30 p.m.
Location: MSU, Management Education Center, 811 W. Square Lake Road, Troy
Pricing Information: $75 for members; $85 for non-members
Contact: For further information call Arlene Rubinstein at (248) 644-7378

Back to Quicklinks

Pro Bono Attorneys from Garan Lucow Miller, P.C.

Sponsor: Detroit Legal Services Clinic
Date: Thursday, November 16, from 2 p.m. until 5 p.m.
Location: SMART Detroit, 13th Floor Penobscot Building

Back to Quicklinks

A Night at Mark Ridley's Comedy Castle

Sponsor: Oakland County Bar Association Membership and New Lawyers Committe=
e
Date: Thursday, November 16. Appetizers from 6 to 7:30 p.m. Performance by=
=20
Dom Irrera from 7:30 to 9:30 p.m.
Location: Appetizers at Royal Oak Brewery; Performance at Comedy Castle
Pricing Information: Members $15; non-members $30
Contact: Register online at http://www.ocba.org or contact James Riashi or=
=20
Jill Bracher at (248) 334-7757

Back to Quicklinks

Hot Topics in Estate Planning

Sponsor: The Taxation Law Section and the Institute of Continuing Legal=20
Education (ICLE)
Date: Tuesday, November 21
Location: MSU Management Education Center, 811 W. Square Lake Rd., Troy
Contact: For more information, please contact ICLE at (734) 764-0533

Back to Quicklinks

ACLU Annual Dinner & Silent Auction

Sponsor: ACLU Fund of Michigan, Metro-Detroit branch ACLU
Date: Friday, December 1
Location: Charles H. Wright African American History Museum, Detroit
Pricing Information: Tickets $125; premium tables and advertisements in ad=
=20
journal (to be distributed at dinner & auction) also available
Contact: Becky Bull at (313) 961-7728

Back to Quicklinks

MDTC Annual Winter Meeting

Sponsor: Michigan Defense Trial Counsel
Date: Friday, December 1, 8 a.m. to 3 p.m.
Location: Troy Marriott, Troy
Contact: MDTC, 700 N. Washington Avenue, Lansing, MI 48906-5133; Phone (517=
)=20
482-7538; Fax (517) 485-4129; www.mdtc.org=20

Back to Quicklinks

Taking & Defending Depositions

Sponsor: The National Institute for Trial Advocacy (NITA)
Dates: Thursday, December 14 through Saturday, December 16
Location: University Place Conference Center & Hotel, Indianapolis
Pricing Information: Tuition is $995, scholarships are available
Contact: Call NITA at (800) 225-6482 or visit their website at=20
http://www.nita.org

Back to Quicklinks

Seminar on ADR in Courts

Sponsor: ADR Section of the State Bar of Michigan, Oakland County Bar=20
Association ADR Section, and Oakland Mediation Center
Date: Friday, December 15, from 1 p.m. to 4 p.m.
Location: Oakland County Commissioner's Auditorium, 1200 N. Telegraph, Pont=
iac
Pricing Information: Free
Contact: RSVP to J. Patrick Martin or by fax (248) 932-0368 before Sunday,=
=20
December 10

Back to Quicklinks

Please send information for the Bar Events section to Carrie Peplinski

Back to Quicklinks

contacts

For information on classified advertising, contact Stacy Sage

For information on fields of practice listings, contact Stacy Sage

For unsubscribe and change of address issues, contact: Carrie Peplinski

To list bar event information, send your information to Carrie Peplinski

Editorial comments may be sent to Nancy Brown

Contact the Interim Executive Director Danial J. Kim

Technical questions may be sent to e-journal-tech@michbar.org

Who Does What at the State Bar=20

Back to Quicklinks

?

To receive the text-only version, please send an e-mail to=20
lyris@lists.michbar.org In the body, type: subscribe ejournal-text. To=20
unsubscribe from the html version, type: unsubscribe ejournal on the next=
=20
line. You may re-subscribe or unsubscribe at any time.

State Bar of Michigan Home
Copyright &COPY; 2000, State Bar of Michigan
---
You are currently subscribed to ejournal as: [mark.e.haedicke@enron.com]
To unsubscribe, forward this message to=20
leave-ejournal-255481W@lists.michbar.org

Not yet, but I am told they plan to fund the additional 500,000.  Mark

	James Grace@ENRON
	10/24/2000 10:29 PM
		 
Do you know if Enron Caribbean funded IeC/Visual Bridge yet?  Or at least 
acknowledged again their commitment?  IeC is getting a little nervous.

Please see if you and/or AGC's in your respective groups can make time to 
participate.  I have always found it to be a very rewarding experience.  Let 
me know.   Mark
	Shelly Jones, Recruiting Manager@ENRON
	Sent by: Enron Announcements@ENRON
	10/24/2000 09:12 PM
		 
 ADDITIONAL INTERVIEWER PARTICIPATION IS REQUESTED FOR OCTOBER 28 & NOVEMBER 
4.

Also, please note the school/date changes (in red).  This change was 
necessary due to the number of candidates participating in Super Saturday.  
If you have a change in your participation as a result of the date change, 
please contact John Harrison, ext. 3-7811 for revisions.

Thank you
Shelly Jones

Enron Managing Directors, Vice Presidents, Directors, and Managers  Who 
Utilize the Associate/Analyst Pool

As a follow up from a "SAVE THE DATE"  email regarding your participation in 
the  Associate and Analyst  Super Saturday process, now is the time to select 
your dates to attend and participate.

Below are the dates for Super Saturday weekends during the upcoming 
recruiting season.  If you are Houston-based or if you know you will be in 
Houston on business at the appropriate times please click the link below to 
volunteer.  

http://axis.enron.com/notice/ssinvite.asp    
(When selecting dates please avoid selecting to interview candidates who 
attend the schools for which you are a team member.)

Associates     Analysts
October 27-28, 2000    November 3-4
Thunderbird, UT, Georgetown, Rice  Rice, UT, Baylor, A&M, OU, Florida, LSU, 
UHCL

November 10-11, 2000    November, 17-18, 2000
Columbia, Stern NYU, UCLA, Darden, Cornell Penn, UVA, Vanderbilt, Michigan, 
Howard, AUC, 
Vanderbilt, Michigan    UHMain and Clear Lake, LSU

December, 1-2, 2000    December 8-9, 20000
Chicago, Kellogg, Harvard, Wharton, MIT Wellesley, overflow and re-schedules 
from previous s/s
-
Friday, December 15, 2000  
Carnegie Mellon
Yale off-cycle candidates

Thank you for your support of the Associate and Analyst Programs.
Shelly Jones
Recruiting Manager

It was part of ECT, but it was sold.   Mark

The volume and complexity of our legal work has increased dramatically over 
the past few years.  I think this environment requires additional time to be 
devoted to legal planning and review in order to provide the best possible 
service to our clients.  Within the next month, I have asked Janette to 
schedule a Quarterly Legal Review for each group listed on our new 
organizational chart .  I  would envision that we would focus on the 
following:  

review of the current monthly legal report and significant legal issues
review of the top ten legal risks
form contracts and other documentation projects
legal budget
legal resources, inside and outside
performance metrics

In addition, I am proposing that any energy trading contract for a term 
longer than one year by initialled by an AGC or member of the OGC.  Let me 
know what you think about that.

Mark Haedicke
        

Why wouldn't we use the EEI form in Ontario?  The markets will be integrated, 
at least in part, into the US.  We could have an annex for Ontario.  We will 
be using the EEI form right across the border in the US.  Let 's chat about 
this.
Regards,
Mark

	Peter Keohane
	10/25/2000 08:58 AM
		
Chris, Greg is putting the finishing touches on the Power Master as well as a 
GTC.

Greg, Chris needs the Master form ASAP so we can take the lead on this 
Ontario industry form development iniative.  Can you finalize the form and 
prepare a bullet point memo as requested by Chris comparing the differences 
between our form and EEI.

Greg, also you should coordinate a Calgary office meeting with traders and 
originators (not more than 1 hour) to unveil and explain the form ASAP.  
Alberta Market Opening and PPA trading commences Jan 1/01 and we may need 
push to get Masters signed or rely on GTC in the short term.

Chris, you should do likewise in Toronto when appropriate.

Milly, would it be a worthwhile expense for Greg to attend the firstOntario 
industry meeting in Toronto with Chris, as Greg has the background on 
developing the form?

Mark and Elizabeth, FYI.

Peter.  

   
	
	

Greg - Sorry to keep bothering you on the Power Master, but I was wondering 
what is the ETA for the form?  The reason I ask is that I am going to be 
involved in the industry push here in Ontario to develop a standard physical 
bilateral agreement.  While it is my understanding that many participants 
want to start with the EEI form and OPGI believes that they already have a 
next to final form, for obvious reasons Peter and Milly would like to see our 
form become the industry standard.

Another thing that would be helpful is a brief memo describing the 
differences between the EEI form and our form and the rationale for the 
differences.  Some of this may be readily apparent from running a blackline, 
but I would like to have the benefit of the knowledge you have built up in 
developing the form.  

Timing of this is fairly tight as the next meeting on this initiative is 
November 9th.  My goal is to show up at the meeting and advocate a 
"Canadianized" version of the EEI form and then describe the great time and 
effort Enron has expended on this already and table our draft as a starting 
point.

Apparently EEI will also be in attendance.  I will follow up with Elizabeth 
Sager on what is the status of our relationship with EEI and what was the US 
experience in developing the EEI master.

Regards
CJG

Effective today, there is a new legal review procedure for physical power 
contracts that are individually negotiated, with a term longer than one 
year.  Please notify me (Janette will maintain a list of contracts, 
counterparties and status) when drafting starts on such power contracts and 
provide me with a draft with sufficient time to make comments prior to 
closing.  My objective is to insure a consistent approach on these power 
contracts.  Thanks for your cooperation in this matter.  Please forward this 
memo on to the lawyers on your team.

Mark Haedicke   

YES!

	"Swanstrom, Bill" <BSwanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
	10/26/2000 01:55 PM
		 
Mark
 
I have front row seats right behind the Rockets bench (I think you've sat
there before) for the opening home game next Tuesday (Halloween night).  Can
you join me?  I think Lyons was going to make it as well.
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com <mailto:bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com> 
(713) 226-1143
 
 

Alan, I like your suggestions.  Please forward your e-mail to the rest of the 
ogc to facilitate discussion.  I would like to finalize this policy next 
week.  Mark

	Alan Aronowitz
	10/26/2000 01:42 PM
		 
Mark:

Got your voice mail on this. I wasn't sure if you were suggesting the policy 
for trading contracts or all contracts of greater than a year.

My thoughts are as follows:

1) Policy Scope: I think we need to address whether the Policy will extend to 
trading as well as origination transactions. As you know, often there is a 
very blurry line.

2) Existing Masters: If a master is in place, confirmations will be used for 
terms of one month to greater than one year. I don't think it will be 
practical for us to approve these confirmations before signature unless there 
are material modifications done to the pre-approved confirmation template in 
the master, which would require Legal approval in the present state of 
affairs.  I assume the Policy would only apply to individually negotiated 
contracts outside a Master Agreement.

3) Order of Magnitude: We should consider having a dollar figure (determined 
simply by multiplying the notional or contract volume x the contract price or 
the Enron financial commitment amount), coupled with the one year or greater 
term, that would require the additional OGC/AGC approval in order to make 
sure the requirement is imposed only for higher dollar contracts.

I would be happy to discuss this with you further.

Alan

I want to have a pre-telephone conference with JoAnn on what we are going to 
present.   Let's spend one half hour.  Mark
	Zulie Flores@ENRON
	10/26/2000 12:15 PM
		 
Please note that the following meeting is now set:  

Date: Monday, November 6, 2000

Time: 2-3pm

Where: 50M03

Attendees: Cindy Olson
  Mark E. Haedicke
  Elyse Kalmans
  JoAnn Pinkette - Child Advocates  - BEAR  (Her telephone number is 
713-529-1396)
  Judi Herold           " "                    "
  Sheri Robinson    "            "                    "

Please make note on your calendars of this meeting...If you have any 
questions, please contact zulie 33908...thank you

Please add to the list as number three.    Mark
	Peter Keohane
	Sent by: Sharon Crawford
	10/26/2000 04:33 PM
		
Mark, on reflection, I think that there is currently only one legal risk 
within Enron Canada that would warrant being added to the top legal risks for 
ENA, which is the Alberta Sundance "B" PPA acquired in the Alberta PPA 
auction in August, 2000.

I would suggest the description attached.

Regards,
Peter

Janette Elbertson
10/24/2000 08:47 AM
Mark Haedicke requested I forward the attached document to you.

Janette Elbertson

Sounds good.   Mark

Your memo was well done.  Mark

Keep this as a top priority!  Thanks.    Mark

	Mark Greenberg@ENRON
	10/26/2000 10:22 AM
		 
To All -

Thanks again for the participation in this project.  I believe we made some 
progress yesterday on the overall look and feel of the site. 

Meeting Notes:

Mark - Presented ideas for the look and feel of the web site based on law 
firm web sites and intra-Enron sites.  I will continue to pursue work with 
the IT group on the design and implementation of the site.

Michelle - Reported on her progress with the ENA PR group on a name.  
click.legal or click.law seem to be the favorite addresses; however, 
"legalmatters.enron" was also suggested.  Michelle will continue to work with 
the ENA PR group to develop a name, possible logo and slogan/tag-line 
consistent with the Enron vision statement.

Janette - Reported on the status of the organization chart information to be 
used on the site.  Indicated she is still waiting for responses from several 
of the groups for the "who are we" paragraph.  She is also making progress on 
matching the org. chart to the individual legal team members.  Work on this 
project will continue.

Ed/James - Both reported on the status of link identification.  Discussion 
took place regarding the further identification of categories associated with 
the links and those links that will be useful to the Department, realizing 
that few clients will actual access our site for links.  Work on a listing of 
categories and sites for these categories will continue.

General Information:

Subsequent to our meeting, I met with our designated IT project coordinator - 
Tamika Hebert.  We spent almost two hours discussing the functionality we 
want in the site.  Unfortunately, John Reese, our IT designer, was out of the 
office and unable to provide me with the design ideas he has to date.  I hope 
to receive these designs later today or tomorrow and will make them available 
to everyone for comment.  I also provided Tamika with references to some of 
the sites we reviewed during our meeting so that she could understand some of 
the look, feel and functionality we want.

Concerning actual development of the background structure, the "programmer" 
has not been identified for this project, but should be by the end of this 
week.  Once he/she is identified, work will begin on the design of the 
functionality of the site.  Concurrent with this effort, it is necessary that 
we start providing content to Tamika so that site areas can be tested and 
reviewed.  Accordingly, once information is available in your respective 
areas, please provide it to me or forward it directly to Tamika.

Reminder - Please remember to note that we have moved the time of the meeting 
from 2:00 to 2:30.  Our next meeting will be next Wednesday, November 1 in 
EB38C2.

Thanks again for the hard work.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

Alan, please confirm that you have told Mike that it is required that Legal 
be consulted on such a waiver.  Mark
	
	

This memo is being sent to inform you that the September 30 Panther principal 
payment was made today and to clarify the confusion around the delay for the 
payment. Panther is one of the operating subsidiaries in our DPR Holding 
Company relationship with Chris Cline.

As many of you are aware, we are in the process of restructuring the Panther 
loan. Panther has violated certain financial covenants as a result of the 
lack of coal production when the mine was temporarily idled. These covenant 
violations put the loan in default and put us in a position to restructure 
certain aspects of the relationship. (All principal and interest payments 
have been made as scheduled despite the shutdown).

Part of the restructuring may involve deferring certain principal payments 
until 6/30/00 when Panther is expected to resume coal production. Since we 
are in the process of negotiating certain changes and since DPR Holding 
Company was sitting on $2.0 mm to be used for the payment and/or dividend 
distributions, they asked if they could wait until the distribution payment 
date in November before making the principal payment. This would give us a 
few more weeks to finalize the restructuring negotiations and perhaps enable 
them to defer the payment until June. This would also allow DPR to make a 
larger dividend distribution to both us and Cline. 

I told them that this was okay but that it did not constitute a waiver or 
decision to defer the payment. Unfortunately, this was not communicated well 
internally. I felt that this was an acceptable action because the company has 
the money and we are in the process of restructuring the repayment schedule. 
I also viewed it as a minor accomodation to Cline who has personally spent 
over $5 million on equipment for the project since January and has not 
charged the joint venture. 

However, to avoid hurting the relationship or DPR's reputation internally, 
Cline made the payment today.

ISDA has confirmed January 18 as the date for the Board meeting in London.  

fyi
	David W Delainey
	10/30/2000 01:12 PM
		 
Guys, attached you will find a preliminary agenda for the 2000 ENA Offsite.  
As leaders of the organization, you have been invited to participate in a two 
day offsite where business 2001 objectives and strategies for ENA will be 
discussed.  It is scheduled to occur December 14th and 15th at the Venetian 
in Las Vegas.

This is the forum to ensure that your point of view and ideas can be heard 
and incorporated into our plans and iniatives as such I would encourage 
everyone to attend and to stay for the entire period.  In particular, we 
would like everyone to stay over Friday night and leave Saturday morning.

ENA public relations (Dorie) will manage all the logistics including air fare.

Final invitations, details and agenda will follow shortly.

Regards
Dave and John

ok

	Elizabeth Sager
	10/30/2000 12:02 PM
		
Mark - for your approval

1.  Trip for me to San Diego to attend WSPP meeting.

2  Trip for Shari to Portland in November while Christian is on Thanksgiving 
holiday.

Thanks

ps - I will schedule a meeting with you this week to discuss Shari/staffing 
in Portland office.

I will talk to Dave about this and get back to you.  Mark

	Alan Aronowitz
	10/28/2000 09:31 AM
		
This looks fine to me.

As we have previously discussed, I think in the special circumstance of Scott 
Tholan (Director), we should put in place a Power-of-Attorney to permit him 
to sign: (1) confidentiality agreements and (2) consulting agreements related 
to the competitive analysis projects. We can put a one year time limit on the 
POA as suggested in your memo. Please confirm that you are ok with this so 
that I can put the POA in place.  If you agree, please advise if I need to 
copy John L. and/or Dave on the POA.

Alan

	Mark E Haedicke
	10/20/2000 10:56 AM
		 
I would like to do fewer resolutions authorizing non-vps to sign contracts, 
and when we need such authorizations, let's make sure the resolutions are 
appropriately limited.  My thoughts are as follows:

1.   We have a lot of vps that can sign contracts.
2.   It is generally ok to have confirmations signed by certain carefully 
selected directors since we are confirming a trade that already took place 
and there is master agreement already signed.
3.   There are certain very routine agreements like pipeline right-of-way 
agreements that are ok for carefully selected directors to sign.
4.   Confidentiality agreements should be signed by a vp.
5.   Any authorization for a director to sign should expire within not more 
than one year and revoke all prior authorizations.

Please give me your comments.

Mark   

I will see you for dinner.  Mark   I assume we are talking Nit Noi off of 
Kirby.  Mark

	"Swanstrom, Bill" <BSwanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
	Sent by: "Ingram, Kay" <KIngram@lockeliddell.com>
	10/31/2000 10:08 AM
	Please respond to "Swanstrom, Bill"
		 
Just a reminder that we are on for the Rockets game tonight.  I've made
reservations at Nit Noi for 6 p.m.  Dan and Mark, I have your tickets.  If
you think you might not be able to make dinner, let me know and I'll send
your tickets over by messenger.  
 
Looking forward to it!
 
 
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com <mailto:bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
(713) 226-1143
 

For your review.  Mark
	Suzanne Adams
	10/30/2000 07:15 PM
		 

I am ok with it.  Mark

	Michael A Robison
	10/31/2000 02:20 PM
		 
Mark:
John Nowlan wants to enter into a Confidentiality Agreement with Eastman 
Chemical Company in connection with discussions concerning the potential 
joint development of an internet portal.  Eastman wants Enron to agree to a 
nonsolicitation provision that would prohibit us for a period of 12 months 
from initiating hiring contacts with Eastman employees identified in a 
schedule to be attached to the Confidentiality Agreement.  Contacts with us 
initiated by Eastman employees as well as responses by Eastman employees to 
general employment advertisements would be excluded from the nonsolicitation 
provision.  John takes no exception to the nonsolicitation provision.  Under 
our Legal Department Guidelines I need your approval to go forward with this 
arrangement.  Please let me know if you approve.
Thank you for your assistance.
Mike
EB3859
(713) 853-6667 DID
(713) 646-4842 FAX

Congrats on a job well done and a successful result.

	Peter Keohane
	11/01/2000 01:59 PM
		 
Mark, Enron Canada was awarded the contract for managing on behalf of the 
Government of Ontario the Non-Utility Generation Contracts, approx. 2000MW.  
We will be managing the position under an incentive fee arrangement, as well 
as providing back-office operations for sheduling, dispatch, settlement, 
etc.  I understand that commercially this was something we wanted to win 
badly.  Chris did a wonderful job together with our commercial people 
(involving some very late nights) to put together an excellent response to 
the RFP, which was deatiled in identifying and managing the risks.  I 
understand that although our response was to the RFP was therefore 
non-comforming, it showed such a detailed thought and understanding of the 
issues that we were awarded the contract with all of our conditions 
accepted.  Everyone here is very pleased.  We now need to develop the 
definitive agreement with Ontario, which I will help Chris on due to the many 
demands on his time.  At this time I am hoping to try to avoid using external 
counsel.  If we need to use external counsel, I will speak to you regarding 
an appropriate firm.

Peter.

Any particular legal issues on these deals?

Mark
	David W Delainey
	11/02/2000 09:25 AM
		 
Tim, I would argue that we should pursue this business as long as a) we are 
being adequately compensated for the financing and underlying commodity risk; 
b) we have very good paper; c) we are dealing with solid credits and are 
charging an appropriate risk adjusted cost of capital for the underlying 
financing; d) we have the ability to syndicate the capital or funds flow 
position if needed to manage cash issues and e) that RAC is comfortable that 
we are reaching these goals.

Any imbedded financing or $5M or more should be DASHED.  David, Joe and Mark 
should be your key contacts to ensure we are adequately managing these issues 
but I do not see any fatal flaw in the strategy if priced/managed well and we 
watch the funds flow issues.  

Regards
Delainey

	
	

We have closed the following deals where we deliver power two a muni in the 
short term and get paid back power later on.  These deals have both a 
commodity and a finance portion:

Counterparty    Loan Period  Repayment Period  Amount Financed

Grant County    7/01 to 7/06   7/06   $4.7 million
Grant County    5/01 to 7/06   7/06   $5.7 million
Avista/Kaiser    7/2000   7/2000 to 7/2006   $31.3 million   
BPA/Kaiser    9/2000   7/2001 to 9/2001   $36 million
Clatskanie    11/2000 to 9/2001 10/2001 to 9/2006  $5 million
Eugene Water and Electric  1/2001 to 3/2002  11/2001 to 4/2002  $4.9 million
Eugene Water and Electric  7/2001 to 12/2002 5/2002 to 12/2002  $7.3 million

We are seeing demand for more of these.  For example, Tacoma City Light is 
looking at $35,000,000 + in this type of structure.  What do you guys need to 
know about this business and how much of an appetite do we have for this?

fyi
	Robert Eickenroht@ENRON
	11/01/2000 06:44 PM
		 
Mark:

Good hearing from you!

Attached as you requested are the TNPC Noncompetition Agreement, Executive 
Summary and Derrick Memo regarding same.  I will be happy to discuss this 
with you at you convenience.

Regards,
Robert

This is great news!  Let's make the most of this opportunity.  Thanks,   Mark

Great job!  The english language will dominate the energy world!   Mark

Please handle.  4 breakout rooms is a safe number.  Mark
	"Liz O'Sullivan" <LOSULLIVAN@isda.org>
	11/03/2000 10:19 AM
		 
Dear Mark:

I am trying to find a suitable venue and date to hold ISDA's Energy
Conference in Houston.  At the moment I have on hold Tuesday, March 6, 2001
at the Four Seasons Hotel in Houston.  

Please let me know if March 6th is a suitable date to hold Energy
Conference.  Also, please advise on the number of breakout rooms you would
recommend us to book for the afternoon sessions.  We previously had four
breakout workshops: (1) Electricity Derivatives, (2) Coal Derivatives, (3)
Weather Derivatives and 
(4) Natural Gas and Other Energy Derivatives.  

I look forward to hearing from you.

Regards,
Liz

Ms. Liz O'Sullivan
International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.
600 Fifth Avenue - 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY 10020
(212) 332-2559

I appreciate the extra work.  Thanks.   Mark

	Greg Johnston
	11/02/2000 04:43 PM
		 
Further to the landslide of e-mails I have sent relating to this agreement, I 
hope that this will be the last as far as asking for input.  Over the last 
few days, the form of the paper pursuant to which Enron Canada will trade 
physical power in Canada has been reviewed and (I think) finalized by legal 
in Calgary and Houston and the commercial people in Calgary.  We have 
determined that it is in the best interest of Enron to jointly promote the 
Edison Electric Institute (EEI) form of master which, as I described in my 
e-mail of yesterday, consists of a standardized base contract with an 
amending section, much like the ISDA form of financial master.  However, as 
the current form of the EEI master is a US document, containing many US 
specific provisions that have no application in Canada, commercially it has 
been identified as a concern that, with respect to counterparties that are 
not sophisticated trading companies, selling a US document with a Canadian 
addendum will be difficult if not impossible.

Therefore, we are going to proceed to finalize the form of "industrial 
master" that I have drafted and sent out numerous times for review, a copy of 
which I enclose in both a clean and black-lined version (black-lined to the 
most recent draft distributed to you) in what I now believe is, in fact, 
final form.  Our commercial people can use this form, together with the form 
of GTC I distributed to most of you earlier today, to market power in Alberta 
to counterparties who will not accept the EEI form.

We will immediately begin the process of supporting the use of the EEI form 
in Canada but will propose that a Canadian form of base contract be agreed to 
and implemented, thereby eliminating the problem of using a US document as 
the base contract for Canadian transactions.  I will begin the process of 
trying to create a first draft of this base contract which, other than with 
respect to removing US references and incorporating specific Canadian 
principles, will be identical to the US form.  I will also commence the 
process of preparing what Enron believes the form of addendum to this 
Canadian base contract should be.

Sorry for the lengthy e-mail, but I wanted to ensure that everyone was 
completely up-to-date with the status and process.  I believe that this 
solution will address everyone's concerns without jeopardizing commercial 
transactions in Alberta.

Thanks

Greg

Travis McCullough, Richard Sanders and Michelle Cash.  I am still thinking 
about a couple more.  I probably need a few weeks to finalize.  Thanks.  Mark

	Rob Walls@ENRON
	11/02/2000 03:30 PM
		 
So far, I have received no recommendations for candidates for vice 
president.This is a gentle reminder.  Thanks.

	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	11/02/2000 03:34 PM
		 
Rob has asked me to collect legal department views on the attached statement 
of principles regarding Security and Human Rights that Enron Corp is 
considering endorsing. These have been worked out over the past several 
months by a task force of the US and UK governments, along with 
representatives of industry (including Enron) and NGOs (including Amesty and 
Human Rights Watch) under the auspices of Secretary fo State Albright and 
Foreign Secretary Cook.  As a result, we really don't  have the ability to 
change the text, which is fixed. 

As you know, Enron is very concerned about human rights issues because of 
their intrinsic value and their community relations impacts.These guidelines 
would be in addition to the Human Rights Policy Statement the Enron board 
adopted last year, which really do not touch on security matters as such. I 
have sent this to each of your since your business units are those that have 
the most extensive operations in the developing countries in which these 
issues are of primary concern.  (I am separately collecting comments/concerns 
from within EES and EECC.)

The Enron effort on this guideline project has been lead by Lauren Goldblatt 
of the Corp. PR group. Lauren has run the attached drafts past Mike Hicks and 
Pete Vandergam at Corp. Security for their views of whether this can be 
implemented by Enron.  We as the legal department have been asked to express 
our view on are the following:

(a) Are there any show stoppers that would argue that Enron should not 
publicly express its "endorsement" of these polices?
(b) If Enron were to express its endorsement of the policy statement, what if 
any material problems do you think your business line might encounter in 
implementing the policy?
(c) Do you see any unintended practical or legal consequences that might 
arise from Enron publicly adopting or endorsing this as policy?

Please take an hour few hours to read through the materials, or have one of 
your lawyers do so. You might need to consult with your operation personnel 
for their practical views as well.   I would be grateful if you could express 
any concerns you may see with the guidelines by November 7 (Wednesday) so 
that I can coordinate comments and get the responses out.   (The deadline for 
Enron and other companies to express their endorsement of the policy has been 
extended from the November 8 deadline expressed in the attached to November 
15. To allow time for Enron to deal with responses, we have been asked to get 
our feed back to Lauren by November 8 (Thursday).)

You cane-mail your comments or phone them to  me at 713-646-6309. If I get 
suffucient expressions of interest for a conference call by Monday, I will 
set up a call in number for Wednesday morning US. 

Thanks, I appreciate your views and comments.

 
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	10/26/2000 10:26 AM
		 
John, Rob and I have talked and   Rob would like you to take the lead on 
this.  Deborah, I need you to work  with  John S. to see how our 
international EES business (Europe, Mexico, etc.) might be   affected by this 
and whether we take this position.  I am sure Rob and JOhn will  have the 
history and expert opinion as to how this should be handled, and my guess is, 
this issue primarily affects EECC at this time.  Maybe one of the Apache 
lawyers can take the lead for the traditional EES business.   Rob will be in 
next week and then going out of town and I will pick up for him then. 
Lauren Goldblatt@ECT
10/25/2000 05:44 PM
Rob and Vicki:

Over the past few months we have participated in an initiative aimed at 
developing a voluntary set of guidelines governing human rights and security 
arrangements.   I would greatly appreciate your thoughts, review, and sign 
off on the guidelines.  

Should we agree to endorse the principles, we must send a letter to the U.S. 
State Department by November 8, 2000.     I have attached a fact sheet as 
well as the revised principles for your review.   

The principles and signatories will be announced by Madeline Albright and 
Secretary Robin Cook in November. 

Thank you for time and consideration on this.  Please do not hesitate to call 
with any questions.  I can be reached either by cell phone (917) 821-0724 or 
by  voicemail at 212-702-3916.

Best Regards, 

Lauren

 - corp_resp__20_Sept_[2].doc

Thanks for the heads up.  Mark

	Steven J Kean@ENRON
	11/01/2000 03:43 PM
		 
Joe Hartsoe, Rick Shapiro, or Jim Steffes can fill you in on the details of 
what FERC did today.  One question you need to think about is how their 
decision on price caps affects any contracts which we may have indexed to 
California's spot market.  The way it reports the market clearing price will 
change fundamentally if prices over 150 will be accepted but not used to 
clear the market for all bids.  So, if we are using this as a reference price 
in our contracts it may trigger the need to look for alternatives.
	Ann M Schmidt
	11/01/2000 10:37 AM
		 
USA: FACTBOX-FERC details changes for Calif power market.

11/01/2000
Reuters English News Service
(C) Reuters Limited 2000.

WASHINGTON, Nov 1 (Reuters) - The U.S. Federal Energy Regulatory Commission 
on Wednesday approved several actions to revamp California's power market 
over the next two years. 
Immediate changes include the following:
* Eliminate requirement that three utilities - Pacific Gas & Electric, San 
Diego Power and SoCal Edison - must sell all of their power to and buy all 
their power from the state Power Exchange (PX). 
* Require market participants to schedule 95 percent of their transactions in 
the day-ahead markets to reduce chronic underscheduling of load and 
generation and over-reliance on the ISO's real-time imbalance market to meet 
supply. FERC also proposed a penalty charge for scheduling deviations in 
excess of 5 percent of hourly load requirements. 
* Temporary modification of the single-price auction so bids above $150 MWh 
cannot set the market clearing price paid to all bidders. 
* Establish independent, non-stakeholder governing boards for the California 
Power Exchange (PX) and Independent System Operator (ISO). 
* Create congestion management design proposal. 
* Establish generation inter-connection procedures. 
* Explore alternatives to the single price auction by the ISO and PX. 
* Develop market rules to ensure sufficient supply is available to meet load 
and reserve requirements. 
FERC also approved changes to protect wholesale customers from unreasonable 
rates during the time it will take to adopt longer-term market remedies. The 
following price mitigation measures will remain in effect until Dec. 31, 
2002: 
* Single-price auctions for all sales in the ISO and PX markets at or below 
$150 MWh. The single price would be used for all load which clears below this 
amount in the auction. 
* If an auction does not clear below the $150 MWh level, suppliers who choose 
to bid above $150 would be paid their price bid. In other words, the highest 
bid of the day, if above $150 per MWh, would no longer be the clearing price 
paid by all. 
* Sellers receiving above $150 per MWh would be required to report their bids 
to FERC on a weekly basis and provide certain cost information to the agency. 
* The ISO and PX would be required to report monthly information on such 
bids, allowing FERC to monitor competitive conditions and assure just and 
reasonable rates. Sellers would be subject to potential refund liability but 
no lower than their marginal or opportunity cost if FERC finds 
non-competitive conditions. The potential refund liability would extend the 
full 24 months it would take to implement the market reforms.

Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 

Elizabeth and Christian:

Please brief me on what impact you believe the FERC proposed order could have 
on our contracts.

Mark
	Steven J Kean@ENRON
	11/01/2000 03:43 PM
		 
Joe Hartsoe, Rick Shapiro, or Jim Steffes can fill you in on the details of 
what FERC did today.  One question you need to think about is how their 
decision on price caps affects any contracts which we may have indexed to 
California's spot market.  The way it reports the market clearing price will 
change fundamentally if prices over 150 will be accepted but not used to 
clear the market for all bids.  So, if we are using this as a reference price 
in our contracts it may trigger the need to look for alternatives.
	Ann M Schmidt
	11/01/2000 10:37 AM
		 
USA: FACTBOX-FERC details changes for Calif power market.

11/01/2000
Reuters English News Service
(C) Reuters Limited 2000.

WASHINGTON, Nov 1 (Reuters) - The U.S. Federal Energy Regulatory Commission 
on Wednesday approved several actions to revamp California's power market 
over the next two years. 
Immediate changes include the following:
* Eliminate requirement that three utilities - Pacific Gas & Electric, San 
Diego Power and SoCal Edison - must sell all of their power to and buy all 
their power from the state Power Exchange (PX). 
* Require market participants to schedule 95 percent of their transactions in 
the day-ahead markets to reduce chronic underscheduling of load and 
generation and over-reliance on the ISO's real-time imbalance market to meet 
supply. FERC also proposed a penalty charge for scheduling deviations in 
excess of 5 percent of hourly load requirements. 
* Temporary modification of the single-price auction so bids above $150 MWh 
cannot set the market clearing price paid to all bidders. 
* Establish independent, non-stakeholder governing boards for the California 
Power Exchange (PX) and Independent System Operator (ISO). 
* Create congestion management design proposal. 
* Establish generation inter-connection procedures. 
* Explore alternatives to the single price auction by the ISO and PX. 
* Develop market rules to ensure sufficient supply is available to meet load 
and reserve requirements. 
FERC also approved changes to protect wholesale customers from unreasonable 
rates during the time it will take to adopt longer-term market remedies. The 
following price mitigation measures will remain in effect until Dec. 31, 
2002: 
* Single-price auctions for all sales in the ISO and PX markets at or below 
$150 MWh. The single price would be used for all load which clears below this 
amount in the auction. 
* If an auction does not clear below the $150 MWh level, suppliers who choose 
to bid above $150 would be paid their price bid. In other words, the highest 
bid of the day, if above $150 per MWh, would no longer be the clearing price 
paid by all. 
* Sellers receiving above $150 per MWh would be required to report their bids 
to FERC on a weekly basis and provide certain cost information to the agency. 
* The ISO and PX would be required to report monthly information on such 
bids, allowing FERC to monitor competitive conditions and assure just and 
reasonable rates. Sellers would be subject to potential refund liability but 
no lower than their marginal or opportunity cost if FERC finds 
non-competitive conditions. The potential refund liability would extend the 
full 24 months it would take to implement the market reforms.

Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 

I was not aware of this.  I will investigate.  Thanks.

	Rick Buy
	11/01/2000 01:13 PM
		 
Mark- were you aware of this? Not a huge dollar  amount but does indicate a 
naked risk we didn't know we had (I think). Rick

	
	                           
	

	

Rick:  I wanted to inform you about a situation where a Commercial Team has 
subjected Enron to some material risk that did not get appropriate 
approval.               

 Here's the story:   On October 30, I received a funding request for my 
approval of approximately $260,000 representing a cash advance request on  
the Bernard No. 1 well, a 16,500 exploratory well in the Cypress Program.   
The request appeared pretty routine but as is our procedure, I had Don 
Rollins check it out .   Don discovered that we had already paid our cash 
call and this cash call represented our working interest partner, Kelley 
Oil's share, which is a highly unusual situation.  Checking further we 
discovered that  the well is being drilled under a farmout agreement from 
Kelley, who wanted to be operator.  Our guys (Thompson/Josey) wanted Enron 
(not Kelley)  to operate the well during the drilling phase but did not want 
to be official operator of record so they set up Rozel Onshore, our prospect 
generator in Lafayette to be our surrogate operator.  Kelley was upset about 
this and would not sign the Joint Venture Agreement unless the cash call 
provisons were deleted.  Thompson/Josey and team agreed and signed the 
agreement which has no initials from the Legal Department.   The effect of 
this was that Rozel/Enron would have to incur all the costs then bill and 
collect from Kelley.

Rick, as you are aware, the cash call provision in a JOA is the primary 
credit risk mitigant that an operator has to ensure that his partners pay 
their share of well costs before costs are incurred.  This can be 
particularly good protection if a well gets in trouble with lots of cost 
overruns that partners don't  want to pay.  In this case, our surrogate 
operator, Rozel has no established credit with oil service companys and no 
money of his own so all services including the drilling rig are having to be 
prepaid by Enron 100%.  The well is heavily front end loaded with costs with 
a total drill and complete exposure of over $4.0 million (if thing go ok!)

I discussed this with Dave Gorte and Brad Larson and we all agreed  that we 
are forced to fund since the well is drilling and failure to fund would shut 
down operations.   Also, keep in mind that this will be an ongoing obligation 
(and risk exposure) during this entire drilling phase.

Lessons Learned:
   1) The E&P merchant finance team has no business operating a deep S. 
Louisiana exploratory test.
   2)  Important provisions, like "cash call" should never be given away 
without appropriate risk assessment and approval.

Please call if you have questions.
   

	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	11/02/2000 03:34 PM
		 
Rob has asked me to collect legal department views on the attached statement 
of principles regarding Security and Human Rights that Enron Corp is 
considering endorsing. These have been worked out over the past several 
months by a task force of the US and UK governments, along with 
representatives of industry (including Enron) and NGOs (including Amesty and 
Human Rights Watch) under the auspices of Secretary fo State Albright and 
Foreign Secretary Cook.  As a result, we really don't  have the ability to 
change the text, which is fixed. 

As you know, Enron is very concerned about human rights issues because of 
their intrinsic value and their community relations impacts.These guidelines 
would be in addition to the Human Rights Policy Statement the Enron board 
adopted last year, which really do not touch on security matters as such. I 
have sent this to each of your since your business units are those that have 
the most extensive operations in the developing countries in which these 
issues are of primary concern.  (I am separately collecting comments/concerns 
from within EES and EECC.)

The Enron effort on this guideline project has been lead by Lauren Goldblatt 
of the Corp. PR group. Lauren has run the attached drafts past Mike Hicks and 
Pete Vandergam at Corp. Security for their views of whether this can be 
implemented by Enron.  We as the legal department have been asked to express 
our view on are the following:

(a) Are there any show stoppers that would argue that Enron should not 
publicly express its "endorsement" of these polices?
(b) If Enron were to express its endorsement of the policy statement, what if 
any material problems do you think your business line might encounter in 
implementing the policy?
(c) Do you see any unintended practical or legal consequences that might 
arise from Enron publicly adopting or endorsing this as policy?

Please take an hour few hours to read through the materials, or have one of 
your lawyers do so. You might need to consult with your operation personnel 
for their practical views as well.   I would be grateful if you could express 
any concerns you may see with the guidelines by November 7 (Wednesday) so 
that I can coordinate comments and get the responses out.   (The deadline for 
Enron and other companies to express their endorsement of the policy has been 
extended from the November 8 deadline expressed in the attached to November 
15. To allow time for Enron to deal with responses, we have been asked to get 
our feed back to Lauren by November 8 (Thursday).)

You cane-mail your comments or phone them to  me at 713-646-6309. If I get 
suffucient expressions of interest for a conference call by Monday, I will 
set up a call in number for Wednesday morning US. 

Thanks, I appreciate your views and comments.

 
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	10/26/2000 10:26 AM
		 
John, Rob and I have talked and   Rob would like you to take the lead on 
this.  Deborah, I need you to work  with  John S. to see how our 
international EES business (Europe, Mexico, etc.) might be   affected by this 
and whether we take this position.  I am sure Rob and JOhn will  have the 
history and expert opinion as to how this should be handled, and my guess is, 
this issue primarily affects EECC at this time.  Maybe one of the Apache 
lawyers can take the lead for the traditional EES business.   Rob will be in 
next week and then going out of town and I will pick up for him then. 
Lauren Goldblatt@ECT
10/25/2000 05:44 PM
Rob and Vicki:

Over the past few months we have participated in an initiative aimed at 
developing a voluntary set of guidelines governing human rights and security 
arrangements.   I would greatly appreciate your thoughts, review, and sign 
off on the guidelines.  

Should we agree to endorse the principles, we must send a letter to the U.S. 
State Department by November 8, 2000.     I have attached a fact sheet as 
well as the revised principles for your review.   

The principles and signatories will be announced by Madeline Albright and 
Secretary Robin Cook in November. 

Thank you for time and consideration on this.  Please do not hesitate to call 
with any questions.  I can be reached either by cell phone (917) 821-0724 or 
by  voicemail at 212-702-3916.

Best Regards, 

Lauren

 - corp_resp__20_Sept_[2].doc

	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	11/02/2000 03:34 PM
		 
Rob has asked me to collect legal department views on the attached statement 
of principles regarding Security and Human Rights that Enron Corp is 
considering endorsing. These have been worked out over the past several 
months by a task force of the US and UK governments, along with 
representatives of industry (including Enron) and NGOs (including Amesty and 
Human Rights Watch) under the auspices of Secretary fo State Albright and 
Foreign Secretary Cook.  As a result, we really don't  have the ability to 
change the text, which is fixed. 

As you know, Enron is very concerned about human rights issues because of 
their intrinsic value and their community relations impacts.These guidelines 
would be in addition to the Human Rights Policy Statement the Enron board 
adopted last year, which really do not touch on security matters as such. I 
have sent this to each of your since your business units are those that have 
the most extensive operations in the developing countries in which these 
issues are of primary concern.  (I am separately collecting comments/concerns 
from within EES and EECC.)

The Enron effort on this guideline project has been lead by Lauren Goldblatt 
of the Corp. PR group. Lauren has run the attached drafts past Mike Hicks and 
Pete Vandergam at Corp. Security for their views of whether this can be 
implemented by Enron.  We as the legal department have been asked to express 
our view on are the following:

(a) Are there any show stoppers that would argue that Enron should not 
publicly express its "endorsement" of these polices?
(b) If Enron were to express its endorsement of the policy statement, what if 
any material problems do you think your business line might encounter in 
implementing the policy?
(c) Do you see any unintended practical or legal consequences that might 
arise from Enron publicly adopting or endorsing this as policy?

Please take an hour few hours to read through the materials, or have one of 
your lawyers do so. You might need to consult with your operation personnel 
for their practical views as well.   I would be grateful if you could express 
any concerns you may see with the guidelines by November 7 (Wednesday) so 
that I can coordinate comments and get the responses out.   (The deadline for 
Enron and other companies to express their endorsement of the policy has been 
extended from the November 8 deadline expressed in the attached to November 
15. To allow time for Enron to deal with responses, we have been asked to get 
our feed back to Lauren by November 8 (Thursday).)

You cane-mail your comments or phone them to  me at 713-646-6309. If I get 
suffucient expressions of interest for a conference call by Monday, I will 
set up a call in number for Wednesday morning US. 

Thanks, I appreciate your views and comments.

 
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	10/26/2000 10:26 AM
		 
John, Rob and I have talked and   Rob would like you to take the lead on 
this.  Deborah, I need you to work  with  John S. to see how our 
international EES business (Europe, Mexico, etc.) might be   affected by this 
and whether we take this position.  I am sure Rob and JOhn will  have the 
history and expert opinion as to how this should be handled, and my guess is, 
this issue primarily affects EECC at this time.  Maybe one of the Apache 
lawyers can take the lead for the traditional EES business.   Rob will be in 
next week and then going out of town and I will pick up for him then. 
Lauren Goldblatt@ECT
10/25/2000 05:44 PM
Rob and Vicki:

Over the past few months we have participated in an initiative aimed at 
developing a voluntary set of guidelines governing human rights and security 
arrangements.   I would greatly appreciate your thoughts, review, and sign 
off on the guidelines.  

Should we agree to endorse the principles, we must send a letter to the U.S. 
State Department by November 8, 2000.     I have attached a fact sheet as 
well as the revised principles for your review.   

The principles and signatories will be announced by Madeline Albright and 
Secretary Robin Cook in November. 

Thank you for time and consideration on this.  Please do not hesitate to call 
with any questions.  I can be reached either by cell phone (917) 821-0724 or 
by  voicemail at 212-702-3916.

Best Regards, 

Lauren

 - corp_resp__20_Sept_[2].doc

We want the letter on Doyle and New Albany ASAP.  Is there any reason we 
would not do the joint defense agreement.

Mark

	"Al Kimball" <akimball@bracepatt.com>
	10/27/2000 02:08 PM
		 
Received this just now - will not reply until we have your thoughts.  Cle 
Dade  had a thought about mentioning the existing New Albany - Doyle units in 
our reply letter as well.  We are available at your convenience to discuss 
the New Albany - Doyle turbine situation vis-a-vis Power Systems - Al 

Our non-infringement opinion letters on the redesigned components have been 
ready now for over one week.  I understood your client was anxious to receive 
them, so we worked very hard to complete them as quickly as we could. 

Please forward to me the executed Joint Defense Agreement so that I can 
forward our non-infringement letters.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Trent

"WorldSecure Server <shb.com>" made the following
 annotations on 10/27/00 12:24:50
From the law offices of Shook,Hardy, Bacon LLP.

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE: This e-mail message including attachments, if any, is 
intended only for the person or entity to which it is addressed and may 
contain confidential and/or privileged material. Any unauthorized review, 
use, disclosure or distribution is prohibited.  If you are not the intended 
recipient, please contact the sender by reply e-mail and destroy all copies 
of the original message.  If you are the intended recipient but do not wish 
to receive communications through this medium, please so advise the sender 
immediately.

=============================================================================

These look fine.  Have them printed off for me to sign.  Mark

I think this is a detrimental reliance case or fraud.  I want to be 
aggressive on this.  Richard, please let me know what theory is best.  Do we 
have counsel for Washington?

Mark

	Christian Yoder
	10/27/2000 12:15 PM
		 
In the days immediately before the application for a price cap, Puget came to 
us and asked us to enter into several put options.  We did so. I am advised 
by the traders that if this price cap were to actually be in effect,  our put 
option transactions would not make sense for us economically and we would 
never have entered into them had we known of their intention to make this 
filing.   I am under some pressure  to explain two things:  (i) whether the 
fact that they knew they were going to file for the cap when they did the 
options is some kind of fraud, and (ii) whether the WSPP Agreement or our 
ISDA swap agreements have any clauses in them to address this kind of 
thing,ie. is this some kind of "illegality" issue?  I am working on the 
second issue and have discussed it with Mark Taylor, but on the first issue, 
I need advice from Richard and anyone else who can help.----cgy 
Mary Hain
10/27/2000 09:50 AM
Puget Sound has filed a complaint against all jurisdictional sellers of 
wholesale energy and/or capacity in the Pacific Northwest, including parties 
to WSPP agreement.  Puget Sound requests FERC to impose price cap on 
wholesale sales of energy and capacity in the Pacific Northwest equal to the 
lowest price cap "established, ordered, or permitted by the Commission for 
wholesale purchases by the Cal ISO or Cal PX . . . ."  Puget requests an 
effective date of December 25,2000.  

Thanks.   Mark

	Jordan Mintz
	10/27/2000 11:44 AM
		 
Mark (T.) and I have recently discussed our forwarding to ENA Legal our 
updated dealflow summaries so we can ensure that (1) legal coverage is being 
provided for the relevant transactions and (2) there is agreement that the 
"right" lawyers (both inside and outside) are being engaged.

Please feel free to distribute, as needed.  I previously provided Travis with 
a copy.
Let me know if you have any questions/comments.

Jordan
Darlene C Forsyth
10/27/2000 09:56 AM

I think it is a good experience.  Thanks.  Mark

	Travis McCullough
	10/25/2000 03:06 PM
		
I signed up for a day of interviews on November 4.

Travis McCullough

Mark: for your info.

Mark Haedicke
	Barbara Hanlon <BHANLON@isda.org>
	11/06/2000 10:21 AM
		 
Memo to Credit Derivatives Documentation Task Force:
We have arranged for meetings of the Credit Derivatives Documentation Task
Force to take place simultaneously in New York and London on Monday,
November 13, at 9:30 NY time/2:30 London time. The New York meeting will
take place at the offices of Chase Manhattan Bank, 270 Park Avenue, 11th
Floor, Room C. The London meeting will take place at the offices of Morgan
Stanley Dean Witter, 20 Cabot Square, Canary Wharf, London E14.  Please RSVP
to Barbara Hanlon at bhanlon@isda.org indicating at which location you will
be attending.
At each meeting, I will arrange for several individuals to present their
view on the Restructuring issue. There will then be an opportunity in each
meeting to ask questions of those individuals and for more general
discussion. We will then link the London and New York meetings by telephone
to share views between the meetings. 
This distribution list is drawn from participants in the documentation
process. The Restructuring issue, while focused on a term in the
documentation, is nevertheless one of market practice and not really one of
documentation. We, therefore, encourage you to ensure that the views of your
trading desk are expressed at the meeting, preferably by having someone from
the desk at the meeting. We expect a large number of people at the meetings,
however, so we also encourage you to consider who from your institution is
most critical to be in attendance to ensure that your views are heard. 
We look forward to hearing from you on the 13th. 

Bob Pickel

Mr. Robert Pickel
General Counsel
International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.
600 Fifth Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, New York 10020-2302
Phone: (212) 332-1200
Fax: (212) 332-1212
http://www.isda.org

Peter:

I asked Mark T to give you a call.  Legal questions on the financial confirms 
should be handled in Canada as the first option and secondly go to Houston.  
Please talk it through with Mark T to make sure that all works.  Should you 
and Mark T talk it through with the confirm desk in Canada to make sure it is 
clear?

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

	Sharon Crawford
	11/06/2000 10:17 AM
		 
SENT ON BEHALF OF PETER KEOHANE:

Please see attached e-mail from Rob Milnthorp.  What I believe he is 
referring to is documentation of financial (gas or power transactions).  
(i.e. All physical transactions, Confirms, GTC's, Masters, etc. are 
documented out of Calgary, all with the proper controls.)  Honestly, I am not 
clear on this point.  My understanding is that responsibility for financial 
trading for Canada is with Mark Taylor.  i.e. I understand that Confirms 
which do not require legal input have been moved to the Confirm group in 
Calgary, but Confirms which require legal input, ISDA Masters with Canadian 
counterparties, structured financial transactions, etc. remain with Mark 
Taylor, and that Calgary Legal is not, generally speaking, responsible for 
financial transactions.  I do not want to re-visit this issue, but merely 
clarify any confusion so that I can get back to Milnthorp.  I know that 
neither Greg Johnston, Mark Powell, Chris Gaffney nor I are seeing any 
financial trades.

Regards,
Peter

Rob Milnthorp
11/02/2000 03:01 PM
Peter, do we now have the proper controls and procedures re power confirms? 
If so, can you please explain them to me. I'm still confused following my 
discussions with Haedicke and his understanding via Mark Taylor. thanks, 
Greg Johnston
11/02/2000 02:01 PM
Please find attached the form of physical power GTC that may be used in 
conjunction with confirms for power deals of less than one year in duration.  
This is the standard form so it does not address market opening delays or 
changes in law affecting pricing.  Any provisions required to address these 
risks will need to be built into the confirms themselves as "Other 
Provisions".

Greg

No

=09Janette Elbertson
=0911/06/2000 09:58 AM
=09=09=20
Do you have any interest in attending this?

Janette Elbertson
=09Becky Spencer
=0911/03/2000 12:40 PM
=09=09=20
Please forward the following message from Sylvia Hu to your assignments in=
=20
case they may want to attend this training.  Thanks!-Becky
Dear Legal Folks:

Lexis CertiFinder is a new service that expands out of it's Public Records =
to=20
include driver's license, vehicle registration, and criminal records on=20
people.  Many of you came to the September presentation and have business=
=20
needs for the access.   We now have a Lexis CertiFinder flat rate contract =
in=20
place.  It is $42 per ID per month.   Please attend Lexis CertiFINDER=20
training in EB47C2 at 10:30 AM - 11:30 AM on Friday, 11/10/2000  or read=20
through the attached CertiFinder User's Guide.  If you plan to attend the=
=20
training, please RSVP to Sylvia x36775 by COB, Thursday, 11/9.  If you do=
=20
need the access, let me know and I'll request an ID for you.  =20

 =20

Thanks,
Sylvia Hu
Corporate and Law Information Services

Lexis-Nexis CertiFINDER Contents:

Each year, fraud costs companies billions of dollars. Now that you have the=
=20
LEXIS
c
-NEXIS
c
CertiFINDER=01v service, you can help protect your company=01,s bottom line=
 from=20
people who
provide misleading or inaccurate information. In fact, with this low-cost,=
=20
easy-to-use solution,
you can conduct research that will help you identify and manage corporate=
=20
risk faster and
more efficiently.
In less than 30 seconds, CertiFINDER navigates through millions of public=
=20
record documents
and relevant news articles to deliver a clearly organized, timely report=20
right to your desktop.*
CertiFINDER simplifies your research by enabling you to enter minimal=20
information (for
example, a name or address) and to search full-text documents (not just=20
headers) to retrieve
focused results on the person in question.
As a result, the CertiFINDER service is an ideal tool for:
=01=07 Verifying identities
=01=07 Uncovering aliases
=01=07 Establishing relationships between people and businesses or other=20
individuals
=01=07 Finding current or previous addresses, in addition to confirming rep=
orted=20
address dates
=01=07 Identifying financial distress via bankruptcies, judgments, and lien=
s
=01=07 Disclosing real and personal property ownership
CertiFINDER reports help you identify issues that suggest potential risk an=
d=20
when paired
with the LEXIS
c
-NEXIS
c
services, enable you to conduct more in-depth research within
other pertinent sources, such as company reports, financial filings, casela=
w,=20
industry regula-tions,
import/export records, etc. By reviewing this additional information, you c=
an=20
gain even
greater insight into risk variables.
To learn how simple it is to generate timely, targeted reports on an=20
individual using the
CertiFINDER service, consult the following pages.
* CertiFINDER reports run in 28 seconds on average vs. an average of two=20
minutes for DBT and one minute for ChoicePoint.
Based on internal studies conducted 4/3/00.
Distribution of displayed Social Security numbers retrieved from non-public=
=20
information is limited to a select group of pre-qualified
subscribers who go through a strict approval process and must be involved i=
n=20
law enforcement, federal investigation, or fortune
500/insurance companies with an investigative unit or department dedicated =
to=20
fraud investigation. SSNs retrieved from public record
databases such as bankruptcy filings and death records will display to all=
=20
LEXIS-NEXIS subscribers.

Thanks for the offer!  I think I am all set.  Mark

	SKramer@milbank.com
	11/06/2000 09:43 AM
		 
Mark, 
Please let me know if you need to use an office while you are in town for the 
Energy Bar conference.  If so, I can have an office reserved for you here -- 
we are only a few blocks from the Capitol Hilton, the hotel where the 
conference will take place.
Steve 
Steven M. Kramer 
Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP 
International Square Building 
1825 Eye Street, N.W. 
Washington, D.C. 20006 
TEL:  202-835-7508 
FAX:  202-835-7586 
skramer@milbank.com 

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential 
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee 
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended 
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited. 
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify 
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer. 

	"Baird, Bob" <RBaird@velaw.com>
	11/04/2000 09:33 PM
		 
Mark and Rob:

   I finally finished the highly scientific process of dividing up the
tickets.  The methodology I used is as follows:

   (1) We each ended up with one exhibition game.

   (2) The two of you expressed a preference for weekend nights.  There
are 12 Friday and Saturday games, so I gave each of you six.

   (3)  I tried to give you games where you will not be out of town
(although I ended up giving each of you one game where both of you will be
out of town).

   (4) I divided the teams into good teams (Trailblazers, Jazz, Heat,
Spurs, Lakers,  Knicks, Pacers and Sonics), medium teams (Timberwolves,
Hornets, Kings, 76ers, Cavaliers, Suns, Celtics and Nets) and bad teams
(Bulls, Pistons, Grizzlies, Wizards, Magic, Clippers, Mavericks, Bucks,
Nuggets, Warriors, Raptors and Hawks), and I tried to divide the teams so
that there was a realtively even distribution of team levels. Mark ended up
with 5-7-6, Rob with 6-3-9 and I ended up with 2-1-2.  Although Rob has one
more good team than Mark has, he get to see more dogs.  I am not 100%
certain that I have a good handle on whose going to be good, mediocre and
bad, and there were some teams that might be bad but I put in a medium
category because they are interesting (e.g. 76ers, Celtics and Nets).

   (5) Finally, I attempted to minimize the repeats.  But it ended up
that Mark has the Timberwolves and Grizzlies  twice, and Rob has the
Warriors and Nuggets twice.

   And, of course, if you don't like what I did you can always trade.
   
   This was a highly scientific process, done with the aid of Lotus
1-2-3.

Mark: please note that I have given you Tuesday night's tickets vs. the
Lakers.

Bob      
5   Tuesday, 11/14, Chicago Bulls   
12   Tuesday, 12/19, San Antonio Spurs   
15   Wednesday, 12/27, Seattle Supersonics   
16   Thursday, 1/4, Detroit Pistons   
33   Thursday, 3/15, New Jersey Nets   
      
Mark      
1   Tuesday, 10/31, Minnesota Timberwolves   
3   Tuesday, 11/7, Los Angeles Lakers   
4   Thursday, 11/9, Vancouver Grizzlies   
6   Thursday, 11/16, Charlotte Hornets   
8   Tuesday, 11/28, Sacramento Kings   
9   Saturday, 12/2, Portland Trailblazers   
17   Saturday, 1/6, Utah Jazz   
20   Wednesday, 1/24, Philadelphia 76ers   
21   Friday, 1/26, Vancouver Grizzlies   
22   Tuesday, 1/30, Miami Heat   
25   Tuesday, 2/13, Washington Wizards   
26   Saturday, 2/17, Cleveland Cavaliers   
28   Friday, 2/23, Orlando Magic   
30   Thursday, 3/8, Los Angeles Clippers   
34   Saturday, 3/17, San Antonio Spurs   
36   Thursday, 3/29, Phoenix Suns   
37   Tuesday, 4/3, Dallas Mavericks   
41   Tuesday, 4/17, Minnesota Timberwolves   
      
Rob      
2   Thursday, 11/2, Milwaukee Bucks   
7   Saturday, 11/18, Phoenix Suns   
10   Tuesday, 12/5, Dallas Mavericks   
11   Saturday, 12/16, Denver Nuggets   
13   Thursday, 12/21, Los Angeles Lakers   
14   Saturday, 12/23, Golden State Warriors   
18   Saturday, 1/13, Sacramento Kings   
19   Tuesday, 1/16, Toronto Raptors   
23   Thursday, 2/1, Los Angeles Clippers   
24   Monday, 2/5, New York Knicks   
27   Tuesday, 2/20, Boston Celtics   
29   Monday, 2/26, Portland Trailblazers   
31   Saturday, 3/10, Golden State Warriors   
32   Tuesday, 3/13, Indiana Pacers   
35   Tuesday, 3/27, Utah Jazz   
38   Thursday, 4/5, Seattle Supersonics   
39   Saturday, 4/7, Atlanta Hawks   
40   Tuesday, 4/10, Denver Nuggets   
      
      

Robert S. Baird
Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
One American Center
600 Congress
Austin, Texas 78701
Telephone: (512)495-8451
When calling from Houston (713)758-2414
Fax: (512)236-3210
Email: rbaird@velaw.com
Home telephone (512)347-8065
Home fax: (512)347-8065
Pager: 1-888-487-2651

          ++++++CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE+++++
The information in this email may be confidential and/or privileged.  This
email is intended to be reviewed by only the individual or organization
named above.  If you are not the intended recipient or an authorized
representative of the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any
review, dissemination or copying of this email and its attachments, if any,
or the information contained herein is prohibited.  If you have received
this email in error, please immediately notify the sender by return email
and delete this email from your system.  Thank You

Please see comments below.  Mark
	Michael A Robison
	11/03/2000 06:14 PM
		 
Mark:
I wanted to make sure this got to you.
Mike
EB3859
(713) 853-6667 DID
(713) 646-4842 FAX

	Michael A Robison
	11/03/2000 06:10 PM
		
Mark:
The attached email raises the following three questions with respect to 
Enron's endorsement and adoption of the attached statement of principles on 
Security and Human Rights and my response is noted after each question:
 Are there any show stoppers that would argue that Enron should not publicly 
express its "endorsement" of these polices? No.
If Enron were to express its endorsement of the policy statement, what if any 
material problems do you think your business line might encounter in 
implementing the policy?  Given the limited physical presence of EGM in 
foreign locations, I would not expect implementation to be a problem.
Do you see any unintended practical or legal consequences that might arise 
from Enron publicly adopting or endorsing this as policy?  The commitment 
under the "Consultation and Advice" section of the statement on "Interactions 
between Companies and Public Security" provides: "In their consultations with 
host governments, Companies should take all appropriate measures to promote 
adherence to international law enforcement standards, particularly those 
reflected in the U.N. Code of Conduct for Law Enforcement Officials and the 
U.N. Basic Principles on the Use of Force and Firearms."  I believe we should 
take note that "all appropriate measures" is very broad and could publicly be 
construed to mean an obligation to withdraw our operations from a particular 
country that fails to abide by these principles.
My response pertains only to the operations of Enron Global Markets.   I will 
be checking my emails while I am in Singapore and will be happy to address 
this further if you would like me to do so. 

Mike
EB3859
(713) 853-6667 DID
(713) 646-4842 FAX

	Mark E Haedicke
	11/03/2000 04:53 PM
		 
	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	11/02/2000 03:34 PM
		 
Rob has asked me to collect legal department views on the attached statement 
of principles regarding Security and Human Rights that Enron Corp is 
considering endorsing. These have been worked out over the past several 
months by a task force of the US and UK governments, along with 
representatives of industry (including Enron) and NGOs (including Amesty and 
Human Rights Watch) under the auspices of Secretary fo State Albright and 
Foreign Secretary Cook.  As a result, we really don't  have the ability to 
change the text, which is fixed. 

As you know, Enron is very concerned about human rights issues because of 
their intrinsic value and their community relations impacts.These guidelines 
would be in addition to the Human Rights Policy Statement the Enron board 
adopted last year, which really do not touch on security matters as such. I 
have sent this to each of your since your business units are those that have 
the most extensive operations in the developing countries in which these 
issues are of primary concern.  (I am separately collecting comments/concerns 
from within EES and EECC.)

The Enron effort on this guideline project has been lead by Lauren Goldblatt 
of the Corp. PR group. Lauren has run the attached drafts past Mike Hicks and 
Pete Vandergam at Corp. Security for their views of whether this can be 
implemented by Enron.  We as the legal department have been asked to express 
our view on are the following:

(a) Are there any show stoppers that would argue that Enron should not 
publicly express its "endorsement" of these polices?
(b) If Enron were to express its endorsement of the policy statement, what if 
any material problems do you think your business line might encounter in 
implementing the policy?
(c) Do you see any unintended practical or legal consequences that might 
arise from Enron publicly adopting or endorsing this as policy?

Please take an hour few hours to read through the materials, or have one of 
your lawyers do so. You might need to consult with your operation personnel 
for their practical views as well.   I would be grateful if you could express 
any concerns you may see with the guidelines by November 7 (Wednesday) so 
that I can coordinate comments and get the responses out.   (The deadline for 
Enron and other companies to express their endorsement of the policy has been 
extended from the November 8 deadline expressed in the attached to November 
15. To allow time for Enron to deal with responses, we have been asked to get 
our feed back to Lauren by November 8 (Thursday).)

You cane-mail your comments or phone them to  me at 713-646-6309. If I get 
suffucient expressions of interest for a conference call by Monday, I will 
set up a call in number for Wednesday morning US. 

Thanks, I appreciate your views and comments.

 
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	10/26/2000 10:26 AM
		 
John, Rob and I have talked and   Rob would like you to take the lead on 
this.  Deborah, I need you to work  with  John S. to see how our 
international EES business (Europe, Mexico, etc.) might be   affected by this 
and whether we take this position.  I am sure Rob and JOhn will  have the 
history and expert opinion as to how this should be handled, and my guess is, 
this issue primarily affects EECC at this time.  Maybe one of the Apache 
lawyers can take the lead for the traditional EES business.   Rob will be in 
next week and then going out of town and I will pick up for him then. 
Lauren Goldblatt@ECT
10/25/2000 05:44 PM
Rob and Vicki:

Over the past few months we have participated in an initiative aimed at 
developing a voluntary set of guidelines governing human rights and security 
arrangements.   I would greatly appreciate your thoughts, review, and sign 
off on the guidelines.  

Should we agree to endorse the principles, we must send a letter to the U.S. 
State Department by November 8, 2000.     I have attached a fact sheet as 
well as the revised principles for your review.   

The principles and signatories will be announced by Madeline Albright and 
Secretary Robin Cook in November. 

Thank you for time and consideration on this.  Please do not hesitate to call 
with any questions.  I can be reached either by cell phone (917) 821-0724 or 
by  voicemail at 212-702-3916.

Best Regards, 

Lauren

 - corp_resp__20_Sept_[2].doc

The top ten legal risk report for EGM is new.  It should help focus attention 
on the most significant legal risks.  Mark

	Jeffrey A Shankman
	10/23/2000 05:32 PM
		
I'll defer to you.  How does this supplement your reports now?

Mark E Haedicke
10/23/2000 04:38 PM
Mike and Jeff:

I am rethinking the legal reports.  Alan and I am preparing a monthly trading 
and transactional summary, a litigation report and the TOP TEN legal risk 
report.  To me the last two are the most important.  On a conceptual basis, 
is that what you need or want to see?

Mark

Fyi.  Does this impact on us?   Mark
Mark:

I thought you would find the attached blurb describing an effort in the UK to 
attempt to indirectly curb prices for generation of some interest in light of 
ENA's enhanced interest in building and owning peaker plants and the desire 
to capture profits particularly during times of electric market volatility 
(even though ENA's plants, unlike those of PowerGen and National Power, will 
constitute only a very small percentage of the generation market).  While I 
do not see this type of policy occurring in the U.S. I always think it is 
useful to keep an eye on developments like this, even if they exist outside 
the U.S., since many U.S regulators often look to the UK for "ideas" since it 
is further ahead in some respects on the deregulation curve.

John

*    U.K.:  REGULATOR'S PROPOSAL WOULD ALLOW CUSTOMERS TO SUE
      An offshoot of Dallas-based TXU, Edison Mission Energy and
 AES Corp. are three energy companies likely to be most affected
 by U.K. industry regulator Callum McCarthy's announcement
 yesterday that customers could be able to sue their suppliers
 for abusively raising prices.
      The measure is designed to safeguard potential price
 manipulation by generators until new electricity wholesale
 trading rules are introduced next year. McCarthy plans to add
 "good behavior" clauses to legislation proposed by the
 government last week and scheduled for discussion in parliament
 next month. And an independent advisory body would settle
 disputes between McCarthy and electric companies.
      Allegations from big industry customers that National Power
 and PowerGen abused their market power by raising prices in July
 spurred McCarthy's action. The company's combined profits were
 $21.7 million higher than profits during the same two weeks in
 1998.  The companies "strenuously deny" the charges of price
 manipulation (Andrew Taylor, Financial Times, Oct. 19).

Richard, please review and comment asap.  Mark

Dave:

I have prepared a first draft of a letter for your review.   Let me know if 
you want to make changes.

Regards,

Mark 

Elyse:

I like the first one a lot.  Could we do it for this Christmas?  I would hate 
to wait a whole year.  I also think the last one is a good idea.  Let me know 
what I can do to help.

Mark

	Elyse Kalmans@ENRON
	11/07/2000 04:10 PM
		 
Cindy and Mark:  The Community Relations team has brainstormed ways to 
support BEAR during the holiday season, specifically with their bike drive.  
One note,  Enron already adopts an entire needy Elementary School for the 
holiday seaso, and our employees adopt each child in the school by donating 
money, etc. to provide supplies and clothing for the children, so I am a bit 
concerned about another big employee drive during the holidays.  

However, we have a number of ideas that I will share below, knowing that it 
may take some time to schedule a meeting for the three of us:

1.  Partner with 104 KRBE to promote a Bike Drive in partnership with Sun & 
Ski Sports (one of KRBE's sponsors).  Enron could pay for the advertising 
dollars and Sun & Ski could get shoppers to make donations toward buying 
bikes.  Laura Schwartz is exploring KRBE's appetite for something like this.

2.  BEAR/CPS table at our December 1 Big E Cafe which highlights ways for 
employees can get involved throughout the community during the holidays.  
BEAR could use the opportunity to ask for donations as well as offer 
volunteer opportunities.

3.  Partner with the Enron Cycling Club to donate bikes - leverage their 
connections with local bike stores.  These employees might be more likely to 
want to donate.

2.  Utilize Matching Dollars (up to $15,000 per employee annually) if Mark or 
other employees are interested in contributing.  Additionally, if Mark or 
other employees volunteer with BEAR, using VIP dollars (up to $2500) to pay 
for bikes.

Please let me know your thoughts, so that we can pursue some of these 
opportunities.  

Elyse

I think you pose an interesting legal issue.  I believe there is caselaw on 
this in the states.  We have a variation on this in some agreements in that 
if exposure exceeds x, then collateral must be posted.  I will be interested 
in the responses you get.

Regards,

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	Sent by: Sharon Crawford
	11/07/2000 04:17 PM
		 
Mark, Rob Milnthorp has asked me to consider whether there is an artful way 
under our Master Agreements that upon certain occurrences we could elevate 
our exposure from unsecured to secured, particularly in circumstances where, 
for whatever reason, we have not received letters of credit or other 
collateral.  My thought is to insert a clause in our Master Agreements in the 
nature of a "floating charge".

The problem with this concept is that it may be resisted within the 
industry.  For example, certain counterparties, i.e. a financial institution 
or a near-financial institution, such as a bank, a brokerage, a trading 
institution, etc., would not likely be willing to provide us with security 
over their assets.  In general, counterparties will also have concerns with 
granting security over their assets, particularly as that security may have 
restricting consequences for their treasury/banking relationships and 
covenants, and/or on their ability to conduct business, including disposing 
of assets which may then require our consent.  In addition, it would likely 
be necessary to introduce this concept on a bilateral basis, such that it 
would also be binding on us in similar circumstances.  (Counterparties could 
go so far as requiring this concept in our Enron Corp. guarantees.)

For example, in the natural gas business in Canada at least, older form 
marketing agreements and agreements used by gas aggregators with gas 
producers used "reserved dedication" covenants, whereby reserves were 
dedicated to a particular contract.  These covenants did not, however, create 
security, to avoid the complicating issues addressed above.  To the extent 
that the reserves were not available, the marketer/aggregator could have a 
claim, on an unsecured basis, for breach of covenant, but was not in a 
secured position.  I do not believe we want to go to this type of concept.

However, we may be able to think of some creative way whereby the 
counterparty is free to deal with us (and we are free to deal with them) on 
an unsecured basis, subject to our standard collateralization requirements, 
but also provide that upon the occurrence of a particularly serious event, 
such as a Material Adverse Change, a Triggering Event, an Event of Default, 
etc., the security automatically takes place.  We would need to consider 
whether such a "prospective" security interest could be made to work and be 
enforceable.

I have discussed this concept on a preliminary basis with Rob Milnthorp and 
Mungo Hardwicke-Brown of the Blake firm to see if we could create a 
relatively simple clause to be inserted into our Master Agreements which 
artfully deals with this issue.  In essence, the idea would be to get 
ourselves in a position of being one step ahead of all of the unsecured 
creditors in the event there is an insolvency.

Would you please let me know whether you think this is a worthwhile project 
or whether we have considered such a thing in the past in Houston.  As noted 
above, the clause would have to be one that could be "sold" to counterparties 
and be acceptable to us on a bilateral basis (and that may well not be 
possible).  If you believe that it is a worthwhile project, I will continue 
to work with Mungo Hardwicke-Brown to see if we can come up with something.  
If you do not believe that it is a worthwhile project or have considered this 
idea in the past and found it to be unworkable, please let me know, and we 
will not work on it further.

Regards,
Peter

Pursuant to our discussions, attached is the Top Legal Risks report for ENA.

Janette

I am glad you enjoyed the game!  Please coordinate with Janette.  Mark

	John Viverito@ENRON
	11/08/2000 09:11 AM
		 
Mark-

Thanks for the opportunity to see the game last night.  I had a great time.  
I hope I have the opportunity to return the favor some time.

How about the Presidential election!  

With regard to the Consulting Services Agreement to be signed by John 
Lavorato, please inform me as to when you would like me to drop by to discuss.

Thanks,

John 

Phillippe:  Please convey to your people how important it is that they=20
monitor compliance with this policy and let me know about any violations. =
=20
Mark
=09Mark Frevert@ENRON
=09Sent by: Enron Announcements@ENRON
=0911/07/2000 09:44 PM
=09=09=20
As a reminder, ENA=01,s policy regarding retention of electronic mail, incl=
uding=20
Lotus Notes mail, Internet e-mail, cc:mail and voicemail is as follows:

Message Location    Maximum Retention

Inbox       30 Days
Message Log/Sent Mail   30 Days
Trash       Rollover from Inbox for 15 days
Bulletin Boards     30 Days
Folders/Archives    E-mails placed in Folders or Archives =01) one year
Voicemail     90 days

E-mail and voicemail older than the maximum retention will be purged=20
automatically by IT, which is responsible for monitoring compliance with th=
is=20
policy.  Any exception to this policy requires approval by Mark Haedicke or=
=20
Richard Sanders.

Mark Frevert and Mark Haedicke

It looks fine.  Mark

	Michelle Cash
	Sent by: Twanda Sweet
	11/08/2000 02:58 PM
		 
Below is an email to be sent to all attorneys/paralegals within ENA Legal.  
Please review and provide me with any comments.

Thanks.

Many of you have received requests for feedback through the Performance 
Evaluation Program ("PEP") system.  This feedback is used by the Performance 
Review Committee in conducting its evaluations and also is used in preparing 
the written performance reviews.

Please take the time to complete the forms and provide candid, accurate 
feedback when it is requested.

The deadline for completing evaluation forms is November 17th.

FYI
	David W Delainey
	10/20/2000 01:05 PM
		 
Mark, I am not completely sure what the other groups want to do; however, 
assuming a fixed amount of the "internal" legal costs are fairly represented 
by this allocation as ENA's "capacity" charge, you are correct.  This number 
will be in the P/L under your name.  The "outside" legal costs should be 
tracked and controlled and carried at the business unit (by deal) level.   I 
need an estimate of the quarterly "capacity charge" for ENA and an estimate 
of outside legal costs by business unit.

Regards
Delainey
Dave:

I have attached the "time allocations" (which are used for inside costs only) 
by attorney to the various business groups.  We can derive the percentage of 
total legal department inside costs from this chart, in order to calculate 
the capacity charge, for ENA and the other wholesale groups and ENW.  We had 
used this chart to bill back to the various business units within ENA, but we 
will stop doing that now per our conversation.  Are you in agreement? 

Mark
	Deb Korkmas
	10/20/2000 08:53 AM
		 
See attached per your request.  Deb

Deb Korkmas

See if you can fit her in.  Mark
Robin Decker@ENRON
10/22/99 11:46 AM
I am trying to arrange individual 30-minute meetings for Andrea Calo's 
Houston Trip.  She will be available Wednesday, October 27th, from 2:00p to 
6:00p and Thursday, October 28th, from 9:00a to 10:30a.  Would you please let 
me know if you have any time available to meet with her?

Thank you so much for your attention to this matter.  We apologize for the 
late notice.

Sincerely,

Robin Decker
Andrea Calo's Houston Assistant
(713) 853-1459
EB 3837a

I am still working on a Spanish speaking trading lawyer.  One should be 
available by December 15.    Mark

	Jaime Williams@ENRON
	11/07/2000 06:32 PM
		 
First of all, thank you very much for this last push. The list of pending 
issues with the Mexican counterparties has really come down in the last two 
weeks, and we really appreciate your efforts down here...You will find the 
status report on this file, which still needs some work to be done, but I 
believe now the ball is more on our customer's court than ours...Thanks again 
and we appreciate your continuing support. 

Kind regards. 

I think we need to watch this.  Mark

	Alan Aronowitz
	11/09/2000 09:10 AM
		 
FYI. David's role seems to be expanding at EA beyond Legal. I know Paul 
Quilkey has a lot of confidence in him.

Any thoughts, reactions?

Alan
	David Minns@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	11/02/2000 12:34 AM
		 
FYI, this note is pretty self explanatory. In essence I have assumed the 
primary responsibility for co-ordinating the commercial deal flow through the 
office.  
Paul Quilkey
17/10/2000 10:50 PM
As Enron Australia continue to develop there is a need to constantly review 
and refine operational procedures and responsibilities.

Enron's senior staff meeting on Monday has been created as the primary forum 
to discuss and promote the commercial initiatives of our entire operations.  
These meetings are mandatory for all Director and equivalent level staff 
within the organisation across all Enron companies in Australia.  The 
meetings will be held in the boardroom at 4.30PM on each Monday (or Tuesday 
in case of holiday).  Accordingly, I encourage you to avoid scheduling any 
conflicts with this timing.
The first meeting will be held on Monday 30 October.

David Minns will play a central role to the coordination of the commercial 
activities of this group.  Please supply David with a list of your group's 
major deal initiatives should you intend to be absent from this meeting.  In 
David's absence please provide me with this list should you be unable to 
attend this meeting in person or not be in a position to dial in to the 
meeting. 

In addition, Heidi Mason will assume greater responsibility for coordinating 
support resources throughout office.  All administrative staff will report to 
Heidi in addition to their current direct report.

The assumption of greater coordinating responsibility for David and Heidi is 
designed to maximise the amount of effort each Director is expending on 
direct commercial activities as well as increasing efforts to maximise 
existing resources and cross-commodity deal opportunities.

A general office email will be sent advising of this initiative.  This email 
will also incorporate explicit comment on reporting and expense obligations.  

Your cooperation in supporting this initiative is appreciated.

Jon:

Thanks!  I will be in London for the ISDA meeting in mid-January.  See you 
then!

Regards,

Mark

	Jon Chapman
	11/09/2000 03:18 AM
		 
Mark

Many congratulations on your new role as General Counsel with EWS - I wish 
you every success in it in the future .

Hope to see you before too long .

Best wishes.

Jon

Thanks Gareth!  Hope things are going well.

Mark

Thanks Bob!   Mark

	Robert Bruce@ENRON
	Sent by: Robert Bruce@ENRON
	11/07/2000 11:29 AM
		 
Today I gave a presentation to the originators and traders in Gary 
Hickerson's ag group, including a proposal of control procedures for 
compliance with ag option restrictions.  Gary was not present, but the 
procedures were well received by the group, who felt that they were practical 
and could be complied with.

Attached is an outline of the presentation, including the proposed 
procedures.  -- Bob

Robert E. Bruce
Senior Counsel

 The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of October 15, 2000.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions. 

 Please let me know if you have any questions.

Many of you have received requests for feedback through the Performance 
Evaluation Program ("PEP") system.  This feedback is used by the Performance 
Review Committee in conducting its evaluations and also is used in preparing 
the written performance reviews.

Please take the time to complete the forms and provide candid, accurate 
feedback when it is requested.

The deadline for completing evaluation forms is November 17th.

Mark Haedicke and Michelle Cash

Please register me for the flu vaccine.  My cost center is 105655 and my 
company number is 413.  My extension is 36544.

Thank you.

Jordan:  Travis is going to give you a call about keeping up to speed on some 
of the year end deals.  Would it make sense for Travis or someone else to 
attend any of your staff meetings?  Or maybe you could attend ours or both.  
Let me know what you think.

Mark  

	Jordan Mintz
	Sent by: Darlene C Forsyth
	11/15/2000 07:27 PM
		 
Attached is our updated EGF-Legal Dealflow sheet for your review and use..  
Please let me know if you have any questions or comments.

Thanks,
Jordan

Paul:=20

Is this resolved?  Let me know if we need to discuss further.

Mark

=09Paul Simons
=0911/16/2000 11:24 AM
=09=09=20
Mark

Further to my voicemail, I attach the string of emails which highlights the=
=20
concern relating to personal trading by Enron staff (please see section VII=
 -=20
Miscellaneous - Employee Trading).

I appreciate you are tied up at a management conference, but if you could=
=20
possibly get word to me on who I should speak to to resolve this, I would b=
e=20
very grateful.  Many thanks

Paul
207 783 6566

The answer on question 1, according to our usual interpretation, is yes - y=
ou=20
may trade equities.
The answer on question 2, according to our usual interpretation, is no - yo=
u=20
should not trade Brent Futures.
Ted

David Redmond
11/13/2000 08:21 AM
Mark,

I am not sure I follow this but I will attempt to present my interpretation=
=20
of your note.

I am only restrained from trading those items in clause one if I am=20
responsible for trading them at Enron, and "equities" falls under=20
"securities" in clause one.
"Equities" fall under clause one and are therefore not included in clause=
=20
two. Therefore, since I do not trade equities for Enron, I can trade them o=
n=20
my personal account.

Brent Crude futures, I would argue, are "financial instruments," included i=
n=20
clause one. I am not responsible for trading them for Enron. If they fall=
=20
under clause one they are not included in clause two. Does this mean, since=
=20
they are not in clause two and I do not trade them for Enron, I can trade=
=20
them on my personal account?

Perhaps you could give me a call, +44 207 783 4928.

Thank you,

Dave

This issue was much easier when all we traded were energy commodities,=20
interest rates and currencies. The older versions of the policy provided th=
at=20
no Enron employee may trade any energy commodity for the account of anyone=
=20
other than Enron.  Beyond that, no Enron employee could trade a commodity=
=20
which was within their area of responsibility.  For example, I was not=20
permitted to trade natural gas futures for my own account but, since intere=
st=20
rates and currencies are not within my area of responsibility, I could trad=
e=20
them.  As the scope of our trading activities expanded it became more=20
difficult to identify the scope of the company's concern, much less to=20
articulate it.  We did however take a stab at it and the result is below. =
=20
This may be an area which could stand some clarification in the next versio=
n=20
of the Policy. =20

For now, I would suggest that the term "security" highlighted below should =
be=20
read to include equities and therefore not one of the commodities covered i=
n=20
the second numbered clause (i.e. the word "other" refers to items other tha=
n=20
those listed in clause (i)).  The result is that an Enron employee who does=
=20
not trade financial instruments, securities, financial assets or liabilitie=
s=20
for Enron may trade them for his or her own personal account.  To take this=
 a=20
step further, one could argue that an employee who trades the equities of=
=20
energy companies for Enron should not trade energy company equities for his=
=20
or her own account but could trade other equities - if it were me, I would=
=20
certainly make sure that Ted Murphy agreed with my analysis before I did it=
. =20
Of course, a wide variety of commodities remain clearly off limits for=20
personal trading - metals, ag commodities, bandwidth, freight, lumber, amon=
g=20
many others - for all employees.  As I remember it, this was done purposely=
=20
and if anyone disagrees with the scope of the policy they would be wise to=
=20
discuss the matter with the RAC Group as they make suggestions for Policy=
=20
revisions to the Enron Corp. board.

Employee Trading.  No employee of any Enron Business Unit may engage in the=
=20
trading of any Position for the benefit of any party other than an Enron=20
Business Unit (whether for their own account or for the account of any thir=
d=20
party) where such Position relates to (i) any financial instrument, securit=
y,=20
financial asset or liability which falls within such employee=01,s=20
responsibility at an Enron Business Unit or (ii) any other commodity,=20
included in any Commodity Group.

=09Cassandra Schultz@ENRON
=0911/08/2000 08:32 AM
=09=09=20
Mark - would you please clarify this issue for us?

Thank you,
Cassandra Schultz.

David Redmond@ECT
11/08/2000 03:05 AM
Cassandra,

Richard asked me to review this document before the traders on the UK Gas=
=20
Desk would sign it.

The UK gas desk adheres to all the risk management requirements of this=20
document. However, in Section VII , Miscellaneous, Employee Trading, the=20
document would appear to prevent any of us trading equities (amongst other=
=20
commodities) on our personal account as Equity Trading is a Commodity Group=
.=20
We are unsure if this is the aim of this agreement.

We have asked our compliance officer, Paul Simons to clarify the impact of=
=20
this clause for us.

We are not ignoring the document, we are waiting for clarification.

Thank you,

David Redmond

Sheila Tweed or Dale Rasmussen.  Mark

Mark:

I think the "Welcome" is great and have no changes.  Janette is sending you 
the org chart I want to use.  
Thanks!

Mark Haedicke

	Mark Greenberg@ENRON
	11/21/2000 08:03 AM
		 
Mark -

I have been charting the progress of the website.  It appears to be moving 
along very well.  We hit a few snags on some of the data base issues, but 
have cleaned them up for now. 

In order to finalize a couple of areas I need to get from you any comments 
you may have on the "Welcome" information I previously forwarded, another 
copy of which I have attached below.  I also need to get from either you or 
Janette the version of the organization chart you want to have initially on 
the site.  

I have a meeting later today with the IT group working on the project.  I 
will give you a further update on the project after that meeting.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

Thanks Bob.   Mark

	Robert Bruce@ENRON
	Sent by: Robert Bruce@ENRON
	11/20/2000 06:13 PM
		 
(1) I presume references to the "ENA Legal Department" should remain as such 
and not be changed to the "Enron Wholesale Services Legal Department."  fyi, 
in the revised policy, ENA remains as a defined entity in that it is listed 
as a member of the "Group."yes

The Resource Group, as we last discussed it, is composed of the following: 
Dave Delainey, Mark Frevert, Julie Gomez, Steve Kean, John Lavorato, Mike 
McConnell, Michael L. Miller, Jeff Shankman, Rick Shapiro, John Sherriff and 
Greg Whalley.

(2) Should Jeff McMahon (CEO of Enron Industrial Markets) be added?yes

(3) Should Ray Bowen (COO of Enron Industrial Markets) be added?yes

(4) Should Louise Kitchen (CEO of Enron Net Works) be added?yes

Once the Resource Group is finalized and the policy is ready to go out, I 
will prepare for your review a very brief  memo (2 or 3 sentences) to each 
person on the group notifying them that they have been designated to the 
group per the new policy, which is revised to reflect the new Enron Wholesale 
Services structure.

Please reply with your thoughts.  Thanks -- Bob

Robert E. Bruce
Senior Counsel

Thanks Jordan.  Mark

	Jordan Mintz
	11/20/2000 02:55 PM
		
Mark: Travis and I have been meeting fairly regularly.  I would enjoy 
attending your staff meetings but have a conflict with Andy's.  Let's see if 
Travis and I can firm something up for now through the end of the year to 
ensure "real time" communications regarding dealflow.  We intend to meet 
later today around 5pm.

Jordan

Please print out and put in my QLR binder.  Mark
	Peter Keohane
	Sent by: Sharon Crawford
	11/20/2000 11:51 AM
		 
Mark, for the Quarterly Legal Review (tomorrow 8:00 a.m. Calgary, 9:00 a.m. 
Houston, 10:00 a.m. Toronto), I attach the following, which you may want to 
speak to:

1. current Enron Canada Legal Status Report;
2. Enron Canada Outside Legal Fees - 2000 Report; and
3. Enron Canada Legal Budget - 2000 and 2001 (salaries and outside legal 
expenses only).

Regards,
Peter

no problema

	Jeffrey T Hodge
	11/20/2000 09:46 AM
		 
Mark:

I am planning on taking Wednesday, November 22, as a vacation day unless you 
have great concerns about that.

Jeff

Please review and give me your brief thoughts on this.  Mark
=09Stephen R Horn
=0911/19/2000 04:22 PM
=09=09=20
Mark,

The Austin Ventures people in Austin who have invested in eLaw have had the=
se=20
people contact me.  Curious for your perspective of the business plan in th=
e=20
attached Executive summary  which I exerpted the following:=20

eLaw is partnering with some of the worlds leading law firms to build=20
comprehensive databases of proprietary legal analysis and work product that=
=20
are accessible online by attorneys. =20

By leveraging quality, branded work product -- including agreement forms,=
=20
briefs, memoranda, pleadings and checklists =01) to a much wider audience t=
han=20
has previously been accomplished, eLaw is creating profound new economies o=
f=20
scale in the area where a majority of attorneys spend most of their billabl=
e=20
time: legal research and document drafting of transaction and litigation=20
oriented material.  By using material in the eLaw libraries, eLaw users can=
:
? Accelerate the research and drafting process by directly accessing a volu=
me=20
and quality of materials that have previously been available only within=20
large law firms
? Increase productivity and efficiency and avoid =01&reinventing the wheel=
=018 (or=20
paying outside counsel to do so), saving hundreds of dollars per hour
? Reduce fees paid to outside law firms by in-house counsel=20

Would you please give me a call when you have had a chance to review.

Thanks,=20

Steve Horn

Sandra Jimenez <Sjimenez@elaw.com> on 11/16/2000 08:39:42 PM

Dear Mr. Horn:

Several weeks ago Chris Pacitti, of Austin Ventures, gave me your name as
someone who might be interested in learning more about eLaw.com. I have
attached an executive overview of our business for your review and would
appreciate speaking with you about the business opportunity. I will call yo=
u
next week to schedule a mutually agreeable time to speak. I will call you a=
t
713-853-4520. If your phone number is different than the one Chris gave me,
please let me know.

Thank you in advance for your interest and I look forward to speaking with
you soon.

Sandra Jimenez
CEO
sjimenez@elaw.com
Phone: 512-493-3581
Fax: 512-257-7246

 <<Execsumm 11-15-00fin.doc>>

 - Execsumm 11-15-00fin.doc

Thanks Bruce.  Have a great Thanksgiving!

Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	Sent by: Wendi Hoelscher@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	11/21/2000 12:49 PM
		 
Mark:

I am out of the office today but am working with some folks to put together a 
draft global assets org chart.  While South America and India did not provide 
an org chart, they did provide a list of attorneys with some reporting 
information.  We will forward that back to them today in the form of an org 
chart and allow them to comment.  I will copy you on what I send out.

Bruce

Please see the review below, which I agree with.  Mark Greenberg is my elaw=
=20
expert.  Mark
=09Mark Greenberg@ENRON
=0911/22/2000 08:06 AM
=09=09
Mark -

I reviewed the information below and the current functionality of the=20
website.  Basically, eLaw is a shopping center for legal information. =20
Currently only information related to Labor & Employment is available, but=
=20
construction efforts are focused on many other areas including Antitrust,=
=20
Corporate Securities, E-Commerce, Environmental and Intellectual Property. =
=20

Since it is a shopping center, it basically works like any other shopping=
=20
site.  You search for the information you want, whether it is an article,=
=20
legal brief or form document related to the desired topic.  Once you find=
=20
something you want, you move it to your "Briefcase" (or shopping cart) and=
=20
continue searching.  Once you have finished searching, you go to the check=
=20
out screen and, after checking out, down load the information, via e-mail, =
to=20
your computer.

As with the legal education site I have been looking at, the central questi=
on=20
is the integrity of the information.  Though it may have been developed by =
a=20
reputable source (e.g., Baker & Botts, Baker Hostetler, etc.), concerns as =
to=20
age, reliability, and specifically direct applicability, would always=20
prevail.  The information would be useful as a base or building block, but=
=20
there may be additional work to do in order to verify the information or=20
tailor it to the specific need (especially if the need has specific=20
jurisdiction requirements).

I would be more than happy to further review the product if you wanted to=
=20
pursue it.  However, as I indicated, usefulness at this time may be somewha=
t=20
limited given the limited topic areas covered.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

=09Mark E Haedicke@ECT
=0911/21/2000 11:39 AM
=09=09=20
Please review and give me your brief thoughts on this.  Mark
=09Stephen R Horn
=0911/19/2000 04:22 PM
=09=09=20
Mark,

The Austin Ventures people in Austin who have invested in eLaw have had the=
se=20
people contact me.  Curious for your perspective of the business plan in th=
e=20
attached Executive summary  which I exerpted the following:=20

eLaw is partnering with some of the worlds leading law firms to build=20
comprehensive databases of proprietary legal analysis and work product that=
=20
are accessible online by attorneys. =20

By leveraging quality, branded work product -- including agreement forms,=
=20
briefs, memoranda, pleadings and checklists =01) to a much wider audience t=
han=20
has previously been accomplished, eLaw is creating profound new economies o=
f=20
scale in the area where a majority of attorneys spend most of their billabl=
e=20
time: legal research and document drafting of transaction and litigation=20
oriented material.  By using material in the eLaw libraries, eLaw users can=
:
? Accelerate the research and drafting process by directly accessing a volu=
me=20
and quality of materials that have previously been available only within=20
large law firms
? Increase productivity and efficiency and avoid =01&reinventing the wheel=
=018 (or=20
paying outside counsel to do so), saving hundreds of dollars per hour
? Reduce fees paid to outside law firms by in-house counsel=20

Would you please give me a call when you have had a chance to review.

Thanks,=20

Steve Horn

Sandra Jimenez <Sjimenez@elaw.com> on 11/16/2000 08:39:42 PM

Dear Mr. Horn:

Several weeks ago Chris Pacitti, of Austin Ventures, gave me your name as
someone who might be interested in learning more about eLaw.com. I have
attached an executive overview of our business for your review and would
appreciate speaking with you about the business opportunity. I will call yo=
u
next week to schedule a mutually agreeable time to speak. I will call you a=
t
713-853-4520. If your phone number is different than the one Chris gave me,
please let me know.

Thank you in advance for your interest and I look forward to speaking with
you soon.

Sandra Jimenez
CEO
sjimenez@elaw.com
Phone: 512-493-3581
Fax: 512-257-7246

 <<Execsumm 11-15-00fin.doc>>

 - Execsumm 11-15-00fin.doc

Thanks for the chart.  Let's get together next Monday and talk through.  

Regards,

Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	Sent by: Wendi Hoelscher@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	11/21/2000 03:43 PM
		 
Randy/Sandeep:

I'm attaching a first stab at an org chart for the Enron Global Assets legal 
group.  Mark Haedicke's preliminary thought is that all international region 
attorneys will initially be put in Global Assets.  Over time, we can review 
this allocation.

I understand that some international lawyers are currently doing EBS and EES 
type work.  However, unless Vicky Sharp or Kristina Mordaunt has these 
lawyers on their respective headcounts, we need to get them included in Enron 
Wholesale.

I'm sure that the chart is not yet accurate.  I'm out of the office today and 
we did not have time to track down each lawyer's current title.  I would 
appreciate your help in this regard.  All other comments are welcome as 
well.  

Thanks for your assistance.

Bruce

John:  I would like to go over the work your firm is doing for us.  I will 
ask my assistant to give you a call and set up a meeting.

Happy Thanksgiving!

Mark

	"Keffer, John" <JKeffer@KSLAW.com>
	11/22/2000 11:09 AM
		 
Mark-as a result of the latest reorganization of Enron, there are a number
of projects that King & Spalding's Houston office is working on that now
fall within your area of responsibility.  I'd like to have the opportunity
to meet with you to explain what we are doing, and to bring you up to date
on the growth of our Houston office.  Would a meeting in the next week or so
fit your schedule?  My assistant (Carmen Schnur) keeps my calendar, so if
your assistant want to contact her to coordinate, that would work well.

I take this opportunity to wish you a Happy Thanksgiving.

Regards

John L. Keffer
King & Spalding
713 751 3255
713 751 3280 (fax)
jkeffer@kslaw.com

                    Confidentiality Notice
This message is being sent by or on behalf of a lawyer.  It is intended 
exclusively for the individual or entity to which it is addressed.  This 
communication may contain information that is proprietary, privileged or 
confidential or otherwise legally exempt from disclosure.  If you are not the 
named addressee, you are not authorized to read, print, retain, copy or 
disseminate this message or any part of it.  If you have received this 
message in error, please notify the sender immediately by e-mail and delete 
all copies of the message.

Let's try again in two weeks.  Mark

Peter:

I think your collective e-mails constitute the legal risk memo.  What do you 
think the legal risk rating ought to be?

Regards,

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	11/22/2000 10:28 AM
		 
Mark, thanks for the voice mail.  In terms of a risk memo, I agree that one 
should not be necessary as in many respects this can be characterized as 
normal course trading within position limits under a standardized Master 
Agreement and without an outlay of capital, but hopefully the following 
(together with my memo from last night - copy attached) suffices to the 
extent a risk memo is required.

In terms of unusual risks:

1.  We do not have any rights to collateral under the proposed Master.  
However, the counterparty is the Balancing Pool which is essentially 
Government of Alberta credit risk.  Derek Davies is I believe dealing with 
Credit to resolve credit issues.  In fact, I believe the Balancing Pool is 
taking significant risk as it is selling the power firm under a Master which 
does not match up to the interruptible nature of the PPAs it holds.

2.  The Balancing Pool will be secured under the Master by a parental 
guarantee of Enron Corp. and has a somewhat discretionary right to call for 
collateral from us under the Master if there is a material change in Enron 
Corp.'s creditworthiness.

3.  It is a requirement of the auction that we will have entered into 
back-to-back physical hedges for 70% of the volume we acquire, and we are 
currently working at putting those deals in place conditional on us bidding 
and being successful in the auction.  Penalties can be imposed if 70% of the 
volume purchased is not properly hedged.

4.  As we are dealing with the Government of Alberta, we always run the risk 
(as we are somewhat seeing now with respect to the Sundance PPA we acquired 
in the first auction) that they can change the auction rules, the market 
rules or the legislation in ways that are adverse to us.  In terms of the 
auction rules, as with the first auction, they could be better drafted, but 
our fundamental concern will be to make sure that it is clear that if we post 
a bid deposit and do not bid that we get the deposit back, and to ensure that 
the rules are clear enough that we are comfortable that we are in complete 
control of whether or not we can comply with the rules.

Peter.

(Milly, sorry for not copying you on my first memo - see below.)

Mark, as I have mentioned to you the Plan B Alberta Power Auction is 
scheduled for Nov 29/00, under which Enron Canada can purchase for one-year 
terms, in each of three successive years, up to approximately 300MW/year #1;  
130MW/year #2; and 65MW/year #3, of the unsold PPA capacity that reverted 
back to the Balancing Pool of Alberta following the first auction last 
August.  The bid qualification documentation needs to be in Friday and US 
Thanksgiving is Thursday/Friday.  I wanted you to be aware of this, and 
determine from you if any corporate approvals need to be obtained.

Firstly, Derek Davies/John Zufferli will only be bidding to the extent 
authorized by Lavo.

Secondly, bid qualification commits us to the rules of the auction, the forms 
of documentation to govern both the auction and the purchase if we are 
successful, and requires a bid deposit (approximately C$6.5MM), but does not 
obligate us to bid and, provided we comply with the auction rules, the Bid 
Deposit will be returned after the auction.

Thirdly, unlike the PPA auction the risks are much less significant in terms 
of volume and term.  In terms of documentation, if we are the successful 
bidder, we will be buying power from the Balancing Pool under a physical 
Master, which seems to be a Canadianized version of the EEI Master and which, 
although not entirely to our liking, is generally satisfactory.

Fourthly, the position will, I understand, be managed in the power trading 
book within approved position limits.  Note:  The nominal amounts owing (i.e. 
no up front payment is required) on an unhedged basis for the entire 300MWs 
in year #1 would be something like C$260MM, assuming a C$100/MW purchase 
price.  Year #2 would be C$114MM and year #3 would be C$57MM.

Given the nature of the transaction, the short time that we have with US 
Thanksgiving intervening, and numerous other demands, I do not believe that a 
DASH, Risk Memo and/or Board Approval is necessary, but please let me know.

I will leave you a brief voice mail to follow-up.

Peter.

FYI
	Mark E Haedicke
	11/22/2000 11:56 AM
		
Peter:

I think your collective e-mails constitute the legal risk memo.  What do you 
think the legal risk rating ought to be?

Regards,

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	11/22/2000 10:28 AM
		 
Mark, thanks for the voice mail.  In terms of a risk memo, I agree that one 
should not be necessary as in many respects this can be characterized as 
normal course trading within position limits under a standardized Master 
Agreement and without an outlay of capital, but hopefully the following 
(together with my memo from last night - copy attached) suffices to the 
extent a risk memo is required.

In terms of unusual risks:

1.  We do not have any rights to collateral under the proposed Master.  
However, the counterparty is the Balancing Pool which is essentially 
Government of Alberta credit risk.  Derek Davies is I believe dealing with 
Credit to resolve credit issues.  In fact, I believe the Balancing Pool is 
taking significant risk as it is selling the power firm under a Master which 
does not match up to the interruptible nature of the PPAs it holds.

2.  The Balancing Pool will be secured under the Master by a parental 
guarantee of Enron Corp. and has a somewhat discretionary right to call for 
collateral from us under the Master if there is a material change in Enron 
Corp.'s creditworthiness.

3.  It is a requirement of the auction that we will have entered into 
back-to-back physical hedges for 70% of the volume we acquire, and we are 
currently working at putting those deals in place conditional on us bidding 
and being successful in the auction.  Penalties can be imposed if 70% of the 
volume purchased is not properly hedged.

4.  As we are dealing with the Government of Alberta, we always run the risk 
(as we are somewhat seeing now with respect to the Sundance PPA we acquired 
in the first auction) that they can change the auction rules, the market 
rules or the legislation in ways that are adverse to us.  In terms of the 
auction rules, as with the first auction, they could be better drafted, but 
our fundamental concern will be to make sure that it is clear that if we post 
a bid deposit and do not bid that we get the deposit back, and to ensure that 
the rules are clear enough that we are comfortable that we are in complete 
control of whether or not we can comply with the rules.

Peter.

(Milly, sorry for not copying you on my first memo - see below.)

Mark, as I have mentioned to you the Plan B Alberta Power Auction is 
scheduled for Nov 29/00, under which Enron Canada can purchase for one-year 
terms, in each of three successive years, up to approximately 300MW/year #1;  
130MW/year #2; and 65MW/year #3, of the unsold PPA capacity that reverted 
back to the Balancing Pool of Alberta following the first auction last 
August.  The bid qualification documentation needs to be in Friday and US 
Thanksgiving is Thursday/Friday.  I wanted you to be aware of this, and 
determine from you if any corporate approvals need to be obtained.

Firstly, Derek Davies/John Zufferli will only be bidding to the extent 
authorized by Lavo.

Secondly, bid qualification commits us to the rules of the auction, the forms 
of documentation to govern both the auction and the purchase if we are 
successful, and requires a bid deposit (approximately C$6.5MM), but does not 
obligate us to bid and, provided we comply with the auction rules, the Bid 
Deposit will be returned after the auction.

Thirdly, unlike the PPA auction the risks are much less significant in terms 
of volume and term.  In terms of documentation, if we are the successful 
bidder, we will be buying power from the Balancing Pool under a physical 
Master, which seems to be a Canadianized version of the EEI Master and which, 
although not entirely to our liking, is generally satisfactory.

Fourthly, the position will, I understand, be managed in the power trading 
book within approved position limits.  Note:  The nominal amounts owing (i.e. 
no up front payment is required) on an unhedged basis for the entire 300MWs 
in year #1 would be something like C$260MM, assuming a C$100/MW purchase 
price.  Year #2 would be C$114MM and year #3 would be C$57MM.

Given the nature of the transaction, the short time that we have with US 
Thanksgiving intervening, and numerous other demands, I do not believe that a 
DASH, Risk Memo and/or Board Approval is necessary, but please let me know.

I will leave you a brief voice mail to follow-up.

Peter.

Please review this memo and leave me a voice mail on the status.  Are we 
making changes suggested by our Mexican lawyers?  Mark
	"Weiland, William" <wweiland@velaw.com>
	11/21/2000 03:29 PM
		 
Peggy Banczak called me yesterday to say that the Inter-American Development
Bank ("IADB") had indicated its refusal to fund its loan to the appropriate
ENE borrower in connection with the Enron-Vitro Monterry Cogeneration
Project ("Project") unless the PPA(s) (and construction contracts?), i.e.,
those contracts to be concluded between Mexican entities and calling for
performance in Mexico, be governed by Mexican law.  Peggy explained that
after long negotiation, ENE had been able to convince Vitro and Cementos
Apasco (and other power purchasers/construction companies?) to agree that
their contracts be governed by New York law but that despite this great
success, IADB now for policy reasons was insisting that those contracts be
governed by Mexican law.

Peggy and I talked with Rogelio Lopez-Velarde and Peggy subsequently
provided me copies of three memoranda dated August 15, September 18 and
September 27, 2000, addressed to Peggy and Robert Stephens of Bracewell &
Patterson from Rogelio Lopez-Velarde and Amanada Valdez.  In the August 15,
2000, memorandum Rogelio and Ms. Valdez analyzed the enforceability of
certain of the provisions of the PPA between Enron Energia Industrial de
Mexico, S. de R.L. de C.V. and Apasco should that agreement be governed by
Mexican law.  They recommended certain changes be made if the agreement were
to be governed by Mexican law.  In the September 18, 2000, memorandum
Rogelio and Ms. Valdez gave their opinion on the enforceability of the
"Suspension Remedy" contained in Section 13.5 of the PPA.  In their
memorandum of September 27, 2000, they opined principally that the provision
of Section 13.6 of the PPA specifically denying each "Capacity User" the
right to terminate the PPA except in the case of a "Producer Event of
Default under Section 132(a) (sic) has occurred and the Project has been
Abandoned" was unenforceable.  I have reviewed the three memoranda but I
have not reviewed the PPA nor any of the other underlying Project documents.

As Joe Dilg mentioned to you before we undertook last week our limited
review of the Enron-Vitro Amparo matter, we are not Mexican lawyers and
therefore we cannot opine on the Lopez Velarde, Heftye, Abogados memoranda
and opinions referenced above and we cannot opine on how the application of
Mexican law to disputes that could arise under agreements the IADB now
insists be governed by Mexican law might affect the enforceability of
provisions of those agreements or the agreements themselves.  

I consider the memoranda provided by the Lopez Velarde, Heftye, Abogados
firm, however, to be well reasoned and written.  As I have not seen the
underlying documents, I am not able to determine whether the August 15,
2000, memorandum addresses all of what the drafters characterize as the
"Challengeable Clauses" in the PPA in Section I.2.A.  My guess is that the
form from which the PPA has been developed is a form that ENE has used on
other occasions in circumstances that would permit the agreements to be
governed by laws of jurisdictions that have experience considering
sophisticated commercial disputes at a minimum and perhaps disputes
specifically arising under power purchase agreements.  If ENE does agree to
subject interpretation of the PPA and other affected contracts to Mexican
law, it would be worthwhile to again review the PPA and other affected
agreements to be absolutely sure that all of the "Challengable Clauses" are
identified and either changed in a manner acceptable to ENE to make them
enforceable or if not changed that the risks of leaving the provisions "as
is"  are fully understood and evaluated by ENE.  I do have the following
specific comments concerning the August 15, 2000, memorandum:

   1.   If they already have not been made, is it possible still to
convince the Mexican counter parties to make the changes Lopez Velarde,
Hefty, Abogados have suggested?  Based on the Lopez Velarde, Hefty, Abogados
memos, it seems to me that  ENE, as a condition to agreeing to accept
Mexican law as the governing law, would want to negotiate at least the
material changes to the PPA suggested by the Lopez Velarde, Heftye, Abogados
firm in the memoranda.

   2.   If it is not possible to negotiate the changes or is
possible only to negotiate some of the changes, with respect to the
"Discretionary Performance Prohibition" and the "Discretionary Condition
Prohibition" outlined in Sections I.1.1 A. and B, would only the
specifically applicable Performance or Condition provision be rendered
unenforceable or could the PPA in its entirety be deemed unenforceable if
either "performance of portions of the PPA [as opposed to performance of the
entire agreement] are left to the unilateral discretion of one of the
parties." or "compliance with some [as opposed to all] [of the conditions]
rests exclusively in the discretion of the obligor..."?

      Are there any Performance or Condition Prohibitions that
individually could be deemed to render unenforceable the entire PPA?

      If there are a number of Performance or Condition
Prohibitions that are not amended, could they in the aggregate be deemed
sufficient to render undenforecable the entire PPA?

   3.   Is there any other Challengable Clause or other clause in
the PPA or other affected agreement that without modification to make
enforceable should cause ENE not to entier into the PPA or other affected
agreement ?

   4.   Do the Discretionary Performance or Discretionary Condition
Prohibitions constitute events of default, even if the party in whose favor
they run do not attempt to enforce them, constitute an event of default that
would afford the "innocent party"  the right to demand rescission of the
PPA?

I understand that the PPA and the affected contracts all contain dispute
resolution provisions that would subject disputes to international
arbitration.    Assuming that the dispute resolution provisions are not
renegotiated, the fact that Mexican law, if agreed as the governing law,
will be interpreted by arbitrators and not Mexican courts is a factor that
could result in a more independent consideration and resolution of the
interpretation and application of Mexican law to disputes that may arise
under the contracts.  

If you have questions or wish to discuss this matter, please call me at
713-758-2518.

William H. Weiland

          ++++++CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE+++++
The information in this email may be confidential and/or privileged.  This
email is intended to be reviewed by only the individual or organization
named above.  If you are not the intended recipient or an authorized
representative of the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any
review, dissemination or copying of this email and its attachments, if any,
or the information contained herein is prohibited.  If you have received
this email in error, please immediately notify the sender by return email
and delete this email from your system.  Thank You

Travis, please look into this per my voice mail and get back to both me and 
Rick.  Mark
	Rick Buy
	11/21/2000 11:20 AM
		 
Mark- our fears came true on this. Well got "stuck" and costs will escalate 
substantially. Now is necessary to sidetrack. Did your guys find anything on 
this? Rick

	
	                           
	

Mark- were you aware of this? Not a huge dollar  amount but does indicate a 
naked risk we didn't know we had (I think). Rick

	
	                           
	

	

Rick:  I wanted to inform you about a situation where a Commercial Team has 
subjected Enron to some material risk that did not get appropriate 
approval.               

 Here's the story:   On October 30, I received a funding request for my 
approval of approximately $260,000 representing a cash advance request on  
the Bernard No. 1 well, a 16,500 exploratory well in the Cypress Program.   
The request appeared pretty routine but as is our procedure, I had Don 
Rollins check it out .   Don discovered that we had already paid our cash 
call and this cash call represented our working interest partner, Kelley 
Oil's share, which is a highly unusual situation.  Checking further we 
discovered that  the well is being drilled under a farmout agreement from 
Kelley, who wanted to be operator.  Our guys (Thompson/Josey) wanted Enron 
(not Kelley)  to operate the well during the drilling phase but did not want 
to be official operator of record so they set up Rozel Onshore, our prospect 
generator in Lafayette to be our surrogate operator.  Kelley was upset about 
this and would not sign the Joint Venture Agreement unless the cash call 
provisons were deleted.  Thompson/Josey and team agreed and signed the 
agreement which has no initials from the Legal Department.   The effect of 
this was that Rozel/Enron would have to incur all the costs then bill and 
collect from Kelley.

Rick, as you are aware, the cash call provision in a JOA is the primary 
credit risk mitigant that an operator has to ensure that his partners pay 
their share of well costs before costs are incurred.  This can be 
particularly good protection if a well gets in trouble with lots of cost 
overruns that partners don't  want to pay.  In this case, our surrogate 
operator, Rozel has no established credit with oil service companys and no 
money of his own so all services including the drilling rig are having to be 
prepaid by Enron 100%.  The well is heavily front end loaded with costs with 
a total drill and complete exposure of over $4.0 million (if thing go ok!)

I discussed this with Dave Gorte and Brad Larson and we all agreed  that we 
are forced to fund since the well is drilling and failure to fund would shut 
down operations.   Also, keep in mind that this will be an ongoing obligation 
(and risk exposure) during this entire drilling phase.

Lessons Learned:
   1) The E&P merchant finance team has no business operating a deep S. 
Louisiana exploratory test.
   2)  Important provisions, like "cash call" should never be given away 
without appropriate risk assessment and approval.

Please call if you have questions.
   

I am very interested in Steve and think we could use him in addition to 
Shari.  The only problem is that I agreed that I would not try to recruit him 
so the firm would agree to let us second him.  We just need to proceed slowly 
with him and hopefully it will work out to our benefit.

Regards,

Mark

	Tim Belden
	11/17/2000 12:05 PM
		 
By the way, I spoke to Chris Foster and Greg Wolfe about the relative merits 
of Steve Hall and Shari Stack.  Their thinking was that Steve is probably a 
better "deep thinker" (to use Elizabeth's words) but that he might be bored 
with the routine transaction work that Shari seems to really enjoy.  He also 
doesn't have the ISDA background which would provide tremendous benefit to 
us.  Therefore, I think Shari is a better fit for our current needs.  

Having said that, I am extremely impressed with Steve.  He has a better 
handle on this California work than anyone I've worked with yet.  He seems 
really bright and responsive.  I talked to him last week about working for 
Enron and he seemed interested.  I didn't get into any details about our 
needs, but gauged his general level of interest in the work that he is doing 
for us and his willingness to consider jobs other than his current one.  He 
basically said that he would be happy to hear about opportunities here.  I 
was talking to Richard Sanders yesterday and he also is impressed with Steve 
and said that he had considered trying to hire him.  I don't know if there is 
a position for Steve or not.  I just wanted to give you feedback on my 
discussions with him.  Let me know if you need any help or information from 
me on this matter.

Regards,
Tim

Please respond back with a date.  Thanks,  Mark
	Tim Belden
	11/17/2000 11:47 AM
		 
I have discussed relocating Shari to Portland with both of you.  Elizabeth 
wanted to make sure that she had hired at least one additional attorney 
before Shari could move to Portland.  When I spoke to Mark earlier this week 
he indicated that January 1st  was a reasonable deadline.  I would like to 
get some closure/finality on this matter -- both from a business perspective 
and to allow Shari to know what the future holds.  Let me know your thoughts.

I approve the request for a CPN for Al Larsen.

Yes, go ahead and remove it.  Mark

	Tim Belden
	11/22/2000 12:50 PM
		
sounds fine to me.  by the way, did you do any more thinking on whether i can 
remove the taping on one of my lines???

I am very interested in Steve and think we could use him in addition to 
Shari.  The only problem is that I agreed that I would not try to recruit him 
so the firm would agree to let us second him.  We just need to proceed slowly 
with him and hopefully it will work out to our benefit.

Regards,

Mark

	Tim Belden
	11/17/2000 12:05 PM
		 
By the way, I spoke to Chris Foster and Greg Wolfe about the relative merits 
of Steve Hall and Shari Stack.  Their thinking was that Steve is probably a 
better "deep thinker" (to use Elizabeth's words) but that he might be bored 
with the routine transaction work that Shari seems to really enjoy.  He also 
doesn't have the ISDA background which would provide tremendous benefit to 
us.  Therefore, I think Shari is a better fit for our current needs.  

Having said that, I am extremely impressed with Steve.  He has a better 
handle on this California work than anyone I've worked with yet.  He seems 
really bright and responsive.  I talked to him last week about working for 
Enron and he seemed interested.  I didn't get into any details about our 
needs, but gauged his general level of interest in the work that he is doing 
for us and his willingness to consider jobs other than his current one.  He 
basically said that he would be happy to hear about opportunities here.  I 
was talking to Richard Sanders yesterday and he also is impressed with Steve 
and said that he had considered trying to hire him.  I don't know if there is 
a position for Steve or not.  I just wanted to give you feedback on my 
discussions with him.  Let me know if you need any help or information from 
me on this matter.

Regards,
Tim

Jeff, will you coordinate with Peter for the legal PRC in getting all the 
info on the Cd lawyers so you and I can represent them at the PRC.
	Chris Gaffney
	11/17/2000 07:32 AM
		 
Peter - Some time ago you suggested that at year end review time I should 
provide you with a list of significant accomplishments.  The following is 
such list:

January through June with ENA
NSTAR All RequirementsTransaction - While similar in structure to the United 
Illuminating transaction, the NSTAR deal provided challenge in that it came 
together in a very accelerated time frame.  We did not have the luxury of 6 
months of negotiations as we did in UI.  We essentially structured and 
executed a deal in less than 3 weeks.  It was also a challenge in that I had 
no experience working with these particular clients (Kevin Presto, Dana 
Davis, Ed Baughman and John Llodra of East Power Trading/Mid Markets.  
Another significant hurdle was the education process of the utility and its 
attorneys which was essential to get them comfortable with the complexities 
of an all requirements trading document.
Consolidated Edison Turbine deal - This transaction was blown up at the 
eleventh hour, it was another challenging deal which required a creative 
structure to flip turbines into a project and take back a call on power.  
Again the education of the utility and structuring of the transaction made 
this particular deal difficult.

July through November with ECC
Sunoco structured power transaction - This was the first project I worked on 
in the Toronto office and was the first back to back transaction completed 
off of the British Energy PPA.  While the Calgary lawyers had put together a 
very good back to back precedent, there was still a great deal of negotiation 
involved in completing the deal and complexity involved in maintaining the 
requisite back to back transaction.
G-6 structured transaction - This deal just (as of 40 minutes ago) blew up.  
Notwithstanding that the deal will not be completed, it was a very 
complicated deal which involved a highly negotiated services agreement, 
arrangements for ECC to take initial equity and an option for additional 
equity and trading documentation.  This project required negotiating with 6 
municipal electric utilities who were trying to set up a retail affiliate to 
market power in Ontario.  The structure would have ECC as a risk management 
and settlement services provider in exchange for being the exclusive 
wholesale supplier of energy to the G-6.  This involved mitigating and 
structuring around a myriad of legal issues.
TransCanada structured power transaction - This was another back to back 
transaction off of the British Energy position.  These deal was challenging 
in that it involved a more sophisticated counterparty who had certain 
idiosyncratic issues such as regulatory risk and credit.  We were able to 
structure a deal which balanced the parties competing interests and 
maintained the commercial value of the transaction for Enron.
OEFC Non-Utility Generation Contract Management - We have just recently been 
awarded the project and have begun negotiations with OEFC regarding 
management of the NUG contracts.  However, the teamwork exhibited among legal 
and commercial and between the Toronto and Calgary legal and commercial 
groups showed how effective the ECC operation can be.  Your advice and 
initial review together with my implementation structured an RFP response 
that did the right thing: protected ECC from potential legal risks.  While 
there was commercial pressure to bend from these principals we stood our 
ground and as a result have a much stronger bargaining position.
Transition from Houston to Toronto - While both you and Mark know that there 
were some initial issues with respect to working out the arrangements for my 
move from Houston to Toronto I believe that I have transitioned quite 
smoothly.  I think that I have quickly gained the respect and trust of those 
in the Toronto office and of Rob Milnthorp.  Being the lone lawyer in a 
satellite office presents unique challenges; especially when the commercial 
folks are not content doing bread and butter type transactions but rather 
present highly structured deal on a weekly or even daily basis.  I understand 
and appreciate that you have gone out of your way to provide support to me 
when I have had issues arise on Toronto matters. In return I feel that I have 
provided you with comfort that the legal interests of Enron Canada are being 
protected and that our commercial team is receiving top notch legal support.  
I have done this while still managing all of the little things that go along 
with moving your family 2000 miles.

Regards
CJG

So far, I think EWS will be an unincorporated business unit.   Mark

	Robert Bruce@ENRON
	Sent by: Robert Bruce@ENRON
	11/27/2000 12:00 PM
		 
Enclosed please find redlined and clean copies of the versions of Executive 
Summary and Policies and Procedure that we plan on posting on LegalOnline.  
The most recent revisions reflect the newly announced Enron Wholesale 
Services organizational structure.  There are still a few unanswered 
questions relating to the EWS structure -- such as whether EWS will be an 
actual entity or simply an unincorporated "umbrella" of certain businesses.  
In large part, the revisions are simply more flexible versions of old 
language in light of these unanswered questions.  I would not say that any of 
the revisions amount to substantive changes to the policy.

Please contact me with any comments or questions you may have regarding the 
enclosed; however, please also keep in mind that we are on a very critical 
path towards the scheduled roll-out of LegalOnline.  In that regard, it would 
be greatly appreciated if any requested revisions could be made no later than 
Wednesday, Nov. 29.  Thanks -- Bob

Robert E. Bruce
Senior Counsel

Making progress in energy!    Mark

The  person I had in mind was Fransisco Pinto-Lite.  He is unwinding from his 
old obligations.  I will work on an update.   Mark

	Barbara N Gray
	11/27/2000 04:54 PM
		 
Mark, I am concerned that although assistance has been previously (prior to 
the latest reorg) represented to Peggy as forthcoming, it has not yet 
arrived.  We left our QLMeeting without a definite plan.....as I recall, 
because we thought there might be an individual with one of the "disbanding 
units" available "in the near future.  I am concerned  (based on some very 
tenuous third hand information) that Peggy may already be looking 
elsewhere...........I have told her that finding help for the Mexico work was 
on the very top of our agenda.....I would like to be able to inform her of 
what exactly we are doing to handle this situation................can you let 
me know what the status is of the individual referred to above.

Many thanks

BNG

John:  That is fine with me.  See you then.   Mark

	"Keffer, John" <JKeffer@KSLAW.com>
	11/27/2000 03:14 PM
		 
Mark-your assistant and I have confirmed that Thursday morning at 9:30 fits
our schedules.  If it is okay with you, I'd like to bring to the meeting my
partners John Cogan and Philip Weems, who are handling LNG matters for
Enron.  Let me know.  Thanks

                    Confidentiality Notice
This message is being sent by or on behalf of a lawyer.  It is intended 
exclusively for the individual or entity to which it is addressed.  This 
communication may contain information that is proprietary, privileged or 
confidential or otherwise legally exempt from disclosure.  If you are not the 
named addressee, you are not authorized to read, print, retain, copy or 
disseminate this message or any part of it.  If you have received this 
message in error, please notify the sender immediately by e-mail and delete 
all copies of the message.

I need your list of accomplishments (five to ten items) for calendar year 
2000 by the close of business next Tuesday, December 5.

Thank you.

At the last minute I could not go either.  Hope things are going well.  Mark

	"Mogel, William" <WMogel@ssd.com>
	11/27/2000 02:06 PM
		 
Mark--Sorry I missed you at the recent EBA meeting but I was traveling. Hope
all is well. Best Regards, Bill

William A. Mogel
Squire, Sanders & Dempsey, L.L.P.
1201 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W.
P.O. Box 407
Washington, D.C. 20004-0407
Telephone No. (202) 626-6678
Fax No. (202) 626-6780
EMail Address: WMogel@SSD.com

Almaty  Beijing  Bratislava  Brussels  Budapest  Cincinnati  Cleveland
Columbus  Hong Kong  Houston  Jacksonville  Kyiv  London  Los Angeles
Madrid  Miami  Moscow  New York  Palo Alto  Phoenix  Prague  San Francisco
Taipei  Tokyo  Washington  including the Renaissance Network of independent
counsel in China: Beijing, Shenzhen, Chengdu, Shijiazhuang, Dalian, Suzhou,
Fuzhou, Taiyuan, Guangzhou, Wenzhou, Haikou, Wuhan, Nanjing, Xiamen, Ningbo,
Yantai, Shanghai, Zhengzhou.

Yes, renew my subscription.

	Stephanie E Taylor
	11/29/2000 01:19 PM
		
Dear Mark,

This is to inform you that your subscription to Risk is up for renewal.  The 
regular subscription cost through December, 2001, is $599.00.  The cost after 
the corporate discount is $509.15.

Please let me know if you would like to renew this publication.  We will be 
happy to take care of this for you.  If you have any questions, please do not 
hesitate to call me.

Sincerely,
Stephanie E. Taylor  

Randy:

You make some great points.  We need to sit down and talk about this 
further.  An org memo is going out today, but it does not address South 
America.  I will give you a call.

Regards,

Mark

What is the status of our discussions with Carlos?   Mark
	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/04/2000 01:29 PM
		
Mark,  although I will hate to lose  Carlos and everyone here at EECC and 
NEPCO wants him to stay, in point of fact he has repaid his debt to society 
and is entitled to look at opportunites outside of EECC now. Please feel free 
to talk with him. He is discussing matters with Vicki et al now, and  she is 
aware that he will be contacting ENA (EWS?)as well.  

 As background, it was understood at the time we took Carlos on board that 
his long term career interests were not limited to our construction work, 
and, consistent with his resume, I have kept him mostly focused on our equity 
and finance related matters (including work-outs).  I do think well of 
Carlos, and certainly believe that he is a lawyer that Enron wants to keep.

	Carlos Sole
	12/01/2000 09:36 AM
		 
Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

Thanks.  It was very helpful.  Mark

	John Novak@ENRON
	12/04/2000 11:49 AM
		 
Attached is the current draft.  I'm sending this without talking to Lisa 
first but I'm pretty sure this is close to final.  Please call either of us 
or Brian if you have any questions.

Regards,
 John

Attached is the revised org chart.

Are there year-end deals?  If yes, how will they be covered?  Let me know.  
Thanks.   Mark

	John Novak@ENRON
	12/06/2000 11:41 AM
		 
I am planning to be out of the office from Dec 15 through January 2 on 
vacation/home leave.  During this time, I will be available by telephone (my 
U.S. cellphone number is 917-971-0606) and I will have access to email.

Regards,
 John

Martin:

Thanks for the update!  It looks like great progress in being made. 

Mark

 Janice:  Would you please follow up on this with Bill McCoy.  Mark
	Peter Keohane
	12/06/2000 04:54 PM
		 
We were unable to convince Morgan Stanley's counsel to provide the Affidavit 
in support of our position by the noon deadline today.  He said that although 
the traders were OK, he needed to track down internal approvals over the next 
few days.  Notwithstanding the deadline, it would still be extremely helpful 
to our case if we received the Affidavit over the next couple of days.  We 
would file the Affidavit, and deal with the judge, hopefully convincing him 
to allow the Affidavit notwithstanding the deadlines he established (there is 
a good likelihood he would do so).  As mentioned it would be very helpful if 
we weren't the only party advocating the need for a comprehensive index 
before the judge.  Accordingly, if you have any residual pressure to bear on 
MS, it would be greatly appreciated.

Peter.

fyi
=09David Delainey, President & CEO Enron Americas@ENRON
=09Sent by: Enron Announcements@ENRON
=0912/07/2000 11:53 PM
=09=09=20
On November 8, the Office of the Chairman, issued an important communicatio=
n,=20
announcing significant organizational changes in Enron's worldwide=20
operations. The purpose of this memo is to share with you the decisions tha=
t=20
are underway to restructure  Enron=01,s operations in South America.  The b=
asic=20
organizational framework has been set.=20

As you know, Diomedes Christodoulou and Jim Bannantine will be assuming new=
=20
responsibilities within Enron. Replacing them will be Orlando Gonzalez and=
=20
Joe Kishkill, who will become the Co-Presidents of South America, reporting=
=20
to Dave Delainey and John Lavorato.  They will share overall responsibility=
;=20
however, Orlando=01,s focus will be on direct sales origination,=20
commercial/government relationships and regulatory issues.  Joe=01,s focus =
will=20
be on wholesale origination, financial and operating performance and overal=
l=20
country management.  In addition, Orlando will continue as President and CE=
O=20
of Elektro until its ultimate sale.

The existing, large integrated asset base in South America (excluding=20
Elektro) will be managed and operated by Rebecca McDonald and Jim Hughes in=
=20
Enron Global Assets, which is part of Enron Wholesale Services under Mark=
=20
Frevert. Ultimately, there will be very close coordination in both Brazil a=
nd=20
Argentina between Enron Americas and Enron Global Assets to ensure that our=
=20
reputation in South America is protected, our asset positions are being=20
managed prudently and that commercial opportunities surrounding these asset=
s=20
are pursued.

The remaining natural gas and electrical commercial activities in South=20
America will be organized around the highly successful North American netwo=
rk=20
business model.  This model employs people, market making, physical=20
commodities, capital and assets to provide reliable, flexible and high-valu=
e=20
products to our customers.  It is people and intellectual capital based and=
=20
enjoys high rates of return on invested capital.

In the interest of pursuing this strategy, the following teams will report =
to=20
Joe and Orlando:
=20
The Commercial Origination team will be lead by Brett Wiggs.  The team will=
 =20
focus on covering South American markets, primarily Brazilian and Argentine=
=20
natural gas and electricity, with the following goals:

? Generating new, innovative, reliable and high value products and services=
=20
needed by the market by utilizing our commodity, asset and capital=20
capabilities;
? Providing those products and services across South America and across the=
=20
value chain, including wholesale and retail, based upon the highest value=
=20
opportunity;
? Finding structural value arbitrages in the South American market and move=
=20
quickly to capitalize;
? Assisting the Risk Management and Trading organization in managing the=20
overall risk of the organization;
? Managing all new power and asset development opportunities in South Ameri=
ca=20
consistent with this strategy, and
? Providing the Risk Management and Trading organization information and de=
al=20
flow.

The Commercial Origination team will consist of a diverse group of people w=
ho=20
work as a single team which bring the required skills including commodity,=
=20
capital, regulatory, asset, development, market, structuring, deal executio=
n,=20
finance and country knowledge necessary to reach our goals.=20

The Trading and Risk Management team will be headed by Remi Collonges.  The=
=20
team will continue to develop pricing information and manage the price book=
=20
for the relevant energy markets in support of the wholesale and direct sale=
s=20
efforts.  Additionally, the team will work toward implementation of activel=
y=20
trading South American energy commodities.  This group will be responsible=
=20
for managing Enron South America=01,s overall risk and will have a direct=
=20
reporting relationship with John Lavorato in his role as head of the Americ=
as=20
risk activities.

The Argentine effort will be integrated into the overall South American=20
Commercial Origination and Trading and Risk Management groups; however, we=
=20
will continue to maintain an Argentine office headed by Michael Guerriero. =
=20

The goal of the reorganization is to create a flat team oriented organizati=
on=20
that is very market and commercially focused.  The following support=20
functions will assist the overall business objectives of the commercial tea=
m=20
and will report into Joe and Orlando, plus into their line functions in=20
Houston.  The overall goal is to ensure that the South American business=20
units have an adequate support organization to evaluate opportunities, as=
=20
well as manage day-to-day business and risk.  Otherwise, the Houston=20
infrastructure will provide resources as needed to manage peak requirements=
=20
in South America, not unlike other businesses in Enron Americas.

These groups include:

The Government Affairs team, which will be headed by Sergio Assad, will=20
manage the relationships with the relevant regulatory agencies as well as=
=20
governmental ministries.  The primary regulatory goal will be to facilitate=
,=20
in the near term, substantive changes to the regulatory rules to allow a=20
functioning wholesale traded market in Brazil and Argentina. Sergio will=20
assume his responsibilities upon completion of the Elektro sale.  During th=
is=20
interim period, Jose Bestard will continue to be in charge of the regulator=
y=20
function.  Once Sergio makes the transition, he will also report to Rick=20
Shapiro in Enron Government Affairs.

The Finance team will be headed by Britaldo Soares.  The team will manage t=
he=20
interface with Enron Global Finance.  Britaldo will transition from his=20
current duties at Elektro upon completion of the Elektro sale.  Britaldo wi=
ll=20
also report to Joe Deffner in Enron Global Finance.  Rob Gay will be=20
assisting Britaldo during the transition, while continuing his work on the=
=20
Cuiaba project.

The Legal team, which will be lead by Randy Young, as general counsel, and=
=20
John Novak, as deputy general counsel, will manage South America=01,s legal=
=20
requirements.  Randy and John will also report to Mark Haedicke in Enron=20
Wholesale Services - Legal Department.

Miguel Padron will become Chief of Staff.  Human Resources, Information=20
Technology, Treasury, Accounting & Reporting, as well as Administration wil=
l=20
report to Miguel.  This will bring focus to essential, but non-commercial=
=20
functions, as well as more efficiently manage key matrix reporting=20
relationships with Enron.  Miguel will also report to David Oxley in Enron=
=20
Wholesale Services =01) Human Resources and Wes Colwell in Enron Wholesale=
=20
Services =01) Business Analysis and Reporting.

These changes are consistent with Enron's evolving business strategy and=20
reflect our continuing commitment to grow the company by maximizing our=20
financial and intellectual capital.  However, in line with the new=20
organizational structure and the near term potential for business in the=20
region, further budget reductions will be necessary.  People directly=20
affected will be notified shortly.
=20
Enron is committed to continue the successful implementation of its=20
businesses in South America.  We believe that as the markets develop, we ar=
e=20
uniquely positioned to leverage Enron=01,s core capabilities and create=20
shareholder value.=20

The Legal Committee meeting normally held every other Monday in conjunction 
with the OGC meeting will not be held for approximately two months.  The OGC 
meetings will continue every Monday morning as usual beginning 8:30 am 
Central time.  You will be notified when the Legal Committee meetings 
resume.  Thank you.

I am on the Board of BEAR and sponsoring this effort.  Please let Janette=
=20
Elbertson know by e-mail if you are interested in donating your time to hel=
p=20
staff the table in the lobby on Monday, December 18, from 10 a.m. to 2:00 p=
.m.

Thank you.
=20
Help CPS Kids!
Enron, KRBE and Sun and Ski Sports are collecting donations for Children=01=
,s=20
Protective Services Be A Resource (BEAR) Program to purchase gifts this=20
holiday season. Make your donation and receive a $10-off coupon for Sun and=
=20
Ski Sports.

Donations will be accepted in the Enron Building Lobby - Tuesday, December=
=20
12, Thursday, December 14 and Monday, December 18 from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m. or=
=20
in EB407.

KRBE Morning Show LIVE in Antioch Park
Come out and show your support for the CPS BEAR collection Monday, December=
=20
18 when the 104 KRBE morning show=01,s Streets of America comes to Antioch =
Park.=20
See you there from 6 a.m. to 9 a.m.

Is it really necessary to coordinate everything through ENW?  I am not sure 
people will do that?  I think ENW should be informed but not be in control of 
the registration.  Have the ENW people requested that they be in charge of 
this process?  Will they care if we change it?

	Leslie Hansen
	12/12/2000 02:14 PM
		 
Mark:

I wanted to follow up to see if you have had an opportunity to consider the 
proposed policy attached below.  Currently, the traders have no guidelines 
governing their use of third party electronic trading platforms, and there 
has been no centralized system for monitoring such use.  

Please give me a call with any questions or comments.

Leslie
	Leslie Hansen
	11/14/2000 01:09 PM
		 
Mark:

Mark Taylor and I have worked with Andy Zipper to develop a policy relating 
to use of third party electronic trading platforms.  We propose that you and 
Mark Frevert send the attached e-mail to all traders informing them of this 
policy.  Note that I included a contact for questions at the bottom of the 
policy.  I have listed myself for now.  We discussed sending this e-mail to 
all Enron traders, including those in Europe and within other business units.

Mark Taylor, Andy Zipper and Sheri Thomas (the designated master user who 
currently acts as Product Control Director for EnronOnline) have approved the 
e-mail and the policy.

I look forward to your comments on the policy.  After you have approved the 
e-mail and the policy, I will coordinate with Andy and Sheri to determine how 
best to circulate the e-mail.

Leslie

You must notify the Enron Net Works LLC (ENW) designee set out in the Policy 
if you would like to trade on such a trading platform.
All registration and other documentation must be sent to the ENW designee, 
who will coordinate the necessary legal and administrative review.
You are not authorized to use a third-party electronic trading platform until 
you are authorized by ENW.
The Master User for all third-party electronic trading platform accounts will 
be an ENW designee.
If you are currently using any third-party electronic trading platform, 
please notify the ENW designee.

A full copy of the Policy Statement is attached for your review. 

Let me know what the outcome of the meeting is.  Thanks.  Mark

	Peter Keohane
	12/12/2000 12:10 PM
		 
PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL

I think we need to talk to the following issues tomorrow:

1.  Status update on court proceedings;

2.  Evidentiary matters, including:

(a)  formal industry support for our position - without it, we are fighting 
an uphill battle, and I understand the other side will be filing evidence of 
industry support for their position; and 

(b)  a detailed and focused analysis of the pre-NGX and post-NGX index 
consequences, in terms of volume and pricing consequences - our analysis to 
date has proven weak;

3.  Goals, including can we live with the risk of no CGPR AECO index.  In 
other words, our best argument is likely that CGPR cannot pass off what it 
purports to be an AECO index reflecting the broader market, but NGX (and EOL 
for that matter) are free to publish their own index.  The result might be 
that NGX (or EOL for that matter) is free to publish their own index, 
provided it is not passed of as being the CGPR AECO index reflecting the 
broader market, and Enerdata then must publish the broader index, if it 
wishes, as the CGPR AECO index.  However, if CGPR chose not to continue 
publishing, it is likely going to be free to do so, with the effect that 
there would be no CGPR AECO index as referred to in our Confirms and 
Transactions, which would have to then be altered to account for a separate 
and new index, which for the time being could be NGX or EOL.

I have asked our outside lawyers to join in on the call at 2:00 p.m. (Calgary 
time) tomorrow.

Peter 

I think it is great!  When is the best time for me to make my contribution?  
On the radio show or before?  

	Laura Schwartz@ENRON
	12/11/2000 04:07 PM
		 
This is what is running on eTV to promote our effort.

Laura
 - KRBE.exe 

I appreciate your support.  Sounds like progress is being made on the deal.=
 =20
Thanks for all the hard work!  Mark

=09Ned E Crady@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
=0912/11/2000 11:15 AM
=09=09
Mark,

 I do not know where I will be Monday (Washington, NYC, Bahamas, Houston)..=
..=20
but I would be pleased to support what looks like a good cause   otherwise.=
=20

Thanks, Ned

 PS -  We closed $135MM  loan w/ ExImbank last friday but do not fund until=
=20
12/21/2000.

   Meanwhile, McConnell is meeting the Prime Minister of Bahamas on the LNG=
=20
storage facility/Pipeline to Florida this wednesday.

I am on the Board of BEAR and sponsoring this effort.  Please let Janette=
=20
Elbertson know by e-mail if you are interested in donating your time to hel=
p=20
staff the table in the lobby on Monday, December 18, from 10 a.m. to 2:00 p=
.m.

Thank you.
=20
Help CPS Kids!
Enron, KRBE and Sun and Ski Sports are collecting donations for Children=01=
,s=20
Protective Services Be A Resource (BEAR) Program to purchase gifts this=20
holiday season. Make your donation and receive a $10-off coupon for Sun and=
=20
Ski Sports.

Donations will be accepted in the Enron Building Lobby - Tuesday, December=
=20
12, Thursday, December 14 and Monday, December 18 from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m. or=
=20
in EB407.

KRBE Morning Show LIVE in Antioch Park
Come out and show your support for the CPS BEAR collection Monday, December=
=20
18 when the 104 KRBE morning show=01,s Streets of America comes to Antioch =
Park.=20
See you there from 6 a.m. to 9 a.m.

Please schedule a meeting for Dan Fournier and David Jackson with Jim Derrick 
and me in Houston over the next couple of months.  We will probably first 
meet in Jim's office and then go to lunch.  Mark
	"DAN FOURNIER" <dan.fournier@blakes.com>
	12/08/2000 04:54 PM
		 
Mark, received your voice-mail. Our national Chairman, David Jackson, and I 
are at your disposal. Just give us a bit of a heads-up on timing and we will 
come to Houston. Best regards, Dan.

Daniel P. E. Fournier 
Blake, Cassels & Graydon LLP
3500, 855 2nd Street S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
T2P 4J8 
Tel: 403-260-9636
Fax: 403-260-9700
Email: dpef@blakes.com

This email communication is confidential and legally privileged.
If you are not the intended recipient, please notify me at the telephone 
number shown above or by return email and delete this communication and 
any copy immediately.  Thank you.

Jane:

ISDA is planning an energy seminar in Tokyo in mid-May.  We have heard there 
may be an energy seminar in March or April in Tokyo.  Have you heard of the 
earlier seminar?  We are trying to decide whether it makes sense to go 
forward on the May seminar.  Could you look into this and talk to the traders.

Thanks for your help.

Regards,

Mark

Today, I talked to the GC of both Southern and Duke.  Each GC said they were 
not really up to speed on the issues.  I took the opportunity to walk them 
through the Nerc letter and the action taken at the Serc board meeting.  They 
each attempted to argue our fight was really with TVA.

Mark

Looks good to me.  Mark

	Rob Walls@ENRON
	12/07/2000 01:50 PM
		 
I attach for your review the final draft of the proposed Enron U.S. Foreign 
Corrupt Practices Act Policy.  As I mentioned this morning, this draft is the 
result of many months of work by Mary Nell Browning, Bob Williams, Joe Dilg 
(Vinson and Elkins) and Martin Weinstein (Foley and Lardner).  I would like 
to roll this policy out early in the new year and so would appreciate 
receiving your comments as soon as possible but not later than the end of 
this year.

Please feel free to call me if you have any questions or need any 
information.  Thanks.

Rob

no problema

	Jeffrey T Hodge
	12/08/2000 04:00 PM
		 
Mark:

In follow-up to our conversation at lunch Monday, I am hoping to take 
Thursday and Friday of next week off (December 14 and 15).  That will bring 
me down to having only a week left.  After that, I will be taking only a day 
or two on a "when it looks good" basis.  Let me know if  you have any 
concerns with that schedule.

Thanks,

Jeff

fyi
	Andreas Kraemer@ENRON
	12/08/2000 09:26 AM
		 
FYI, Mark Haedicke from Legal informed me that there is some sort of conflict 
and consequently legal concerns over hiring John Bloomer as outside 
consultant.  As a contract with him would probably not be approved by Legal 
we won't further pursue to hire him for our technical due diligence.

Andreas

Eric:

I have talked to Alan Aronowitz about this as well.  You need more resources 
immediately from inside.  We will also have to recruit outside to get enough 
resources as the business grows.

Regards,

Mark

	Eric Gonzales
	12/06/2000 04:45 AM
		 
Mark,

I just wanted to send you a quick note regarding the LNG legal support.  As 
we discussed several weeks ago, I am concerned that within Dan Rodgers 
current group of resources there is no one with ECT commodity transaction 
experience.  This lack of experience is very noticeable to our commercial 
team as the current legal group is on a steep learning curve and given our 
immediate deal requirements.  Dan and I spoke about this yesterday and agreed 
that he will expedite the effort to recruiting someone from within ECT.   I 
believe not only will this person help enormously within our current deal 
flow but he/she would be a great resource for the other EGM legal team 
members regarding commodity transactions.  

The main reason for this note is to enlist your help to get the right person 
into the group.  I will routinely be checking with Dan as to the progress we 
are making on this effort.  

Thanks for your help in this effort.

Eric

It sounds premature at this time for ISDA to put on an energy seminar in 
Japan.  Do you agree?   Mark

	Jane McBride@ENRON
	12/13/2000 02:26 AM
		
Enron Japan is also planning an energy conference in April / May of next year 
to promote our energy business here in Japan.  The arrangements are still 
very much at the preliminary stage so are confidential which is why I did not 
copy this email to the ISDA person.  (As you would suspect we are still some 
way off being able to use ISDA documentation for any of our energy 
transactions, which are tending to be physical transactions.)

Jane

	Mark E Haedicke@ECT
	2000/12/13 07:38
		 
Jane:

ISDA is planning an energy seminar in Tokyo in mid-May.  We have heard there 
may be an energy seminar in March or April in Tokyo.  Have you heard of the 
earlier seminar?  We are trying to decide whether it makes sense to go 
forward on the May seminar.  Could you look into this and talk to the traders.

Thanks for your help.

Regards,

Mark

I am hearing that it may be premature to do an ISDA energy conference in 
Tokyo because almost all the products being discussed so far are physical.  
What do you think?

Mark
	Jane McBride@ENRON
	12/13/2000 01:22 AM
		
Hi Mark,

There will be a one-day WRMA conference here (Morten Erik and Mark Tawney are 
involved in these arrangements and Mr. Wani, lawyer of local derivative fame 
will be talking at the conference) in late Feb or early March.  Date will be 
fixed later this week, likely to be March 5.

Jane 

	Mark E Haedicke@ECT
	2000/12/13 07:38
		 
Jane:

ISDA is planning an energy seminar in Tokyo in mid-May.  We have heard there 
may be an energy seminar in March or April in Tokyo.  Have you heard of the 
earlier seminar?  We are trying to decide whether it makes sense to go 
forward on the May seminar.  Could you look into this and talk to the traders.

Thanks for your help.

Regards,

Mark

Here is the memo I mentioned in our meeting today.  Let me know if there are 
other items we should put on the list.  Thanks.   Mark
	Mark E Haedicke
	10/25/2000 10:13 AM
		 
The volume and complexity of our legal work has increased dramatically over 
the past few years.  I think this environment requires additional time to be 
devoted to legal planning and review in order to provide the best possible 
service to our clients.  Within the next month, I have asked Janette to 
schedule a Quarterly Legal Review for each group listed on our new 
organizational chart .  I  would envision that we would focus on the 
following:  

review of the current monthly legal report and significant legal issues
review of the top ten legal risks
form contracts and other documentation projects
legal budget
legal resources, inside and outside
performance metrics

In addition, I am proposing that any energy trading contract for a term 
longer than one year by initialled by an AGC or member of the OGC.  Let me 
know what you think about that.

Mark Haedicke
        

The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of November 15, 2000.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Jim:  The draft memo on power is attached.  Lots more work to do.  Let me 
know if you want to discuss further.

Mark
	Elizabeth Sager
	12/13/2000 10:55 AM
		 
Mark

Attached is a draft of the chart of power risks.  Let me know if there is 
anything else you would like me to do on this.  We are still in the process 
of reviewing top exposures with credit.

Elizabeth 36349

I do not think so.  I think he will be at Enron until he is 65.   Mark

	Jane McBride@ENRON
	12/14/2000 04:42 AM
		
I think it really depends on what sort of topics they are thinking of having.
Also BTW, do you think Ken Lay is going to resign?  Everyone here seems 
pretty sure he will (so does the Japanese media).  I have heard his responses 
to this question before so I know what the official line is.
Jane 

	Mark E Haedicke@ECT
	2000/12/13 23:40
		
It sounds premature at this time for ISDA to put on an energy seminar in 
Japan.  Do you agree?   Mark

	Jane McBride@ENRON
	12/13/2000 02:26 AM
		
Enron Japan is also planning an energy conference in April / May of next year 
to promote our energy business here in Japan.  The arrangements are still 
very much at the preliminary stage so are confidential which is why I did not 
copy this email to the ISDA person.  (As you would suspect we are still some 
way off being able to use ISDA documentation for any of our energy 
transactions, which are tending to be physical transactions.)

Jane

	Mark E Haedicke@ECT
	2000/12/13 07:38
		 
Jane:

ISDA is planning an energy seminar in Tokyo in mid-May.  We have heard there 
may be an energy seminar in March or April in Tokyo.  Have you heard of the 
earlier seminar?  We are trying to decide whether it makes sense to go 
forward on the May seminar.  Could you look into this and talk to the traders.

Thanks for your help.

Regards,

Mark

Kristin:
Kevin is very concerned with this charge.  Why is litigation now being billed 
up front?  Why is there a 50% increase in corporate legal?  Why is there a 
100% increase in corporate secretary?  Why are we billed for the library when 
we use primarily electronic sources?  Could you please work on the answers to 
these questions and get back to me.

Mark

John:

I have not seen the legal opinion yet from Brazilian counsel [Dr. Pinto] on 
our dollar indexing issue.  Please forward to me so I can review the opinion 
and get final approval for the deal.

Regards,

Mark

I would not want to move forward with either unless you are a "sponsor" and 
believe such tools would clearly add value immediately.   Mark

	Mark Greenberg@ENRON
	12/13/2000 11:10 PM
		 
Rob/Mark -

I wanted to give you both a brief overview of the reviews this past week of 
eLaw and eVelocity.

eLaw - I met with principals of eLaw and Steve Horn earlier this week.  The 
reason for the meeting was really a pitch of second round funding from Enron 
to the tune of $10MM to $15MM.  The secondary focus was on the product and 
its usefulness to Enron. Steve made it clear that any funding decision would 
be driven 100% by a decision by the Legal Department to use the tool and, 
thus, it was up to Legal to review it and see where to go.

The demonstration of the tool was impressive.  Though it does act as a 
traditional shopping type site in many respects, it also has functionality to 
create a "myelaw" page customized to the information you, the user are the 
most interested in seeing.  It also allows for a query into further 
information, which query is then forwarded to the law firms (or firm) 
supporting the practice area (e.g. Labor/Employment) for comment.  There is 
also the ability to set up an Enron library so that information on topics 
developed by Enron retained firms can be loaded, organized and maintained, 
including legal opinions, memoranda on various topics and form 
pleadings/documents.  This area is secure from the balance of the site so 
that other users cannot access the information.  The loading process is 
fairly easy and could easily be implemented within a firm environment.  Some 
of the functionality that would be the most useful is due to be released in a 
new version coming out early Q1 and by the end of 2001 there is the plan to 
have at least 10 or so practice areas available.  Right now the focus is on 
Environmental, Intellectual Property, Health Care, and Tax.

I think the tool could be useful, especially in relation to the organization 
of information we obtain from our outside sources.  It may also complement 
the website/portal concept we are currently looking to make a part of the 
website/portal development process.  I would be curious to see, however, what 
other tools are out there doing the same or similar function.

eVelocity - I met this afternoon with Mike Griffs (sp?) to discuss the 
eVelocity tool.  It was presented as a portal concept to link the law firm 
and our legal department solely for the movement, review and payment of law 
firm invoices.  While it is billed as a system capable of interfacing with a 
matter management system, it can, itself, be used as a matter management tool.

The capabilities of the system revolve around the determination of a set of 
rules that are applicable to law firm invoices.  For example, say Enron does 
not pay more than $0.10 per page of copying.  This can be set as a rule so 
that any invoice loaded into eVelocity by a law firm containing more than 
this amount per page would be automatically rejected.  The rejection would 
then require the law firm to adjust the bill accordingly and resubmit it to 
the system.  This same functionality can be put in place on the Enron side so 
that the rule requires the bill to come into Enron for review, but notes that 
it is not compliant with the established rules so that the reviewing attorney 
is alerted to the issue.  The system does identify the problem so you do not 
have to search the entire invoice to see what differs from the rules.  It is 
possible to  establish rules that would allow an invoice, presuming it 
complied with all rules, to be automatically approved and moved to AP for 
payment.   This would require interfacing with AP and the SAP system, but it 
could be done.

In addition to the above functionality, the system can also track matters, 
budgets for matters, costs incurred for a matter and the name of the law firm 
people who are authorized to bill against a specific matter.  Reports can be 
generated in an number of formats to assess financial performance against a 
budget or overall costs for various matters.  Finally, since it is a 
web/browser based system, implementation is not difficult and there is not a 
lot of IT involvement needed.

I specifically asked why any other matter management system would be needed 
and received the response that there really is no such need.  Mike indicated 
a pilot program would take no more than two to three weeks to set up.

In keeping with the ideas surrounding the technology plan developed for EWS, 
as well as similar ideas presented for the Corp. portal/website, it makes 
sense to look at implementing a matter management system of some sort that 
goes beyond litigation tracking.  Whether or not it is eVelocity or another 
comparable tool would require further research into the available products, 
but I believe it would be worth while to pursue maybe in a pilot program 
atmosphere.

What I have provided above is a general overview of the products and meetings 
surrounding the demonstrations.  If either of you would like further 
information or have any questions, please let me know.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

fyi
	"Teruo Tanaka" <teruo.tanaka@ibjbank.co.jp>
	12/13/2000 06:17 PM
		 
Dear Mark and Bob,

We will be kicking-off the above group in January. The core members are
scheduled to meet in advance to discuss the priority and order of the issues
to be discussed. For this purpose, I would appreciate if you could arrange
for someone to send me the minutes of the past committee meetings in NY and
London. If they are not open to non-chairs or the ISDA Board, I will digest
it and reduce them into plain Japanese summary.

Thank you for your cooperation.

Regards,

Terry

We are coming in on the 22, Friday and will be leaving on the 27.   Good luck 
on the job!  Look forward to seeing you soon.   Mark

	LDLIPMAN@aol.com
	12/13/2000 09:04 AM
		 
Hi Mark, 

I'm still waiting to hear back from the President of Western Union. I met 
with the company psychologist last Wednesday and she said that she thought I 
would be offered a position within a few days. The long wait game wears on 
you after a while. 

We were talking about coming up to Breckinridge to ski with you one day, 
perhaps Christmas. What day do you arrive and when do you leave. 

Have a great day. 

Larry

Bruce:  I think your suggestion makes sense.  An e-mail or voicemail on major 
developments as they occur would be helpful.  Thanks,   Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/13/2000 06:01 AM
		 
Mark -

I thought that I would keep you informed of major decisions or analysis on 
Dahbol from time to time.

I was pleased to see the quality of our lawyers in India.  I think that it is 
a solid internal team and we will be relying on the same external lawyers 
that we have used throughout the life of the project.

Bruce

Bruce Lundstrom
12/11/2000 11:39 AM
Rebecca/Jim -

The India legal team has completed two important reviews:

Permits/Approvals Review.  Sandeep Katwala led a group reviewing our permits 
and approvals.  They feel pretty good about our compliance with these 
permits/approvals.  As you have heard on previous phone calls, the day tank 
seepage some time ago makes us the most nervous.  It seems to us that a 
release from the site resulting in substantial groundwater contamination 
plays pretty well in the court of public opinion given DPC's failure to "come 
forward" on the issue (even though it was advised at the time of the release 
that it had no legal obligation to do so).  Sandeep's note is below.

PPA Review.  Paul Kraske led a group reviewing the PPA.  His memo on this 
issue is also below.  He feels pretty good about our ongoing compliance with 
the PPA.  The instances of the non-compliance are not particularly material 
and none would appear to play well in the court of public opinion.  I should 
also note that it would be very difficult for MSEB to lawfully terminate the 
PPA -- that remedy is not readily available to MSEB under the PPA terms.

Both review efforts have relied somewhat on the representations of DPC 
personnel.  The India legal team was able to "tie down" many significant 
issues with written documentation but in many cases have relied on the oral 
representations of our own employees to confirm compliance with our 
obligations.

There are a number of other legal review efforts underway and I will keep you 
apprised as these reviews progress.

Bruce
Sandeep Katwala
12/11/2000 07:43 AM
Bruce,
Lauren, Narayan and Kunal have completed their review of DPC compliance with 
clearances. Based on discussions with DPC personnel and a review of 
correspondence where relevant, no material non-compliance issues have 
surfaced which I feel would pose a problem under the PPA. There are two 
instances under the Reserve Bank of India approvals DPC has failed to submit 
reports to the Ministry of Finance within the time frame indicated; these are 
however minor issues. We have to accept that there may be practical instances 
where there may not be strict compliance at the site (eg the actual 
construction of physical assets is not strictly as per the layout approved by 
the authorities) but, from the discussions with DPC personnel none of these 
have come to light. On the environment approvals DPC has submitted compliance 
statements to the Maharashtra State Pollution Control Board which confirm 
that DPC is in compliance with the conditions in the relevant approvals. We 
have relied on these statements as being accurate. 

With respect to the water pollution issue, as we saw on Saturday, DPC has 
notified MPCB pursuant to the show cause notice of the measures taken to 
mitigate the pollution off the site. That correspondence seemed to indicate 
that there should be no further problems with this issue. However, my sense 
is that we have not seen the end of this issue and in particular, the report 
currently being prepared by GSDA has not yet surfaced in final form. There is 
no guarantee that it will be positive. Shobhan's view that it is difficult to 
see how a Court would support an injunction of some sort shutting down the 
plant "permanently" given the remedial measures taken by DPC is persuasive - 
you can however see that it provides excellent ammunition for PR purposes.

Sandeep

Paul Kraske
12/11/2000 06:23 PM
Gentlemen-
Attached is a short note we prepared summarizing our conclusions after an 
initial review of PPA compliance.  Please feel free to call if you have any 
questions regarding the attached.  Regards,
Paul

ok

=09Sue Rich@ENRON
=0912/14/2000 10:31 AM
=09=09=20
Could you please put me on the notification list when changes like this are=
=20
implemented?  I manage the field IT function for ETS.  My group provides=20
support for about 1800 field employees.  We need to be able to roll this=20
information out in a timely manner to those field employees. =20

Thanks.  If you have any questions/concerns, please feel free to call me at=
=20
402-398-7809. =20

Sue
E-mail / Voice Mail Retention Policy Change Notice

We have just received notice of a change to the e-mail and voice mail=20
retention policy.  The change will go into effect Friday, December 15, 2000=
.

The greatest impact will be to your "sent mail," which will be retained onl=
y=20
30 days as compared to the current 365 days. =20

As a reminder, you should not use the email system to store important=20
documents.
They should be saved to your network directory which is regularly backed up=
.

However, for 'sent' messages you want to keep longer than 30 days in the=20
email system, you should move the messages from the Sent Mail to a specific=
=20
folder where the messages can be kept 365 days.

The scope of the e-mail retention policy includes all forms of electronic=
=20
mail, for example, Lotus Notes Mail, Internet e-mail, Outlook e-mail, and=
=20
voice mail.

Enron supports a work environment in which information is freely exchanged=
=20
and encourages employees, contractors, and agents working on behalf of Enro=
n=20
to use its computers and related electronic resources in accomplishing thei=
r=20
work.  Computers, systems, and networks and the work products they contain=
=20
are Enron property and subject to Enron review and control.  All Enron=20
employees, contractors, and agents are responsible for using the computing=
=20
resources provided to them by Enron in an appropriate manner.

The revised retention schedule follows:

Message Location    Maximum Retention
Inbox     30 Days
Message Log/Sent Mail   30 Days
Trash     Rollover from Inbox for 15 days
Bulletin Boards    30 Days
Folders/Archives    E-mails placed in Folders or Archives =01) one year
Voice mail     90 days

The Corp IT Group responsible for maintaining compliance with this=20
e-mail/voice mail policy will automatically purge e-mail and voice mail old=
er=20
than the allowed maximum retention age.  Any exception to this policy=20
requires approval from Mark Haedicke or Richard Sanders.

If you need assistance in creating folders and saving documents to them,=20
please call the Helpdesk x7454.  We will be glad to assist you.

Thank.  Jean x7173

Jim:

I am confused.  LeBeouf wanted to represent ENA and EES and Reliant never 
came up in the conversations.  We picked Brobeck and it was painful for 
LeBoeuf.  I think there must be some additional facts relative to New Power.

Regards,

Mark

	James Derrick@ENRON
	12/15/2000 06:01 PM
		 
FYI; should we have any discussions with LeBeouf re their representation?  Jim
Marc Manly@EES
12/15/2000 08:40 AM
Jim:  on the theory that it is better late than never, I attach a summary of 
the Reliant/Labeouf discussions concerning their potential representation of 
us in California.  It appears that Reliant did finally leave a crack open (it 
was not so absolute as I had been led to understand).  Marc
Kathleen E Magruder
12/14/2000 09:35 PM
You have asked that I recount the facts surrounding my failed attempt to hire 
LaBeouf Lamb to represent New Power in CA before the PUC.

In late July, I contacted Chris Hilen with LaBeouf's San Francisco office to 
ask if he would represent us in the Order Instituting Investigation which 
arose from the summer's price spikes in San Diego.  He said he would check 
with Reliant to ensure there were no conflicts.  When he returned my call, 
Reliant was unwilling to permit LaBeouf to proceed on our behalf.  Because I 
had been told earlier this year that Reliant would probably never be opposed 
to  us anywhere but Texas in the future, I called a contact at Reliant who 
referred me to Mike Jines in the general counsel's office.  Mr. Jines was 
unavailable, so I left him a voicemail message.  I told him that as I 
understood it, Reliant is only in the generation business in CA and not in 
the retail sales of electricity as we are.  We should both be interested in 
options that create better markets, lift rate caps and foment competition.  
Consequently, I felt there was no conflict here.  It took Mr. Jines some days 
to respond.  The intervention date was quickly approaching and needed legal 
assistance, I turned to Arter Hadden.  Some time after we had made that 
commitment (and after the intervention date), Mr. Jines called and suggested 
that perhaps something could be worked out.  Due to the press of other 
business, I did not return the call as the immediate situation had been 
resolved.

In October then, as we searched for a lobby firm in Sacramento, one person 
who was highly recommended told us Reliant would be "extremely uncomfortable" 
if she were to represent us, too.  She opted not to interview with us.  Since 
the message was similar to the original message to LaBeouf, I have moved on 
to find another lobbyist and have not followed up with Jines.

If you would like to discuss this more, please call.

Great job!    Mark

	Chris Long@ENRON
	12/16/2000 10:16 AM
		 
Congress Passes the Commodity Futures Modernization Act of 2000

Late Friday afternoon, December 15, Congress passed the Commodity Futures 
Modernization Act of 2000.  The purpose of the Act is to eliminate 
unnecessary regulation of commodity futures exchanges and other entities 
falling within the  coverage of the Commodities Exchange Act ("CEA") and the 
provide legal certainty with regard to certain futures and derivatives 
transactions.  By enacting such changes, Congress intends to promote product 
innovation and to enhance the competitive position of US financial markets. 
Certain provisions of the Act open the door for Enron's further product 
innovation and growth.  Specifically, the Act provides important legal 
certainty for energy and other transactions occuring both on an 
over-the-counter (OTC) bilateral basis and on multilateral electronic trading 
platforms.  Enron was a leading advocate of passage of this legislation.

Bilateral Transactions

Under the Act, bilateral transactions in all commodities (other than 
agriculture commodities) that do not occur on trading facility (i.e. not on a 
multi-party exchange) are exempt from most provisions of the CEA as long as 
the transactions are entered solely between "eligible contract 
participants"(i.e. persons and certain legal entities satisfying capital 
thresholds and other requirements under the Act).  This provision essentially 
codifies and expands existing CFTC exemptions for swaps and forward 
contracts, thereby eliminating a degree of legal ambiguity that has 
frustrated product innovation and growth.  

Multilateral Transactions

In addition, the Act creates a broad exemption for any agreement, contract or 
transaction in commodities (other than agriculture commodities) so long as 
they the transactions are between "eligible commercial participants", are 
entered into on a "principle-to-principle basis" and that take place on a 
multi-party "electronic facility".  This exemption could facilitate expansion 
of EnronOnline to allow for multi-party transactions, however certain legal 
requirements will have to be met.

Other Transactions

The Act also creates a broad exclusion for a number of commodities that are 
of interest to Enron, including "credit risk measure" commodities and weather 
derivatives .  Again, the derivative transaction exclusion will have to meet 
certain legal thresholds.

This legislation has been over six years in the making and the collective 
support of many Enron employees has been crucial.  Thank you to all that have 
contributed to the passage on this important legislation.  We will have a 
more through legal summary of this legislation in the near future. Do not 
hesitate to contact me at (202) 466- 9158 of Mark Taylor at (713) 853-7459 
with any questions.

Please schedule.  Mark
	George McClellan
	12/17/2000 06:17 PM
		 
Mark  - I would like to set a meeting for Monday afternoon,, Dec. 18 with all 
of the above to discuss Sempra.  Please advise a convenient time.  Thanks,

George

please schedule
	Debra Hicks@ENRON
	12/15/2000 01:43 PM
		 
The "final" Legal PRC meeting has been scheduled for next Friday, December 
22nd from 9:00 a.m. to 11:30 a.m. in conference room 50M03.  The call-in 
number for those of you unable to attend (Mike) is set forth below:  

Domestic: 800-991-9019
Passcode: 6549461#

Thanks.

Thanks for the update.  Keep spending time getting advice from Barbara.  Mark

I am confirming.  Mark

Please review the attached hypos and give me comments.  How do I make 2 and 3 
better?  What other hypos should I add?  Maybe one geared more toward Alberta?

Mark

Peter:

I have attached my work in progress to give you an idea of what I am looking 
for.  

Regards,

Mark

As a follow up to our meeting with the traders last week about litigation 
risks,  I have drafted the attached hypos (so far) for discussion about legal 
risks in the changing landscape.  Let me know if you have any comments.

My accomplishments for the year 2000 include the following:

1.    EEI Form Master Power Contract -- ENA Legal led the industry 
development of the first master power contract.  The form is rapidly becoming 
the industry standard for North America and in the process dramatically 
lowering costs and increasing liquidity.  In October, we put an EEI into 
place with PG&E with the result that Enron credit exposure is $50,000,000 
less than under the prior contract.

2.    New Legal Risk Rating Methodology -- implemented a legal rating system 
which simplifies the review of legal risks and makes it much easier to 
determine whether or not we are being appropriately compensated for the legal 
risks.

3.    EWS Legal Website for Training -- website has gone live for training 
regarding all major EWS legal issues.  This website will reduce training 
costs and increase availability of training to all employees.  

4.    Developing New Businesses -- integral part of developing and 
structuring Enron Online, bandwidth trading, equity trading, Clickpaper.com, 
insurance, pulp, coal, Japan and Australia.

5.     Litigation Settlements -- many disputes were settled favorably 
including Fort James, California Px, TVA and BPA.

6.    Deal Machine Never Stops -- projects having lots of complex legal 
issues cutting across multiple disciplines including MG Metals, Las Vegas 
Cogen II, Pastoria, sale of the Peakers, sale of HPL, Electrobolt, JV with 
Texaco (Bridgeline), posting agreements for Enron Online, East Coast Power, 
QF restructurings like Motown, Project Summer (sale of international assets) 
and on and on. 

7.    Deregulation of Energy Trading -- ENA legal formed an energy coalition 
and worked through ISDA and our Washington office to pass legislation to 
significantly reduce CFTC oversight of ENA's trading business.  

8.    Management -- built a deal-oriented team that understands the 
underlying businesses and is working to share the legal technology across 
Enron.  

Thanks so much for your help on the BEARing gifts program!  It is a great 
cause and your help will make Christmas a lot happier for a lot of kids who 
really have very difficult lives.  Most have never received anything new.  
Have a great holiday season!

Mark Haedicke 

Thanks.  Have a great Christmas!   Mark

	Angela Davis@ENRON
	12/20/2000 10:53 AM
		 
Attached is the legal risk memo for HEOF II's investment in the above 
referenced partnership.

Angela D. Davis

David:

My first choice would be Dec 29 and second, Jan 3.  Let me know, I will need 
to schedule the time.

Regards,

Mark  

	David Love-Dallas <DLove@russellreynolds.com>
	12/20/2000 09:59 AM
		 
Mark:  Just to keep the process going, could we meet in Houston on Fri. Dec
29 or Jan 3, 4, 5?  We are in One Allen Center, Suite 2840.  Thanks

David:

Per your request, I have attached a draft of my resume.

Regards,

Mark

                    Janette

                                         cc:

                    12/15/2000           Subject:     Resume

                    02:50 PM

 

 

Here's your resume.

(See attached file: meh-resume 12.15.00.doc)

Janette Elbertson
David: 
Per your request, I have attached a draft of my resume. 
Regards, 
Mark 

                                     
                    
Janette                                                                       
                 
                                                                              
                                     
                                                                              
                                     

Here's your resume. 
(See attached file: meh-resume 12.15.00.doc) 

Janette Elbertson 

I would try talking to Jenny Rub. She can refer you to the right person.   
Mark

	Gail Brownfeld@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/20/2000 08:19 AM
		 
Mark,
 Does EWS have a particular procedure for dealing with document retention 
issues asociated with litigated matters? Is there a particular IT person you 
would suggest we talk to concerning obtaining e-mails and tapes?  Thanks in 
advance.
                      Attorney-Client Privileged Communication

Since litigation has begun with Sempra, Somerset and Blue Grass, we should
see to it that documents relating to the issues in the lawsuit are
preserved.  For this purpose documents include not only hard copy but also
documents and information in electronic form and on voice or video
recordings.
It may well be that you will have questions on how to implement this
practice and more specifically what documents are covered. My suggestion is
that we start by trying to see that documents are not discarded and
determining what questions and issues there are.  Feel free to contact me
for guidance as you go forward.  It may well be that we should have a
conference call to see that everyone  is using the same procedures and to
address common issues.  If you think that would be desirable let me know.
We also need to see that other people who should get this notice have it
forwarded to them so that Enron's compliance is complete.

=======================================================
This email message is for the sole use of the intended recipient(s) and may 
contain confidential and privileged information. Any unauthorized review, 
use, disclosure or distribution is prohibited. If you are not the intended 
recipient, please contact the sender by reply email and destroy all copies of 
the original message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to 
postmaster@brobeck.com
BROBECK PHLEGER & HARRISON LLP
http://www.brobeck.com

Yes, through Thursday.  Mark

	Richard Lydecker@ENRON
	12/19/2000 03:38 PM
		 
Probably tomorrow (or we hope Thursday latest) we will be circulating a DASH 
for approval to sell our interests in three seismic companies for total 
consideration of approximately $2.5 million, net to Enron.  We have been 
working on this transaction for several months and think we can get it 
together this week.  Will you be available to review/sign this DASH this 
week?  Thanks.  Dick.

fyi
	Sheila Walton
	12/20/2000 02:35 PM
		 
Here is the sheet for reduced hours employees.

Please do not send me these messages as I do not have time to read them.  
Mark

Mark:  Should we get Cheryl Nelson to start getting up to speed on some of=
=20
the transportation and shipping issues?  Let me know.

Mark Haedicke
=09Enron Global Markets LLC - Office of the Chairman@ENRON
=09Sent by: Enron Announcements@ENRON
=0912/18/2000 09:21 PM
=09=09

Enron Global Markets (EGM) has made numerous organizational changes as its=
=20
businesses continue to grow and expand around the world.  We are pleased to=
=20
announce the following changes within EGM.

Financial Trading=20
The Convertible Arbitrage desk has moved from EnronCredit.com to the=20
Financial Trading group under Gary Hickerson.  Mike Bradley will manage the=
=20
desk. =20

Billy Lemmons has joined Gary Hickerson's group from EIM.  He is exploring=
=20
the agriculture value chain and origination opportunities.

Transportation and Shipping
Dan Reck will be transitioning out of the coal group and will be exploring=
=20
our rail and trucking initiatives.  These markets together represent=20
approximately $105 billion notionally, and we believe there are many=20
synergies between our energy, coal, and freight trading businesses. =20

Enron is currently trading dry-freight through EOL and is a leading market=
=20
maker in this new product. The shipping business is growing very quickly.  =
We=20
have asked Pierre Aury and Scott Montcrief to co-lead our worldwide vessel=
=20
trading businesses.  Scott will be responsible for all liquids vessel=20
businesses and Pierre will manage all dry vessel businesses.  The LNG vesse=
l=20
business currently managed by Wayne Perry will remain in the LNG group, but=
=20
will also report to and coordinate with Pierre and Scott.

Weather
Our worldwide weather operations will continue to report to Mark Tawney in=
=20
Houston.  This business, which includes trading weather products in 10=20
countries and 40 states in the U.S., is also rapidly expanding.  Mark will=
=20
have all V@R allocation responsibility between Sydney, Tokyo, Oslo, and=20
Houston.  In addition we will be forming a weather-marketing desk in London=
. =20

Crude and Products
Bill White will be coming over from EBS and will have responsibility for al=
l=20
U.S. financial crude trading.  Don Schroeder will continue to have oversigh=
t=20
and lead our physical crude business.  Mario De La Ossa has joined EGM from=
=20
Equiva and will manage our product options book.=20

Doug Leach will be expanding his fuel management and origination role.  He=
=20
will report directly to John Nowlan.

Finance and Structuring
Andrew Makk has joined the finance team from the Middle East group.  Most=
=20
recently he has been working on the Gaza project.

Jim Lewis has also joined this team. His last assignment was leading the=20
structuring group for CALME.

Both Andrew and Jim will report to Larry Lawyer.
=20
Corporate Development
Mark Wadlington has joined the EGM team and will be managing this activity=
=20
and co-ordinating with all Enron Corp. He reports to Tim Detmering with=20
accountability to the office of the chairman of EGM.

Operations and Accounting
Todd Hall has expanded his role as Business Controller and will have=20
responsibility for coal and weather.

Mike Perun has joined Enron from the banking industry and is responsible fo=
r=20
Controls & Standards.  He will focus on EGM=01,s operational and accounting=
=20
processes on a global basis.  He reports to Brent Price.

The Ecoelectrica power plant in Puerto Rico will move reporting=20
responsibility into the Enron Global Assets group.  Greg Curran, who is=20
responsible for all the activities in Puerto Rico, will report to that grou=
p=20
on all Ecoelectrica business and to Enron Global Markets on the remaining=
=20
businesses.

Please join us in congratulating everyone in their new roles.

Please make the changes marked by Sager.   Mark
	Elizabeth Sager
	12/19/2000 03:01 PM
		
Mark

Attached are my comments to your Hypotheticals.  
Call with any questions

Thanks 
Elizabeth
36349

I will plan on 10:00 am to noon in your Houston offices on Dec 29 unless I 
hear otherwise from you.  Thanks, Mark

	David Love-Dallas <DLove@russellreynolds.com>
	12/20/2000 03:31 PM
		 
Great; anytime Friday morning thru lunch.  I need to be back in Dallas early 
that afternoon.  Thanks Mark. 
David: 
My first choice would be Dec 29 and second, Jan 3.  Let me know, I will 
need to schedule the time. 
Regards, 
Mark 

                                                                              
                                         
                    David 
Love-Dallas                                                                   
               
                    AM                                                        
                                         
                                                                              
                                         
                                                                              
                                         

Mark:  Just to keep the process going, could we meet in Houston on Fri. Dec 
29 or Jan 3, 4, 5?  We are in One Allen Center, Suite 2840.  Thanks 
David: 
Per your request, I have attached a draft of my resume. 
Regards, 
Mark 

                    Janette 
Here's your resume. 
(See attached file: meh-resume 12.15.00.doc) 

Janette Elbertson 
David: 

Per your request, I have attached a draft of my resume. 

Regards, 

Mark 

Here's your resume. 

(See attached file: meh-resume 12.15.00.doc) 

Janette Elbertson 

For you to add the wire instructions which are in my out box.  Mark
	"Caren S. Sweetland" <csweetland@Gibbs-Bruns.com>
	12/21/2000 03:35 PM
		 
Attached please find the Settlement Agreement and Mutual Release, edited
pursuant to our discussion this morning.  Only one other change has been
made; Robin wanted to include the language "or which could have been
asserted" in paragraphs 6 and 7.  If you need any additional changes or have
any comments, please do not hesitate to contact me.

 <<#94919 v3 - TVA Settlement Agreement II.wpd>>

 - #94919 v3 - TVA Settlement Agreement II.wpd

I don't know what subscription she is talking about.  Please handle.  Mark
	Stephanie E Taylor
	12/28/2000 04:15 PM
		 
Dear Mark,

I am processing your subscription renewal and need your Company and Cost 
Center numbers.  Please send them to me as soon as you can.

Thanks and Happy New Year!

Stephanie E. Taylor
eSource/Houston
713-345-7928

I am trying to change my schedule, but so far I have a conflict for the 
dinner in London.   Mark

	Cynthia Richards <CRICHARDS@isda.org>
	12/28/2000 11:40 AM
		 
We would like to invite you to farewell dinners for Richard Grove in London
on January 18, 2001 (the evening of the Board meeting) and in New York on
January 25, 2001.

The dinners will be held at the following locations:

London:   Date: Thursday, January 18, 2001 at 7:00 PM     
Venue: Admiralty Restaurant              
Somerset House              
The Strand              London WC2                   

New York:  Date: Thursday, January 25, 2001 at 7:00 PM  
Venue: Remi              
Rialto Room              
144 West 54th Street              
(Between 6th and 7th Avenue)              
New York, NY 10019   

Please RSVP to Cynthia Richards in the New York office (ph:  212 332-1206 or
email: crichards@isda.org) if would to like to attend the dinner in one or
both locations.

Thank you.

Please talk to Frank and let me know how we should approach Coralina.  Have a 
happy new year!   Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/29/2000 12:00 PM
		 
Mark -

Thanks for your help yesterday with Francisco.  I haven't heard from him but 
will talk to him on Tuesday if he and I don't talk today.

As a follow-up to our discussion yesterday, I thought that I would pass along 
an e-mail from Coralina.  

Bruce

Coralina Rivera
12/14/2000 03:10 PM
I am former counsel with Enron Caribbean Basin, which included supporting 
legal for the Dom REP: SECLP and the LNG project in development , and for 
Puerto Rico: Eco Electrica, Progasco and ProCaribe. As part of the Enron 
restructuring, I have been assigned to Enron Global Markets. 
 I understand that the SECLP asset  in the Dominican Republic has been 
assigned to your group. I am in the process of moving to the Enron building 
before year end and I have been told that my office will have very limited 
storage space. Please let me to know where to send the SECLP files.
I will be available to assist in the transitioning of this matter.   

Thanks,

Coralina
x67926

Please review and give me your comments on the attached proposal re adopting 
a standard from 1 to 10 on legal risk ratings.  I am most concerned that the 
proposal works for our international transactions.  Let me know.  I would 
like to roll this out sometime in January.

Regards,

Mark

Rob, I am still waiting for the first run of the numbers for legal.  I will 
keep you posted.  Mark

	Rob Milnthorp
	01/03/2001 10:40 AM
		 
Folks, could you give me a heads up on proposed bonus #'s for your Canadian 
reports when you have a moment?

Thanks
Rob

yes

Please do not send me the reports anymore as I do not have time to read 
them.  Mark

On the commodity side of our business, there is a long list of lawsuits on 
commodity prices in CA.  This may be a committee discussion item.  Mark 

	Richard Grove <RGROVE@isda.org>
	01/02/2001 03:39 PM
		 
To the Memebers of the ISDA Board:

As we put together the agenda for the Jan. 18 Board meeting, we would like
to invite you to let us know of any issues that you would like to have
discussed at the meeting.  Please contact me if you would like to include an
issue on the agenda.

Rick

fyi
	Mark E Haedicke
	01/02/2001 04:04 PM
		 
Please review and give me your comments on the attached proposal re adopting 
a standard from 1 to 10 on legal risk ratings.  I am most concerned that the 
proposal works for our international transactions.  Let me know.  I would 
like to roll this out sometime in January.

Regards,

Mark

I propose that we continue to alternate the Office of General Counsel ("OGC") 
and Legal Committee ("LC") meetings of Enron Wholesale Services on Monday 
mornings at 8:30 am, Houston time.  The OGC and the LC would have the 
following members:
       
  OGC     LC
 Alan Aronowitz     OGC
 Mark Evans     Justin Boyd
 Barbara Gray     Michelle Cash
 Jeff Hodge     Steven Douglas
 Bruce Lundstrom    Peter Keohane
 Travis McCullough    John Novak
 Julia Murray     [Marcus Von Bock und Polach?]
 Elizabeth Sager     Dan Rogers
 Richard Sanders    Paul Simons
 Lance Schuler
 Mark Taylor
 Sheila Tweed
 Randy Young
 
Please give me your comments.  It is anticipated that we will continue to 
adjust the membership of both groups as the businesses continue to change.  I 
plan to address the policy committee in February.

     

The intent is that the higher the rating, the higher the legal risk.  I 
believe the jurisdictional risk is a key factor in creating legal issues even 
if none exist at the time the deal is done.  Does that make sense?  Stuart 
should be on the LC.  Randy is the GC of South America.

Mark  

	Lance Schuler-Legal
	01/04/2001 04:50 PM
		 
As for the email on Risk Memos:  I thought it looked good and is very 
appropriate.  I did note that there were 4 categories for low risk 
jurisdictions, and only 3 categories for each of medium and high risk 
jurisdictions.  Maybe we cannot have a "no legal" risk in a high risk 
jurisdiction; but what about "many significant" legal issues in a medium risk 
jurisdiction?  Is this then too many categories?   Also, would it make any 
sense to have ratings of 1 through 4 only, with a requirement to specify 
whether we are dealing with a low, medium or high risk jurisdiction?  In 
other words, could anyone be confused into believing that  a rating of 4 is 
better than a rating of a 5?  As currently set forth, a higher rating does 
not necessarily equate to a greater risk.  Unless a reader were very familiar 
with the rating scale, someone might interpret a low number, out of say 10, 
as having minimal risk, when ratings 4, 7 and 10 may actually be the "worst".

As for the OGC and Legal Committee:  I note only that Dan and Lisa would no 
longer be on the LC.  How do you think we would convey this to them?  Also, I 
was understanding that Stuart would start to be included.  I have also been 
asked recently where Randy Young technically fits within the system.  He is 
on the OGC, but I am still confused where he is technically on some 
organization chart.  

Thanks.  Lance.

W. Lance Schuler

Thanks for your comments.  I think it would be a good idea to have Jon on as 
well.  I will add Jon and Marcus to the list.  Please let them know as 
appropriate.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

	Mark Evans
	01/04/2001 01:45 PM
		
Mark,

thanks for the note. 

From the European perspective, I think the LC grouping makes sense. I think 
you definitely want Marcus on the call: Marcus will be heading all our non-UK 
European gas and power trading operations and so will be key going forward. 

Query whether you want Jon Chapman on the calls. Jon will not be doing any 
trading work but will doing the European assets work, akin to Bruce's group. 

        Mark

I propose that we continue to alternate the Office of General Counsel ("OGC") 
and Legal Committee ("LC") meetings of Enron Wholesale Services on Monday 
mornings at 8:30 am, Houston time.  The OGC and the LC would have the 
following members:
       
  OGC     LC
 Alan Aronowitz     OGC
 Mark Evans     Justin Boyd
 Barbara Gray     Michelle Cash
 Jeff Hodge     Steven Douglas
 Bruce Lundstrom    Peter Keohane
 Travis McCullough    John Novak
 Julia Murray     [Marcus Von Bock und Polach?]
 Elizabeth Sager     Dan Rogers
 Richard Sanders    Paul Simons
 Lance Schuler
 Mark Taylor
 Sheila Tweed
 Randy Young
 
Please give me your comments.  It is anticipated that we will continue to 
adjust the membership of both groups as the businesses continue to change.  I 
plan to address the policy committee in February.

     

Please review and give your thoughts to me and Randy.   Mark
	Randal Maffett
	01/04/2001 01:13 PM
		 
Last week during the holidays, we made a lot of progress w/ Fidelity 
regarding their "take-out" from the Partnership at Dallas.  We exchanged 2 
drafts of a Letter Agreement which says ENA (or an affiliate) will buy their 
99% LP interest in Landfill Gas Investments, LP (LGI) on or before Jan 31, 
2001.  Included in our draft was a provision whereby the ENE Guaranty would 
be extinguished.  However, late yesterday Fidelity came back and said they're 
not willing to extinguish the Guaranty completely.  The way the deal w/ 
Fidelity will be structured, ENA will pay them the delta between the $5.2MM 
initial payment they made less the accrued tax credits on the date we close 
(est to be $300K+/-).  Fidelity wants 2 things:

protection in the event the IRS disallows/disqualifies the tax credits 
accrued (i.e., the $300K), and
protection against any environmental claims that may have occurred while they 
were a partner in LGI (June, 200 thru Jan, 2001).

There are 2 basic alternatives to consider:

replace the existing guaranty to LGI with a new guaranty to Fidelity with a 
specific cap on the tax credit amount ($300K+/-) and with the same 
environmental coverage (up to $5MM) as currently exists but restricting it to 
issues which occurred while they were a partner.  The probability of either 
ever being triggered is extremely remote.  Replacing the benefactor from LGI 
to Fidelity is significant for us because it eliminates future environmental 
exposure related to LGI as well as prevents potential future buyers of our LP 
interest from seeing that ENE once was willing to issue such a guaranty.
replace the existing guaranty with an indemnity from ENA which provides 
Fidelity with the same protection as alternative #1.  Per ENA accounting 
since the amount of exposure is limited to $5.3MM in aggregate, this would 
not be significant/material enough to be separately identified as a balance 
sheet item.

The problem we have is Fidelity has a Guaranty "in hand" and unless you give 
me approval to go back and structure our deal around them, we don't have any 
leverage to get them to release it.  They are willing to work with us on 
either of the 2 alternatives listed above.  This is the only remaining 
commercial issue left w/ Fidelity.

Please advise or call to discuss further.  Ext. 33212.  Thanks!

RANDY

Why should we hold them harmless on environmental if they get their money 
out?  We would only want to provide an ENA indemnity if necessary.  I have 
asked Lisa to look at this.  Mark

	Randal Maffett
	01/04/2001 01:13 PM
		 
Last week during the holidays, we made a lot of progress w/ Fidelity 
regarding their "take-out" from the Partnership at Dallas.  We exchanged 2 
drafts of a Letter Agreement which says ENA (or an affiliate) will buy their 
99% LP interest in Landfill Gas Investments, LP (LGI) on or before Jan 31, 
2001.  Included in our draft was a provision whereby the ENE Guaranty would 
be extinguished.  However, late yesterday Fidelity came back and said they're 
not willing to extinguish the Guaranty completely.  The way the deal w/ 
Fidelity will be structured, ENA will pay them the delta between the $5.2MM 
initial payment they made less the accrued tax credits on the date we close 
(est to be $300K+/-).  Fidelity wants 2 things:

protection in the event the IRS disallows/disqualifies the tax credits 
accrued (i.e., the $300K), and
protection against any environmental claims that may have occurred while they 
were a partner in LGI (June, 200 thru Jan, 2001).

There are 2 basic alternatives to consider:

replace the existing guaranty to LGI with a new guaranty to Fidelity with a 
specific cap on the tax credit amount ($300K+/-) and with the same 
environmental coverage (up to $5MM) as currently exists but restricting it to 
issues which occurred while they were a partner.  The probability of either 
ever being triggered is extremely remote.  Replacing the benefactor from LGI 
to Fidelity is significant for us because it eliminates future environmental 
exposure related to LGI as well as prevents potential future buyers of our LP 
interest from seeing that ENE once was willing to issue such a guaranty.
replace the existing guaranty with an indemnity from ENA which provides 
Fidelity with the same protection as alternative #1.  Per ENA accounting 
since the amount of exposure is limited to $5.3MM in aggregate, this would 
not be significant/material enough to be separately identified as a balance 
sheet item.

The problem we have is Fidelity has a Guaranty "in hand" and unless you give 
me approval to go back and structure our deal around them, we don't have any 
leverage to get them to release it.  They are willing to work with us on 
either of the 2 alternatives listed above.  This is the only remaining 
commercial issue left w/ Fidelity.

Please advise or call to discuss further.  Ext. 33212.  Thanks!

RANDY

I think the cut is going to be that a person runs a group.  Mark

	Alan Aronowitz
	01/04/2001 12:18 PM
		
This list looks fine to me.

However, what about Ned Crady?

I propose that we continue to alternate the Office of General Counsel ("OGC") 
and Legal Committee ("LC") meetings of Enron Wholesale Services on Monday 
mornings at 8:30 am, Houston time.  The OGC and the LC would have the 
following members:
       
  OGC     LC
 Alan Aronowitz     OGC
 Mark Evans     Justin Boyd
 Barbara Gray     Michelle Cash
 Jeff Hodge     Steven Douglas
 Bruce Lundstrom    Peter Keohane
 Travis McCullough    John Novak
 Julia Murray     [Marcus Von Bock und Polach?]
 Elizabeth Sager     Dan Rogers
 Richard Sanders    Paul Simons
 Lance Schuler
 Mark Taylor
 Sheila Tweed
 Randy Young
 
Please give me your comments.  It is anticipated that we will continue to 
adjust the membership of both groups as the businesses continue to change.  I 
plan to address the policy committee in February.

     

I agree with your reasoning.  Mark

	Christian Yoder
	01/04/2001 03:37 PM
		 
The CalPx has written us a letter saying that if we do not sign their 
proposed indemnity agreement by January 12, we will have to post collateral 
(letter of credit) for the full extent of our exposure to them (approx 
$25million).  Implicit in this demand is the threat that if we do not post 
the collateral, they will not allow us to do any business with them.

All things considered, I recommend that we consider posting the collateral 
and that we do not sign the indemnity agreement.  This recommendation assumes 
that we want to continue to do some residual business with the CalPX.  
Obviously, if our traders don't care about doing any business with them, we 
should just call their bluff and quit trading with them, but I don't think we 
would really want to do this.

The reason why I do not think we should sign the indemnity agreement is 
because it exposes us (Enron Corp.) to the very real PX credit meltdown 
risk.  Under the PX's Surety Bond with AIG,  if creditors of the CalPX,  say, 
the big three California Utilities for example,  teetering as they are on the 
brink of insolvency,  were to default to the PX, then AIG must keep the CalPX 
whole.  If AIG pays any money to the PX, it will immediately turn to its 
indemnity agreements with all the non-defaulting participants (including 
ours)  and try to recover from them.  Although the indemnity agreements 
purport to limit  AIG's ability to recover from us to our own specific 
default with the PX,  I do not think we should rely on the wording of the 
agreement to guarantee that we would not be washed into some kind of broader 
claim by AIG in a meltdown situation.  The wording is too ambiguous.   If I 
were outside counsel, I would not write us a legal opinion saying that if we 
signed the indemnity agreement we would not have any exposure in a meltdown.  

Therefore, given the solvency crisis with the big three utilities, I think we 
should assume there will be a major payment default and  I think,  if we must 
continue to do business with the PX, we should do it on the basis of posting 
collateral for our exposure.  Such collateral would be clearly tied to our 
own default and we should be able to control our own default risk with them.  
I have asked Tracy to set up a conference call to go over this reasoning.  
----cgy

 

Please stop sending the newsletter to me.  Mark

Chris:

I would like to be kept up to date on who the potential candidates are.  We 
are planning on inviting Newsome to speak at our ISDA conference in March.

Thanks,

Mark

	Chris Long@ENRON
	01/08/2001 09:14 AM
		 
As the Bush transition moves forward, we need to monitor (or perhaps try to 
influence) the selection of the new CFTC Chair/Commissioners. 

As noted below, Jim Newsome has been selected as Acting Chair.  I mentioned 
this to Ken Raisler and Stacy Carey.  Everyone agrees that Newsome is a known 
quantity, though he may not be a superstar in the mold of Bill Ranier.   Ken 
said Newsome knows our issues and is favorable to a "free market" approach to 
energy and metals.  However, there is some concern about his ability to reign 
in the CFTC staff.  Newsome is the favorite currently for the position with 
boosters in Senators Lott and Cochran and his college roommate Rep. Jerry 
Moran (R-KS).  However, it is still early in the game and unknown Chair 
candidates could still be out there (including officials passed over for more 
high profile positions).

If Newsome is nominated as the Chair, an additional Commissioner (a 
Republican) position opens and will be named by Speaker Denny Hastert.  
Hastert is from the suburbs and the assumption is that he the Chicago 
exchanges may influence the appointment.  Stacy Carey is poking around to 
determine what Chicago exchanges are thinking.   One name that has been 
mentioned often is retired Congressman Tom Ewing who has expressed interest 
in a Commission seat, but not the Chair (Ewing is supportive of our issues).

David Spears is also likely to leave, but no date has been announced.  This 
is also a Republican seat.  The Democrats Barbara Holum and Tom Erickson are 
likely to stick around until their terms expire.

We can try to float names of persons we would like to see either Chair or 
join the Commission.  Also, we have learned that Wendy Gramm has list of 
names she may be shopping around for CFTC and SEC - it would be good the see 
who Gramm is proposing.

Please advise how you want to proceed in either reviewing or suggesting the 
appointees.

Thanks - Chris

	
No. 05 
Monday January 8, 2001	Page A-4 
	ISSN 1523-567X
	Regulation, Law & Economics
	
	Futures Trading
Newsome Elected Acting Chair;
Favors 'Free-Market' Philosophy

The Commodity Futures Trading Commission has elected Jim Newsome as its 
acting chairman, the agency announced Jan. 5. 
Newsome, a Republican, will assume the role played by outgoing Chairman 
William Rainer, who announced last month that he would resign his position 
effective Jan. 19. 
Newsome, a native of Plant City, Fla., was nominated to the CFTC in July 1998 
and sworn in Aug. 10 that same year. Immediately before joining the 
commission, Newsome was chairman of the Mississippi Agribusiness Council and 
served as executive vice president of the Mississippi Cattlemen's Association 
and Mississippi Beef Council. 

Levels of Oversight

Newsome, who could not be reached for comment Jan. 5, told BNA last month 
that he favors a "free-market philosophy," something he said helped him work 
productively with the like-minded Rainer, who was a Democrat. He praised in 
particular the CFTC's new regulatory framework that was approved by the 
commission last fall. The rulemaking largely was withdrawn after Congress 
essentially codified the initiative in the Commodity Futures Modernization 
Act passed in December. 
The new tiered-system creates different levels of oversight meant to 
differentiate between different levels of investor sophistication. "We've 
tried to develop a much more flexible regulatory scheme that allows for more 
competition for futures markets participants," Newsome said. 

Copyright , 2001 by The Bureau of National Affairs, Inc., Washington D.C.

Thanks for the update.  Good luck in NY.   Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	01/08/2001 08:56 AM
		 
Gentlemen -

We are currently in the processing of serving/delivering the GOM Guarantee 
demand and the PPA Meet and Discuss Letter.  Ken Lay approved the delivery in 
a conference call this morning.  Our attention will then turn to the GOI 
Guarantee demand (can be served a week from today), the Notice of Arbitration 
under the GOM Guarantee and anticipation of injunctive relief being sought by 
our counterparties to stay any arbitration and collection/payment on the 
guarantees.

We are scheduled to meet with the lenders in NY tomorrow.

Bruce

Bruce Lundstrom
01/05/2001 01:57 PM
Jim/Mark -

I know that Rob has been keeping you generally apprised, but I thought that I 
would update you both on the quickly evolving Dabhol situation.

The commercial situation at Dahbol Power Company is deteriorating pretty 
rapidly.  MSEB is now approx. 45 days late on payment in full of the October 
invoice.  They have paid only a relatively modest portion of that bill.  
Payment on the November bill is about 15 days late.  The MSEB Chairman says 
that MSEB can't pay these invoices.

At present, the Governments of Maharashtra and India are refusing to engage 
in a constructive dialogue on solving the non-payment issue and the 1400 MW 
that will come on line as part of Phase II.  They say that they recognize 
their obligations as guarantors of MSEB's obligations but are not interested 
in helping in any different capacity (e.g., GOI buys some or all of Phase II).

Until just a few days ago, the lead India bank was refusing to fund even 
their own ongoing interest obligation.  At present, they are refusing to 
continue funding any other Phase II draw request.  The India banks have a 
great deal to lose and, in our opinion, should strongly consider continuing 
to fund Phase II.  It would seem that the lead India bank is scared, knaive 
or, worse yet, very pessimistic about Dabhol's future -- perhaps there are 
other reasons for their current position.

We are meeting with the international banks in NY on Tuesday.  Our main goal 
is to convince them to continue to fund and to use their influence to have 
the India banks do the same.

The current India legal crisis team is nearly identical to the 1995 India 
legal crisis team.  The same law firms and lawyers (both Indian and 
international) are continuing to play much the same roles.

We have not identified any particular "holes" in Dabhol's legal position.  
While the India newspapers have offered up various theories that might allow 
MSEB to cancel the PPA (frustration of purpose, etc.), none seem compelling.  
No counterparty has offered up any of these theories directly to DPC.

In the short term, we are preparing (1) a demand under the GOM guarantee and 
(2) a "meet and discuss" letter under the PPA.  The current plan is to serve 
these next week.  We are also preparing (3) an arbitration notice under the 
GOM guarantee, (4) a demand under the GOI guarantee and (5) an action against 
MERC.  MERC is the Maharashtra Energy Regulatory Commission.  They have 
issued "orders" over the last year limiting the amount of power that MESB 
buys from Dabhol.  We do not believe that they have jurisdiction to do so.  
We may or may not ultimately file this action.

Let me know if I can provide any further information.

Bruce

There will be an OGC meeting this afternoon from 1:30 to 2:30 PM in EB38C2 
regarding PRC matters.  Please plan to attend.

There will be an OGC meeting this afternoon from 5:00-5:30 PM in EB38C2 
regarding PRC matters.  Please plan to attend.

What would you propose?  I am open to whatever makes sense.  Should we ask 
him to move to Sao Paulo?     Mark

	Randy Young@ENRON
	01/09/2001 06:07 AM
		 
John Novak's expat contract expires around March 16th.  As his supervisor, I 
need to tell him what we intend to do with it.  I would like to give him an 
indication sooner rather than later (if we are going to renew, what will be 
the term, etc.?). Please let me know your thoughts as soon as possible.  ry
John Novak
01/04/2001 06:09 AM
Randy -- My ex-pat contract is expiring in a couple of months (March 16th, I 
think) and I'm wondering if now is the right time to start discussing 
renewal, etc.   Please let me know.  Thanks.

Rgds,
 John

Why wouldn't Dan see Johan's number?   Mark

	Angela Ernest@EES
	01/08/2001 08:44 AM
		 
Mark,

Please advise.

Thanks
Angela
CALME HR
6-7783

Rick Bergsieker@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
01/07/2001 04:19 AM
With regard to Geresse, check with Mark Haedicke to see if Dan ultimately 
needs to see Johan's bonus amount.  You will probably need to explain the 
problem to Mark.

Angela Ernest@EES
01/05/2001 08:41 AM
Rick,

I forwarded your email on Stromquist and forwarded to EGEP's HR Department to 
communicate to his Manager.  Additionally, Janie intentionally excluded Johan 
Gerrese's bonus from Dan Rogers' bonus spreadsheet because of the amount of 
his bonus.  Is it all right if Dan see this?  Please advise.

Thanks
AKE
713-646-7783

Thanks for the update.  Sounds like things are coming together.  Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	01/06/2001 10:09 AM
		 
Mark -

I won't be able to attend the EWS Legal Monday meeting due to Dabhol but 
thought that I would give you a couple of updates:

I think that we have Francisco squared away -- Coralina is back from vacation 
this week.  If I can get some of Coralina's time for Puerto Rico, I feel 
covered on Central America/Carribean.

Miguel Mendoza is back from vacation this coming week as well.  I don't have 
a good feel for South America yet but think that I do now for the rest of 
Global Assets (APACHI, CALME and India).  I'm delaying my trip to India to 
spend some time with Miguel next week.

Dabhol is still pretty much the center of the Global Assets universe.  I have 
nothing to add to my Friday update that I sent to you.

I hope all is well.

Bruce

Randy.  What do other multinationals operating in Brazil do?  JP Morgan or 
Citibank?   Mark

	Randy Young@ENRON
	01/10/2001 06:49 AM
		
For what it is worth, I agree with Sami's concern that we may laboring under 
a false sense of security in assuming that a foreign arbitration provision in 
a Brazilian contract, between Brazilian contracting parties relating to a 
Brazilian matter in controversy would be easily enforced by a Brazilian 
court.  Inevitably, we have to fight hard for these "concessions" in our 
negotiations and end up leaving a lot of Enron consideration (not to mention 
blood and sweat) on the table to get these provisions inserted in our 
contracts.  If we are really being "taken" by these crafty Brazilian lawyers 
(like the former General Counsel of the Odebrecht Group), I think we should 
re-think the policy in this specific instance.

Elektro, because it is the fifth largest electricity LDC in Brazil, has a 
long history of litigation in the Sao Paulo courts (we had a number of cases, 
you will recall, when we bought it, and have had others since). It is clearly 
not the only substantial, high-profile Brazilian company Enron has down here, 
making it a little hard for us to negotiate these provisions as "foreigners"  
the way we do elsewhere.  

By all means we should check with Jose Emilio, but if he shares Sami's (and, 
I have to say, my) concerns, I think we should consider making a special rule 
for Brazil-to-Brazil contracting transactions.  Perhaps we could have the 
first position be ICC arbitration in Sao Paulo (in English?), with a forum 
savings clause that states that if the arbitration provision is held 
unenforceable that the litigation will be in the courts (federal, if 
possible) of Sao Paulo.  The worst thing that could happen is that we enter 
into an arbitration provision, thinking we are safe, and end up in some court 
in a smaller city in a backwater part of Brazil where they are a little loose 
on the law and perhaps even looser on the concepts of justice, due process, 
etc.

If you would like me to be involved in the further discussions, let me know.

Randy

Sami Arap
01/10/2001 06:20 AM
Thanks again, Bob.

I will call Jos, Emilio to check.  I agree that a foreign arbitral award is 
enforceable in Brazil (whether international or local aspects are under 
discussion) provided that you follow the "exequatur" procedure at the 
Brazilian Supreme Court.  I have personally participated in the enforcement 
of a foreign arbital award against Odebrecht a few years ago.

However, the point I am raising is that in case one of the two Brazilian 
contracting entities challenge such foreign arbitration clause and refer the 
matter under dispute to a local court, it is most likely that the Brazilian 
judge will accept jurisdiction and review the case, in accordance with 
Article 88 (I)(II)(III) of the Brazilian Civil Procedure Code.  In such 
event, if Enron (please note that I am always & only referring to an Enron 
Brazilian entity) agrees to a foreign arbitration clause with a Brazilian 
counterparty, it may end up resolving its contractual disputes at the 
Brazilian courts (and this is exactly what I am trying to avoid by suggesting 
ICC arbitration in S?o Paulo for all contracts entered into between two 
Brazilian entities).

Even if the two Brazilian contracting entities refer the matter under dispute 
to foreign arbitration and, at the same time or at a later stage, one of the 
parties decide to challenge the foreign arbitration clause and refer the 
matter to the local courts, it is most likely that the Brazilian Supreme 
Court will recognize the local courts jurisdiction and decide that the 
foreign arbitration clause was null and void.

I will be in Houston on Friday, January 26, and would very much appreciate 
the opportunity to discuss this matter in detail with you and possibly with 
Rob Walls and/or Jim Derrick.

Regards,

Sami

Robert C Williams@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
01/09/2001 10:18 PM
Sami,

I agree on the issue of Brazilian law.  But on the question of foreign 
arbitration, our advice has been that such a clause will be enforced by the 
local courts, even if the dispute has no international aspects other than the 
parent is foreign (although there was a dissenting opinion from one lawyer on 
this issue).   Could you check this point with Jose Emilio Pinto at Tozzini 
or Fernando Serec?  As to local arbitration, we have accepted this where the 
dollar amount of the disputes is likely to be less than $500,000.  We should 
probably also have a cumulative cap of, say, $5 million.   On bigger deals, 
Rob orJim have resisted local court jurisdiction.  The most flexible they 
have been to my knowledge where more $ is at stake is to agree to 
ICC-administered arbitration in Sao Paulo.  In this case, I think we should 
propose the local arbitration procedure which would is best calculated to 
result in an impartial award, whether that be ad hoc, ICC, FIESP, or 
Canadian-Brazilian C of C.  Jose Emilio would have a view on this, too.  Hope 
this is helpful.

Bob  

Sami Arap@ENRON
01/09/2001 04:48 PM
	

Michelle and Bob;

Thanks for the reply.  The issue here is when Brazilian entities (only) are 
entering into a contract which obligations will only be performed in Brazil 
and such agreement is governed by Brazilian laws.  My understanding of the 
Enron arbitration policy (and please correct me if I am wrong) is that when 
Enron (as a foreign company) is dealing with foreign governments, 
governmental agencies or government-owned companies, or private companies 
from the host company, we must follow our internal policy by choosing 
preferred arbitration rules, preferred place of arbitration and preferred 
governing law.

In case of Elektro, as well as any other Brazilian Enron entity (EAS, ECE 
etc), entering into a contract with another Brazilian party with obligations 
to be performed in Brazil, such contract will most likely be governed by 
Brazilian laws.  Although the parties are in principle able to select a 
foreign law in Brazil, the contracting parties must comply with local public 
policy.  I strongly advise that two or more Brazilian parties contracting 
obligations in Brazil agree that the respective contract be governed by the 
laws of Brazil.

With respect to the dispute resolution mechanism, we are all aware of Enron's 
policy to avoid referring disputes to the Brazilian courts.  In case of the 
above mentioned Elektro deal, the idea is to submit all contract 
controversies to arbitration under ICC rules in S?o Paulo.  To me, the 
question is whether we use "ad hoc" arbitration OR institutional arbitration 
(i.e. submit the matter to FIESP or the Canadian-Brazilian Chamber of 
Commerce to act as the "arbitration administrator").

FYI since I joined Enron, I've been told that all of Enron's Brazilian 
entities should use foreign arbitration as their contracts' dispute 
resolution mechanism.  In my opinion, this concept may not work the way Enron 
wants.  If the local Enron entity is dealing with another Brazilian party and 
(suppose) both parties have agreed to use ICC arbitration in NY, it is most 
likely that, in case the Brazilian counterparty decides to refer the matter 
under dispute to the Brazilian courts, the local judge will accept 
jurisdiction and review the case.  You may ask "why".  The reason is because 
there are two Brazilian parties contracting obligations to be performed in 
Brazil under the laws of Brazil; as a consequence a local judge will accept 
jurisdiction.

I'd very much like to emphasize that, while working as General Counsel of the 
Odebrecht Group, I use to accept foreign arbitration clauses in contracts 
entered with Affiliates of foreign companies because I knew that, at the end 
of the day, I could always challenge the dispute resolution mechanism agreed 
in the contract and refer the matter to the local courts.  Since Odebrecht's 
counterparties did not do their homework properly ...

Arbitration was first introduced in Brazil through the Federal Constitution 
of 1824.  The Civil Code of 1916 ractified the use of arbitration, however, 
it obliged the arbitral award to be reviewed by the local courts.  Only in 
1996, with the issuance of the Brazilian Arbitration Act (Law 9307), it was 
recognized the use of arbitration as a definitive dispute resolution 
mechanism without having to submit the final arbitral award to the review of 
the local courts.

With respect to enforceability, please note that the arbitral award is final, 
binding and enforceable towards the contracting parties.  Only in case a 
Party decides not to comply with the final arbital award, the other Party may 
refer the arbitral award to a local judge to obtain an "exequatur".

Please feel free to contact me at the earliest possible convenience to 
continue to discuss this arbitration matter.

Rgds,

Sami

Robert C Williams@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
01/09/2001 03:55 PM
There was a concern at one point that FIESP would favor big, "homegrown" 
companies.   I'm sure Sami knows more about this than I do, though.

Michelle Blaine
01/09/2001 12:37 PM
Definitely we do not want to submit to the local courts.  Do suggest ICC 
arbitration but I am only vaguely familiar with FIESP. I think that is fine, 
but please remind me what it is.  I am going to call you from my cell in a 
little bit because I have to leave the office.

Sami Arap@ENRON
01/09/2001 11:47 AM
	

Elektro is participating in the negotiation of a telecom project to form a 
SPC among Elektro and four other LDCs (Bandeirante, CPFL, CTEEP and EPTE).  
The SPC will be named "SP Telecom".  SP Telecom will develop 
telecommunication services using the LDCs' infra-structure.  After SP 
Telecom's formation, an investor will be selected to purchase the majority of 
the company's shares.  Elektro will have a 5% participation in SP Telecom and 
this deal will generate approximately US$10MM in revenues for Elektro.

The Parties have been discussing a draft MOU for several months, however, 
this matter came to my attention only a few weeks ago.  The MOU has been 
reviewed by all Parties and is currently on final rounds of negotiation.

There is one pending issue which I need to discuss with you before I get Jim 
Derrick's sign-off.  CTEEP and EPTE (state and private owned LDCs) have 
requested that the MOU, as well as any other SP Telecom project agreement, 
includes a dispute resolution mechanism through the courts of S?o Paulo.  I 
have discussed this matter with Jose Margalith (Elektro's in-house counsel) 
and Randy Young, and have suggest Margalith to offer ICC arbitration at FIESP 
(the S?o Paulo State Industries Federation) as an alternative.

Orlando Gonzalez asked me to assist him to resolve this pending issue at the 
earliest possible convenience.  Any thoughts or ideas ?  Please feel free to 
call me (55-11-5503-1226).

Tks for your assistance to this matter.

Sami Arap

Mark:  Please handle.  Should Greenberg work on this?   Mark
	Nora Dobin@ENRON
	01/09/2001 07:13 PM
		 
Attached please find an outline of a proposal for a business relationship 
between DealBench and Freshfields.   Rob, Jordan and I have been considering 
this from a legal relationships perspective and request your thoughts on 
same.  

Tobias Munk of DealBench has been working on developing this 
DealBench/Freshfields relationship for a couple of months.  Tobias came to 
DealBench from Enron London to help develop a capability to do due diligence 
on the DealBench platform (the dataroom product).  He initiated contact with 
Freshfields (Hugh Crisp) before moving to Houston.   DealBench has been aware 
that this relationship would be subject to approval by Enron legal management.

The proposed relationship essentially is a business referral one:  DealBench 
would pay Freshfields 10% of site license fees paid to DealBench by customers 
referred by Freshfields.  Freshfields also would provide up to 100 hours of 
consulting services regarding the dataroom product for no additional monetary 
consideration but DealBench would give Freshfields exclusive recognition for 
helping DealBench develop the dataroom product in Europe and Asia. DealBench 
advises that Freshfields believes it would benefit from the publicity 
associated with being part of the development of an e-commerce product.  The 
DealBench commercial team is very interested in moving forward with 
Freshfields.  Although Freshfields cannot guarantee any referrals, DealBench 
believes the relationship would be fruitful for it commercially because of 
Freshfields' prominence in M&A transactions in Europe and Asia. 

Before DealBench moves further with Freshfields, it would like legal 
clearance.  We look forward to hearing from you.

Regards, NJD

Nora J. Dobin
Senior Counsel
Enron Global Finance
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith Street
Houston, Texas  77002

713/345-7723 (phone)
713/853-9252 (fax)
E-mail:  nora.dobin@enron.com

fyi
	jprussell@duke-energy.com
	01/09/2001 02:15 PM
		 
Resending.
             
                    JoAnn P                                                   
             
elizabeth.sager@enron.com                         
                    01/09/01             cc:                                  
             
                    12:43 PM             Subject:     ISDA 
Membership                      
                                                                              
             
                                                                              
             

I am actively pursuing have Duke Energy become an ISDA member this month.
We are very interested in supporting the effort you mentioned at the
October meeting to begin developing one universal master energy trading
form.  Please keep me informed of future meetings, to insure our active
participation as this effort develops.  Thanks.

I would like to sit in from 230 to 300.  Thanks.  Mark

I appreciate you making the trip to Houston.  Mark

	"DAN FOURNIER" <dan.fournier@blakes.com>
	01/04/2001 09:22 AM
		 
Mark, David Jackson and I will meet with you at 11:30 am on the 21st of 
February. We look forward to seeing you and Jim. Best regards, Dan.
 
Daniel P. E. Fournier 
Blake, Cassels & Graydon LLP
3500, 855 2nd Street S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
T2P 4J8 
Tel: 403-260-9636
Fax: 403-260-9700
Email: dpef@blakes.com
 
This email communication is confidential and legally privileged.
If you are not the intended recipient, please notify me at the telephone 
number shown above or by return email and delete this communication and 
any copy immediately.  Thank you.

I never heard of the company.  Mark

	Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org>
	01/10/2001 04:43 PM
		 
Mark:

We have recently been talking to a gentleman named Ed Straub at Duke.  I'll
see if I can push him perhaps by telling them they can speak in Houston if
they join up?

I also spoke with Constellation Energy today and they are serious about
joining as a Primary.  I might even be able to have their application by
next week's Board meeting.

Sorry if I asked you this before, but do you or anyone at Enron know Powder
Horn Petroleum Company out of Tulsa, OK?  They have applied as a Subscriber.

Thanks.
Mary

fyi

                    jprussell@duke-

                                           cc:

                    01/09/2001             Subject:     ISDA Membership

                    02:15 PM

 

 

Resending.
                    JoAnn P

                                         elizabeth.sager@enron.com

                    01/09/01             cc:

                    12:43 PM             Subject:     ISDA Membership

I am actively pursuing have Duke Energy become an ISDA member this month.
We are very interested in supporting the effort you mentioned at the
October meeting to begin developing one universal master energy trading
form.  Please keep me informed of future meetings, to insure our active
participation as this effort develops.  Thanks.

In reviewing the contracts, so far I have the following questions:

1.     Have Oman LNG and ADgas taken the risk of non-performance by DPC and 
indirectly MSEB without any credit support?  The only security is the equity 
in DPC?  Are such contracts typically secured or done with a buyer with deep 
pockets?  How much value was put into DPC by the shareholders?

2.     Are there local public policy issues that could be addressed by local 
courts with respect to the LNG contracts?  Fraud?  Bribery?  Are there any 
local law issues with respect to performance or interpretation of the 
contracts?  Isn't take-or-pay meaningless without credit support?

3.     What are the arguments for DPC to terminate the contracts?  Only where 
the PPA is terminated?  Payments?

4.    Who negotiated the contracts?  Were there requests for credit support?  
From Enron?  Did Enron ever promise to indirectly "backstop" the contracts by 
its investment in Dabhol?

5.   What was the discussion regarding the "reduction in operational 
capability" language in the contracts?  What was the language meant to 
cover?  Do we need our counterparty's approval to investigate other markets?

6.   Is there any argument that DPC has already breached the contracts?  
Could our counterparties issue a press release claiming damages over the 
entire term of the contract? Confidentiality and press releases?

In reviewing the contracts, so far I have the following questions:

1.     Have Oman LNG and ADgas taken the risk of non-performance by DPC and 
indirectly MSEB without any credit support?  The only security is the equity 
in DPC?  Are such contracts typically secured or done with a buyer with deep 
pockets?  How much value was put into DPC by the shareholders?

2.     Are there local public policy issues that could be addressed by local 
courts with respect to the LNG contracts?  Fraud?  Bribery?  Are there any 
local law issues with respect to performance or interpretation of the 
contracts?  Isn't take-or-pay meaningless without credit support?

3.     What are the arguments for DPC to terminate the contracts?  Only where 
the PPA is terminated?  Payments?

4.    Who negotiated the contracts?  Were there requests for credit support?  
From Enron?  Did Enron ever promise to indirectly "backstop" the contracts by 
its investment in Dabhol?

5.   What was the discussion regarding the "reduction in operational 
capability" language in the contracts?  What was the language meant to 
cover?  Do we need our counterparty's approval to investigate other markets?

6.    Is there any argument that DPC has already breached the contracts?  
Could our counterparties issue a press release claiming damages over the 
entire term of the contract? Confidentiality and press releases?

7.    What is the law on piercing the corporate veil for an Indian company 
like DPC?  Could this issue be considered separate from the contract and be 
litigated in India or Oman and thus outside the arbitration?

8.     What is the list of all documents that could impact on whether or not 
Enron has any exposure under the LNG contracts?

9.     Are there instances where the Dabhol project could fail and the LNG 
contracts would not novate to MSEB?  Why does it matter if the LNG contract 
obligations novate to MSEB if DPC has no money?

10.   Other potential claims against Enron if the LNG contracts are 
terminated or not performed?

Please give Christian a call on this and make sure you are satisfied we not 
taking too great a risk.  Mark
	Christian Yoder
	01/12/2001 10:06 AM
		 
Greg Wolfe
01/11/2001 05:07 PM
Steve:

The CDWR idea has already been implemented. Today the ISO couldn't get supply 
from the market and informed market participants that CDWR would sleeve deals 
to the ISO. This occurred at a time when CA was in Stage 3 emergency (only 
the second one ever) and anticipating rolling blackouts this evening. Enron 
and other suppliers began to aggregate supply to sell to CDWR presumably to 
go to the ISO.  Belden was concerned that Gray Davis may just withhold 
payment through CDWR when settlements are due. This concern prompted us to 
require paper confirms for hourly deals and a discussion between Christian 
Yoder and Steve Hall (Stoel Rives) with the assistant director at CDWR to 
make sure CDWR management was on board - which they confirmed verbally. 
Regardless of all of this we still have some paranoia about getting paid. Is 
Gray Davis willing to confirm that no payment issue through CDWR will occur? 
We are currently continuing to aggregate supply through the day but are 
hesitant to increase quantities without such assurance. Other suppliers 
appeared hesitant as well as they wouldn't sleeve the deals to CDWR.

Please find attached my draft summary relative to the above contracts.  Let 
me know if you have any corrections.

Mark Haedicke

I was convinced otherwise by Randy.

	Janette Elbertson
	01/16/2001 10:36 AM
		 
John:

I talked with Mark Haedicke this morning regarding the best way to get you 
connected for the Monday morning staff meetings.  He would like you to let 
both him and I know (possibly by the preceding Friday Houston time) at what 
number he can call you to conference you into the meeting each Monday morning.

We discussed getting a bridgeline; however, it is best if Mark calls the 
various participants and adds them in by conference call.  

Thank you.

Janette Elbertson

You are welcome.  Take care.  Mark

	Peter Keohane
	01/16/2001 10:34 AM
		 
Mark, thanks for the confidence and support you continue to show in me with 
the recent promotion.  I hope to meet expectations.

Peter.

Mark:

I am still coming to London, but for a very short time.  I would like to get 
together either in London on a future trip or in Houston.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

	Mark.Harding@CliffordChance.com
	01/15/2001 08:39 AM
		 
Mark,

I am sorry that we will not be meeting up on Friday. I understand that you
have had to cancel your trip over here. Are you likely to make it over here
in the near future? If not, shall we get together at some point when I am in
the US (I'd like an excuse to get to Houston!).

All the best.

Mark 

*******

This message and any attachment are confidential and may be privileged or 
otherwise protected from disclosure.  If you are not the intended recipient, 
please telephone or email the sender and delete this message and any 
attachment from your system.  If you are not the intended recipient you must 
not copy this message or attachment or disclose the contents to any other 
person.

For further information about Clifford Chance please see our website at 
http://www.cliffordchance.com or refer to any Clifford Chance office.

Please coordinate with Jane on this.  Mark
	Jane McBride@ENRON
	01/14/2001 06:55 PM
		 
Dear Mark,

As per this letter from Bob Pickel, I wonder if you (assuming you are Enron's 
"Primary ISDA contact") would be able to send me our Firm ID and password 
when you have a chance so that I can access the online versions of the 
documents.

Thanks very much and thanks for the card.  Hoping you and your family had a 
happy holiday and wishing you all the best for 2001.

Jane McBride

	"ISDA" <cgreasley@isda.org>
	2001/01/13 12:18
	Please respond to cgreasley
		 
 - cover- non pcs.doc

This is about a trip to Brazil.  She asked me to pay the $6000 in expenses.  
Do you see any rationale to pay for this?  Mark
Monica Jordan
11/08/99 10:34 AM
Mark,

 Thanks for looking into the People's to People program for me.    Instead of 
asking Cliff for full funding perhaps it would be "better received" to 
suggest 50% funding?   If it doesn't look like that would work either, would 
it be ok with Enron's policy to go on my own?

 Thanks.  (I hope that I'm not being a nuisance about this Mark, if so, just 
say the word and I'll drop it!)

 Monica

Jane:

I have asked Mark Taylor to coordinate with you on this matter.

Regards,

Mark

	Jane McBride@ENRON
	01/14/2001 06:55 PM
		 
Dear Mark,

As per this letter from Bob Pickel, I wonder if you (assuming you are Enron's 
"Primary ISDA contact") would be able to send me our Firm ID and password 
when you have a chance so that I can access the online versions of the 
documents.

Thanks very much and thanks for the card.  Hoping you and your family had a 
happy holiday and wishing you all the best for 2001.

Jane McBride

	"ISDA" <cgreasley@isda.org>
	2001/01/13 12:18
	Please respond to cgreasley
		 
 - cover- non pcs.doc

Please send on the Cheryl Nelson.   Mark
	"EnergyDerivatives" <energyderivatives@lacimagroup.com>
	01/13/2001 07:36 PM
		 
Les Clewlow and Chris Strickland are pleased to announce the publication of 
their latest book on the pricing and risk management of energy derivatives. 
"This book should become a standard reference for energy derivatives traders, 
risk managers, energy risk consultants, and anyone else interested in the 
fascinating area of energy derivatives." Mark Garman, CEO FEA 
"Undoubtedly, the book will become an indispensable reference source for risk 
managers, researchers and practitioners interested in understanding complex 
issues arising in modelling energy markets, and in learning modern techniques 
for valuing energy derivatives."  Alexander Eydeland, Southern Energy 
Americas Group 
To see more reviews from Energy Experts, to read chapter summaries and to 
download sample chapters please visit... 
 
http://www.lacimagroup.com/energyderivatives.html

ENERGY DERIVATIVES 
PRICING AND RISK MANAGEMENT 
Les Clewlow and Chris Strickland
 This book provides a comprehensive and technical treatment of the 
 valuation and risk management of energy derivatives, including: 
the behaviour of spot and forward prices 
modelling and estimating volatility 
analysis of structures that exist in the energy derivatives market and their 
applications 
the pricing and hedging of energy derivatives using single and multi-factor 
spot price models 
using simulation and trinomial trees for pricing caps, floors, swaptions, and 
path-dependent securities such as barriers, Asians, lookbacks, and swing 
options 
using multi-factor models of the forward curve, including volatility 
estimation and pricing of exotic derivatives 
risk management of energy derivative positions 
value-at-risk and credit risk for energy derivatives 
  

  
If you would prefer not to receive any further, very occasional, email 
announcements from Lacima Group please reply to this message with the subject 
"REMOVE".	

  
  

Thanks for the update.  Mark

	Andrew Edison@ENRON
	01/11/2001 05:07 PM
		 
I just wanted to drop you a short note to let you know that Kevin 
McConville's deposition today in the Berry Construction case went off without 
a hitch.  Outside counsel reports that the deposition was really a 
non-event.  It lasted only three hours, and opposing counsel was not terribly 
effective.  McConville reportedly did an excellent job of sticking to the 
party line, and there were no damning admissions.

Elizabeth:  Please review this confirm.  Mark
	Christian Yoder
	01/11/2001 03:34 PM
		 
Here is a confirmation letter which we need to review and discuss.   I will 
arrange a call. ----cgy
Greg Wolfe
01/11/2001 07:57 AM
Christian:

Based upon our discussion, here is the confirm I would like to attach to the 
internal DASH and send to McCook as the documentation we would require from 
BPA. This draft highlights changes from the Stoel Rives version which, based 
upon our discussion, are appropriate. I am available to discuss any of the 
nuances of the language. We are potentially looking at transacting tomorrow 
afternoon and Tracy Ngo is preparing the DASH which will go to Houston today 
(which requires input from you).

Thanks

Sami:  Thanks for the update.  Mark

	Sami Arap@ENRON
	01/17/2001 12:12 PM
		 
Mark;

Randy Young suggested that I send you an update regarding the above captioned 
deal.  This is a total energy management services deal where Enron Argentina 
is currently providing billing services to Azurix Argentina.  The TEM 
Agreement was executed on August 25, 2000.  The contract term is 3 years and 
the NPV is approximately US$900,000.

Azurix Argentina is facing a very difficult situation arising from its Buenos 
Aires Province water concession agreement.  Over the past few days, local 
newspapers have informed that Mr. Carlos Ruckauf, the BA Governor, has called 
a local congress extraordinary session "to consider the early termination of 
Azurix water concession agreement" (sic).  The BA Province is claiming that 
Azurix did not fulfill the contracted investments.  In case the Azurix 
concession is revoked, our agreement will also be terminated.

Rgds,

Sami

The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of December 15, 2000.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.  

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Dan:

I would like to understand your business strategy.  I am asking my assistant 
to work out a time.  

Mark

	Daniel Reck
	01/29/2001 09:55 AM
		 
Mark:

As you know, we are going to start trading freight capacity this year.  We 
are building a team of Enron insiders and outsiders and I would like the sr. 
staff to understand how and why we insist on using our contractual concepts 
(e.g. make them look financial, limit liability, avoid litigation, etc.).  
Sean Cumerland (formerly CALME), Chris Kravas (CEO of WebModal) and I are 
going to meet February 7-9 at the Houstonian.  I am inviting you, Joe 
Deffner, Wes Coldwell, Vince Kaminski and Rick Buy to meet with us for an 
hour or so to communicate how your area integrates with the commercial 
businesses.  In addition, I think it will be helpful for you to hear about 
our plans to build the freight business.

Please let me know what time, if any, works for you on those days.

Thanks,

Dan Reck
x3-7445

Elizabeth:  Are you ok with it?   Mark
	Chris Gaffney
	01/26/2001 09:29 AM
		 
Mark - Enron Canada is on the verge of entering into a 3 year fixed price 48 
MW power sale to Ivaco Rolling Mills Limited Partnership and Ivaco Inc.  The 
sale is a back to back transaction with the British Energy supply source.  
The electricity purchase agreement is based off of the industrial one-off 
form that was developed to do back to back deals with the British Energy 
supply source.  That form has been approved by Peter Keohane and previously 
reviewed by Elizabeth Sager.  A copy of the Ivaco agreement is attached.  If 
you would like further information about this transaction please let me know.

Regards
CJG

What is the status of your looking at the LNG contract issues?   Mark

	Andrew Edison@ENRON
	01/26/2001 05:14 PM
		 
We are considering instituting an arbitration on behalf of Enron Liquid 
Fuels, Inc. against Gulf Oil Limited Partnership to recover approximately 
$55,000 for due and unpaid fuel oil sales.

If you are aware of any reason legal action should not be brought against 
Gulf Oil Limited Partnership, please let me know.  My direct line is 
x5-7105.  If I do not hear from you by Tuesday, January 30, I will assume 
that you have no objection to Enron Liquid Fuels, Inc. instituting this 
arbitration.

Thanks for your assistance.

Please set the meeting up with Alan, Dan and me.  Mark

	Andrew Edison@ENRON
	01/29/2001 01:38 PM
		
I have looked over it thoroughly and am ready to talk when you are.  I had 
thought Dan was going to set up a meeting, but maybe I was mistaken.  I am 
around and available this week so let me know what is convenient on your 
schedule.

	Mark E Haedicke@ECT
	01/29/2001 11:00 AM
		
What is the status of your looking at the LNG contract issues?   Mark

	Andrew Edison@ENRON
	01/26/2001 05:14 PM
		 
We are considering instituting an arbitration on behalf of Enron Liquid 
Fuels, Inc. against Gulf Oil Limited Partnership to recover approximately 
$55,000 for due and unpaid fuel oil sales.

If you are aware of any reason legal action should not be brought against 
Gulf Oil Limited Partnership, please let me know.  My direct line is 
x5-7105.  If I do not hear from you by Tuesday, January 30, I will assume 
that you have no objection to Enron Liquid Fuels, Inc. instituting this 
arbitration.

Thanks for your assistance.

Thanks for the heads up!  Mark

Great job!  I don't have any changes.  Thanks.  Mark

	Laura Schwartz@ENRON
	01/29/2001 11:18 AM
		 
Mark - Attached is a copy of the story to go in the next issue of Enron 
Business. Can you please review and let me know if you have any comments? 
Thanks!

Laura

Great job!  Thanks.  Mark

	Mary Clark@ENRON
	01/29/2001 02:46 PM
		 
Mark, I've attached the story about the BEARing Gifts program for your 
review.  Please return your comments to me by Friday, Feb. 2. 

Laura, please run the story by Judy Herold at CPS.  

Thanks to all for this wonderful little story.  It warmed our hearts here in 
PR.

Mary

Dad:

The name I have is Dr. Vinberg.  He is a therapist in Houston and is in his 
80s.  I talked to him today and I thought he seemed good.  He recommended 
that we meet for two hours on one day and schedule some time the next day if 
it is productive.  His number is 713-622-1441.  He charges $150 per hour and 
I will pick that up as you would be incurring expenses to come to Houston.  
Give him a call and see if he is acceptable to you.  If he is, I will propose 
dates and we can see if they work for everyone. 

Love,  

Mark  

I have asked Dan Lyons to give you a call on this.  Mark

	Greg Johnston
	01/29/2001 05:36 PM
		 
Mark, I am trying to find a good commercial firm in or around West Palm 
Beach, Florida that I can use as local counsel, if necessary, on a go-forward 
basis with our Advanced Mobile Power Systems transaction.  As you are likely 
aware, Enron has agreed to provide legal services to AMPS for the next six 
months, and I wanted to have available, if possible, a firm in Florida with 
which Enron is familiar and whom Enron has used before for any situations 
that require specific legal advice relating to the laws of Florida.  I am 
going to Florida to run through the legal policies with the AMPS board of 
directors and officers next week and would like, if possible, to meet with 
someone from such a firm or firms while I am there.  Do you know of or have a 
database that identifies such a law firm(s)?

Thanks
Greg Johnston

Dan: 

I think you should add a sentence that you will continue to be directly 
involved in LNG matters including the contracts for Dabhol and that addtional 
resources are being developed in London both inside and outside.

Mark

	Daniel R Rogers@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	01/30/2001 04:23 PM
		 
Alan,

Attached is a draft of the memo we discussed with Mark during our recent 
Dubai trip.  Please let me know if you have any comments.  If you are in 
agreement as to content, I'll be happy to ensure that it is distributed to 
the Middle East Team.

Thanks,
Dan

The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of January 15, 2001.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Mark:  Thanks for the info.  I had a great time at the football game!  I 
think you will like Dubai.  It has some great restaurants.  

Regards,

Mark

	Mark Evans
	02/02/2001 09:54 AM
		 
Mark,

I will be out of the office on Monday, so I have asked Jon to chair the call 
from the London end.

I was interested to read in the press that we are considering a new LNG 
import terminal in the Bahamas connected by pipeline to Florida!

Hope all is well.

     Mark

Jane:

Thanks for the update.  It is very important for our traders to understand 
the documentation challenges.

Mark

	Jane McBride@ENRON
	02/02/2001 12:16 AM
		
Apologies to Shioda-san.
He is an associate not an analyst.
JMB

	Jane McBride
	2001/02/02 14:44
		 
Dear Mark,

Just wanted to let you know that I sent one of our young Japanese analysts 
along to an ISDA committee meeting earlier this week. His name is Takuro 
Shioda and he has been working on the commercial side with Bank of Tokyo 
Mitsubishi, with whom we are currently negotiating an ISDA master.

The ISDA people here are trying generally to get more non-legal 
non-documentary  trading types involved in the Japanese language committees 
because of how valuable this sort of feedback is in terms of practical 
application of the ISDA docs and they have indicated that they would be 
particularly  grateful for help from Enron in this regard.

None of our Japanese traders have any real ISDA experience but I have taken 
this as a first step.  We cant do much more for ISDA on this front at this 
point in time but obviously as we put ISDA masters in place and trade under 
them this situation will change.

Jane

Janette:

Please make contact with the gem broker below and set a time where I can meet 
him and look at some topaz, emeralds and opals.  I want to look at loose 
stones.  I may need to talk to him before I go.

Mark
	Randy Young@ENRON
	02/01/2001 04:22 PM
		 
Got your voice message.  The guy with the gems in Sao Paulo is Gerson de 
Castro Mendes.  His phone number is 5511 5071 6660 (His English is excellent, 
so you can leave a message.)  His email address is: gemart@cepa.com.br 

Pat will let Gerson know that you will be contacting him directly.  Good luck.

Regards,
Randy

Frank:

I am not in favor of this promotion.  I think in the new environment that it 
could be negative for him.  Let's talk about it.  Mark

	Frank Sayre@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	02/05/2001 09:36 AM
		 
Mark - I just wanted to touch base with you to confirm that FPL is now an 
Assistant General Counsel.   His confirmation sheets states that he has been 
promoted to that rank, but I didn't want to convey the new title to him until 
I had your confirmation that the promotion was ok with you.   Thanks.

I would suggest Dan Lyons from ENA Legal for Vision and Values.

Mark

Alan:  This makes sense to me.  Please get with John or send your e-mail to 
him and see if this matter can be resolved quickly.  Mark

	Alan Aronowitz
	02/04/2001 10:58 AM
		 
Ned, Andy and I have discussed the dispute resolution provisions of the 
possible EPC Contract between Enron LNG Atlantic Limited (EGM affiliate) and 
EE&CC for Project Jose.

Attached is Ned's memo outlining our conclusions at this time. In essence, we 
thought that:

Only upon the parties' mutually agreement would the use of a qualified 
independent expert (arbitrator) subject to AAA rules (note: the current 
language in the draft would need to be changed to clarify that AAA rules 
would apply to the IE's proceedings) be the appropriate mechanism for the 
expeditious handling of a narrow group of technical disputes ("Technical 
Disputes"). Primarily, these would be disputes over the adjustment of the 
contract price for a change order or the date of a milestone or completion 
date due a change order. 
In the interests of an expeditious resolution, the current draft should be 
changed to reflect that the IE's decisions would be final, and 
non-appealable, as contrasted with the current draft where in certain 
instances they can be appealed to the three-arbitrator panel.
The "baseball arbitration" approach required in the current draft should be 
used by the IE for these Technical Disputes only, and would not apply to 
disputes handled by the three-arbitrator Panel. The commercial people on the 
Enron LNG side of the table like baseball arbitration b/c they believe it 
mitigates the possibility of claims inflation by the Contractor in these 
change order price disputes. 
All other disputes under the Contract would be handled by a three-arbitrator 
panel ("Panel") subject to AAA rules, which would also handle all Technical 
Disputes if the parties cannot mutually agree to an IE.
The Dispute Resolution Section of the draft Contract should be refined in 
some areas to provide greater clarity. Andy and Ned are in the process of 
doing this.

If you have any questions before you visit with Vicki or John, please advise 
any of us.

Alan

	Ned E Crady@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	02/01/2001 06:48 PM
		 
Please see attached memo regarding this afternoon's discussion of proposed 
resolution to the concerns posed on the arbitration clause.

   Thanks, Ned

  

J: yes.  Mark
	Mark Frevert@ENRON
	Sent by: Nicki Daw@ENRON
	02/06/2001 02:54 PM
		 
You are cordially invited 
to join me at the 
2001 Houston Livestock Show & Rodeo
on
Monday, 19th February

with performances by
Lyle Lovett & Robert Earl Keen
performance starts at 7pm

Please RSVP Nicki Daw (x33497)

Janette:  Schedule some time for me to go to this gallery.  Maybe early 
Wednesday afternoon.  Mark
	Randy Young@ENRON
	02/02/2001 06:37 PM
		 
Mark

There are a lot of art galleries in Sao Paulo, but I am not sure what you 
like.  The place I was telling you about is Galeria Jacques Ardies.  Jacques' 
gallery is one of the two best (I think) specializing in contemporary 
Brazilian "naif" artists.  Most of his stuff is really interesting, vibrant, 
"Brazilian" pieces (many from the Northeast of Brazil where they have the 
greatest African influence and a very rich culture).  Kind of funky and "out 
there,"  but I really like it.  He also has some terrific textile works by 
Madeleine Colaco, an artist who has become very popular in the United States 
(we have one of her wall hangings in our den).

Jacques' web site is at http://ardies.com/quemingl.htm.  I don't think it is 
very representative of what you will find there, but take a look.

There are plenty of other galleries that you can go to as well. Let's talk 
about what you want to see on the way down, and I will give it some thought.

By the way,  I am scheduled to have lunch with Lance on Thursday, and I have 
a phone call into Alan asking for a time with him as well.  I will keep you 
posted.

Regards,
Randy

Thanks.  I want to go to the gallery.  Mark

	Randy Young@ENRON
	02/02/2001 06:37 PM
		 
Mark

There are a lot of art galleries in Sao Paulo, but I am not sure what you 
like.  The place I was telling you about is Galeria Jacques Ardies.  Jacques' 
gallery is one of the two best (I think) specializing in contemporary 
Brazilian "naif" artists.  Most of his stuff is really interesting, vibrant, 
"Brazilian" pieces (many from the Northeast of Brazil where they have the 
greatest African influence and a very rich culture).  Kind of funky and "out 
there,"  but I really like it.  He also has some terrific textile works by 
Madeleine Colaco, an artist who has become very popular in the United States 
(we have one of her wall hangings in our den).

Jacques' web site is at http://ardies.com/quemingl.htm.  I don't think it is 
very representative of what you will find there, but take a look.

There are plenty of other galleries that you can go to as well. Let's talk 
about what you want to see on the way down, and I will give it some thought.

By the way,  I am scheduled to have lunch with Lance on Thursday, and I have 
a phone call into Alan asking for a time with him as well.  I will keep you 
posted.

Regards,
Randy

Bryan: Bob's number is 212-332-2554.  Let me know your impressions after the 
meeting.  Mark

	Bryan Seyfried
	02/08/2001 11:08 AM
		 
mark - i will be in NY on Wednesday next week and would like to try and 
schedule a quick meeting with Bob. Could you pls. email me his phone number 
and I will try to arrange something.  Thanks again for your assistance.

The agenda of the ISDA conference that Greg is the keynote speaker at is 
attached.  Mark
	"Liz O'Sullivan" <LOSULLIVAN@isda.org>
	02/07/2001 12:05 PM
		 
Mark:

As per your phone conversation with Bob, please find attached the Energy &
Developing Products Brochure for conference.

 <<spkeragendaEnergy.doc>>
Regards,
Liz

 - spkeragendaEnergy.doc

Travis
	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	02/08/2001 04:45 PM
		 
"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction 
of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

 - 7V%001!.doc

I would love to do that but I have a commitment on Saturday night in 
Houston.  Thanks for looking into it for me.  Next time.  See you next week.  
Mark

	Sami Arap@ENRON
	02/09/2001 05:31 AM
		 
Mark;

Unfortunately, no soccer games on Monday and Tuesday.  However, if you are 
willing to anticipate your flight (Saturday night instead of Sunday night), 
Corinthians is playing its oldest and strongest competitor Palmeiras on 
Sunday at Morumbi Stadium at 4:00pm.  The most famous soccer games in Brazil 
are:  Flamengo vs. Fluminense in Rio ("Fla-Flu") and Corinthians vs. 
Palmeiras in S?o Paulo.  Please let me know if you want me to get VIP seats 
for you and others.

Rgds,

Sami

Matt:  Congratulations on your wedding plans!  I am sorry I cannot make it!  
Mark

	Matthias Lee
	02/08/2001 07:31 PM
		 
Dear All

Kathleen and I are getting married on 17 March 2001. Kathleen has had the 
pleasure of meeting those of you who were in Singapore in the last year and a 
half. As for the rest, I've told her so much about all of you that she feels 
she has met you!

Nony has been so kind to help us distribute our wedding invitations to you. I 
know its probably too far to come, but we really wanted  to somehow share the 
occasion with you, our friends in Houston. If you do happen to be in the 
neighbourhood and manage to come, we would be truly honoured.

Best regards
Matt  

Mr. Fournier:

This is Janette Elbertson, Mark Haedicke's Assistant.  I spoke with your 
assistant this morning and this meeting has been rescheduled for Thursday,  
March 1, at 11:30 am in Jim Derrick's office.  Lunch is scheduled after the 
meeting if that meets your schedule.

Mark Haedicke is traveling this week.  I will call your e-mail to his 
attention upon his return on Friday.  

	"DAN FOURNIER" <dan.fournier@blakes.com>
	02/09/2001 09:42 AM
		 
Dear Mark: 
 
I trust you had a pleasant holiday season.  I understand that our meeting 
with Jim Derrick and you has been rescheduled to the first part of March.  
Your assistant gave us the choice of March 1 or 2.  Although we can 
accommodate both dates, March 1 works better for David Jackson. 
 
Our understanding is that Blakes is not getting any further work from Enron 
as a result of the circumstances under which we could no longer continue 
acting for Enron in litigation involving Westcoast, another Blakes client. 
 
As you can well imagine, the prospect of losing our valued relationship with 
Enron is extremely disappointing, especially considering the significant 
inroads we had made during the last couple of years in getting to know Enron, 
its various businesses and representing your interests on a number of major 
transactions and initiatives in Canada. 
 
At this point in time, we need to better understand where we stand and 
whether there is any prospect of representing your interests in Canada.  One 
of our concerns in trying to mend fences is our relationship with your 
Calgary office which we perceive to be paramount in any effort to 
re-establish the kind of relationship we had with Enron prior to this 
incident.  As a result, we would like to seek your views on this prior to our 
meeting in Houston so as not to further aggravate our relationship with the 
Calgary office.
 
David Jackson and Jim Christie, two key members of our senior executive, and 
I would be available to discuss this matter with you at your convenience 
Wednesday, Thursday or Friday of next week.  Perhaps you can let me know what 
works best for you and we could initiate the call. 
 
Thanking you in advance for your kind consideration. 
 
Best regards, 
 
Dan
 
 

I think it must be in Moran's area.   Mark

Mina: 

Mark Haedicke does not have his lap top computer with him so he probably has 
not seen this e-mail.

Janette Elbertson

	Mina Miyakawa@ENRON
	02/13/2001 03:40 PM
		 
Mark,

Could you kindly confirm ASAP if you will have time for sightseeing as 
requested by Janette on her e-mail below. 
Also could you inform me at what time and where you would like the driver to 
pick you up tomorrow, February 14th afternoon, for sightseeing and/or 
transfer so as I can set up with the driver.

Thank you,

Mina Miyakawa
Assistant to Sami Arap and Luiz Watanabe
Extension 1362

Janette Elbertson@ECT
02/01/2001 02:55 PM
Mina:

Can you arrange for  Frederic Chamoux to:

Pick Mark Haedicke up from the airport on Monday, February 12, at 8:30 AM.  
He will be arriving on Continental flight #:  93 and will need to go to the 
Caesar Park Hotel;
Be available on Wednesday, February 14, beginning at 2:30 pm to show Mark 
around Sao Paulo;
Pick Mark Haedicke up from his hotel to make his departure flight on 
Wednesday, February 14, which departs Sao Paulo at 11:55 PM to return to 
Houston.

Please note Mark requested the car be a normal sedan rather than a 
limousine.  Here is the contact information for Frederic Chamoux.

Name: Frederic Chamoux
   Office Phones: 55 11 5506 1943 or 240 3948
   Mobile:  55 11 9183 8384
   e-mail address: sac@passafaroegrande.com.br

Mark will take cabs to his meetings while in Sao Paulo.  Many thanks for your 
help.

Janette Elbertson

Does it still make sense to have these meetings anymore?  Maybe just sit in 
on Novak's meeting.   Mark Haedicke
	Becky Spencer
	02/15/2001 10:46 AM
		 
There will be a South American Legal Team meeting today!!

Thursday, February 15th
2:30 p.m. - 3:30 p.m. Houston time (5:30 p.m. Buenos Aires time)
EB38c1

Hopefully when we recruit for other areas, like LNG and the like, we will 
pick up a lawyer with some shipping experience.  It seems like overkill to 
recruit just for shipping.  

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

	Mark Evans
	02/14/2001 05:28 PM
		
Alan, Mark,

they are firing from all angles. We had this approach from Stu Staley and 
Pierre Aury. 

My line to them has basically been: we will provide best shipping advice 
promptly: please refer all your queries in this regard to Justin Boyd's team 
ie first contact: Robert Quick, Rahul Saxena, then any other team members, 
including Justin and failing them, me. 

So far, we are far from being swamped with technical shipping issues that we 
cannot deal with in-house. As and when we get to that position, we have good 
relationships with the best shipping firms in London, including Richards 
Butler and Sinclair Roche and Temperley. This may be adequate cover at that 
stage. Alternatively we may decide to recruit. In making that decision we 
would of course consult with George and Stu and the rest of the team. My view 
is that we are not at that stage yet. 

I would love this business to expand to the position where we needed to do 
that, and I hope we get there soon. When we do, we will ensure these business 
areas are properly covered until we get new staff on board. The business will 
not be prejudiced by a wait and see approach.

This approach has satisfied Stu and Pierre. Of course we have to be flexible; 
if George is adamant and prepared to fund the recruitment, then off we go. I 
think I could persuade him however that he didn't need to do that now. 

What are your views on this?

Subject to how you want to play things / have already played things with 
George, I would propose to speak to Stu and Pierre about this again and then 
call George to ensure he is happy with the game plan.

I'll try to call you both tomorrow morning your time to discuss this.

Thanks.

        Mark

FYI.

Any thoughts about this?
	George McClellan
	02/07/2001 03:33 PM
		 
Mark - we are rapidly expanding our vessel trading business in London.  In 
addition other Enron groups such as liquids, LNG, steel and pulp & paper are 
becoming much more active on the vessel side.  One of our areas of concern as 
we go forward is gaining ready access to competent shipping counsel.  I would 
like to meet with you to discuss our interest to hire a in-house shipping 
attorney in London. 

Thanks,

George

I am not sure why that is.  Non-trading work is off a little so maybe that is 
it.  Be sure to touch base with Lance Schuler about the work he sees coming 
up.   I am happy to talk about it.  Mark

	"Swanstrom, Bill" <BSwanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
	02/15/2001 10:45 PM
		 
Mark, while I'm sure you're buried by the California situation, I'd like to 
get together with you when you get a chance to discuss business 
opportunities.  Despite consistently high marks for quality of work, 
responsiveness and cost-effectiveness (and despite getting feedback from 
several sources that we're the preferred firm on any deal that politically 
can be sent to someone other than V&E), we seem to be getting less business 
over the last 3-4 months than we're used to getting.  I just want to make 
sure there's not any negative issues, and assuming there are none, see what 
we can do to get more business from Enron.
 
Thanks.
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com
(713) 226-1143
 
 

fyi
	Robert Pickel <RPICKEL@isda.org>
	02/15/2001 05:48 PM
		 
I have spoken with a number of you regarding several Board-related matters,
and wanted to provide that information to everyone. These relate to the
following:

 Nominating Committee Results
 Citigroup
 Board Meeting Schedule
 Strategic Planning Meeting Schedule 
 Pre-Strategic Planning Lunches

Nominating Committee Results
 
The Nominating Committee has completed its deliberations and has recommended
11 individuals for election at this year's AGM to two-year terms. In
addition to the reelection of Ernie, Jerry, Jose Manuel, Keith, Maurits,
Terry, Tom and Tim, the Nominating Committee has proposed the following
individuals for election:

Kaushik Amin, Managing Director at Lehman Brothers NY, co-head of their
global fixed income division.

Fred Janbon, Global Head of Fixed Income at BNP Paribas, London

Azam Mistry, Director, Head of Risk Management Advisor--Treasury and Capital
Markets, HSBC, Hong Kong, and Co-Chair of our Asia-Pacific Steering
Committee

Thank you to everyone on the nominating commitee for your efforts,
particularly those of you who had an opportunity to meet these and other
prospective nominees.
 
Citigroup
 
The Nominating Committee chose not to nominate anyone from Citigroup for
election at this year's AGM. We have emphasized to Citigroup that this
decision is due to a variety of factors, including lack of attendance at
Board meetings by current and past Board members and the fact that Citi has
had a seat on the Board continuously since the Association was formed. We
have encouraged them to remain involved in ISDA activities with a view to
rejoining the Board at the earliest possible juncture. Please encourage your
Citigroup counterparts to get involved or remain involved in the
Association's activities.
 
Both Ravit and Thierry Sciard, who contacted us to offer himself as an
alternative for the position, were upset by the decision, but it is not
clear what the long-term effects will be. The most immediate tangible effect
is that Citi has indicated that it is withdrawing its co-sponsorship of the
Tuesday and Wednesday evening events at the Washington AGM. There is a
possibility that Lehman may be interested in sponsorship.
 
Board Meeting Schedule
 
Please make note of the Board meeting schedule for the remainder of the
year:

April 4 and 5 (over lunch each day at the AGM in Washington)

May 16-17 in Kyoto (more details below)

September 12 in London

November 13 in New York (note this is a change from prior schedules
distributed)

Strategic Planning Session
 
May 16 and 17 are the dates of our strategic planning session, which this
year will be at the Miyako Hotel in Kyoto. The details on the Miyako Hotel
are:

MIYAKO HOTEL
Sanjo Keage
Kyoto 605-0052
Japan
Phone: 81 75 771 7111
Fax: 81 75 751 2490
http:/www.miyakohotel.co.jp

The schedule is slightly different from past sessions. I will provide more
details on the specifics, but for your planning purposes, you should arrange
to be in Kyoto for lunch on Wednesday, May 16. (Bullet trains from Tokyo
that morning will get you there in time.) We will have dinner in the hotel
Wednesday evening after our afternoon session. On Thursday, May 17, we will
start with breakfast and have a working lunch, with the session ending
around 2:00. The afternoon will be spent visiting temples and perhaps going
on a sake tasting tour. (Fortunately, I do not believe that Francis Ford
Coppola is a sake producer.) Dinner that evening will be at a restaurant and
will be accompanied by a Geisha dance. Please plan to stay for all of the
events. There is nothing planned for Friday so that everyone (particularly
the Europeans) can get planes out of Osaka or Tokyo on Friday morning that
will get them back for the weekend.
 
Pre-Strategic Planning Luncheons
 
As in the past we will hold a series of luncheons in London, New York and
Tokyo where we will invite senior executives from member firms to share with
us their thoughts on issues affecting the industry. The tentative schedule
and locations for these lunches is as follows:

Wednesday, May 2    London    UBS (hosted by Tim Frederickson)

Friday, May 11            New York    AIG (hosted by Ernie Patrikis)

Tuesday, May 15        Tokyo         Royal Park Hotel (hosted by
Koshikawa-san)

In addition to attending the luncheon closest to your office, please
consider arriving in Tokyo a day early to join us at the Tokyo session.
Again, more details will follow. In the meantime, I would welcome any
suggestions for individuals we should invite to these luncheons in the
various centers.
 
I know this is a long email, but it covers the critical dates for the coming
months in one fell swoop. I am on holiday the week of Feb. 19 and will be in
Asia (visiting Beijing, Hong Kong and Tokyo) the week of Feb. 26. I will be
checking emails and voice mails.
 
Bob
 
Bob

fyi
	Rosemary Ryan <RRYAN@isda.org>
	02/16/2001 01:53 PM
		 
As you know ISDA's 16th Annual General Meeting will be held in Washington,
D.C. on April 3-6, 2001 at the Omni Shoreham Hotel.   If you have not
already made your hotel reservations at the Omni Shoreham Hotel, please call
the hotel at (202) 234 0700 and mention that you are attending the "ISDA
Annual General Meeting" to receive the discounted rate.   Please note that
reservations made after March 3, 2001 are subject to room and /or rate
availability.

The AGM will begin with a Pre-Conference Welcoming Reception on Tuesday
evening, April 3 at 7:30 PM at the Corcoran Gallery of Art.  The conference
will conclude on Friday, April 6 at 12:15 PM.

Please call me with any questions you may have.

Regards,

Rosemary
212 332 255

Please keep Lance Schuler and me up to speed on these issues.  Thanks.  Mark 
Haedicke
	"Vasco de Castro Ferraz Junior" <vcferraz@elektro.com.br>
	02/16/2001 01:56 PM
		 
OK
Once again, thank you so very much.
Vasco.

>>> <Gail.Brownfeld@enron.com> 2/16/01 10:41:43 am >>>

     Thanks for the information.  I'll review it and contact Jim Derrick
seeking approval both for Mr. Bermudes to represent Elektro and for the
filing of the lawsuit.  Hopefully, I'll hear from him today.  I don't
expect it to take longer than Monday.  Thanks for your patience.

Gail
I have mentioned to you today by telephone about our  discussions with
ANEEL regarding  the automatic  passthrough of taxes and legal
encumbrances, including a legal opinion we have obtained from Sergio
Bermudes/Marcelo Ferro law firm in relation to this subject.
Orlando and Sergio Assad are about to gave me their clearance to start a
legal suit against ANEEL having in view its refusal to grant to Elektro
such passthrough.
It is my opinion that this case should be handled by Bermudes.
Do you know if  Bermudes is authorized by Enron to represent us as one of
our litigation law firms? If notI would apreciate your help to obtain such
authorization.
Bermudes is a very well known litigation lawyer with a sound reputation in
Brazil and abroad.
Attached you will find his legal opinion I referred above.
Sergio Bermudes / Marcelo Ferro CVs in  English can be reached in the
internet at the following address:  www.sbadv.com.br 
Kind regards
Vasco.

(See attached file: Elektro legal_opinion_dec12.doc)

Below are Mark Haedicke's revisions to the announcement.

The purpose of this memo is to share with you the new We are pleased to 
announce organizational changes that have been implemented in to the Enron 
South America legal department in response to the recent reorganization and 
realignment of the principal Enron Wholesale Services business units 
operating in the region, Enron Americas and Enron Global Assets. 

Randy Young, currently General Counsel of ESA, will be assuming new 
responsibilities within Enron.  Replacing him will be John Novak, who will 
become General Counsel of ESA, reporting to Mark Haedicke.  The ESA legal 
department will be responsible for supporting all Enron Americas and Enron 
Global Assets businesses in the region.  Additional legal resources, 
coordinated by Lance Schuler, will be provided from EWS - Legal in Houston to 
support ESA's wholesale activities.  John will also work closely with Bruce 
Lundstrom, General Counsel of EGA, to coordinate legal support with respect 
to the EGA businesses in the region.  An organizational chart describing the 
new structure is attached.

We believe This new structure will enable us to continue to provide quality 
legal support across business lines within South America while improving 
coordination and providing additional support from Houston for Enron's 
existing operating businesses, as well as the new business development 
initiatives under way in the region.

	John Novak@ENRON
	02/16/2001 02:02 PM
		 
Mark, Bruce and Randy:  Below is a draft reorg memo and an updated org chart 
for your review and comment.  The org chart is a bit dense so any suggestions 
on how to clean it up would be welcome.  Thanks.

Rgds,
 John

The purpose of this memo is to share with you the new organizational changes 
that have been implemented in the Enron South America legal department in 
response to the recent reorganization and realignment of the principal Enron 
Wholesale Services business units operating in the region, Enron Americas and 
Enron Global Assets. 

Randy Young, currently general counsel of ESA, will be assuming new 
responsibilities within Enron. Replacing him will be John Novak, who will 
become general counsel of ESA, reporting to Mark Haedicke.  The ESA legal 
department will be responsible for supporting all Enron Americas and Enron 
Global Assets businesses in the region.  Additional legal resources, 
coordinated by Lance Schuler, will be provided from EWS - Legal in Houston to 
support ESA's wholesale activities.  John will also work closely with Bruce 
Lundstrom, general counsel of EGA, to coordinate legal support with respect 
to the EGA businesses in the region.  An organizational chart describing the 
new structure is attached.

We believe this new structure will enable us to continue to provide quality 
legal support across business lines within South America while improving 
coordination and providing additional support from Houston for Enron's 
existing operating businesses as well as the new business development 
initiatives under way in the region.

Mark Haedicke

Thanks.  I put the risk at a 2.  Mark

	Dale Rasmussen
	02/16/2001 03:17 PM
		 
The risk memo for Project Columbia is attached.  Please call me with any 
questions or comments.

Thanks.

Yes, send a resume to Julia Murray.  Mark

	Eric Thode@ENRON
	02/13/2001 03:43 PM
		 
Mark --

Do we ever hire summer interns for the Legal Department?  If so, how would 
someone get considered?  I have a cousin by marriage, who is interested.

Eric

What do you think of the letter?    Mark
	
	

Mark - 

Attached is the proposed language for a letter explaining the reasons to 
postpone the securitization deal.  Larry Lawyer would like to send this 
letter to the investment banks, potential investors, rating agencies and the 
deal team.  

Please review the statement and give me a call at X33242 with any comments or 
changes.  

I have also attached the final draft of the Q&A.  I appreciated all the help 
from the legal department on this document.  Shari and Janet had several 
comments that I think will be very helpful.

Thanks again

Traci 

fyi
	Michael Guerriero@ENRON
	02/20/2001 02:56 PM
		 
Here are the three approved Documents. They have all been executed.

MFG

Wow!  Things can change quickly.  Thanks.  Mark

	Rob Walls@ENRON
	02/20/2001 04:46 PM
		 
Mark -

I was cleaning out my email in anticipation of the move to microsoft outlook 
from notes and found this.  Interesting. . .

	Rick Bergsieker
	01/13/1999 07:44 AM
		
Andrew:  thanks.  Rob/Wade:  I agree with Andrew-----Dan is doing a super job 
and deserves to be recognized and compensated for it.

Rick

   
	Enron International
	

Guys-

Dan Rogers is an absolute beast.  I am very impressed by the amount of 
workload he can handle, his appreciation for commercial objectives and his 
awesome attitude.  He maintains a very good balance between doing what he can 
do and knowing when to delegate stuff to outside counsel; no one I've worked 
with in the legal group has mastered this as well as Dan has.

People usually don't hesitate to complain, thought you may want to hear some 
good stuff too. 

Adios,

Andrew

I am available as a last resort.  I have asked Alan Aronowitz who is the GC 
of Enron Global Markets to make a presentation.  I will let you know.   Mark

	"Liz O'Sullivan" <LOSULLIVAN@isda.org>
	02/20/2001 11:36 AM
		 
Mark:

I write this email to discuss the Energy and Developing Products conference
in Houston on March 6th, 2001.  Attached please find a copy of the latest
agenda for your perusal.  Mark Taylor graciously helped me find speakers for
the conference.  However, I just want to confirm with you your availability
to speak on the Panel Discussion on Recent Events and the Growth of New
Products at 9:30 AM.
 <<spkeragendaEnergy.doc>>
The issues to be discussed include:  Power Price Spikes; Delivery Failures;
OPEC Production Decisions; Emissions Trading; and New and Developing
Products.  Christophe Chassard will also speak on the panel.  This is a
difficult panel to find speakers.  We have invited Steve Bunkin to join
panel and still waiting for his reply.   If he accepts then we will have
just three speakers on the panel.  Christophe said he is comfortable
speaking about OPEC production decisions and to a lesser extent power price
spikes.

Let me know if you are available to speak.  And if so, what topics on panel
you would feel comfortable discussing.

Thanks,
Liz
212-332-2559

 - spkeragendaEnergy.doc

Thanks for pointing that out.  Mark

	Edmund Cooper
	02/21/2001 12:23 PM
		 
Dear All,

In the course of current ISDA Master Agreement negotiations with an 
Australian counterparty it has come to my attention that the ISDA netting 
opinion for Australia specifies that certain Sections of the ISDA Master 
should not be altered; otherwise reliance on the opinion, and close-out 
netting, could be jeopardised.  In particular the opinion specifies that 
Section 2(a)(iii) should not be altered.  

Enron has a standard alteration to Section 2(a)(iii) in Part 5 of its 
standard form Schedule, viz.  

"(a) Conditions Precedent.  The condition precedent set forth in clause (1) 
of Section 2(a)(iii) shall not apply to payments owed by a party if the other 
party shall have satisfied in full all its payment obligations under Section 
2(a)(i) and shall at the relevant time have no future payment obligations 
whether absolute or contingent, under Section 2(a)(i)."

Obviously, in the case of Australian counterparties this condition precedent 
should not be included in our documentation.

In addition, there are a number of other countries (including Germany, Italy, 
South Korea and Switzerland) where the effectiveness of the ISDA netting 
opinion presupposes that certain Sections of the Master, including Section 
2(a)(iii), are not altered in any material respect. To that end I would 
suggest that our standard condition precedent does make a material alteration 
and that it should not be included in ISDA Master Agreements with 
counterparties trading from these jurisdictions.

Certainly from the London end, I think that when we start negotiations with a 
new counterparty we should check the ISDA opinions to ensure that we don't 
trip ourselves up.

Regards, 

Edmund

Congratulations!   Mark Haedicke

	Michael Guerriero@ENRON
	02/21/2001 11:43 AM
		 
As of this moment the acquisition of the Arcor Modesto Maranzana Power 
Facility has been completed. All documents and assets have been executed 
and/or transferred.  

Congratulations to the deal team and all those who have diligently worked on 
this project over the past eighteen months. Your efforts our are greatly 
appreciated and you have achieved bottom line results for Enron.

Michael F. Guerriero

J: include this org chart with the memo.  Mark
	John Novak@ENRON
	02/21/2001 08:22 AM
		 
Below is the revised chart, which hopefully is cleaner and easier to read 
than the previous version.

Rgds,
 John

Let's send it out today.  Mark
	Randy Young@ENRON
	02/20/2001 11:28 AM
		
I am fine with the announcement, as revised.  ry

Below are Mark Haedicke's revisions to the announcement.

The purpose of this memo is to share with you the new We are pleased to 
announce organizational changes that have been implemented in to the Enron 
South America legal department in response to the recent reorganization and 
realignment of the principal Enron Wholesale Services business units 
operating in the region, Enron Americas and Enron Global Assets. 

Randy Young, currently General Counsel of ESA, will be assuming new 
responsibilities within Enron.  Replacing him will be John Novak, who will 
become General Counsel of ESA, reporting to Mark Haedicke.  The ESA legal 
department will be responsible for supporting all Enron Americas and Enron 
Global Assets businesses in the region.  Additional legal resources, 
coordinated by Lance Schuler, will be provided from EWS - Legal in Houston to 
support ESA's wholesale activities.  John will also work closely with Bruce 
Lundstrom, General Counsel of EGA, to coordinate legal support with respect 
to the EGA businesses in the region.  An organizational chart describing the 
new structure is attached.

We believe This new structure will enable us to continue to provide quality 
legal support across business lines within South America while improving 
coordination and providing additional support from Houston for Enron's 
existing operating businesses, as well as the new business development 
initiatives under way in the region.

	John Novak@ENRON
	02/16/2001 02:02 PM
		 
Mark, Bruce and Randy:  Below is a draft reorg memo and an updated org chart 
for your review and comment.  The org chart is a bit dense so any suggestions 
on how to clean it up would be welcome.  Thanks.

Rgds,
 John

The purpose of this memo is to share with you the new organizational changes 
that have been implemented in the Enron South America legal department in 
response to the recent reorganization and realignment of the principal Enron 
Wholesale Services business units operating in the region, Enron Americas and 
Enron Global Assets. 

Randy Young, currently general counsel of ESA, will be assuming new 
responsibilities within Enron. Replacing him will be John Novak, who will 
become general counsel of ESA, reporting to Mark Haedicke.  The ESA legal 
department will be responsible for supporting all Enron Americas and Enron 
Global Assets businesses in the region.  Additional legal resources, 
coordinated by Lance Schuler, will be provided from EWS - Legal in Houston to 
support ESA's wholesale activities.  John will also work closely with Bruce 
Lundstrom, general counsel of EGA, to coordinate legal support with respect 
to the EGA businesses in the region.  An organizational chart describing the 
new structure is attached.

We believe this new structure will enable us to continue to provide quality 
legal support across business lines within South America while improving 
coordination and providing additional support from Houston for Enron's 
existing operating businesses as well as the new business development 
initiatives under way in the region.

Mark Haedicke

Rob:  How can we get some relief on this issue?  Should we set up a call with 
Peter and me?  There really is an earnings impact.   Let me know. 

Regards,

Mark Haedicke
	Peter Keohane
	02/20/2001 10:35 AM
		 
Lavo/Mark, although it has been a chronic problem, the seemingly inexcusable 
delay at processing guarantees by Enron Corp. (both Enron Corp. and 
Counterparty) seems to be getting worse of late.  It is becoming an 
impediment to transacting and to our reputation in the market as the largest 
and most responsive energy marketer.  As you know, our business is 
essentially transacted off Enron Corp.'s credit, and procuring guarantees is 
often unnecessarily difficult and time consuming.  I know that Commercial, 
Credit and Legal are all frustrated by the process.  I know Bill is seeing if 
there is something he can do, but I was wondering whether there was also 
something you could do to speak to this issue in Houston.

Peter.

It's ok with me.  Mark

	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	02/19/2001 01:35 PM
		 
Mark:  As noted in the few attached e-mails, we have been asked to give some 
general advice on municipalization to the City of Bakersfield, CA.  I assume 
that this is not an issue from a conflcit perspective, but because it 
"touches" CA I had raised it with Vicki just in case there was something that 
i was not aware of .  Could I bother you to Reply to this and just let me 
know if you see any possible problem with us doing this work?  Thanks.

It was good to catch up with you briefly on Friday.  It sure seems like 
everything is going very well for you.  With everything you have going on, 
both domestically and internationally, I appreciate your taking the time to 
get together.  I'm sure we will be speaking in the not too distant future as 
the CA developments continue to unfold over the next few weeks.

Thanks.

John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 424-8125. 
 The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of the 
e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

I am ok with this.  Since this a muni, do you think you should check with
Mark as well?

Vicki:  I assume this is not a problem from a conflict, but just wanted to
double check since it "touches" CA.  As you may know from the trade press,
a number of cities, etc. have been looking into the possibility of forming
their own muncipallly owned utilities in light of all the CA problems.
This will undoubtedly be a long and arduous process by any city that
pursues it and probably will not go anywhere, at least not in the short
term.  Nonetheless, I just wanted to check.  I assume we are still on for
this afternoon at 2:00 p.m.  Thanks.  John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).
If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or
reproduction of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be
unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com
Content-Transfer-Encoding: quoted-printable
Date: Tue, 13 Feb 2001 19:42:16 -0500
John,

 As mentioned in my E-mail, I have been contacted by the City Attorney of
Bakersfield, Cal., a city of about 150,000 concerning our ability to advice
the City concerning it operating its own electric utility.  I told him that
because of our work for Enron that I would need to check whether we would
be in a position to be of assistance.

I would appreciate your thoughts.  Bakersfield is in  P G & E's service
area.

Dean

Congrats!  Things seem to be building rapidly now on the Continent.  Mark

You would need to start out in the associate program.  Good luck.  Mark

No need to do a risk memo if the legal risk rating would be a 1.  Is that 
what this one would be?  Mark
	Eddy Daniels@ENRON
	02/15/2001 04:17 PM
		 
Please find attached a legal risk memorandum re the Encorp investment for 
your review.

Regards,
Eddy Daniels

The report is well done.  For my purposes it could be much shorter -- really 
in a bullet list format.  Thanks.  Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	02/15/2001 03:34 PM
		 
Mark -

Attached is the EGA Legal report for February.  I'm interested in your 
feedback on level of detail.  Some of our contributors gave quite a bit of 
detail (e.g., India) while others were quite a bit more brief (although 
generally on less important projects).

Also, I've left out discussion of the South America assets.  I'm assuming 
that is coming from John/Randy -- I know that Miguel Mendoza is inputting to 
them on most of these assets.

Thanks,
Bruce

John:

What is the status on this?  I now have Eddie Daniels dedicated full time to 
Cuiba.  Hopefully that will help you some.

Regards,

Mark
	David M Rosenberg@ENRON
	02/14/2001 05:41 PM
		 
Mark,

As a follow-up to our  monday meeting, I want to reiterate our need to have a 
local dispute resolution mechanism for merchant (trading) activities.  My 
suggestion is to automatically allow ICC arbitration (English or Portuguese) 
in Sao Paulo for deals out to 4-5 years and smaller than 200 average 
megawatts, with a case-by-case review for deals of longer maturity or larger 
average capacity.  I appreciate the fact that this requires some discussion 
of company policy, and I am grateful for any help you can give.   I strongly 
believe that we will not be able to prosecute  a successful trading operation 
without a meaningful dispute resolution forum in Sao Paulo.

It was good to see you again, and I look forward to your continuing interest 
in South American trading.

--DMR

Rex:  We are trying to make this as limited as possible.  Can you define 
specifically what requires an exception?  I am the signoff for the wholesale 
group, but it makes sense to be consistent across Enron.

Regards,

Mark

	Sharon Morgan/ENRON@enronXgate
	02/13/2001 11:11 AM
		 
  
Mark - Would you please approve this for Rex?

Sharon - Exceptions are handled through an approval from Mark Haedicke. If he 
approves the exception, then we will not subject the mail file in question to 
the retention agent. Please let me know if I can be of further assistance.

Thanks-
Cyndi

I am requesting that Rex Rogers, Vice President and Associate General 
Counsel, of our Enron Corp. Legal Department be granted an exception to the 
length of time that he can retain his messages.  He has some emails from 1999 
that are important for him to retain because they deal with Securities and 
Exchange Commission filings, the Enron Corp. Form 10-K, and other vital 
information.  Thank you for your consideration.

Sharon Morgan
x37273

We are pleased to announce organizational changes to the Enron South America 
legal department in response to the recent reorganization and realignment of 
the principal Enron Wholesale Services business units operating in the 
region, Enron Americas and Enron Global Assets. 

Randy Young, currently General Counsel of ESA, will be assuming new 
responsibilities within Enron.  John Novak will become General Counsel of 
ESA, reporting to Mark Haedicke.  The ESA legal department will be 
responsible for supporting all Enron Americas and Enron Global Assets 
businesses in the region.  Additional legal resources, coordinated by Lance 
Schuler, will be provided from EWS Legal in Houston to support ESA's 
wholesale activities.  John will also work closely with Bruce Lundstrom, 
General Counsel of EGA, to coordinate legal support with respect to the EGA 
businesses in the region.  An organizational chart describing the new 
structure is attached.

This new structure will enable us to continue to provide quality legal 
support across business lines within South America while improving 
coordination and providing additional support from Houston for Enron's 
existing operating businesses, as well as the new business development 
initiatives under way in the region.

Rob:

Thanks.  I will ask Janette to set up a call for you, me and Peter on the 
guarantees.

Mark

	Rob Walls/ENRON@enronXgate
	02/21/2001 04:27 PM
		 
Mark -

I think a call among the three of us would be a good place to start.  Let me 
know if you would like Deb to set up the call.  Thanks. 

Rob:  How can we get some relief on this issue?  Should we set up a call with 
Peter and me?  There really is an earnings impact.   Let me know. 

Regards,

Mark Haedicke
Lavo/Mark, although it has been a chronic problem, the seemingly inexcusable 
delay at processing guarantees by Enron Corp. (both Enron Corp. and 
Counterparty) seems to be getting worse of late.  It is becoming an 
impediment to transacting and to our reputation in the market as the largest 
and most responsive energy marketer.  As you know, our business is 
essentially transacted off Enron Corp.'s credit, and procuring guarantees is 
often unnecessarily difficult and time consuming.  I know that Commercial, 
Credit and Legal are all frustrated by the process.  I know Bill is seeing if 
there is something he can do, but I was wondering whether there was also 
something you could do to speak to this issue in Houston.

Peter.

I am happy to meet with them.  We will want them to meet Jim Derrick as 
well.  Mark

	Peter Keohane
	02/12/2001 02:39 PM
		 
As you know, Donahue E&Y has been doing work for us lately, so far on the 
retail, regulatory, and general corporate fronts.  I also believe they have 
the ability to work for us in a broader capacity.  E&Y is generally among the 
best situated for the coming deregulated power market.  E&Y set up many of 
our systems in Toronto and Donahue E&Y is currently assisting us on the 
wholesale side with Ontario Energy Finance Corporation (one of the 
deregulation off-shoots of Ontario Hydro) on finalizing the NUG management 
arrangement.  They are also very strong on tax, and may be able to assist 
non-ECC business units (i.e. Global Markets and EES) in Canadian 
initiatives.  Representatives of their firm are considering a trip to Houston 
in the Spring and asked me if they could visit with you and others within 
Enron in Houston.  I told them that we would be pleased, once the timing is 
right.  Once they have a date I will let you know to see if we can set 
something up. Peter.

Yes. They are a great company to get in ISDA.  Mark

	Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org>
	02/09/2001 02:02 PM
		 
Mark:

I know Duke will be no problem getting approved for membership during the
executive committee meeting .  In case anyone asks, do you know
Constellation Power Source?

Thanks.
Mary

No problem.  Mark

	James Derrick/ENRON@enronXgate
	02/23/2001 03:03 PM
		 
Please let me know if you have any objection to Eric's request.  Thank you. 
Jim

I am looking for some additional general corporate outside legal assistance 
in the LA area (at a more reasonable rate than is charged by Milbank, 
Tweed).  I have come into contact with two former Milbank lawyers who are now 
at McDermott, Will & Emery.  We were impressed with their work in the past 
and believe that they can provide us with prompt, reasonably priced, top 
quality general corporate legal assistance.  McDermott has represented Enron 
Trading Systems and EBS.  Is this an acceptable firm for me to hire?  Thanks, 
Jim

I am only aware of the Edison Institute effort which is a physical power 
contract.  I think he was probably mistaken.  Mark

Sylvia:  I think there should be a cost center for each of ENA, EGM, EIM, ESA 
and EGA, which tracks the org chart of people reporting directly to me.  Deb 
Korkmas can help you with the proper account numbers.

Mark

	Sylvia Hu/ENRON@enronXgate
	02/23/2001 09:08 AM
		 
Mark:

With the last re-org, I have been told that most of the old EI Legal Groups ( 
CALME, APACHI, etc.) have moved under your ENA Legal, now known as EWS.  When 
I do Lexis and Westlaw allocations, would you like me to put all under you 
cost center or should I separate them out by 12 subgroups?  I retrieved your 
org. chart from your website.  Please advise your preference and provide cost 
centers that you would like me to allocate Lexis and Westlaw charges at your 
earliest convenience.

Thanks,
Sylvia Hu
Corporate and Law Information Services
x36775

found it.  Mark

	Stuart Zisman
	02/23/2001 04:17 PM
		 
Mark,

I am currently negotiating an Option to Obtain an Easement in connection with 
our peaking power plant in Caledonia, Mississippi.  As you know, the 
Caledonia facility is currently scheduled to be sold to Cinergy Capital & 
Trading, Inc.  The anticipated closing date is March 27, 2001 (but this is 
subject to change depending on when we obtain the requisite regulatory 
approval).

One of the things that ENA was seeking to do, prior to deciding to sell the 
plant, was to establish a second interconnection to the Southern Company 
(currently Caledonia is interconnected to TVA).  In pursuit of this second 
interconnection, certain ENA developers were charged with the responsibility 
for obtaining options for easements.  The easements were needed in order to 
run the transmission wires from the plant to the point of the interconnection 
with Southern.  To date, we have obtained all but one of the required options 
(the "Galiano Option").

We are obligated to cooperate with Cinergy from now until the closing date in 
pursuit of the Galiano Option.  Ms. Galiano and her lawyer have insisted upon 
adding an indemnity in the form of easement which requires the grantee 
(Caledonia Power I, LLC) to indemnify the grantor against liabilities arising 
from grantee's use of the easement.  They have adamantly rejected, however, 
my request that the indemnification be limited to actual damages (and that 
special, consequential and punitive damages be waived).  

Cinergy has asked us to execute the Galiano Option without the waiver of 
consequential damages and I am seeking your permission to do so.

I think that this should be acceptable from ENA's perspective for several 
reasons:

1)  It is likely (99%+) that we sell Caledonia Power I, LLC (the proposed 
counterparty to the Galiano Option) in the next several weeks;
2)  The Galiano Option is structured as an option to obtain an easement and 
the waiver of consequential damages issue only arises if the option is 
actually exercised; and 
3)  If for some odd reason the sale doesn't go through, we finally decide to 
complete the second interconnection and we exercise the option for easement, 
we can probably mitigate our risk by procuring additional insurance.

Please let me know, at your earliest possible convenience, if I may proceed 
with the execution of the Galiano Option.  Many thanks.

Stuart

I am taking steps to retain the lawyers we have and supplement with more 
Brazilian lawyers and lawyers in Houston.  Big challenge to get all the work 
done.

Mark

	Remi Collonges@ENRON
	02/22/2001 04:46 PM
		 
Mark,

I hope that your trip to South America was instructive.  You mentioned to me 
the week before this trip that you and I would talk about your findings and 
decisions concerning legal support for my team.  Do you still want to do it?

Remi
011 55 11 5503 1200

Yes, I will go to this dinner.  I do need to leave on Tuesday at about 1:00 
pm.  Mark
	"Liz O'Sullivan" <LOSULLIVAN@isda.org>
	02/22/2001 12:00 PM
		 
Thank you very much for your participation in the International Swaps and
Derivatives Association's Energy and Developing Products conference to be
held at the Four Seasons Hotel in Houston on March 6th, 2001.  

To show our appreciation, we would like to invite you to dinner at 7:00pm on
Monday, March 5th.  The dinner will be held at Damian's Cucina Italiana
restaurant which is located conveniently near the Four Seasons Hotel at 3011
Smith Street, (713) 522-0439.  The dinner will be in the alcove area.   

Please phone your RSVP as soon as possible at 212-332-2559 or by email at
losullivan@isda.org.

We look forward to seeing you at dinner!

Regards,
Liz O'Sullivan
ISDA Conference Department

Yes, for the time being until we get someone in Alan's group.  Mark

	Jordan Mintz/ENRON@enronXgate
	02/22/2001 09:18 AM
		 
Mark: Who should I contact regarding legal coverage for this project?  
Insurance--Lou Stoler?
Jordan

All:

Be careful of paying for insurance wraps.  Lots of noise in the system about 
insurance companies not paying.  I met with Chase last week and their credit 
guys expressed extreme skepticism over the efficacy of insurance wraps.

Tim: Talk to the market to ensure that our A1/P1 facility is still viewed as 
an A1/P1 risk.

Joe & Jordan: Scrub down the credit reserve policy, we need to make certain 
that we are in absolute compliance with the documents.  If not we need to 
clean up the documentation ASAP (it seems highly unlikely that we would not 
be making significant claims under that policy this year).

Ben
fyi
Following is the article menioned in yesterday's meeting.  

AIG Declines to Pay Flashpoint Bonds, Triggers 18-Notch S&P Cut
2/8/1 13:3 (New York)

AIG Declines to Pay Flashpoint Bonds, Triggers 18-Notch S&P Cut

     London, Feb. 8 (Bloomberg) -- A pair of ``AAA''-rated bonds
issued by Flashpoint Ltd. suffered an 18-notch downgrade by
Standard & Poor's after a unit of American International Group
Inc. said it won't pay on insurance that guarantees the bonds.
     The $149.1 million of bonds, named Hollywood Funding No. 5.
and No. 6, were sold by the U.K. company to finance films and
television shows. S&P assigned its top rating to the securities
because they're guaranteed by Lexington Insurance Co., a
subsidiary of AIG, the world's largest insurer.
     Investors who bought the zero-coupon bonds were to be repaid
by the revenue from a basket of films. When the films didn't make
enough to cover those payments, the insurance policy was designed
to kick in. Lexington, though, said it won't cover the shortfall
because the film company broke its contract. Now, S&P regards the
bonds as ``vulnerable to nonpayment,'' and rates them ``CCC-.''
     ``There has never been a downgrade of that magnitude in
Europe,'' said Kurt Sampson, head of structured finance ratings
at S&P. ``We are voicing our concern about the implications for
the capital markets. The degree of our concern is evident by the
fact we are going public with this.''
     S&P, which downgraded the Hollywood bonds on Friday, said
Lexington's actions have prompted it to review other securities
insured by Lexington in case the insurer seeks to ``raise
defenses to the payment'' due on other bonds.
     Joe Norton, AIG's spokesman, said the company won't comment
on the bonds. Graham Johnson at Flagship Group, which handles
press communications for Flashpoint, said the company regards the
bonds as ``not a matter that it's appropriate for them to comment
on.'' Credit Suisse First Boston, which managed the private sale
of Flashpoint's six Hollywood Funding bonds, also declined to
comment.

                         Cash Shortfall

     Hollywood Funding No. 5, a $48.4 million dollar bond, was
due to be repaid on Jan. 5, according to people familiar with the
security. Bondholders haven't been paid, and agreed to wait for
two months before triggering a default because Lexington is
investigating whether the issuer broke its contract with the
insurer, S&P said.
     ``The policies were to provide for sufficient funds to pay
the notes in full, should revenues in the trustee's other
accounts be insufficient,'' S&P said. ``S&P believed that the
original policies'' would pay out under any circumstances, ``and
that any such matters were not supposed to constitute a defense
to payment on the policies.''
     S&P's defines ``AAA'' ratings as those applying to issuers
with an ``extremely strong'' ability to meet their obligations.
     The rating company also said that Lexington won't be meeting
shortfalls on Hollywood Funding No. 6, a $100.7 million bond
maturing on June 18, because the issuer broke its contract by not
making as many films at it agreed to.

--Alice James in the London newsroom (44) 207 330 7195, or
ajames@bloomberg.net, with reporting by Sean Farrell /mg

Story illustration: {HOLFUN 0 6/18/01 <Corp> DES <GO>} for the
terms of one of the bonds.

NI CRA    NI BON    NI EBN    NI ABS    NI INS    NI RED
NI COR    NI FILM   NI TV     NI ENT    NI LAW    NI ENH
NI EUB    NI PVT    NI WIN

AIG US <Equity> CN
-0- (BN ) Feb/08/2001 18:03 GMT

How did it turn out with Francisco?    Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	02/21/2001 05:38 PM
		 
Mark -

Given that South America legal resources are stretched thin, we will be 
checking with Francisco to see if he has time to pick up Columbia.  He knows 
it well and I don't believe that it will be particularly time-consuming for 
him.  But it would help free up Miguel Mendoza a bit for other South America 
matters.

I will expect Francisco to be cognizant of his other Wholesale obligations in 
saying "yes" or "no."

Bruce

Jim:  Here is the background of the "dispute" with Blakes.  There is a lot of 
emotion on both sides.  I believe we need Blakes on a going forward basis in 
Canada.

Mark Haedicke
	Peter Keohane
	02/08/2001 03:52 PM
		 
Mark, I understand that you and Jim D. are meeting in Houston next week 
regarding Blakes, their mismanagement of the NGX litigation, and other 
matters.  I am providing you the following report, so as the facts and issues 
are clear.  I am taking the time to send you this report because I am 
concerned that Dan Fournier has demonstrated to date that he either does not 
understand the facts and issues (which is amazing) or believes he can 
obfuscate and resolve the issues through political maneuvering.

You will recall that this matter kicked off late in Sept./00 with NGX giving 
us two days' notice that they were taking over control of the methodology for 
determining the prevalent gas indices effective Oct. 1/00.  You will also 
recall that the matter was of significant concern to John Lavorato and Greg 
Whaley, among others, and following a conference call with John, Greg, Steve 
Kean, Rick Shapiro and others, it was agreed that we would consider our legal 
remedies, including that I would prepare a draft stern letter to NGX advising 
them of our concerns and the potential for litigation with Enron, both for 
internal review and review by outside counsel.  I discussed the facts and the 
letter with Blakes (Dalton McGrath) who advised me that he would also be 
discussing the matter with a competition law partner in Toronto.  In the end 
Blakes had some minor comments on the letter and provided a cover letter 
confirming that in the circumstances we had a difficult put provable case.

One issue raised by the letter was the potential involvement of NGX's 
shareholders, for a number of reasons, including:  (i) NGX had only two 
shareholders, Westcoast Energy and OM Gruppen, who to our knowledge 
controlled the mind and management of NGX;  (ii) OM Gruppen is in the 
business around the world of purchasing or creating electronic exchanges and 
had recently purchased its position in NGX from Westcoast;  Westcoast is the 
sole shareholder of Engage Energy, a energy trading competitor;  (iii) NGX's 
transaction for acquiring control of the indices was an aggressive, 
structured attack designed to cause harm to EOL and regain market share that 
EOL had taken away; and, (iv) NGX is a limited liability entity with little 
in hard assets and therefore may have been judgment proof.  Obviously, if the 
evidence or commercial/strategic reasons warranted not proceeding against the 
shareholders at any time, it was our intention not to continue to proceed 
against them.

In short, Blakes was aware from the outset of our intention to involve 
Westcoast in any litigation.

As expected, we did not receive a satisfactory response to our letter to NGX, 
and between late Sept./00 and Nov. 29/00, the date we filed the lawsuit and 
applied for injunctive relief, I had countless further discussions with 
Blakes to draft, and redraft, and redraft again, a Statement of Claim and 
Motion documents, all of which clearly involved Westcoast as a named 
defendant.

Although the Court would not grant an injunction "ex parte", an aggressive 
timeline was established for filing affidavits and briefs, completing 
cross-examinations, etc. with the injunction application set for Dec. 20/00, 
to our strategic advantage.

We were proceeding vigorously on this basis when to my surprise I received a 
phone call from Dan Fournier on Dec. 4/01 (9 weeks into the matter) to advise 
me that there was a "legal" conflict problem involving Westcoast, who is 
occasionally represented out of Blakes' Toronto office by Glenn Leslie.

I explained to Dan that if there was a conflicts problem between Enron and 
Westcoast, and although I was willing to do what I could in the 
circumstances, I was extremely concerned as to what could be done at that 
stage prior to the injunction hearing, noting the conflicts problem was of 
Blakes own making.  Indeed it seemed it was the problem of a Toronto-based 
partner who did not pay enough attention at the outset to look after his 
firm's and his own client's interests, which then needed to be resolved on an 
after-the-fact basis.

Although the problem was initially misleadingly presented to me by Dan as a 
legal conflict on the basis of Blakes having "certain confidential 
information regarding Westcoast", which I suspected to be a justification 
rather than the truth, when probed, Dan admitted that the conflict was a 
business conflict rather than a legal conflict.

Nonetheless, it was suggested by Dan that Blakes could proceed if Enron 
discontinued the action against Westcoast, which obviously was not advice 
given in Enron's interest.

I responded that this was not only unacceptable from a strategic if not legal 
position, and it was emphasized by me to Dan as being unnecessary and 
meaningless for the purposes of the injunction application, as the injunction 
was being sought against NGX and Canadian Enerdata, and no immediate remedy 
was being sought against Westcoast.

Nonetheless, and as a favor to Blakes, I agreed that if Blakes acted on the 
injunction only (which, as noted, did not involve Westcoast) scheduled for 
Dec. 20th, I would transition the file to another firm immediately after the 
injunction, in an orderly manner that did not adversely affect Enron's 
interests.

This result was not apparently acceptable to Blakes.  Late that evening I was 
advised by Dan that a call was being had at Blakes first thing the next 
morning involving Blakes' Chairman, Blakes' Managing Partner, the Westcoast 
responsible partner (Glenn Leslie) and the Enron responsible partner (Dan 
Fournier) to discuss the issue, and if it could not be resolved 
satisfactorily, Dalton McGrath, who is a more junior partner, would likely be 
held accountable.

Unsatisfied that my relationship with Dalton McGrath was being put into 
issue, and after reviewing the matter that evening at the time and 
inconvenience of Milnthorp at home, I called Dan first thing (7:00 am) the 
next morning to nonetheless reiterate to him that I would not only undertake 
to relocate the file, but I would try to do my best to move the file if 
possible ASAP, even BEFORE the injunction application, provided I could be 
satisfied that it could done in a way that was not adverse to Enron's 
interests.

Again, my unusual and more than reasonable accommodations to solve a problem 
of Blakes own making were not apparently satisfactory, as after the Blakes 
internal management call, I was advised late that next morning by Dan that:

(a)  Blakes had decided that, regardless of our wishes, the file must be 
transferred to another firm ASAP, such that, although Blakes would assist in 
the transition and the pending cross examination of Jon MacKay and Seabron 
Adamson, Blakes would have no involvement in the briefs to be filed nor in 
appearing at the injunction application, and would cease immediately to 
appear as solicitors of record, notwithstanding that the injunction was then 
for only a few business days hence under a greatly abbreviated court ordered 
timeline for examinations, briefs, etc.;  finding and educating replacement 
counsel would have to be done at year end, with extraordinary demands on 
replacement counsel (not to mention Enron's other year end commercial 
business concerns, requiring better use and allocation of our resources).

(b)  In making its decision, Blakes had considered:

 - the relative complexity of the Enron vs. Westcoast work (I would have 
assumed Enron would have won this one.)

 - relative annual billings (I would have assume, and it was later confirmed 
to me, that Enron's annual billings were more than 2-3x Westcoast's for the 
past 3 years.)

 - relative strategic importance to Blakes (Enron is the only international, 
Fortune 500 firm represented by Blakes out of its Calgary office.  I also 
would have assumed that Blakes Toronto has an interest in the deregulating 
Ontario power markets, in which Enron expects to be a market leader.  I also 
would have assumed that Blakes would have appreciated the increased profile 
that Enron has given it in the pulp and paper industry, the gas industry, the 
power industry, the insolvency industry, the derivatives and commodity 
trading markets, and in other jurisdictions such as in the Province of 
Quebec, in the Province of British Columbia, in Houston and with other 
counsel which historically act for Enron.)

 - its policy not to sue established clients (Although admirable and a policy 
with which I agree, I assume it was weighed against what must also be a long 
standing and overriding policy of not dumping established clients, especially 
having regard to ethical obligations; the immediacy of the matter; the time 
of year; the business rather than legal conflict; Enron's more than 
reasonable offers to move the file ASAP under its own control but even prior 
to the injunction application; the various misdirections and excuses; the 
fact that Blakes, and particularly the Westcoast responsible partner, knew or 
ought to have known of the conflict for approx. 9 weeks; and, most 
importantly, that Blakes problem was one of its own internal making.  Simply 
put, Blakes did not have the luxury of strictly relying on such a lofty 
principle in the circumstances.)

(c)  The arrangement had been pre-approved by Westcoast.  In other words, not 
only did Enron not have a say in the matter, its litigation adversary had all 
the say.

In short, it is difficult to conceive how on any reasonable basis Blakes came 
to its decision, or decided to communicate its decision in the way it did.  
The situation was of Blakes making, Enron had given Blakes a reasonable way 
out, and, with minimal fortitude by Blakes, and commercial reasonableness and 
respect of Westcoast towards Blakes, the decision to act for Enron on the 
terms proposed by me was obvious.

* * * * * * * * *

Mark, I have no clue why Blakes came to the decision it did in the 
circumstances.  Perhaps Blakes Toronto partner serviced clients are 
preferred?  Perhaps Blakes Calgary partners do not, or do not have the 
ability to represent the legitimate concerns of Enron within Blakes Toronto? 
Perhaps the Enron relationship is not adequately valued or Blakes does not 
like Enron's style?  Perhaps Blakes misjudged Enron's reaction relative to 
what would have been Westcoast's reaction in the alternative?  Whatever, the 
decision and the approach was wholly unsatisfactory.  Blakes needs to be 
accountable, and after-the-fact explanations, justifications, confessions, 
etc. are easily given, do not measure up to prior actions, and are 
necessarily self-serving. 

It is also noteworthy that Blakes decision partly resulted in an adjournment 
of the injunction application to Feb. 18/01 and fundamentally destroyed our 
opportunity to win the injunction which has since been dropped at 
considerable out-of-pocket cost and business prejudice to Enron.  It is also 
noteworthy that Westcoast soon after sold out its position in NGX to OM 
Gruppen, and that we have dropped both NGX and OM Gruppen from the lawsuit.

Mark, I have told Blakes that in these circumstances, more than explanations, 
excuses and promises are necessary.  I also told them that we are focused on 
developing more external counsel relations, and since I have retained Oslers, 
Stikemans, and Ernst & Young on various matters with good results.  I told 
Blakes that we certainly would not preclude using them, but that before I did 
so I wanted an explanation as to how these circumstances arose and how Blakes 
took the decision it did and communicated it the way it did.  

I also told Blakes that the quality and staffing of their work had been 
slipping for some time, and that I would want a renewed commitment to 
staffing files with quality lawyers who are responsible for the working 
relationships.

If you want to discuss the matter in advance of your meeting, please let me 
know.

Peter.

I think it is a good opportunity to promote standardized contracts.  Mark

	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	02/10/2001 05:07 PM
		 
Mark-

We have been discussing whether to have a press breakfast or other press
contacts in Houston for the March 6 conference.  We think there could be
some interesting media coverageand press interest.  

I look forward to your thoughts and would be happy to have a short call to
explore further Monday. Please advise.

Thanks and regards, Ruth

Bob:  The person to ask would be Mark Evans in London.  Let's get together 
for lunch sometime when you are in Houston.  Mark

	"Baird, Bob" <RBaird@velaw.com>
	02/09/2001 05:07 PM
		 
Mark: Do you know off the top of your head who Enron uses in Frankfurt,
Germany?  

I am trying to help out someone who is looking for a U.S. firm (or a firm
with a U.S. office) that also has an office in Frankfurt, to assist with a
large business transaction.

Many thanks.

Hope you are doing well. 

Robert S. Baird
Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
One American Center
600 Congress
Austin, Texas 78701
Telephone: (512)495-8451
When calling from Houston (713)758-2414
Fax: (512)236-3210
Email: rbaird@velaw.com
Home telephone (512)347-8066
Car phone: (512)627-8065
Home fax: (512)347-8065
Pager: 1-888-487-2651

          ++++++CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE+++++
The information in this email may be confidential and/or privileged.  This
email is intended to be reviewed by only the individual or organization
named above.  If you are not the intended recipient or an authorized
representative of the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any
review, dissemination or copying of this email and its attachments, if any,
or the information contained herein is prohibited.  If you have received
this email in error, please immediately notify the sender by return email
and delete this email from your system.  Thank You

The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of February 15, 2001.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.  

Please let me know if you have questions.

My particular concern is that the large majority of Enron's derivatives 
business is in North America.  We are growing rapidly in derivatives in 
Europe, but still quite small.  In terms of derivatives, we are not a factor 
on other continents.  That is different than major equity, currency or 
interest rate traders.

Mark

Ruth: The press release looks fine.  Mark

	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	02/28/2001 10:57 AM
		 
 <<ISDA Energy Conference Release-Revised.doc>>  <<Draft Mexico Agenda
(2-20-01).doc>>

Mark -As we discussed.  I look forward to hearing from you.  Latin American
Committee details to follow soon.  Best, Ruth

 - ISDA Energy Conference Release-Revised.doc
 - Draft Mexico Agenda (2-20-01).doc

Ann K is working on this now.  Thanks.  Mark

	Mark Greenberg@ENRON
	02/28/2001 09:52 AM
		 
Mark -

I was reviewing information Leslie had left behind and was curious if you 
ever had a chance to review and approve the Third Party Platform Policy that 
Leslie had prepared?  If not, I have attached a version of the policy below 
for your review.

The only change I see that needs to be made is the replacement of Leslie's 
name with mine.

Please let me know if you should need anything further.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

Please use the form attached when preparing the top ten risks for your 
businesses.  Please be brief!

Please update the attached Legal Risk Report.   Send the revised report by 
e-mail.  Thank you.

I am willing to do this on the 20th, but only for one hour maximum.  See if 
Jim has any interest and then get back to Peter.   Mark
	Peter Keohane
	Sent by: Sharon Crawford
	03/01/2001 12:30 PM
		 
Jim and Mark, further to my earlier exchange of e-mails with Mark, 3 
representatives of the Donahue Ernst & Young firm, Doug Black, Harold Huber 
and Ron Deyholos, will be in Houston on March 19th and 20th, and they were 
wondering about your availability to meet with them.  They have other 
meetings lined up on the 19th, but would be available, subject to your 
availability, later in the afternoon on March 19th or any time in the morning 
on March 20th.

Please let me know whether that works for either of you, and I will have Ron 
Deyholos then contact you directly to make firmer arrangements.

Regards,
Peter

please set up.  Mark
	Brenda Whitehead
	03/01/2001 01:22 PM
		 
Per the request of Shari Stack and Elizabeth Sager, we are putting together a 
luncheon for the individuals who assisted with the PG&E crisis.  Please let 
me know if you are available for lunch at PESCE from 11:30 am - 1:30 pm on 
either of the following dates:

  Monday, March 26
  Tuesday, March 27
  Thursday, March 29.

Thanks for your cooperation.

Chris:

Thanks for the message.  I appreciate the feedback.  I know she has been 
working particularly hard lately!  We are working to add resources, but that 
is not easy.  Thanks for your support.

Mark

	Christopher F Calger
	03/04/2001 12:15 PM
		 
Mark,

Just wanted to let you know that Sheila has been doing a truly outstanding 
job for West Power lately.  There has been some big, thankless challenges 
related to transacting around our new finance vehicle, Turbopark, and she 
might feel a little beat up by the experience, but she has performed 
extremely well. 

Regards,

Chris

  

fyi
=09Mark Haedicke@ENRON
=09Sent by: Enron Announcements@ENRON
=0903/02/2001 04:51 PM
=09=09=20
In order to ensure adequate, consistent legal review of on-line terms and=
=20
conditions governing use of third party electronic trading platforms, you=
=20
must have all registration documentation (including, for example, password=
=20
applications and access agreements) approved by the On-Line Trading Legal=
=20
Contact before such documentation is submitted or executed.  Any document=
=20
that requires acceptance by =01&clicking=018 should be treated like any oth=
er legal=20
document.  You are not authorized to accept any such click agreement withou=
t=20
written approval of the On-Line Trading Legal Contact.  In addition, the=20
On-Line Trading Legal Contact must review and approve all product=20
descriptions and other on-line terms and conditions applicable to a product=
=20
before a password may be used to trade that product on a third party=20
electronic trading platform.  Accordingly, before any master user or subuse=
r=20
uses a password to trade a product, he or she must confirm that the On-Line=
=20
Trading Legal Contact has approved all applicable product descriptions and=
=20
terms and conditions applicable to such product.=20

The current On-Line Trading Legal Contact is Mark Greenberg (extension 5889=
7)=20
(or in his absence, Mark Taylor (extension 37459)). 

I am confused by this.  Does this mean Cuiaba in South America would be 
covered?  What is the significance if it is?

Mark

	Rob Walls/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/02/2001 04:21 PM
		 
 Mark -
 
 Per my voice mail.  Give me a call at your convenience.  Thanks.

 Rob

Rob:
 As we discussed, the Purchase Right Agreement terminates on January 1, 2005. 
 Therefore, if an Eligible Project commences Commercial Operations before 
January 1, 2005 (or if before January 1, 2005, an Enron Party acquires an 
Ownership Interest in an Eligible Project that has commenced Commercial 
Operations) and Limited Recourse Financial Closing has occurred with respect 
to such Eligible Project, then the Enron Party must offer to sell to EGPP the 
Ownership Interest of such Enron Party in such Eligible Project in accordance 
with the Purchase Right Agreement.

An Eligible Project is any Designated Development Project or Future Project 
in which an Enron Party holds or aquires an Ownership Interest.

A Future Project is any Power Plant or Natural Gas Pipeline (other than the 
Designated Development Projects) that is located within the Territory and on 
which construction has commenced or has been completed, provided that 
pipelines primarily designed to transport liquefied natural gas or natural 
gas liquids are excluded from Future Projects.

The Territory is all geographic areas of the World, excluding areas within 
the boundaries of the United States, Canada and Western Europe.

Please let me know if you need further explanation.  Thanks.

Kelly

Does Matt have time to do all the LNG work?  My guess is that he may have the 
time.  Mark

	Alan Aronowitz
	03/02/2001 02:28 PM
		 
FYI. This will greatly impact Matt's workload and availability for potential 
EBS activities. I would like to visit with you about this.

Regards, Alan
	Daniel R Rogers@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/02/2001 12:27 PM
		 
Alan,

As we discussed the other day, I'm forwarding my "work list" of projects 
either currently or soon to be underway that will be led by V V Rao's team 
out of Singapore (with support from Dubai and Houston):

1. Australia -- Northwest Shelf LNG "Wedge Quantities" bid.  Proposal for 
mid-term, firm (but declining over time) LNG supply for merchant trading 
activities prepared and being sent to NWS next week.  Preparation and 
negotiations of SPA, transportation and marketing contracts to follow.

2. Australia -- Northwest Shelf LNG Master Spot LNG Trading Agreement -- 
draft prepared and being sent to counterparty next week.  Negotiations to 
follow.

3. Indonesia -- PERTAMINA Master Spot LNG Trading Agreement -- draft prepared 
and being sent to counterparty next week.  Negotiations to follow.

4. Japan -- Osaka Gas Co. Master Spot LNG Trading Agreement -- draft prepared 
and sent to counterparty.  Expect responsive comments next week.  
Negotiations to follow.

5. Malaysia/Spain -- LNG fuel supply for Enron's Arcos IPP in Spain -- 
initial term sheet under development.  Expect this one to heat up in the next 
few months.

6. Malaysia -- Malaysia LNG Master Spot LNG Trading Agreement -- draft 
prepared and will be sent to counterparty later in the month.  Negotiations 
to follow.

7. Malaysia -- "Bintulu Hub" e-commerce venture with Malaysia LNG, Malaysia 
Int'l. Trading Co., Enron LNG Marketing and Enron Networks -- under 
development.  Legal needs will depend somewhat on final deal format.  Goal is 
to be set up for LNG commodity and LNG transportation capacity e-trading 
(possibly on a Deal Bench auction site platform) by year-end.  May expand to 
cover crude oil commodity and transportation capacity trading as well 
following recent meetings in London.

8. Japan -- LNG Receiving Terminal & gas and power marketing joint 
development project with Enron LNG Marketing LLC, BHP and EnCom.  Initial 
draft of joint development MOU prepared.  Negotiations to follow.

9. Korea -- KOGAS Winter Cargo Supply & Transportation Opportunities -- under 
develoopment.  Various MOU drafts have been exchanged, but deal structure and 
timing keep moving around.  Legal needs will ultimately depend somewhat on 
final deal format. 

10. Master LNG Vessel Transportation Capacity Access/Trading Agreements -- 
under early development, but should accelerate to match pace of no. 7 above.  
Document will then be used to propose access to numerous other LNG vessel 
owners/charterers who may wish to participate with Enron in making a market 
for spare transportation capacity.  Initial draft underway in Houston, but 
may be handed off to Singapore at some point.

As you can see, there's presently quite a lot of activity being undertaken 
from Singapore.  Much of this has arisen since the beginning of this year.  
Nancy and I have been involved in preparing initial drafts, providing 
comments, etc. from Houston (and occasional fly-in appearances)  and V V 
presently has on-the-ground legal support from an excellent Linklaters Team 
based in Singapore.  Matt Lee has now circled with V V's team and is 
undergoing both intensive commercial LNG training and intensive LNG trading 
contract training.  I suspect that on average this year, we could easily use 
70-100% of  Matt Lee's time (depending on how the above activities progress).

Kind regards,
Dan
 

Paul Trishmann --Check the spelling.

Thanks for raising the issue.  Keep me posted!   Mark

	Christian Yoder
	03/08/2001 09:38 AM
		 
Whereas in the California phase of the western power crisis, we had to deal 
with the emergence of a new governmental agency, CDWR, and figure out whether 
or not and how it might pay us,  in the next, northwest phase, where we will 
probably have to deal with the disintegration, or at least misbehavior,  of a 
powerful federal rogue agency, BPA, one issue that will invariably arise is 
payment default by BPA.  As we have blithely sailed along with BPA up until 
now, we often say to ourselves,  "Oh, when you contract with BPA, you are 
backed by the good faith and credit of the United States of America."  I 
would like you both to put your heads together and decide who at your firm 
can give us a memo addressing BPA's payment mechanisms from a legal, 
statutory perspective.  It bothers me to hear things like;  "they only have 
$700 million in their warchest,"  or "if they can't make their Treasury 
payment they are toast."  What do these kinds of remarks mean to us legally?  
Are we contracting with the surplus bloated   Treasury of the United States 
of America or are we going to have a rude surprise and find out that we are 
contracting with one of these discrete funds that can run out of cash and be 
held hostage by warring politicians?   We need a concise legal analysis of 
this point very soon. ----cgy 

Do you have any comments on this contract?  Please let me and Chris know.   
Mark
	Chris Gaffney
	03/07/2001 04:47 PM
		 
Mark - Attached is a draft of a 3 year, 30 MW power transaction that Enron 
Canada Corp. is contemplating entering into with Atlantic Packaging Products 
Ltd.  The form of agreement is the one-off industrial form that is 
back-to-backed  by the British Energy supply source.  We have used this form 
for the Sunoco, TransCanada and Ivaco transactions.  As with the other 
agreements, the transaction is conditional on, among other things, Ontario 
Market opening occurring by November 30, 2001.

Regards
CJG

Mark:

I would like to get together at the AGM.  I will ask my assistant to work on 
a time would could meet and propose that to you.  Hope things are going well.

Mark Haedicke

	Mark.Harding@CliffordChance.com
	03/07/2001 12:55 PM
		 
Mark,

Remembering that we missed each other in London, will you be at the AGM in
DC? If so, shall we get together briefly? I met Mark Evans from your team in
London recently and had a useful chat about the state of the relationship
between CC and Enron. I also know that David Yeres from our NY office met
with you some time back in Houston. He will also be at the AGM and would, I
know, like to follow up on that meeting.

Best regards.

Mark

*******

This message and any attachment are confidential and may be privileged or 
otherwise protected from disclosure.  If you are not the intended recipient, 
please telephone or email the sender and delete this message and any 
attachment from your system.  If you are not the intended recipient you must 
not copy this message or attachment or disclose the contents to any other 
person.

For further information about Clifford Chance please see our website at 
http://www.cliffordchance.com or refer to any Clifford Chance office.

Thanks.  Please don't hold up the meeting for me but if possible I will 
attend.  Mark

	Christian Yoder
	03/07/2001 12:20 PM
		 
Tim agrees that a half day legal strategy session about the pending summer 
melt down should happen sooner rather than later.   I understand that Richard 
and Elizabeth are scheduling a trip to Portland for the first week in April.  
I will coordinate their schedules with Tim's and tie down the details.  

Here is what I intend to do in the meantime.  Any thoughts or comments would 
be appreciated:

Get our major summer trading positions identified and get the contractual 
underpinings organized.  This is something that Kim Theriot's group can help 
us with.
Meet with our  fundamentals leader and our head scheduler to try to 
understand as much as we can about how  shortage scenarios might unfold and 
what power flow behavior at the key delivery points might look like.  
Meet with Steve Walters of Stoel Rives to get his mind focussed on big 
picture early positioning moves we might wish to take with BPA.
Get Marcus Wood to help us refine our understanding of BPA Surplus firm and 
Excess Federal Power and how BPA might reasonably be expected to act with 
respect to each.
Get credit to figure out if there is anyway we can get BPA to post a large 
amount of LC collateral to us.  
----cgy

Peter:

As we have discussed, I think we probably need someone other than Dan.  I 
don't think there is any need to lay everything out on use of lawyers in 
Canada.  I agree with your comments on the business model for lawyers.  We 
can't ignore that.  Let's generally talk that through with Jim.

Regards,

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	03/07/2001 08:46 AM
		 
Mark, a few thoughts:

1.  Dan Fournier asked me to go to lunch so he could update me on his "very 
positive meeting" with Jim and you.  I told Dan, politely, that I am very 
tired of talking to the issue and really have nothing more to add.  I hope 
that is OK with you.  To be honest, I am really tired of talking to the issue 
and dealing with Dan Fournier's political maneuvering, but I am also 
concerned that it seems apparent that the result of his meeting with you and 
Jim is that he thinks he is back in the saddle with Enron.  I have lost trust 
and confidence in Dan Fournier and as I mentioned Dan's approach within 
Blakes becomes exclusive and results in inefficient allocation of Blakes 
resources to our files.  He tries to conquer the client and thereby alienates 
the talent within his firm.  I know for a fact, after he has squeezed others 
out on our work and his mismanagement of this issue with Enron, that if Dan 
is back in the saddle, many of his partners will not been keen on doing our 
work under Dan's terms.  I also know that there is a philosophy in Houston to 
commercial people not having say in legal retainers, but I believe that the 
senior commercial people who are responsible for the transactions, 
particularly in a smaller office in a smaller market, have an important place 
in the relationship, and in that regard, I know Fournier has lost the trust 
and confidence of Rob Milnthorp.

2.  Regarding Donahue Ernst and Young, it should be borne in mind that the 
initial contact to doing work at their firm was through Jordan Mintz and 
Morris Clark on the tax side.  I also know Jordan thinks well not just of 
their firm but of the multidisciplinary business model.  I also think that 
Jim needs to understand that the business model is likely not going away, and 
likely to expand in Canada, the US and Europe and is something we likely 
cannot ignore.  Also, the circumstances you will recall for us using DEY 
initially was on regulatory and contracting issues affecting the retail 
market, where the incumbent firms with any experience in the area were all 
conflicted and in an area where Blakes is particularly weak in Calgary.  (We 
first approached Stikemans, which had conflict with Enmax, and Bennett Jones, 
which had a conflict with ATCO.  Other firms which we do not typically use 
but which had experience also had conflicts.  After that, I solicited written 
propsals from both Blakes and DEY and interviewed with them with the retail 
team.)  Frankly, DEY has done good work for us.  E&Y is also very well 
situated on the market development side in Ontario, a leading proponent of 
deregulation of the Ontario market, and worked with us to set up our systems 
in Toronto for market opening.

3.  Should I e-mail to Jim a proposed agenda for our call on the 20th 
outlining the firms we currently use in different capacities in Canada?  
Blakes, Bennett Jones, Stikemans, Oslers, Donahue E&Y, or is a less structurd 
call anticipated?

Peter.

Peter.

Greg:  Thanks.  Was a dash done on this?  Mark

	Greg Johnston
	03/06/2001 03:49 PM
		 
Enron Canada plans to subscribe to a private placement of common shares in 
Impact Energy Inc. as a merchant equity investment, which private placement 
is closing tomorrow. The acquisition will be made pursuant to a standard long 
form subscription agreement.  Impact Energy is a publicly traded Canadian 
junior oil and gas company (trades on the TSE under the symbol TEY), which 
resulted from the reorganization of Startech Energy by and with ARC Energy in 
January 2001.  Kyle plans on subscribing for 545,455 common shares at a price 
per share of CDN$0.55, for total consideration of $300,000.25.  Under 
Canadian securities legislation, there will be a hold period imposed on the 
shares of one year from the date of issuance of the shares, meaning that 
Enron Canada will be prevented from reselling the shares in the open market 
for one year, unless it resells them pursuant to another exemption from the 
prospectus requirements available under such securities legislation.  Enron 
Canada previously obtained shares in Impact as part of the plan of 
arrangement involving Startech and ARC.

Should you require anything further, please either contact myself at 
403-974-6745 or Derek Lynn at 403-974-6719.

Thanks
Greg Johnston

Brenda:

It is standard operating procedure to copy all assistants (to the extent you 
know who they are) on e-mails such as this.  In the future please make sure 
you copy me on any e-mails pertaining to meetings or business lunches in 
which Mark Haedicke should participate.  Thank you for your cooperation in 
the future.  

   

	Brenda Whitehead
	03/02/2001 11:35 AM
		 
A luncheon for the individuals who assisted with the PG&E crisis has been 
scheduled for Tuesday, March 27, 2001.  A reservation has been made under the 
name of "Enron" at Ruggles Restaurant, 903 Westheimer for 12:00 noon.  Please 
make sure to leave the office in time to reach the restaurant by 12:00 noon.  
Enjoy your lunch.  

Shouldn't you and Rick do that together so as not to have confusion.  Mark
	Rick Bergsieker@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/09/2001 05:42 AM
		 
I have completed your written performance review and have put a signed 
original copy in the mail to you.  When you get it, contact Brenda to arrange 
for a time for us to talk.  After we talk, you will have to sign the original 
and forward it to Dave Hill.

Thanks.

	Greg Johnston
	03/08/2001 05:25 PM
		
Mark, from talking to Kyle I understand that a DASH was not done for this 
transaction as it was under the threshhold.

Thanks
Greg

Greg:  Thanks.  Was a dash done on this?  Mark

	Greg Johnston
	03/06/2001 03:49 PM
		 
Enron Canada plans to subscribe to a private placement of common shares in 
Impact Energy Inc. as a merchant equity investment, which private placement 
is closing tomorrow. The acquisition will be made pursuant to a standard long 
form subscription agreement.  Impact Energy is a publicly traded Canadian 
junior oil and gas company (trades on the TSE under the symbol TEY), which 
resulted from the reorganization of Startech Energy by and with ARC Energy in 
January 2001.  Kyle plans on subscribing for 545,455 common shares at a price 
per share of CDN$0.55, for total consideration of $300,000.25.  Under 
Canadian securities legislation, there will be a hold period imposed on the 
shares of one year from the date of issuance of the shares, meaning that 
Enron Canada will be prevented from reselling the shares in the open market 
for one year, unless it resells them pursuant to another exemption from the 
prospectus requirements available under such securities legislation.  Enron 
Canada previously obtained shares in Impact as part of the plan of 
arrangement involving Startech and ARC.

Should you require anything further, please either contact myself at 
403-974-6745 or Derek Lynn at 403-974-6719.

Thanks
Greg Johnston

Approved for Janette Elbertson to go to Outlook 1082 on 3/29/01 from 1-2 p.m.

	Magdelena Cruz
	03/19/2001 08:08 AM
		 
Your approval is required for Janette Elbertson to attend the following class.
To grant approval, send a reply to "magdelena.cruz@enron.com" (NotesMail: 
Magdelena Cruz/HOU/ECT).
  Be sure to include employee's name and class number in reply.

Outlook
Session Dates & Times: 
  03/29/2001  1:00:00 PM-2:00:00 PM
Location: EB572
No Show/Participant Fee: $ 18.00

If you have any questions, please call the Technology Training Coordinator at 
713-853-1816.

I would think the change in the business direction requires a different ski=
ll=20
set.  Is that an appropriate response?

=09Rob Walls/ENRON@enronXgate
=0903/19/2001 08:47 AM
=09=09=20
John and Mark --

Your thoughts?

Mr. Walls

I was checking the stock prices when I saw the Enron=01%s homepage saying "=
The
power of Why". So, I=01%ve decided to write these few words. Certainly you =
do
not remember me as you meet lots of people everyday around the world. But I
had the pleasure of meeting you when I was attending a SAP training course
in 2000 when I was in Houston.
I worked for the Legal Departament in the Sao Paulo office and had been
developing a good job (at least my performance evaluations said so) when I
was said teh company was firing many people and I was included in the fatal
list. My immediate supervisors tried to do everything they could to keep me
there and all the answers were no.
I want you to know that this message is not to complain about my firing.
Everyone who works is subject to this fact, specially in Brazil. I simply
became astonished when I was told that two people are being hired for the
same position I had less than 2 months after I left the company.
So, my question is WHY? Why and how does Enron commit such a mistake? I
really trusted the company I used to work for, I really enjoyed working for
Enron and why? Why did Enron fired me and two months later started hiring
two others for the same position? How can such a big company like Enron be
so unreasonalble and why not to say insensitive?

Sorry for this emotional words but I had to say that. I know you might not
even  read this message but I had to try, specially because I did believe i=
n
RICE and I felt I had found out a company where the speech did correpond to
the action, but unfortunately...

Thank you for giving me a little piece of your time and wish success for th=
e
company because I still have friends working very hard there and they reall=
y
like it as I did once.

Thanks a lot for your attention.
Ana Cristina Carvalho dos Santos
ex- S?o Paulo office
email: anacristina32@hotmail.com

I am ok with it for the spot deals.   Mark

	Michelle Blaine/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/16/2001 01:48 PM
		 
Hi Mark, 
Sami Arap, John Novak & I are in the process of developing a new matrix for 
arbitration in Brazil on certain types of trading contracts for your 
approval.   Until that is complete, however, Sami & John have identified the 
following spot market contracts as needing immediate approval for dispute 
resolution clauses agreeing to ICC administered arbitration in Sao Paulo or 
Rio.  As you are aware, this is somewhat contrary to our traditional policy 
for out of country ICC arbitration.  The counter parties in these 
transactions will not agree to arbitration outside Brazil.  Given the nature 
of these contracts, I believe ICC administered arbitration in Brazil is an 
acceptable means for dispute resolution.  I've discussed this with Rob and he 
is in agreement subject to your approval.
Regards,
Michelle

Michelle;

Our commercial guys are negotiating a number of PPAs in Brazil (spot market 
deals) and we need to close these deals before the Brazilian Wholesale Power 
Market (MAE) starts accounting and settling the long & short differences 
among all players (LDC's, Genco's, marketers etc).  There are deals which 
were "closed" last year ("closing" meaning that price, MWh volume, term, 
power profile, center of gravity etc were agreed upon between the contracting 
entities).  Some of these MWh's have already been physically traded but MAE 
haven't yet calculated the system's settlement.

Karla and I are currently working on the below listed deals:

Moema-2: 10-year PPA to purchase 8MW; PV of apprx US$5,130,000.; MTM value of 
US$1,200,000.
Sgu?rio: 2-year PPA to purchase 0.5MW; TBD
Furnas Collar: 2-year PPA to purchase 20-90-130MW (collar concept); PV of 
apprx US$37,696,000.; MTM value of US$12,534,000.
Cofepar: 15-year term to purchase 200MW; PV of apprx US$171,014,000.; MTM to 
be defined.
CSN: 14-month PPA to purchase 13.4MW (10,000MWh/month); PV of apprx 
US$5,865,000.; MTM value of US$786,000.
Eletropaulo Metropolitana: 60-day PPA to purchase 7,000MWh/month; TBD
Gerasul/Pactual: 24-month PPA to purchase 29,57MW; PV of apprx 
US$19,096,000.; MTM value of US$4,235,000.
CEMAT/Pactual: 13-month PPA to purchase 46MW; PV of apprx US$12,201,000.; MTM 
value of 6,107,000.
Celtins: 30-day PPA to sell 80MWh during peak hours; TBD
Cemat: 30-day PPA to sell 950MWh during off-peak hours; TBD
SINOP:  10-month PPA to purchase 8MW; PV of apprx US$8,850,000; MTM value of 
US$1,723,000.
AES Sul:  4-month PPA to purchase 33,6MW; PV of apprx US$2,470,000.; MTM 
value of US$866,000.

We are not (yet) working under "umbrella" type of agreements where Enron and 
the counterparty will execute a General Terms and Conditions (GTC) with 
several Annexes, each of them related to a specific deal.  Each contract is 
to be treated as one single deal. 
Some of the above listed deals are 1QTR commercial priorities and I need to 
know if you would be OK with Enron's Marketing Co (ECE) using 
ICC-administered or FIESP-administered (as a second alternative) arbitration 
under ICC Rules in S?o Paulo as the PPA's dispute resolution mechanism.  
Although I am schedule to meet with Tozzini, Freire this week, I doubt I will 
have time to get their legal opinion, discuss it internally, prepare a 
recommendation to Jim Derrick etc etc.  I've already talked to some of the 
counterparty's in-house counsellors and none of them is willing to accept 
offshore arbitration.  Our counterparties' position has been arbitration in 
Brazil under int'l rules OR local courts.

 

Rgds,

Sami

Please schedule lunch in late April.   Mark
	"Swanstrom, Bill" <BSwanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
	03/16/2001 10:40 AM
		 
Mark, it's been awhile since we visited, so I thought it would be good if Don 
and I could get together for lunch sometime in the next couple of weeks.  Don 
and I are available on the 21st,  28th and 30th, and April 3-5.
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com
(713) 226-1143
 
 

Tim:
Thanks!  I am working on getting Steve even more locked up.  Mark

	Tim Belden
	03/16/2001 10:25 AM
		 
steve is doing great work for us right now.  given the departure of shari 
stack, it is critical that we continue to have steve working for us.  he does 
an incredible job!
Either hire this lawyer or ensure he is on the Enron account for a long 
time!  He is a great lawyer who is facilitating some of the hairy deals.

John:

I gave you a rewrite of Redman's list and the percentages.  I will send it 
again in case it got lost.     Mark

	John J Lavorato/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/15/2001 02:54 PM
		 
Mark

You still own me you expected values for Pan Nat.

Yes, thanks.  Mark

	Rob Walls/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/19/2001 11:12 AM
		 
 Mark -

 Are you in the loop on this?

Rob,

FYI..looks taken care of...much appreciated from your friends South of the 
Equator...

Closing the loop,

Kish
John Novak
03/15/2001 07:54 PM
You are clear to sign CSN with ICC-administered arbitration in Brazil.

Rgds,
 John

Sami Arap
03/15/2001 12:59 PM
John;

I am hoping to close a PPA with CSN on Friday.  The nominal value of the deal 
is approximately US$6million for a 13-month term.  I am fighting to get 
ICC-administered arbitration in Brazil as a dispute resolution mechanism.  
CSN insists on MAE mediation & local courts (which is unacceptable to us).  
In case we reach an agreement, can I go ahead with arbitration in Brazil ?  
Have you talked to Michelle Blaine or Mark Headicke yet ?

Tks,

Sami

Let's catch up when you get back to Houston.  We can go to lunch or set up 
time to meet in the office.  Mark

	Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/15/2001 07:45 PM
		 
Mark -

I'm attaching the March report for EGA.  I understand that the length is 
still probably more than you want -- we will keep working on winnowing it 
down.  I tended to leave in more discussion of troubled projects like SECLP 
and Dabhol.

I hope all is well.  I've been on the road for some time and am currently in 
Singapore.  I'm likely to head back to Bombay for at least the first few days 
of next week.

Bruce

Put this meeting on my schedule.  Mark
	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/19/2001 12:42 PM
		 
FYI, more background.

JWVS
	Keith Dodson & Ken Bean
	Sent by: Marilyn Oliver
	03/19/2001 11:49 AM
		 
On Thursday afternoon, March 22, at 2:30PM in the Doubletree La Salle 
Ballroom, we will have an All Employee Meeting to discuss Enron Engineering 
and Operations Services (EEOS).  Mark Frevert and Dan Leff will join Brian 
Stanley, John Gillis, and the two of us for this discussion.  Led by Mark and 
Dan, we have been on a corporate journey to determine the best method to 
provide a resource base for the building , operating, and maintaining of our 
existing and planned major assets. The discussions evolved around two major 
issues. First,  most of the engineering and project management resources were 
concentrated in the former EE &CC, but operational resources were spread 
among several groups.  OEC provided operational support to some, but not all 
Enron assets.  Second, the clear need for both the engineering and 
operational resources was in Wholesale not Retail (EES).  There will be some 
need to help EES bridge into Industrial clients, but this need is minor 
compared to the requirements of Wholesale.  As a benefit of the time Mark and 
Dan plus other Executive Committee Members put into the decision  to form 
EEOS, we believe we are correctly positioned to effectively address Enron's 
major project needs.  Our Thursday meeting is an open forum to discuss these 
and other issues you might have with our new or perhaps more clearly defined 
position.  

We look forward to seeing you on Thursday.

Keith Dodson 
Chief Operating Officer - EEOS

Ken Bean
Vice President - Operational Energy Corp.

I don't have a problem with it, subject to our normal litigation exception.  
Mark

	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	03/14/2001 06:04 PM
		 
Mark:

I am attaching a copy of a brief memo I received from one of my partners in 
our Houston office about a potential representation of a company called 
Centrans, which apparently is a partner with Enron in a Guatemala power 
project.  Centrans apparently plans to sell a piece of its interest to a 
Fund, in which Enron also owns and interest (although I do not know how much).
We would represent Centrans in selling its interest to the Fund.  I am not 
sure, but I do not get the sense from my conversation with my partner that 
Enron plans to take an active role in the Fund purchase.  So, from a 
conflicts analytical standpoint, this would seem to be analogous to LeBoeuf 
representing a buyer in connection with the sale of an asset to a corporation 
in which Enron is a shareholder.

Do you have any concerns with LeBoeuf representing Centrans on this sale?  
Are there any unique facts or circumstances here that you may be aware of 
that could create a potential problem from your standpoint?  I assume this 
transaction would fall within your "world" but, if not, is there somebody 
else that I should check with on this?  We understand that Thelen Reid & 
Priest is representing the Fund.

Thanks, as usual, Mark, for your consideration.  Perhaps you could just reply 
to this e-mail or ask Janette to give me a call if it is ok.

John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction 
of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

 - centrans.doc

Not much should overlap with our agenda.  Thanks.  Mark

	Lisa Mellencamp
	03/19/2001 02:20 PM
		 
attached is the latest from corp. legal conference fyi just so you can see 
what is planned there if you have not seen yet.

Lisa J. Mellencamp
	Diane Goode@ENRON
	03/15/2001 04:18 PM
		 
 Here's the attachment.  

	Diane Goode
	03/15/2001 04:14 PM
		 
Here is a chart showing the speakers and topics for the Enron Corp. May 2001 
Law Conference.  If you have any questions about the list, please call me.  I 
made changes to the chart today, so this is the most current information.

You participated in the OGC meeting which was fine.  I did not want to miss 
out on your participation.  Going foward, please join  the Legal Committee 
starting this coming Monday and every other week.  Mark

It may be too late now, but I would like to meet with them.  Mark

	Peter Keohane
	03/12/2001 06:00 PM
		 
As I mentioned DEY representatives will be in Houston March 19/20 and wanted 
to meet with you and Jim Derrick.  Jim is not available, but they were 
wondering if they could meet with you.  Given Jim's position on these types 
of firms, Jim's unavailability, and your schedule do you have any interest in 
meeting with them?  Peter.

fyi
	Eddy Daniels@ENRON
	03/09/2001 05:02 PM
		 

Eddy: Let's get together and go over the agenda before the meeting.  Thanks.  
Mark

	Eddy Daniels@ENRON
	03/20/2001 05:18 PM
		
Please find attached a notice of a board of directors meeting for Transborder 
Gas Services Ltd. for next Weds., March 28, 2001.  The meeting will be held 
immediately after presentations to the shareholders' representatives (Enron & 
Shell ) in Cuiaba, Brazil and will start at 11:00 am local time (9am Houston 
time).  There will be a telephone call-in number for board members who can 
not attend in person which will circulate later this week.

Regards,

Eddy Daniels

Great news!   Thanks.   Mark

	Peter Keohane
	03/20/2001 07:07 PM
		 
Mark, I thought you might be interested in the attached note Elizabeth kindly 
sent to me.  I can't emphasize enough the number of significant issues we 
were able to accomplish in Blue Range, which included not just the first 
decision in Canada regarding the categorization of physicals and financials 
as forward contracts (we call them eligible financial contracts) entitled to 
protection under insolvency (which Elizabeth has referred to as the safe 
harbor), but also included:  the first decision in Canada that a shareholders 
claim against management for neglect, although normally an unsecured claim is 
subordinated in insolvency; a decision confirming rights of set-off both 
before and after the insolvency; and at least quadrupling our anticipated 
recovery by making a bid to by Blue Range's assets out of the insolvent 
estate.  Regards, Peter
Peter

Just wanted to let you know that all the great work in Blue Range is paying 
off in the US - citing Blue Range, a Houston bankruptcy court correctly 
decided that a gas contract was a forward contract relative to the US safe 
harbor provisions.  If you want a copy of the opinion let me know.

Hope all is well.

Elizabeth  713 853 6349

Eddy: Please call into this meeting to see if it is worth while for us.  Ma=
rk
=09Pedro Martinez <PMARTINEZ@isda.org>
=0903/20/2001 11:51 AM
=09=09=20

A correction. The subcommittee meeting should be held at 9:30AM instead of
9:30PM. Thank you.

PMD
>  -----Original Message-----

FYI:  Consider the agenda below and how we can get ISDA to help us in 
Brazil.   Mark
	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	03/09/2001 04:56 PM
		 
FYI - We welcome Enron's participation.  Here's the Agenda:

 <<Agenda Brazilian Subcommittee Meeting-4.doc>>

 - Agenda Brazilian Subcommittee Meeting-4.doc
 - Minutes Brazilian Subcommittee Meeting-3.doc

The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of March 15, 2001.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.

Please let me know if you have questions.

Please remember if you are going to be out of the office on vacation or for 
business matters have your assistant send me an e-mail (and copy Janette) 
with the dates you will be out and the telephone number where you can be 
contacted. 

Thank you.

Please put on my schedule.  Mark
	Debra Hicks/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/22/2001 11:18 AM
		 
 This is to confirm that a conference call has been scheduled for Tuesday, 
March 27th at 3:00 p.m. (CST) to discuss Enron Corp form of guaranties.  

 For your convenience, please use the call-in number below:

  Domestic: 800-991-9019
  International: 847-619-8039
  Passcode: 6773228#
  Host:  Rob Walls

 Thanks.

 Debra
 5-5416

Put this on my schedule for tomorrow.  Mark
	Mina Miyakawa@ENRON
	03/22/2001 09:50 AM
		 
The above meeting is confirmed for  tomorrow, Friday, March 23th at 12:00p.m. 
Brazil time/9:00a.m. Houston time.

The dial-in numbers remain the same:
Intl call in #: 1 (954) 797-1944
Toll Free/Domestic call in #: (877) 475-9228
Participant code: 224933
Host code: 662276 (John Novak)
 
Press *0 at anytime during your conference call for operator assistance. 

John Novak
03/08/2001 04:39 PM
We are implementing a legal team meeting with a smaller group that will meet 
during weeks when we don't have the all hands Legal Staff meeting.  The Legal 
Team meeting will be held every other Friday at 9:00 Houston time (currently 
12:00 noon S?o Paulo/Rio time) starting tomorrow.  The idea of the smaller 
group meeting is to get updates on the key deals/assets in the region so we 
can keep Houston current on a weekly basis when the larger legal staff 
meeting is not scheduled.  

While the group included on this call may change from time to time as deal 
priorities change, currently I would like to allocate reporting 
responsibility as follows:  Arap (key trading/origination deals); Watanabe 
(Eletrobolt); Vasco (Elektro); Porto (CEG/Gas Business Unit); Mendoza 
(Transredes sale process); and Novak (Cuiab?).

I look forward to speaking with you tomorrow.

Rgds,
 John

Time: 9:00 a.m. (Houston time)/12:00p.m. (Brazil time)
Intl call in #: 1 (954) 797-1944
Domestic call in #: 1 (877) 475-9228
Participant code: 224933
Host code: 662276
Host: John Novak

Neal:

Thanks for the message.  We are tracking the developments in Washington very 
carefully.  Have Dan give me a call, if he would like.  Hope you and your 
family are doing well.

Take care.

Mark

To ensure a smooth flow of bank resolutions to the necessary signatories, I 
am requesting that Enron Treasury first route the bank resolutions to Angela 
Davis (EWS Legal) to be initialed before being routed to John Lavorato or 
Louise Kitchen.

If you have any questions please call me at 3-6544.  Thank you for your 
attention to this matter.

Thanks for the ideas!  Mark

	Mark Tawney/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/26/2001 01:40 PM
		 
For the trip to Kyoto, I would recommend seats in the Green Car (non-smoking) 
on the Bullet Train.

In Tokyo, I think that you and your son would enjoy Odaiba - Joypolis. 
http://gojapan.about.com/travel/gojapan/library/photo/bltokyo_odaiba2.htm

I also think that Asakusa would be a fun area to visit. 
http://gojapan.about.com/travel/gojapan/library/weekly/aa021201a.htm?terms=Asa
kusa

I will talk with my wife this evening to see if she has any additional ideas.

Thank you again for lunch.

Bob:  I am going to pass on the playoff tickets.  Thanks.   Mark

	"Baird, Bob" <RBaird@velaw.com>
	03/27/2001 01:45 PM
		 
Mark and Rob:
 
Rockets have been looking good (despite the recent slump) and have a chance
to make the playoffs.  (I heard on the radio this morning that Hakeem may be
back.)  
 
So the Rockets have sent out invoices for playoff tickets.  We are supposed
to respond by this Friday, March 30.
 
This year (perhaps because they know there's a decent chance they won't make
the playoffs) the Rockets are invoicing playoff tickets in two installments.
The first installment covers rounds one and two, and the second covers the
Western Conference Finals and the NBA Championship.
 
I can't tell whether if you commit for the first two rounds you have a legal
obligation to buy the second and third if they make it to the Western
Conference Finals, but I assume that doesn't matter (we should assume that a
commitment now means a financial commitment for the entire playoffs).
 
Rounds 1 and 2 encompass 6 games.  $549 per seat, or $2,196 total.  That's
two games in Round 1 at $88.50 per ticket, and four games in Round 2 at
$93.00 per ticket.
 
Rounds 3 and 4 (which we wouldn't have to pay for until later) are $916 per
seat, or $3,664.  I assume that Rounds 3 and 4 will include 8 games.
 
For the regular season I had 6/44 of the tickets, which is 13.6%.  That's
approximately 1 ticket in Rounds 1 and 2 and 1 ticket in Rounds 3 and 4.
I'd be glad to spring for that, although if you all want all the playoff
tickets that's fine also.
 
So I suppose how much it's going to cost each of you depends on whether my
ticket is Round 1 or 2.  If it's in round 2 each of you would pay $912 for
the first two rounds, and if it's in round 1 each of you would pay $921.  If
the two of you want all the playoff tickets, each of you would pay $1,098
for Rounds 1 and 2.
 
This year the Rockets are saying that if the tickets are not used you can
ask for a refund by the same means that you paid.  So what I would propose
to do it put all the charges on my credit card and if they don't make the
playoffs that charge will be reversed; and it may not even make it on my
bill if they don't make the playoffs.
 
Since I will put it on my card I won't need your money until about the 20th
of April.
 
So please let me know if you want to commit and whether you want me to take
a ticket out of each of the sets of rounds. (I'm fine either way)
 
 

Robert S. Baird 
Vinson & Elkins L.L.P. 
One American Center 
600 Congress 
Austin, Texas 78701 
Telephone: (512)495-8451 
When calling from Houston (713)758-2414 
Fax: (512)236-3210 
Email: rbaird@velaw.com 
Home telephone (512)347-8066 
Car phone: (512)627-8065 
Home fax: (512)347-8065 
Pager: 1-888-487-2651 

 
          ++++++CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE+++++
The information in this email may be confidential and/or privileged.  This
email is intended to be reviewed by only the individual or organization
named above.  If you are not the intended recipient or an authorized
representative of the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any
review, dissemination or copying of this email and its attachments, if any,
or the information contained herein is prohibited.  If you have received
this email in error, please immediately notify the sender by return email
and delete this email from your system.  Thank You

I am ok with your slate, but need some Houston people on board as well.  I 
think we can shorten the Houston list by taking me off since John Novak will 
be on the board.  I leave it to Bruce to see if it makes sense to shorten the 
list further.  Mark

	Orlando Gonzalez@ENRON
	03/27/2001 01:51 PM
		 
Did you  get a chance to review the Elektro board make up.  I would like to 
finalize before the next ordinary shareholder meeting in Brazil.   Thanks

Orlando Gonzalez
02/04/2001 10:35 PM
Bruce,  This solution does not work for Brazilian entities for legal 
reasons.    I will send a summary of the current situation and a proposal to 
resolve. We can discuss during your visit.  Thanks

Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
31/01/2001 19:26
Folks -

The Legal Specialists in EGA are working up new director/officer slates for 
the EGA entities.  We will be appointing the following list of directors for 
EGA entities:  

Rebecca McDonald
Jim Hughes
Jeff Sommers
Jim Derrick
Mark Haedicke

There will be some exceptions to this slate, particularly where local law or 
the necessity of regular board attendance requires additional (or even 
different) directors to be appointed.  These will be considered on a 
case-by-case basis.  Allow the Legal Specialists the opportunity to come up 
with their tentative slates and then we will give them to the regional heads 
for comment.

Some of you will be asked to resign your current directorships.  I hope that 
no one will take offense to the fact of of the changed slates -- none is 
intended.  We have found that this common slate has made corporate governance 
more efficient and less complicated.

Thank you for your cooperation.  Please pass this message along to others in 
your respective groups as you deem necessary.

Bruce

To be elected as a Board member a person must be a shareholder of the Company 
(normally one share is transferred to such member) and tehre is no more the 
requirement of the Brazilian residency.
There is no other mandatory requirements.
However one has to have in mind that from a practical point of view it  is 
not viable to have only non residents at the Board (frequent trips to Brazil, 
less flexibility on timing to pass resolutions about ugent matters etc)  
Ideally at least trhee shoul be resident in Brazil (present minum quorum to 
held a Board Meeting.)
Vasco.

>>> <Orlando.Gonzalez@enron.com> 2/4/01 11:39:09 pm >>>

Vasco   What are the residency requirements for board membership?  Are
there other specific requirements?  I would like to send a proposal this
week. Thanks

Orlando:
As per your request, please find bellow the names of all of the present
members of Elektro's Board.
Firstly is to be mentioned that according to Elektro's By Laws, the Board may 
have a minimum of 4 and a
maximum of 7 permanent members (one obligatorily must be elected by
appointment of Elektros' employees) and a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 4
alternates (one obligatorily to act solely as alternate to the employees'
representative at the Board)

Permanent members:
Diomedes Christodoulou (President)
Orlando Goanz?lez
Ricky Linn Waddell
Geraldo Gon?alves Pereira (elected by appointment of Elektro's employees)
Vacant (3)
Alternate members:
James Martin Bannantine
Richard Allan Lammers
Ricardo Louren?o Carneiro (alternate to Geraldo Gon?alves)
Vacant (3)

The election and/or dismissal of the Board members has to be decided by the
shareholders of the company.
Normally the election o the Board members takes place at the annual
Ordinary Shareholder's meeting. (This year, our OGM is scheduled to take
place on April, 29th.)
However this matter  can also be decided at any time via an Extraordinary
Shareholder's Meeting  that has to be called trough a  Board Resolution
that  has to be publicized at the Official Gazette no later than 8 days
prior to date of such EGM.
Should the present number of the Board members be maintained (i.e 4
permanent and 3 alternates), the election of new members (from our side)
will have to be made upon the resignation of those presently on seat.
Should you deem necessary, please call me at your earliest convenience.
Least but nol east As I vave mentined to you the other day, it is quite 
normal to appoint the senior legal council as an alternate to the permanent 
members of the Board so that he may legally be present at all the board 
meetings

Let me know if anyone in your group is interested.  Mark
=09Mark Frevert/ENRON@enronXgate
=09Sent by: Nicki Daw/ENRON@enronXgate
=0903/27/2001 11:50 AM
=09=09=20
On Wednesday, April 11, 2001, Enron, in conjunction with Junior Achievement=
,=20
will host 40 students from Westside High School and Kerr High School for a=
=20
day of Job Shadowing.  This program=01,s objectives are to demonstrate why =
a=20
sound education, interpersonal skills, and a strong work ethic are needed t=
o=20
be successful in the workplace.

The Job Shadowing program consists of the following:

 8:45 AM  Students arrive
 9:00 - 10:30 AM Welcome, Overview, Video, and Tours
 10:30 - 12:00 N Individual Job Shadow Experience with Enron Employees
 12:00 - 1:00 PM Student Lunch with Closing Comments
 1:00 PM  Students return to schools

We need your assistance in identifying individuals within your area who wou=
ld=20
be available to assist with the job shadowing experience.  Please contact=
=20
Nicki Daw ASAP with your recommendations.  More detailed information will b=
e=20
supplied to the employees assisting.

Thank you for your support of the Enron/Junior Achievement Job Shadowing=20
program.

I think New York is a fair compromise, for North American transactions.  
Litigating in London is very expensive so I think that is not a good 
alternative.  Mark

	Mark Powell
	03/27/2001 11:02 AM
		 
Hey Mark,

Enron Canada Corp. is currently negotiating an amended and restated master 
agreement with Direct Energy Marketing Limited ("Direct") and we are in the 
process of negotiating the guarantee we will be receiving from Centrica plc 
on behalf of Direct.  

Centrica will be providing a guarantee which covers physical gas and 
electricity transactions as well as financial transactions between Direct and 
a company called Accord Energy Limited with:

1.  Enron Canada Corp.;
The one key sticking point relates to the governing law is to be England and 
the parties submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of English courts.

I have suggested to the counterparty that we use New York law as a 
compromise.  However, in the event that they will not accept the amendment, 
are you okay with using the law of England and the exclusive jurisdiction of 
English courts?

Please let me know your thoughts when you have the opportunity.  You can 
reach me in Houston at 52520 and in Calgary at 820-6708.

Thanks,

Mark Powell

It looks great.  Mark

	Vance Meyer@ENRON
	03/27/2001 06:39 PM
		 
Vance Meyer, Enron Corp.
(713) 345 4459

Your comments
	Mark E Haedicke
	03/28/2001 12:31 PM
		 
Over the past several months, we have reviewed in detail our trading 
contracts and the companies through which we conduct our trading business in 
California.  In order to reduce Enron's non-market risks ( e.g. legal, credit 
and regulatory) in the volatile commodity markets in California or any " 
future California", we propose the following changes:

1.    Mandatory Uniform Set-Off Provisions in All Trading Contracts for All 
Commodities -- set-off language varies commodity by commodity in trading 
contracts.  Set-off is one of the most critical tools available to Enron in a 
major default situation and it is critical to have set-off language and to 
have it be uniform commodity to commodity so that Enron can get the best 
advantage from set-off and not just the least common denominator.

2.     Mandatory Master Netting Agreements For Counterparties With Multiple 
Masters With Significant Opposite Exposures -- where it is necessary to have 
multiple masters with a counterparty, a "bridge" should be put place between 
the masters whenever there is significant opposite exposures under the two or 
more masters.

3.     Merge EPMI into ENA -- power trades are done through EPMI.  Merging 
EPMI into ENA and conducting power trades through ENA is much more efficient 
from both a credit and legal point of view.

4.     No Automatic Termination for a Bankruptcy Event -- 

Let me know if you have any other proposed changes to our trading contracts 
or entities through which we conduct our trading.  I believe these changes 
will (i) improve efficiency, (ii) reduce risks, (iii) develop the opportunity 
to do more business with certain counterparties and (iv)substanially improve 
Enron's position in the next California type market.  The long range goal is 
conduct as much as possible of the trading business through a single entity 
and a single or limited number standardized agreements.

Over the past several months, we have reviewed in detail our trading 
contracts and the companies through which we conduct our trading business in 
California.  In order to reduce Enron's non-market risks ( e.g. legal, credit 
and regulatory) in the volatile commodity markets in California or any " 
future California", we propose the following changes:

1.    Mandatory Uniform Set-Off Provisions in All Trading Contracts for All 
Commodities -- set-off language varies commodity by commodity in trading 
contracts.  Set-off is one of the most critical tools available to Enron in a 
major default situation and it is critical to have set-off language and to 
have it be uniform commodity to commodity so that Enron can get the best 
advantage from set-off and not just the least common denominator.

2.     Master Netting Agreements For Appropriate Counterparties With Multiple 
Masters With Significant Opposite Exposures -- where it is necessary to have 
multiple masters with a counterparty, a "bridge" should be put in place 
between the masters whenever there is significant opposite exposures under 
the two or more masters.

3.     Merge EPMI into ENA -- power trades are done through EPMI.  Merging 
EPMI into ENA and conducting power trades through ENA is much more efficient 
from both a credit and legal point of view.

4.     No Automatic Termination for a Bankruptcy Event -- in the PGE/SCE 
situation, it should be the non-defaulting party's (Enron in this case) 
option to terminate rather than an automatic termination on "inability to pay 
debts as they become due".

Let me know if you have any other proposed changes to our trading contracts 
or entities through which we conduct our trading.  I believe these changes 
will (i) improve efficiency, (ii) reduce risks, (iii) develop the opportunity 
to do more business with certain counterparties and (iv) substantially 
improve Enron's position in the next California type market.  The long range 
goal is to conduct as much as possible of the trading business through a 
single entity and a single or limited number of standardized agreements.

Louise:

Is Enron ready for this?  I think it is a good suggestion for the most 
significant deals.  It is really positive in that it would force dealmakers 
to pay more attention to what the contracts provide.  I am not sure it makes 
sense to follow this procedure for every deal that is dashed.  Let's talk 
about what are the objectives.  Great question! 

Mark

	Louise Kitchen
	03/28/2001 04:27 PM
		 
Response?
Louise Kitchen
03/21/2001 12:35 PM
We have spoken about this before, the issue is that Enron Americas has no 
approval mechanism for contracts. Neither does any other group but that is 
not my problem.  I have spent too much time reading DASH forms which really 
do not provide full authorization.

There are two suggestions that I would like to be implemented:

(i) DASH forms need to include all of the contracts which are to be signed 
under the deal.  So if a DASH is signed then this authorizes all of the 
contracts to be signed in the deal.  Any contracts which are not included 
need to go through the process outlined below.

(ii) All contracts need a Contract Approval Form attached and Enron's legal 
team cannot initial any contract until this form has been completed (ie 
signed) by the following Enron staff.

Trader/Originator ________________________________
Head of Group (VP or above)______________________
Credit__________________________________________
Legal__________________________________________
Tech Services (where applicable)__________________
Commercial Support (where applicable)_____________

A database of all completed contracts on behalf of Enron Americas needs to be 
maintained by Legal.

Thoughts please?

I will call Mark Golden to respond in a few days.  I don't think this is 
entirely negative for us.  We can use it to get the products we want.

Mark

Add my name as a person to contact.  Mark

	Elizabeth Sager
	03/29/2001 11:16 AM
		 
Mark

Here is a draft of the memo I prepared to explain the Negative CTC assignment 
issue.  Please review and let me know if this appropriate and I have included 
the correct individuals on the distribution list.

Thanks for you help.

Elizabeth
36349

No problema.

	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/29/2001 08:39 AM
		 
As i have mentioned, I need to fill the vacant Carlos Sole slot here at EEOS. 
Vicki had agreed this, but I wanted to run this past you before I move on 
it.  Between the work we do to support the ENA projects, the Pipeline Group 
work, and our claims and litigation, I think I do need to fill the vacancy 
with a lawyer.

I have identified a candidate that has significant construction experience 
that I would like to bring in next Tuesday afternoon for an initial screen, 
but before I do that I wanted to see if you are on board with me filling the 
slot.  

I  would not trouble you with an interview request unless after I meet her I 
think she is a strong enough candidate to pursue further.

JWVS

Print out?   Mark
	Cynthia Richards <CRICHARDS@isda.org>
	03/29/2001 07:14 AM
		 
>  -----Original Message-----
 - Table of Content for agm2001.doc
 - Executive Briefing.doc
 - CD Memo Board Book.doc
 - Lease memo.doc
 - AP Schedule - 22Mar01.doc
 - Asia Pacific Memo.doc
 - CD Memo Board Book.doc
 - Financial Statement as of December 31 2000.pdf
 - collat.doc
 - netting.doc
 - 64 - BoDNoteEMTF190301.dot
 - 64 - BoDNoteEMTF190301.dot
 - 90 - BoDNoteEuro190301.dot
 - 94 - EMU provision3clean.doc
 - 95 DraftSurveySummary200301clean.doc
 - ECB-pressrelease.pdf

You should continue to sign the dashes and just alert me to any matter going 
to Frevert or Whalley.  Thanks.  Mark

	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/29/2001 02:17 PM
		 
Mark, I have not talked to you about whether you want me to sign-off on 
DASHes before they go Buy/Glisan/Skilling. I was doing so for EECC and NEPCO 
for Vicki, but you might want to revisit that.

The attached are for two of our work-out projects in the Gulf of Mexico.  
Please have a look and let me know if you want to sign DASHEs for thsi unit  
or if you prefer that I continue to sign them. 

 JWVS
	Karen L Barbour/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/28/2001 01:06 PM
		 
RAC comments updated as requested.  Please initiate the circulation for 
signature and have the signed originals brought to Emy.  Thanks.

 
John, it looks fine to me.  The only comment that could be updated is the 
last sentence of the Other RAC Comments could be replaced with  "Horizon has 
indicated they have found another source of financing and Enron is currently 
providing information to facilitate a take-out offer from Horizon next month."

Mike

Yes.

	Theresa Zucha@ENRON
	03/28/2001 02:51 PM
		 
Mr. Haedicke, Stuart Zisman would like a copy of the most recent ENA legal 
organizational chart.  Jeanette advised me to check with you regarding this 
request.  Would it be possible to get a copy of this chart for Stuart?

Theresa Zucha on behalf of
Stuart Zisman

John:

Keep me posted on this matter.  Thanks.

Mark

	John Novak@ENRON
	03/28/2001 02:04 PM
		 
FYI, I received verbal notice today that EPE has been fined in the amount of 
R$2.2 million (approx US$1.1 million) for failure to comply with its IPP 
license -- specifically, the failure to dispatch at 450 MW per the 
instructions of the ONS.  Aneel previously had delivered a notice of 
noncompliance to EPE and our response was delivered to Aneel on Friday, so 
the fine probably crossed our response in the mail.  

This is another salvo in the ongoing dispute as to whether our PPA, which 
pre-dates the new regulatory scheme, is to be treated as an exception or 
whether it needs to be completely renegotiated in order to be able to comply 
with the current regs.  In any event, it is not good news.  I will keep you 
posted as I get more details.

Regards,
 John

J: please put this on my calender tomorrow.  Mark
	Mina Miyakawa@ENRON
	03/29/2001 03:22 PM
		
The above meeting is confirmed for  tomorrow, Friday, March 30th at 12:00a.m. 
Brazil time/9:00a.m. Houston time.

The dial-in numbers remain the same:
 Toll Free: (877) 233-7852
 International Access/Caller Paid: (505) 766-5463
 Participant code: 916197
 Host code: 161108 (Novak)
 
Press *0 at anytime during your conference call for operator assistance. 
For those in S?o Paulo the conference room 6C4 is reserved.

Yes.

	Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org>
	03/29/2001 05:32 PM
		 
Mark:

Are you going to introduce Jeff Skilling at the AGM?

Mary

Please send out the attached memo that Julia prepared.  Mark
	Julia Murray@ENRON
	Sent by: Carolyn George@ENRON
	03/28/2001 10:06 AM
		 
Mark,

Attached per your request and for your review is a draft memo to EWS Legal 
regarding limiting use of Unanimous Consents of Directors.

I am researching the question regarding the use of stamps for signatures and 
will follow up with you shortly.

Julia Heintz Murray
Enron Wholesale Services 
Enron Industrial Markets LLC
1400 Smith Street, EB3838
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-4794
Fax:  (713) 646-3393
julia.murray@enron.com

Go State!

	John Viverito@ENRON
	03/26/2001 11:11 AM
		 
Mark-

The Michigan State University Spartans are looking fine!

Cheers,

John

Phone (713) 345-7814
Fax       (713) 646-3490
e-mail John.Viverito@enron.com

That sounds like good news to be part of the process.  Thanks.  Mark

 It has become customary to prepare Unanimous Consents of Directors for many 
transactions even if such actions are not required by the relevant By-laws 
and/or Certificate of Incorporation.  Please consider carefully whether 
Unanimous Consents of Directors are necessary or appropriate in a particular 
transaction, i.e., the transaction is a significant transaction or evidence 
of authority is required for a legal opinion.  When in doubt, please review 
the By-laws and Certificate of Incorporation of the relevant entity and 
discuss the matter with a member of the Office of the General Counsel.

Thank you.

I will pass on it.  Thanks.  Mark

	Louise Kitchen
	03/30/2001 07:49 AM
		 
I don't suppose you have any interest in meeting them - but I thought I would 
offer.

Marcus and Louise

How are you?  I hope all is well and I wanted to let you know that I will be
in Houston at the end of next week with, probably, a couple of my colleagues
and I wondered if you might have any time to get together.

Depending on schedules, I should be with Alan Jowett who is head of our
energy practice, Stephane Brabant who heads our civil law energy practice in
Paris and Ralf Thaeter who leads the energy practice of Gleiss Lutz, the
German firm with whom we have a formal relationship.

We should be around from late on Wednesday 4th April until late afternoon on
Friday 6th April and it would be splendid if we were able to get some time
with you and, if you thought it appropriate, any of your colleagues who
would be interested to meet us.

Could I trouble you to let me know if there are any times that would suit?

Best wishes

Paul

PS We finished a NETA-related deal opposite an Enron team led by Ali Lloyd
and Paul Simons at about 1.30 am on Tuesday!

Paul

This message is confidential and may be covered by legal professional
privilege.  If you have received this message in error, please delete
it from your system. If you require assistance, please contact our
London IT helpdesk.  Thank you.
(e-mail helpdesk@herbertsmith.com; phone +44 (0)20 7333 8888).

Herbert Smith is an international law firm with offices in London,
Bangkok, Beijing, Brussels, Hong Kong, Moscow, Paris, Singapore and Tokyo.  
Further information
about the firm, and a list of the partners and their professional 
qualifications,
is available from Exchange House, Primrose Street, London EC2A 2HS, any of our
offices and from our website at http://www.herbertsmith.com/

_____________________________________________________________________
This message has been checked for all known viruses by UUNET delivered
through the MessageLabs Virus Control Centre. For further information visit
http://www.uk.uu.net/products/security/virus/

call janette.  Mark

	Matt Maxwell@ENRON
	03/30/2001 07:38 AM
		 
I need to run a couple more issues by you with regard to the executive titile 
changes as soon as I can today.  It will be brief as before.  Please let me 
know when I can stop by if at all possible.

Thanks,

Mx

Sorry.  My schedule does not permit that change.  Mark

	Eddy Daniels@ENRON
	03/29/2001 02:07 PM
		
I am scheduled to be in New Orleans all day at a conference Tuesday, May 1, 
and was planning on traveling directly to San Antonio on Weds.  Any chance we 
could have the ESA QLR in San Antonio either Weds. before dinner or before 
departing from SA on Friday??

This is way too much of a commercial!  Two thirds of it speaks only to 
Kiodex.  Tell him that at least one-half should not be a commercial.  He said 
he was going to discuss new commodities and slant his presentation torward 
new commodities.  He needs to do more.  

Mark

	Rosemary Ryan <RRYAN@isda.org>
	03/30/2001 11:10 AM
		 
Mark,

Attached is Martin Chavez's presentation.  Is this too much Kiodex marketing
or is it ok?  We need to print asap and would appreciate your opinion.

Thanks,

Rosemary
212 332 2555
Rosemary, here are my slides.

Regards
M.

Martin,

Just a quick note to let you know that the deadline for printing of
presentations for circulation to the AGM delegates is this Friday, March 30.
Please let me know if you will have some slides.
Thanks,

Rosemary
212 332 2555

 <<final agm agenda3.doc>>

 - ISDA AGM 2001.ppt

Greg Piper raised the following questions:

Is ENW a marketing affiliate?
Is EOL a marketing affiliate?
Sally Beck's organization?
Can Beck's organization process transactions for CMS pipelines?
Could Sally use ETS resources to do processing for CMS?

Greg is looking for some guidance by Tuesday.  Let's discuss.

Mark

Sound like California.  I noticed that the UK power book is doing well too.  

Regards,

Mark

	Paul Simons
	04/02/2001 09:54 AM
		 
Mark

An incredible NETA fact I didn't mention today on our call (but which I think 
you'll find of interest) is that UK power prices in the new balancing market 
this weekend hit an amazing o34,000/MWh (no typo!).

Regards

Paul

j
	Rosemary Ryan <RRYAN@isda.org>
	03/31/2001 09:53 AM
		 
A quick note to remind you of the location of ISDA's 16th AGM and the time
for your presentation.

Presentation time:   Developing Products
   Thursday, April 5 at 2:15 PM

Meeting Location: Omni Shoreham Hotel
   2500 Calvert Street, NW
   Washington, D.C. 20008
   Phone:  202 234 0700

I have attached the final agenda for your information.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Thanks and regards,

Rosemary
212 332 2555
 <<Final AGM agenda 3.30.01.doc>>

 - Final AGM agenda 3.30.01.doc

J:  Please print these out for me and put in my packet for the trip.  Mark
	"Liz O'Sullivan" <LOSULLIVAN@isda.org>
	04/02/2001 07:58 AM
		 
For your review, attached please find a copy the presentations for
Developing Products panel at ISDA AGM in Washington.

 <<mchavez.ppt>>  <<AAronowitz.ppt>>  <<lclemmons.ppt>>

Regards,
Liz O'Sullivan
212-332-2559

 - mchavez.ppt
 - AAronowitz.ppt
 - lclemmons.ppt

J: Please save an electronic copy of this presentation in case I want to use 
any of the slides in the future.  Mark
	Ursula Brenner@ENRON
	04/03/2001 09:46 AM
		 
Rosemary,

This is the presentation Mr. Skilling will be using. As we discussed, this 
presentation is to be projected not to be distributed. He will also have a 
backup with him. 

Please, let me know if you have any questions.  

Best regards,

Ursula Brenner
ENRON CORP.
+1(713)345-3787

This message (including any attachments) contains confidential information 
intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is protected by law.  If 
you are not the intended recipient, you should delete this message and are 
hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or distribution of this 
message, or the taking of any action based on it, is strictly prohibited. 

Please handle.  Mark
Monica Matias@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
11/26/99 10:15 AM
Regarding to Mike's e:mail dated of Nov 25th, I would like to set up a 
meeting, as follows:

  Dec 2nd, Thursday
  From 1:15 pm till 1:30 pm

Please would you advise me if you will be available and your location. Thanks 
in advance. 

Bob:

What is the view in general re arbitration of Brazilian companies?  Should we 
expect many objections to our new policy?  Don't get many objections in the 
US.

Mark

	Robert C Williams/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/02/2001 06:11 PM
		 
Michelle, I did not speak with Jim or Rob about this, so I am assuming that 
you did.  I think it is a good policy, although I am still not as convinced 
as Sami is that the courts in Brazil will so cavalierly disregard 
international arbitration provisions. Nevertheless, I think it was necessary 
to change our policy from a commercial perspective; we were getting too much 
resistance to foreign arbitration.  Now the question is, do we go the next 
step and see if Jim will approve submitting to the jurisdiction of some 
courts in Brazil which are generally reliable and free of corruption (e.g., 
Sao Paulo and Rio) if the counterparty rejects arbitration, and the largest 
sum of money that would ever be in dispute would be less than $500,000?  I 
think we will face that soon, so we may as well raise it now.

FROM: MARK HAEDICKE & MICHELLE BLAINE

Effective immediately, trading contracts to be performed in Brazil between a 
Brazilian Enron entity and another Brazilian entity, may contain agreements 
for arbitration in Sao Paulo using the ICC administration and rules, to be 
conducted in the English language as a first choice or English & Portuguese 
as a second choice.  Attached is the rationale for this exception to the 
policy favoring foreign arbitration and a model clause.  Legal will continue 
to monitor how the Brazilian courts react to arbitration both foreign and 
domestic and reevaluate the policy in 2002.  Please call Michelle Blaine if 
you have any questions. 

 << File: Arbitration Agreement Terms for Enron-Brazil Agreements.doc >>  << 
File: Enron-Brazilian Model Arbitration Clause.doc >> 

Please get this to Mark Frevert.  Mark
=09Wayne Gresham
=0903/30/2001 02:07 PM
=09=09=20
Mark,

I would be interested in participating, assuming I am here that day.

Wayne

**************************************
Wayne E. Gresham
=09Alan Aronowitz
=0903/27/2001 05:26 PM
=09=09=20
Please let Mark know if you are interested in participating in this program=
.

Alan
=09Mark E Haedicke
=0903/27/2001 03:10 PM
=09=09=20
Let me know if anyone in your group is interested.  Mark
=09Mark Frevert/ENRON@enronXgate
=09Sent by: Nicki Daw/ENRON@enronXgate
=0903/27/2001 11:50 AM
=09=09=20
On Wednesday, April 11, 2001, Enron, in conjunction with Junior Achievement=
,=20
will host 40 students from Westside High School and Kerr High School for a=
=20
day of Job Shadowing.  This program=01,s objectives are to demonstrate why =
a=20
sound education, interpersonal skills, and a strong work ethic are needed t=
o=20
be successful in the workplace.

The Job Shadowing program consists of the following:

 8:45 AM  Students arrive
 9:00 - 10:30 AM Welcome, Overview, Video, and Tours
 10:30 - 12:00 N Individual Job Shadow Experience with Enron Employees
 12:00 - 1:00 PM Student Lunch with Closing Comments
 1:00 PM  Students return to schools

We need your assistance in identifying individuals within your area who wou=
ld=20
be available to assist with the job shadowing experience.  Please contact=
=20
Nicki Daw ASAP with your recommendations.  More detailed information will b=
e=20
supplied to the employees assisting.

Thank you for your support of the Enron/Junior Achievement Job Shadowing=20
program.

I think Avista should be primary.  I don't know Kangqi.  Mark

	Mary Cunningham <MCUNNINGHAM@isda.org>
	03/27/2001 08:31 AM
		 
Mark:

Could you check to see if you guys know anything about Avista Energy, Inc in
Spokane, Wash. and Kangqi Oil Trading in Singapore?

Both have applied for Subscriber membership.  I'm thinking that Avista
should maybe be a Primary?

Thanks
Mary

It is a mistake.  Mark

	Stuart Zisman
	03/26/2001 10:17 AM
		 
Mark,

The Frontera transaction is making some additional progress and I am 
currently scheduled to fly to Tampa this evening to finalize the deal.  Per 
our conversation, I have revised the risk memo and am forwarding an original 
to you.  Please let me know if you think the memo is worded to strongly or 
otherwise requires some additional revision.  David Portz also sent you 
another risk memo which relates exclusively to the provision of qualified 
scheduling services (which will also be provided to Frontera under the Energy 
Management Services Agreement). 

On another note, I have received several calls from people who have read the 
latest Enron newsletter.  Apparently I am listed as being transferred out of 
ENA.  Is there anything that I should know?  Please advise.

Stuart

Add Alan Aronowitz, John Novak and Mark Taylor.  Mark

	Rebecca Carter@ENRON
	Sent by: Kelly Johnson@ENRON
	03/26/2001 09:51 AM
	Please respond to kelly.johnson
		 
We would like to add key legal personnel to the distribution list for 
deadline dates in connection with the Enron Corp. Board of Directors meeting 
on May 1st. Please reply via email and will we update our records accordingly.

 Alvin Alexanderson
 Karen Lewis

fyi
	Philippe A Bibi/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/06/2001 01:45 PM
		 
 Mark,

 As discussed from a legal perspective please make sure that you get back to 
Nigel prior to Monday if you do not feel comfortable with this.....

 Regards

 P.
Phillipe,
I have spoken with Wade, we plan to send Barry Sangster out early next week 
to coordinate activities. Assuming we can get the Visa's  sorted Barry should 
be able to leave  London Tuesday morning at the latest,
regards,
Nigel 

 Wade,

 I have asked Nigel Denty who runs Infrastructure in Europe to call you and 
coordinate the removal of sensitive data from our servers located
 in India and have these stored on our servers Physically located in the UK 
that you may access. 

 Nigel, please treat this as high priority.

 Thanks,

 P.

Philippe,

I would like to speak to someone in your group who can help us on a specific 
request. We've been bogged down over here with commercial disputes, so I have 
not been able to keep up with your current organization. If Dan Bruce is 
still involved in assisting you, he would be great, or maybe there is someone 
else who can help. 

In our current dispute with the gov't, we are concerned about possibilities 
of raids by gov't to seize documents, files, etc. We are in the process of 
removing hard files from India, taking them to our attorneys' offices in 
London. However, I am very concerned about electronic files and e-mails and 
such related stuff that could also be seized. This is true of servers, 
desktops, laptops and other computer devices.

Who can I speak to to get some guidance about how we can very quickly remove 
these items from our systems and hardware here in India? My immediate concern 
is getting this stuff out of the country as soon as we can. Once out, I can 
worry about indexing and making available specific items upon request to 
people in India when they need it.

Thanks for your input.
Wade

please schedule
	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	04/09/2001 01:11 PM
		 
I would like to schedule a tim on Wednesday afternoon with you to take you 
through the EEOSC monthly report.  I will be out Thursday and Friday, so 
thenext opportunity would be the following week. Nothing too urgent, I just 
think you might wnat to know a little about what's going on over here.

JWVS

please track this down
	Carol Essig/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/09/2001 02:39 PM
		 
The previously sent request may be an oversight, or you may be busy  with 
other things, but because we have a deadline for the PUHCA filing with the 
SEC, we are sending a reminder to you that we would like to have the 
information for your respective areas as soon as possible.  Please refer to 
the memo from Robert Eickenroht dated March 29, 2001.

If you should have any questions, please contact Robert at 713-853-3155 or 
myself at 713-853-7014. We appreciate your help on this project.

Carol Essig
Enron Corp. Legal
EB 4854
Fax: 713-646-5847
Ph:   713-853-7014

Great job!   Mark

=09Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
=0904/06/2001 11:24 AM
=09=09=20
Mark/Rob -

Good news is hard to come by these days in the Enron emerging market world =
so=20
I thought that I would pass this along.

We still need to work on repatriation/conversion issues to get our money ou=
t=20
but at least it sits safely in an Enron account in the meantime.

Bill Krenz worked very hard on this matter under trying circumstances.  The=
=20
head of the HEPCO negotiating team through a cup at our business guy, Don=
=20
Bunnell, and shattered a tea pot.  Shards from the pot hit Don in the face=
=20
and he had to be hospitalized.  He is apparently fine now.

Bruce

William Krenz
04/06/2001 10:05 AM
No bank gty was necessary afterall.  Although it's a bit complicated, Hepco=
=20
initiated what amounted to 8 separate wires today, 6 of which hit today, an=
d=20
two of which will hit Monday (we have chopped confirmation from the relevan=
t=20
banks that the last two wires were initiated, but it was too late in the=20
business day to get the funds today).  At day's end RMB 271 million of RMB=
=20
341million hit today.  We'll follow up Monday for the rest, but dont=20
anticipate any problem.
Bill

Congratulations!=01; You guys deserve a lot of credit.
=01;
What happened with the last 1/12th of the money they were having a hard tim=
e=20
getting ready in time?
=01;
Chris

Believe it or not, we closed with Hepco this morning.

Bill

Let's schedule a meeting for Mark Taylor, you and me with the consultant who 
we already had conversations with.  We can formulate our response.  Mark

	Janette Elbertson
	04/06/2001 09:50 AM
		 
Pursuant to your request, I called Deborah Bubenko regarding what information 
she needs from you regarding space planning for the new building.  Deborah 
had Kim Kaase (extension 35349) return my call.

Listed below are the next steps:

Review the space plans and give your comments
You mentioned one of your major concerns is size of offices
Provide information regarding any speciality areas such as the number of file 
rooms, the number of conference rooms the department needs, etc.

In summary, the next steps are to determine the requirements for the 
department and then schedule a meeting through Tammy Shepperd (Wes Colwell's 
assistant) to provide them your feedback.

     

Janette Elbertson

Alan, my quick impression is that the checklist format is identifying a 
number of matters for discussion in a way that will be efficient.  What is 
your impression?

Mark

I look foward to meeting you.  I have asked my assistant to get time 
scheduled.  Mark

What is the answer on this?  Mark
	Louise Kitchen
	04/06/2001 07:46 AM
		 
if we have 25% overriding interest - then perhaps we are going to get 25% of 
the upside from this whole thing.  Can you check out all upsides too please.

You can tell its Friday - I'm optimistic about everything!

add to my schedule.   M
	Lisa Mellencamp
	04/10/2001 05:54 PM
		 
per my voicemail.

Lisa J. Mellencamp
	Joyce Dorsey@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	04/10/2001 01:52 PM
		 
The Sithe meeting described below will be held in EB3321.  Thanks.

Joyce Dorsey
Enron Broadband Services
Corporate Development
Phone:  713/853-3516
Cell Phone:      713/502-2246
joyce_dorsey@enron.net
	Joyce Dorsey
	04/10/01 11:23 AM
		 
At the request of John Lavorato, a Sithe "all hands"  meeting has been 
scheduled for Thursday, April 19, 9:00-10:00 a.m. in EB3621.  Invitees 
include:

Todd Busby
Morris Clark
Wes Colwell
Tim Detmering
Jeff Donahue
Steve Douglas
Rodney Faldyn
John Lavorato
Lisa Mellencamp
Chuck Ward

Thanks,

Joyce Dorsey
Enron Broadband Services
Corporate Development
713/853-3516

Jeff:  Let's talk about this and how to start handling Don Black's legal 
work.  Mark
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	04/11/2001 12:04 PM
		 
FYI
James E Keller
04/10/2001 05:28 PM
In light of the transition of the risk books to ENA, I need your input on 
whether we (EES) should continue to pursue our own master contracts with new 
trading partners.  In certain instances, ENA already has a master in place 
with the counterparty or in other instances (TransCanada Energy Marketing 
USA, Inc. & Aquila Energy Marketing Corporation), ENA Legal is currently 
negotiating a separate master with the counterparty.

The Gas Desk is pressing hard for a number of new masters with additional 
counterparties.  While we are set up to handle their requests, in light of 
the organization changes, it seems this may be unnecessary.  Even where ENA 
does not currently have or is not currently negotiating a master, they may 
prefer that the document be handled by ENA legal and avoid having to assign 
the master to them at a later date.    I would like to have your thoughts 
before I commit resources to handle these requests.

If you prefer that we continue to pursue these new master, we have the 
resources available to proceed.

 Jim

Janette: put on my schedule.  Mark
	Lisa Mellencamp
	04/10/2001 05:54 PM
		 
per my voicemail.

Lisa J. Mellencamp
	Joyce Dorsey@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	04/10/2001 01:52 PM
		 
The Sithe meeting described below will be held in EB3321.  Thanks.

Joyce Dorsey
Enron Broadband Services
Corporate Development
Phone:  713/853-3516
Cell Phone:      713/502-2246
joyce_dorsey@enron.net
	Joyce Dorsey
	04/10/01 11:23 AM
		 
At the request of John Lavorato, a Sithe "all hands"  meeting has been 
scheduled for Thursday, April 19, 9:00-10:00 a.m. in EB3621.  Invitees 
include:

Todd Busby
Morris Clark
Wes Colwell
Tim Detmering
Jeff Donahue
Steve Douglas
Rodney Faldyn
John Lavorato
Lisa Mellencamp
Chuck Ward

Thanks,

Joyce Dorsey
Enron Broadband Services
Corporate Development
713/853-3516

Great job!   Mark

	Michelle Blaine/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/10/2001 03:40 PM
		 
Hurray!  More good news from Argentina!  Today the Argentine Supreme Court 
granted TGS an injunction against payment of the stamp tax assessed by the 
Province of Rio Negro pending resolution of the matter.  Rio Negro recently 
rejected TGS's final administrative appeal against payment of the tax with 
penalties and interest in the amount of US $436 million!  Rio Negro had 
ordered payment by April 26 and threatened to commence collection 
proceedings.  Recall that 3 weeks ago, the Court also granted TGS an 
injunction against payment of the tax in Santa Cruz in the amount of US $17 
million which was unprecedented.

Dodged another bullet!
Cheers!
Michelle

 

Sami:  What is the net net of the new policy?

	Sami Arap@ENRON
	04/10/2001 03:36 PM
		 
	
 - CHAR5.DOC
 - M2689III.DOC

Please handle.  I think you should send an email to the OGC and ask if they 
are aware of any such contracts.  Mark
	Sharon Butcher/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/10/2001 12:18 PM
		 
Dear General Counsels:

The U.S. Small Business Administration, Office of Government Contracting has 
advised that on May 25, 2001, they will evaluate Enron's subcontracting 
program and compliance on any subcontracting plans in effect on current 
contracts.

This review will cover the last five (5) years.  All Forms 294 and 295 filed 
with the Small Business Adminstration along with the names of each 
Administrative Contracting Officer (U.S. Government employee responsible for 
monitoring the contract) for each contract will be subject to the review.

In addition, total subcontract placement with small businesses, small 
disadvantaged businesses, women-owned small businesses, and HubZone small 
businesses shall be reviewed.  Further, the amount of indirect or overhead 
costs, if any, apportioned to contract goals is subject to review.

We will also need information on the number of active suppliers Enron is 
currently using in the following categories:  large business, small business, 
small disadvantaged business, women-owned small business and HubZone 
business.  The review will cover these figures for one year ago if available.

Please contact me by Wednesday, April 11, 2001 and advise me of the number of 
contracts between the United States Government and the Enron entities you 
represent.  In the event any of the Enron entities which you represent have 
government contracts, we will need a member of your respective law 
department(s) to pull the government contracts, and all supporting 
documentation, from the Enron companies which you represent and be available 
to work with other members of the team.

If you have any questions, please contact me at 713-853-7224.

Thank you.

Sharon

How would we do this efficiently in EWS?  Mark
	Mark Holsworth/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/10/2001 11:21 AM
		 
  Pete Van De Gohm of EES has again raised the topic of inventorying our 
trade secret protection which has been discussed from time to time.  I have 
visited with Jim Derrick about having a legal/business committee representing 
your major groups.  It would function in a similar manner as our Y2K 
committee did.  We would have Fulbright & Jaworski give our people general 
instructions, our business people would canvass our companies to determine 
what we considered proprietary trade secrets and if we were not protecting 
our proprietary information appropriately, we could address that issue.  
Fulbright could also be used on an ad hoc basis.   Costs would be shared 
proportionately between the major groups except special fees attributable to 
a specific operating group.
 
  I believe we need this inventory.  If we try to enforce our non-competition 
agreements and we can't prove that we kept such information on a need to know 
basis and properly secured, we could lose the law suit.  

  Jim asked that I contact each of you regarding this to see if you were in 
agreement with the proposed plan.  Please respond as soon as possible if you 
agree so we can get the project off the ground.

Please let me know as soon as possible if you are aware of any such contracts 
as described below by Sharon Butcher.

"The U.S. Small Business Administration, Office of Government Contracting has 
advised that on May 25, 2001, they will evaluate Enron's subcontracting 
program and compliance on any subcontracting plans in effect on current 
contracts.

This review will cover the last five (5) years.  All Forms 294 and 295 filed 
with the Small Business Adminstration along with the names of each 
Administrative Contracting Officer (U.S. Government employee responsible for 
monitoring the contract) for each contract will be subject to the review.

In addition, total subcontract placement with small businesses, small 
disadvantaged businesses, women-owned small businesses, and HubZone small 
businesses shall be reviewed.  Further, the amount of indirect or overhead 
costs, if any, apportioned to contract goals is subject to review.

We will also need information on the number of active suppliers Enron is 
currently using in the following categories:  large business, small business, 
small disadvantaged business, women-owned small business and HubZone 
business.  The review will cover these figures for one year ago if available."

fyi
	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	04/12/2001 11:47 AM
		 
Fax: +44 (20) 7330 9999
General Email: Helpdesk@allenovery.com
www: http://www.allenovery.com

Here is Dan Cunningham's memo on the above.

 - Memorandum for ISDA U.S.Netting Legislation.DOC

Both letters are fine.  Please arrange dates for the Chairman to come to 
Houston.  Thanks for all of your help.  Mark

Please set a meeting to talk through this contract with Sami.  Mark
	Sami Arap@ENRON
	04/12/2001 10:18 AM
		 
Dear Elizabeth;

Please find attached hereto, for your information (as well as review, 
comments, questions etc etc), a copy of our latest draft Master Power 
Purchase and Sale Agreement for Brazil-to-Brazil transactions.  This document 
is now being forwarded to RAC.  As soon as we have received comments from all 
areas of support (tax, credit, commercial etc), we will start negotiations 
with all major Generators, LDCs and Marketing companies.  Please feel free to 
contact me should you have questions or comments regarding this matter.

Rgds,

Sami Arap

I agree with your proposal.  Please communicate with Mark Holsworth.  Mark

	Michelle Cash
	04/11/2001 11:33 PM
		
Mark,

As a practical matter, I believe that it will be difficult to maintain an 
updated inventory of confidential information on an ongoing basis.  That 
conceivably could be someone's full-time job, given the vast amount of 
confidential and proprietary projects at issue just within EWS.  

I do agree that we need to put some protocols in place with regard to how 
Enron handles different levels of confidential information (including trade 
secrets).  Rather than have an ongoing commission guided by outside counsel, 
I would suggest that Pete, Scott Tholan, the IT security team, internal 
corporate security, as well as legal subject matter experts get together to 
put forth guidelines on how information should be retained and protected.  
Those guidelines would describe the type of information at issue and the 
corresponding security measures to put in place to protect that material.  
For example, trading positions and curves would have one standard for access 
and disclosure, while personnel information would have a different one.  The 
benefit to this approach is that we can set the guidelines and manage on a 
periodic basis to make sure that they are followed, rather than create 
updated inventories.  

It also presumably would save on outside counsel fees.  I would not view this 
type of approach as requiring much, if any, assistance from outside counsel.

Let me know your thoughts.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Mark E Haedicke
	04/11/01 03:00 PM
		 
How would we do this efficiently in EWS?  Mark
	Mark Holsworth/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/10/2001 11:21 AM
		 
  Pete Van De Gohm of EES has again raised the topic of inventorying our 
trade secret protection which has been discussed from time to time.  I have 
visited with Jim Derrick about having a legal/business committee representing 
your major groups.  It would function in a similar manner as our Y2K 
committee did.  We would have Fulbright & Jaworski give our people general 
instructions, our business people would canvass our companies to determine 
what we considered proprietary trade secrets and if we were not protecting 
our proprietary information appropriately, we could address that issue.  
Fulbright could also be used on an ad hoc basis.   Costs would be shared 
proportionately between the major groups except special fees attributable to 
a specific operating group.
 
  I believe we need this inventory.  If we try to enforce our non-competition 
agreements and we can't prove that we kept such information on a need to know 
basis and properly secured, we could lose the law suit.  

  Jim asked that I contact each of you regarding this to see if you were in 
agreement with the proposed plan.  Please respond as soon as possible if you 
agree so we can get the project off the ground.

Congrats on another one done!    Mark

Mark Evans and Paul Simons are the two key persons in London.  Mark Haedicke

	Emmanuelle Sebton <ESebton@ISDA-EUR.ORG>
	04/10/2001 09:10 AM
		 
Mark, 

I heard that Enron was developing credit derivatives activities in London.
Could you confirm and let me have the name of the key person there (may be
interested in seeing some of our Basel stuff ) ?

Regards, 

Emmanuelle

David:

It was good to see you also.  I am only available on the 14th.  I would like 
you to come to Enron and talk about the audit and certain key provisions in 
the trading agreements with the top trading lawyers.  Give Mark Taylor a call 
at 713-853-7459; he is GC of the financial trading.

Regards,   

Mark  

	David.Yeres@CliffordChance.com
	04/09/2001 04:40 PM
		 
   

Mark, it was good to see you Thursday.  My next visit to Houston is
scheduled for May 14 and 15.  I will be making a presentation concerning the
legal consequences of market abuse in electricity trading to a Risk Magazine
Conference on the 14th.  As we discussed last week, I would, if you wish, be
pleased to speak to your colleagues on the same subject during my visit.  I
would also be pleased to discuss the contract audit issues, focusing on the
key provisions that have been, or we expect to be, critical from a financial
or reputational perspective.  In that regard, it would be helpful to discuss
Enron' experience with agreements/provisions before finalizing my remarks.
Perhaps you could identify someone on your staff with whom I may speak.

Best regards.

David Yeres
Clifford Chance Rogers & Wells LLP
200 Park Avenue
New York, NY 10166
Tel:  (212) 878-8075
Fax: (212) 878-8027
Email: david.yeres@cliffordchance.com

*******

This message and any attachment are confidential and may be privileged or 
otherwise protected from disclosure.  If you are not the intended recipient, 
please telephone or email the sender and delete this message and any 
attachment from your system.  If you are not the intended recipient you must 
not copy this message or attachment or disclose the contents to any other 
person.

For further information about Clifford Chance please see our website at 
http://www.cliffordchance.com or refer to any Clifford Chance office.

 Starting on Thursday,  April 19, at 2:00 p.m. there will be a weekly 
telephone conference for the California litigation team.  The objective will 
be to identify key issues and plan a coordinated strategy for all litigation 
in California.  The call will last not more than one hour.  

 Thus far, the responsibility has been allocated as follows:

1. PG&E Bankruptcy   Lisa Mellencamp and Carl Ecklund (LeBoeuf Lamb Greene & 
McRae)

2. Class Actions   Richard Sanders and Robin Gibbs (Gibbs & Bruns)

3. CTC Matters   Bob Williams, Mike Day and Gary Fergus (Brobeck)

4. FERC Matters    Regulatory and Richard Sanders and Dan Watkiss (Bracewell 
& Patterson)

5. Government Investigations Regulatory and Richard Sanders

 Richard Sanders and Robin Gibbs will have overall responsibility for 
coordination of the litigation.  

Sami:

Does this change in treatment of financial trading open up significantly more 
trading opportunities for Enron?

Mark

	Sami Arap@ENRON
	04/16/2001 08:34 AM
		
Mark;

The Brazilian Central Bank created a structure of access to the interest 
rate, currency and commodity swaps international market that is based on 3 
main points as follows:

payments and receipts arising from hedging modes  (trading on the offshore 
stock market as well as on the forward, futures and option markets) as well 
as remittances to or from abroad inherent to these transactions (spread, 
commissions, premiums and so on) will be effected in foreign currency upon 
prompt closing of exchange on the commercial exchange market;
remittances intended for the opening of current accounts with brokerage 
companies abroad as well as for deposits of collateral margins are permitted; 
and
upon preliminary approval by the Central Bank, remittances abroad intended 
for collateral and escrow deposits linked to interest rate and currency swaps 
can be effected.

The key issue of this structure is that the income tax on remittances to 
overseas that can be demonstrated to be remittances usual, normal and 
necessary for hedging transactions on the international market can be reduced 
by 100%.  In addition to any positive results for the foreign institutions 
from these operations, the spread, commissions, premiums, and other related 
sums. when remitted abroad, will not be subject to any income tax 
withholdings.  With respect to the tax treatment of losses that Brazilian 
companies may incur as a result of hedging operations, such losses may be 
deductible for the purpose of determining taxable profits, only in the event 
that they occur in investments on exchanges abroad.  If these transactions 
are not carried out on such exchanges, the losses will not be deductible when 
determining the taxable profits.

Brazilian entities are not prevented to enter into swap or other derivative 
transactions on the international market in case they do not meet the 
requirements established above.  The consequences, however, will be the 
following:

payments and receipts arising from such transactions as well as remittances 
to or from abroad inherent to these transactions could not be effected in 
foreign currency upon prompt closing of exchange on the commercial exchange 
market, but only through mechanisms available in the or related to the 
floating (or "tourism") exchange rate;
the inflow of foreign currency through the floating rate market would be 
subject to IOF (tax on financial transactions) assessed at the rate of 2% on 
the Brazilian currency equivalent of the foreign funds entering Brazil;
remittance of any amounts that are considered income of a foreign resident 
shall be subject to withholding income tax at 15% or at a reduced rate if the 
creditor is domiciled in a country  with which Brazil has entered into a 
double taxation treaty .

To the best of my knowledge, you will appreciate that the ISDA Master 
Agreement has been widely used by foreign swap dealers with Brazilian 
counterparties.

Rgds,

Sami

Sami:  What is the net net of the new policy?

	Sami Arap@ENRON
	04/10/2001 03:36 PM
		 
	
 - CHAR5.DOC
 - M2689III.DOC

Please schedule.  Mark
	Robert Pickel <RPICKEL@isda.org>
	04/13/2001 04:18 PM
		 
I have seen a negotiation facility that I whink it would be worth showing to
each of you for your consideration. I have suggested the 23rd or the 24th of
April as possible dates for a demo, which would probably be via the
Internet. Please let me know your availability either of those days.
 
The facility is one developed by Beachfire, one of the bidders on the
proposal. You should have their proposal, but I will also forward several
items I have received from them.
 
Bob

Mark:  I would suggest we add netting.  Will you talk to Carol and see if she 
is interested.  Let me know.   Mark Haedicke

	Mark Taylor
	04/13/2001 02:27 PM
		 
Here's a draft of the bullet points you requested:

Per your request.  Mark
	Julia Murray
	04/12/2001 06:37 PM
		 
Mark   Attached is a memo to Jim Derrick suggesting topics for discussion at 
the upcoming General Counsel meeting in May.   Please either give me your 
comments and I will send or you can forward on to Jim.  Thanks.  Julia

Julia Heintz Murray
Enron Wholesale Services 
Enron Industrial Markets LLC
1400 Smith Street, EB3838
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-4794
Fax:  (713) 646-3393
julia.murray@enron.com

Janette, please send him a fax copy only.    Mark
Mark,

I really enjoyed you presentation at the EEI conference last week.

Please send me a copy of your slides so I can incorporate your points into
my stump speeches

Thanks

Craig

Craig G. Goodman
President
National Energy Marketers Association
3333 K Street, NW
Suite 425
Washington, DC 20007
Tel: (202) 333-3288
Fax: (202) 333-3266
www.energymarketers.com

Jim:  Good question.  With all that is going on the answer is yes I think.  
Mark

	James Derrick/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/12/2001 06:05 PM
		 
Mark, query whether Bill Urquhart of Quinn Emanuel should be included. Jim

 Starting on Thursday,  April 19, at 2:00 p.m. there will be a weekly 
telephone conference for the California litigation team.  The objective will 
be to identify key issues and plan a coordinated strategy for all litigation 
in California.  The call will last not more than one hour.  

 Thus far, the responsibility has been allocated as follows:

1. PG&E Bankruptcy   Lisa Mellencamp and Carl Ecklund (LeBoeuf Lamb Greene & 
McRae)

2. Class Actions   Richard Sanders and Robin Gibbs (Gibbs & Bruns)

3. CTC Matters   Bob Williams, Mike Day and Gary Fergus (Brobeck)

4. FERC Matters    Regulatory and Richard Sanders and Dan Watkiss (Bracewell 
& Patterson)

5. Government Investigations Regulatory and Richard Sanders

 Richard Sanders and Robin Gibbs will have overall responsibility for 
coordination of the litigation.  

Have him contact Joe Gold in London at 011-44-207-783-6768 who is the head 
trader in Europe.  Mark

	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <jklauber@LLGM.COM>
	04/12/2001 05:45 PM
		 
Mark:  I had a request from Doug Hawes as to whether there might be a senior 
Enron commercial person in France that he could make contract with regarding 
a project he is working on (see attached e-mail).  Since I know that France 
falls within your "world," I thought you might have a good feeling for who 
Doug might be able to contact.  If you are ok with Doug making such a contact 
and you could perhaps suggest a person Doug could call, I know that Doug 
would be greatly appreciative.

Thanks, Mark.  I'm sure we will be speaking soon with everything that is 
going on.  John
==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  
The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this 
e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

I am responding on behalf of Mark Haedicke.  We have checked with our 
department and our lawyers are not aware of any such contracts as you 
described in your e-mail. 

Barbara Gray responded, "I am unaware of any subcontracts for this period.  I 
do know that we have used minority lawyers, but that does not appear to be 
responsive to the question."

Thank you.

Orlando;

I am ok with the your suggestion.  Hope you are doing well.  

Mark

	Orlando Gonzalez@ENRON
	04/17/2001 06:18 AM
		
In order to finalize the board composition for the Annual shareholders 
meeting to be held on April 30 I suggest the following:   

The board according to the by laws has permanent members (min 4, max 7) and 
alternates (min 2, max 4).  We are also required to have an employee 
representative as a permanent member and an alternate.  We would like to have 
a maximun participation of local residents in order to facilitate board 
meetings.  

Permanent members:                            Alternates:
 Employee rep                                        Employee rep
Orlando  Gonzalez                                  Jim Hughes,
Joe Kishkill                                               John Novak
 Rebecca McDonald                                Jeff Sommers
Jim Derrick
Joao Carlos Albuquerque
Britaldo 
Soares                                                                        
                                                          This allows for 
five local residents and the Houston membership we needed.  I would like your 
opinion as soon as possible so I can discuss with Rebecca in order to elect 
the board on April 30th.  Thanks Orlando

I am ok with your slate, but need some Houston people on board as well.  I 
think we can shorten the Houston list by taking me off since John Novak will 
be on the board.  I leave it to Bruce to see if it makes sense to shorten the 
list further.  Mark

	Orlando Gonzalez@ENRON
	03/27/2001 01:51 PM
		 
Did you  get a chance to review the Elektro board make up.  I would like to 
finalize before the next ordinary shareholder meeting in Brazil.   Thanks

Orlando Gonzalez
02/04/2001 10:35 PM
Bruce,  This solution does not work for Brazilian entities for legal 
reasons.    I will send a summary of the current situation and a proposal to 
resolve. We can discuss during your visit.  Thanks

Bruce Lundstrom@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
31/01/2001 19:26
Folks -

The Legal Specialists in EGA are working up new director/officer slates for 
the EGA entities.  We will be appointing the following list of directors for 
EGA entities:  

Rebecca McDonald
Jim Hughes
Jeff Sommers
Jim Derrick
Mark Haedicke

There will be some exceptions to this slate, particularly where local law or 
the necessity of regular board attendance requires additional (or even 
different) directors to be appointed.  These will be considered on a 
case-by-case basis.  Allow the Legal Specialists the opportunity to come up 
with their tentative slates and then we will give them to the regional heads 
for comment.

Some of you will be asked to resign your current directorships.  I hope that 
no one will take offense to the fact of of the changed slates -- none is 
intended.  We have found that this common slate has made corporate governance 
more efficient and less complicated.

Thank you for your cooperation.  Please pass this message along to others in 
your respective groups as you deem necessary.

Bruce

To be elected as a Board member a person must be a shareholder of the Company 
(normally one share is transferred to such member) and tehre is no more the 
requirement of the Brazilian residency.
There is no other mandatory requirements.
However one has to have in mind that from a practical point of view it  is 
not viable to have only non residents at the Board (frequent trips to Brazil, 
less flexibility on timing to pass resolutions about ugent matters etc)  
Ideally at least trhee shoul be resident in Brazil (present minum quorum to 
held a Board Meeting.)
Vasco.

>>> <Orlando.Gonzalez@enron.com> 2/4/01 11:39:09 pm >>>

Vasco   What are the residency requirements for board membership?  Are
there other specific requirements?  I would like to send a proposal this
week. Thanks

Orlando:
As per your request, please find bellow the names of all of the present
members of Elektro's Board.
Firstly is to be mentioned that according to Elektro's By Laws, the Board may 
have a minimum of 4 and a
maximum of 7 permanent members (one obligatorily must be elected by
appointment of Elektros' employees) and a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 4
alternates (one obligatorily to act solely as alternate to the employees'
representative at the Board)

Permanent members:
Diomedes Christodoulou (President)
Orlando Goanz?lez
Ricky Linn Waddell
Geraldo Gon?alves Pereira (elected by appointment of Elektro's employees)
Vacant (3)
Alternate members:
James Martin Bannantine
Richard Allan Lammers
Ricardo Louren?o Carneiro (alternate to Geraldo Gon?alves)
Vacant (3)

The election and/or dismissal of the Board members has to be decided by the
shareholders of the company.
Normally the election o the Board members takes place at the annual
Ordinary Shareholder's meeting. (This year, our OGM is scheduled to take
place on April, 29th.)
However this matter  can also be decided at any time via an Extraordinary
Shareholder's Meeting  that has to be called trough a  Board Resolution
that  has to be publicized at the Official Gazette no later than 8 days
prior to date of such EGM.
Should the present number of the Board members be maintained (i.e 4
permanent and 3 alternates), the election of new members (from our side)
will have to be made upon the resignation of those presently on seat.
Should you deem necessary, please call me at your earliest convenience.
Least but nol east As I vave mentined to you the other day, it is quite 
normal to appoint the senior legal council as an alternate to the permanent 
members of the Board so that he may legally be present at all the board 
meetings

The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of April 15, 2001.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.

Please let me know if you have questions.

Please provide me your comments on the following outline:

Trading Contracts for Global Commodity Markets

1.  Evolution of Trading Contracts Since 1990
2.   Trading in 2001:  Living with Multiple Master Agreements
       a.   North America
       b.   Europe
       c.   other
3.   Globalization of Commodity Trading
4.   Lessons from the California Crisis
5.   Deregulation Marches Forward 
6.   The Vision
      a.   single global master for physical and financial trading
      b.   use master netting agreements in transition phase
      c.   focus on confirmations and schedules for new products

Do the firms described below by Sheila come within the scope?   Mark
	Sheila Tweed
	04/18/2001 04:29 PM
		
Do our Contract Administration folks (Carolyn Gilley, Mary Salmonson) work 
with these forms and contracts.  The only "small businesses" that I'm aware 
of are the various consulting firms and other service entities (law firms, 
recruiting firms) that we use.  We have a consulting agreement data base and 
also a data base of law firm engagement agreements.  Either Ed Hearn or Kay 
Young could help access these contracts.

	Mark E Haedicke
	Sent by: Janette Elbertson
	04/11/2001 03:19 PM
		 
Please let me know as soon as possible if you are aware of any such contracts 
as described below by Sharon Butcher.

"The U.S. Small Business Administration, Office of Government Contracting has 
advised that on May 25, 2001, they will evaluate Enron's subcontracting 
program and compliance on any subcontracting plans in effect on current 
contracts.

This review will cover the last five (5) years.  All Forms 294 and 295 filed 
with the Small Business Adminstration along with the names of each 
Administrative Contracting Officer (U.S. Government employee responsible for 
monitoring the contract) for each contract will be subject to the review.

In addition, total subcontract placement with small businesses, small 
disadvantaged businesses, women-owned small businesses, and HubZone small 
businesses shall be reviewed.  Further, the amount of indirect or overhead 
costs, if any, apportioned to contract goals is subject to review.

We will also need information on the number of active suppliers Enron is 
currently using in the following categories:  large business, small business, 
small disadvantaged business, women-owned small business and HubZone 
business.  The review will cover these figures for one year ago if available."

Looks like a good candidate.  I am around all next week.  

Regards,

Mark

	Peter Keohane
	04/20/2001 03:45 PM
		 
Janette - Can you call Sharon to co-ordinate 5-10 minutes when Mark is 
available to discuss the attached.

Mark -  I want to discuss with you a candidate, with the following background 
information.  Sorry for the long memo but it might make our discussion more 
efficient.

I wanted to see if I could recruit someone with 4-6 years major law firm 
experience and whom I knew or could confirm by my contacts as having a 
reputation as a quality lawyer and person with broad corporate and commercial 
experience.  Perhaps I am getting too far removed from that level, but I was 
able to come up with only one candidate that I think is worthy of pursuing.  
If he proves unsatisfactory, I will then have to go to an 
out-placement/recruitment agency, which is relatively expensive.  That said 
the candidate I am suggesting would to my mind be as good or better than any 
candidate that we may find through a formal recruitment process.  His name is 
Derek Flaman.  I will send his resume to you by fax.

A couple of points:

Strengths:

(a)  Derek comes from the Donahue Ernst and Young firm and to my knowledge is 
a highly regarded commercial associate.

(b)  Prior to that he was at Macleod Dixon and a highly regarded commercial 
associate there.  The Managing Partner of Donahue Ernst and Young Calgary 
came from Macleod Dixon Calgary and brought Derek over with him.

(c)  Derek has never done any work for us, but I have met him socially a 
number of times and have spoken to him about this job possibility.  I think 
he has a down-to-earth and comfortable personality that would suit the 
atmosphere and stresses of Enron well.

(d)  Derek was seconded internally to Husky Oil - one of DEY's major Calgary 
clients - for a period and has experince in-house.  He worked for an internal 
lawyer at Husky who is a friend of Greg Johnston and who gave excellent 
reviews.

(e)  Although I do not have his law school grades, he tells me he finished in 
the top third of his class at Queens University - which among the reputable 
schools in Canada.

(f)  He is qualified both under Alberta and Ontario law.

(g)  He has met with Milnthorp and Greg Johnston, both of whom were favorably 
impressed.

Issues:

(a)  Derek graduated from law school in '94 and since that time his career 
has been a bit traveled.  Although there is an explanation, his continuous 
experience at Macleod Dixon and Donahue Ernst and Young started in '97.  
Before that the history is he is from a small town in Alberta.  After 
graduating he wanted to work at a small firm in Toronto and had an interest 
in labor law, and spent his first year articling to a Toronto labor 
boutique.  After that year he wanted to get into commercial work and out 
Toronto, and moved to Fraser Milner in Edmonton.  His wife then took a 
position at Stikeman Elliott in Calgary however, and so he moved to Macleod 
Dixon in Calgary.  He moved to Donahue Ernst and Young when they established 
their office in Calgary.  All things being considered, I am comfortable with 
his experience at say a 4 to 5 year level - although compensation could then 
be an issue (I have not discussed compensation with him).

(b)  Derek's experience has been primarily in large commercial projects, 
especially the off-shore oil and gas developments in Hibernia and Terra Nova 
for Husky.  This would require some very good legal and large project 
organizational skills but is obviously different from a faster paced, 
commercially oriented, higher volume trading atmosphere.  In his secondment 
to Husky however he was more involved in their retail gasoline business and 
natural gas marketing and,  although I am sure not the atmosphere at Enron, 
he tells me it is an atmosphere he is comfortable with and enjoys.

(c)  Do Jim Derrick's accounting/law firm concerns apply to hiring a lawyer 
(as opposed to retaining counse)?

I would like to get back to Derek soon to discuss next steps (interview in 
Houston? with whom? Vicki Sharp? get a feel for compensation expectations?), 
or look to other alternatives.

Peter.

I am ok listing you.  Mark

	Christi L Nicolay
	04/20/2001 02:03 PM
		 
Mark -- We need to update FERC's records for our wholesale power marketers 
(EPMI and our plants) to list an official to receive service of certain FERC 
documents.  I believe that you are general counsel for all of these and would 
like to list you.  If something comes from FERC (which should not happen 
often), you would just forward it to me.  I need to send this information to 
FERC next week.  Is this fine with you?  

Thanks.  Christi

Alan:

Could you please respond to the following request.  Thanks.

Mark
	"Teruo Tanaka" <teruo.tanaka@ibjbank.co.jp>
	04/20/2001 02:12 AM
		 
A Japanese trading firm has a keen interest in the above derivatives. I
would be grateful if you could send me the Master SO2 Allowance Purchase and
Sale Agreement and any other materials you may feel appropriate for novices.
They could be the first Japanese trading firm member of ISDA.

Thanks for the info. Next year we want to run those fees through legal before 
they are allocated out.    Mark

Lisa:  It looks fine.  Please send out from you and me.  Thanks.  Mark

	Lisa Mellencamp
	04/19/2001 11:07 AM
		 
please look at the following:

As many of you are aware, Enron Corp. has been appointed as a member of the 
Official Unsecured Creditors' Committee of Pacific Gas and Electric Company 
("PG&E") which filed a bankruptcy reorganization proceeding on April 6, 
2001.   As a member of the committee, Enron will have access to certain 
confidential and/or non-public information regarding PG&E.  Enron and the 
other members of the committee will be signing a confidentiality agreement 
with PG&E that will restrict the use and disclosure of  this  confidential 
and/or non-public information.

Michael Tribolet with the Risk Assessment and Control group is Enron's 
designated representative to the committee, and Lisa Mellencamp with the ENA 
Legal Department will be assisting him in this role. Please be advised that 
they will be restricted from disclosing certain of the information that they 
receive.   Any requests for information regarding PG&E or its bankruptcy 
proceedings that Enron has obtained through its membership on the Committee 
should first be cleared by Lisa Mellencamp, Travis McCullough, Richard 
Sanders or me. 

Lisa J. Mellencamp

Yes, I would be happy to.   Mark Haedicke

	Stacy Carey <SCAREY@ISDA.ORG>
	04/23/2001 12:11 PM
		 
The FT has contacted ISDA regarding our contribution to an upcoming article
they are writing on the emergence of electronic trading. 

ISDA staff will give them regulatory background in US and Europe.  I thought
it might be worthwhile for them to hear a business/legal perspective as
well. 

Would you be interested in speaking with the reporter within the next couple
of days?  Please advise.  Many thanks!

Stacy Carey
Policy Director  & Media Relations
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

fyi
	John Sherriff
	04/24/2001 12:55 AM
		 
May I please have your comments if any on this draft by close of business 
Wednesday.  We hope to have agreed on the Q&A's by then and to send it out 
the announcement on Thursday.

John

To be sent to:  All Enron Europe, all employees in Japan,  all Global Markets 
and all VPs and up around the company

Enron has established several wholesale businesses in Japan in the last year 
including Metals,  Power Plant Development (via our investment in EnCom),  
Coal,  LNG & Weather.   Though Japan continues to make progress towards a 
liberalized electricity market, significant barriers to power trading remain 
under the current interim market structure.  Until further tangible steps are 
taken to improve third party access for electricity in Japan, we will suspend 
our power marketing efforts and focus on the significant opportunities that 
currently exist in our other wholesale businesses.   Once the necessary 
regulatory changes have been completed we expect to aggressively pursue 
Enron's traditional position as the leading buyer and seller of electricity 
in every deregulated market.  

Based on these changes Joe Hirl our President of Enron Japan will move to the 
Global Markets group and lead a team that will focus on developing all our 
Global Markets opportunities in Japan especially Weather,  Oil,  LNG,  Coal, 
and Shipping.    We expect to continue our general recruiting  of Japanese 
nationals and as President of Enron Japan,  Joe will continue to provide the 
overall business leadership to both recruiting and the Analyst and Associate 
program in Japan.  The Finance origination team headed by Jeremy Thirsk will 
continue to report to Joe and also move to Global Markets.  Our power trading 
group led by Morton Erik Pettersen will transition into other roles around 
Enron.  The Equity/FX/Interest rate team which is a part of Global Markets 
has two employees in the Tokyo office today and they expect to expand their 
efforts throughout the year.

The EnCom group, which is our power plant development business (with minority 
partners) and headed by Carey Sloan will continue its efforts in developing 
power plants in Japan.  We are pleased with the progress we are making on a 
number of sites and EnCom will continue to report to the Enron Europe Office 
of the Chairman.

Our Metals team headed by Kazunari Sugimoto will continue to report through 
Enron Metals in London.

By May we expect Enron Credit to have two to three employees in Tokyo pursing 
the Credit Derivative business.  These employees remain in  Enron Credit , a 
part of Enron Europe.

EBS has two employees headed by Jim Weisser and this team expects to expand  
by year end.

The Industrial Markets team also expects to have two employees in the Tokyo 
office in the next couple of months.

In the last seven months the commercial support services for Japan have been 
transitioned to London for support and this is not changing.  Jane McBride 
heads the legal team and will continue to functionally report  to Mark Evans, 
General Counsel in London.   The RAC function will continue to report to Ted 
Murphy, head of RAC for Enron Europe.   The Risk Management and Accounting 
team is headed by Jan-Erland Bekeng will continue to functionally report to 
Fernley Dyson in London.  The  IT, HR,  Tax and real estate teams will also 
continue to functionally report to London. 

Nick O'Day who heads both the Public Affairs group (Government & Regulatory 
Affairs and the Public Relations) in Japan will report to the Enron Europe 
Office of the Chair with a Public Relations functional reporting to Jackie 
Genle in London and a Government Affairs functional reporting to Rick 
Shappiro in Houston.   We anticipate that his team's efforts will be 
primarily directed to supporting the EnCom power plant development team but 
he will also continue to provide support for Global Markets, EBS & Industrial 
Markets.

We have already made considerable progress in breaking into the Japanese 
markets across a wide range of Enron businesses and we anticipate that this 
will be a major profit center for profit growth for years to come. Through 
these current changes we can demonstrate our ability to be flexible and 
target our resources where they will realise the most immediate value for the 
company.

Sheila, I need a status report on their contracts as well.  Please change 
Hodge to 175, Aronowitz to 190 and Taylor to 190.   Mark

	Sheila Walton/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/23/2001 06:09 PM
		 
	

Mark, attached is a chart of your VPs.  I have inserted a column for 
suggested increase amounts.  Call me if you have questions. 

Sheila 

yes.

	Stacy Carey <SCAREY@ISDA.ORG>
	04/23/2001 04:54 PM
		 
Hello Mark -- Andrei Postelnicu, Financial Times, will contact you regarding
the electronic trading article.  For reference, his number is 212-641-6339.

Mark, in cases where we receive similar requests in the future, may I put
reporters in contact with you directly? (with the understanding that,
depending upon the issue, you may or may not decide to speak with them) 

Also, feel free to let me know if you would like any of the ISDA staff to
join your call with Andrei. Many thanks -- Stacy  

Yes, I would be happy to.   Mark Haedicke

 

                    Stacy Carey

                    12:11 PM             Subject:     Financial Times
Article on Electronic Trading                
 

 

The FT has contacted ISDA regarding our contribution to an upcoming article
they are writing on the emergence of electronic trading.

ISDA staff will give them regulatory background in US and Europe.  I
thought
it might be worthwhile for them to hear a business/legal perspective as
well.

Would you be interested in speaking with the reporter within the next
couple
of days?  Please advise.  Many thanks!

Stacy Carey
Policy Director  & Media Relations
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

Thanks for the speech.  Hope to see you at the law conference.  Mark

	Chris Gaffney
	04/23/2001 03:48 PM
		 
Mark and Peter - Attached is a copy of the speech made today by the Ontario 
Minister of Energy.  Of course we would have been much happier with an 
outside date or target of November 1, 2001 or  an unconditional May 1, 2002 
date; however, it at least shows a commitment to deregulation. 

While Enron Toronto will be busy with ongoing marketing and certain major 
projects in the near future (the OEFC NUG Contract Management Agreement, the 
G6 retail initiative and the ENERconnect amendment),  the obvious umber one 
priority of this office in the short term will be negotiating an extension to 
the British Energy Supply Contract.

Regards 
CJG

	Garrett Tripp
	04/23/2001 04:11 PM
		 
Mr. Speaker: 
This Legislature passed the Energy Competition Act in 1998 to help meet the 
province's long-term electricity needs and ensure that Ontarians have a safe, 
reliable and affordable supply of power.
When this government came to office in 1995, we had our work cut out for us. 
Ontario's electricity sector was failing us.
Consumers and businesses had no choice of who supplied them with power. And 
we went from having one of the lowest prices for electricity to the third 
highest in Canada. 
The monopoly we had come to rely on for safe, reliable and 
competitively-priced electricity was no longer working. It had become out of 
date, inefficient and too expensive. Something had to be done.
That's why I'm proud to stand up in the Legislature today to announce that:
The government is confident that conditions necessary to open the electricity 
market to competition will exist by May 2002. The government is committed to 
an open market while guaranteeing a safe, affordable and reliable supply.
There are some who are fundamentally opposed to opening this market to 
competition. Our government believes, however, that open, competitive markets 
are beneficial. They keep costs low, encourage innovation and benefit 
consumers. 
There are others who share our desire to open the market, but who would like 
to see it done even sooner. As government, we bear a responsibility to ensure 
the opening is done right for all involved. To do this, we are committed to 
opening the market at the earliest possible date, while ensuring all of the 
conditions required for a smooth transition to competition are met.
And I'm pleased to tell you, Mr. Speaker, that the four principles guiding 
the government's vision have been, or will be met, by May 2002.

First and foremost, protecting consumers and offering more choice. The 
overall market design and regulatory framework for introducing competition 
puts customers first. Over the long term, a competitive market will lead to 
the lowest possible costs and better service for all. 
Second, creating a strong business climate with a reliable supply of 
electricity. Ontario already has sufficient supply to meet our current needs. 
Announcing a firm market opening deadline today provides greater certainty to 
potential new investors who have already announced 3 billion dollars in new 
generation projects. 
Thirdly, we will protect our environment. My colleague, the Minister of the 
Environment has announced tough new emission caps for the electricity sector. 
They will be among the toughest in North America, matching the requirements 
of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Also today, Minister Witmer is announcing changes to ensure that new 
electricity projects are reviewed in a clear and consistent manner under the 
province's environmental assessment process.
And fourth, we will encourage new ways of doing business and support the 
search for alternative sources of power. For the first time, customers will 
be able to make clean air a priority by choosing the type of power they want, 
including wind, fuel cells and solar. Giving them choice will help promote 
the demand for cleaner, greener electricity. 
And so, Mr. Speaker, I am proud to announce that Ontario's electricity sector 
will open by May 2002. The government is keeping its promise to introduce a 
competitive electricity market. We will do it, and we have put the principles 
in place to ensure that we do it right.

Thank you.		
		

J: please add.  Mark
	eserver@enron.com
	04/25/2001 03:10 PM
		 
Company Card transactions have arrived.

To add these transactions to an expense report, click on the following link 
for Company Card.
http://nahou-wwxms01p

Look forward to it. 11:45 is good.   Mark

	"Swanstrom, Bill" <BSwanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
	Sent by: "Ingram, Kay" <KIngram@lockeliddell.com>
	04/25/2001 11:46 AM
		 
We have reservations at Damian's for 12 noon.  Don and I will pick you up in 
front of your building at 11:45.  Let me know if we need to move the time up 
or back.  Looking forward to it!
 
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com
(713) 226-1143
  
 

MD and GC of Enron Wholesale Services.  Mark

	Steve_Targett@nag.national.com.au
	04/24/2001 06:03 PM
		 
from

Cynthia

My title is now:-

Executive General Manager, Global Wholesale Financial Services,
National Australia Bank

It is a bit long winded but I am head of  Wholesale Banking globally, 
reporting
to the CEO.

Regards
Steve T.

Cynthia Richards <CRICHARDS@isda.org> on 25/04/2001 04:20:56

Attached is a Board list  which we are in the process of updating.  Could
you please check and correct your titles and the name of your company, if
needed, as you would like it to appear on the Internet.

 <<Board11.doc>>

 - Board11.doc

It will be dashed so I would like a brief risk memo.  Mark

	Lisa Mellencamp
	04/26/2001 11:49 AM
		 
is your view of legal risk memo changed by meeting yesterday? sounded like 
might not be DASH??

Lisa J. Mellencamp

I am looking for someone in Portand to work on power plant development that 
will mostly be in CA and Nevada.  I would like you to talk to Sheila Tweed in 
my office at 713-853-7093, who is in charge of this effort on the legal 
side.  I will foward your resume to her and of course tell her to keep it 
very confidential.

Agreed.   Mark

	John Novak@ENRON
	04/26/2001 09:12 AM
		
Mark -- If it's O.K. with you, I think it would be better for us here for any 
South America invoices to be sent to us in S?o Paulo, since that is where 
they'll be processed for payment.  Please let me know.  Thanks.

Rgds,
 John

Marty -

I don't need the originals or copies of these invoices and defer to Haedicke 
and Novak on how they want them processed.  Thanks.

Rob

That's fine Marty, thank you.

We can definitely send you copies of these invoices in the future to help 
facilitate your review and processing of bills. We send the originals to Rob 
Walls in Houston. We will begin with the March invoices which will be going 
out shortly.
    By copy of this memo to Rob Walls, we are advising him that we will be 
sending you copies of these invoices. Please let me know if this is 
satisfactory for your purposes. Marty

>>> <Mary.Ann.Oliveira@enron.com> 04/25/01 05:43PM >>>
Dear April,

Would you mind sending the original of the statements of fees of the
subjects below to the S?o Paulo Office? Usually, before the invoices are
cleared they receive comments, codes, they are submitted to provisions for
cash and may route to different people for review.

Please let me know if this is not any inconvenient for you. Current
subjects invoiced by Skadden are:

                    Dona Francisca (John Novak)
                    RioGen Merchant - Eletrobolt (John Novak)

Thank you.

Mary Oliveira
Enron America do Sul Ltda.
Av. das Na??es Unidas, 11541 - 6o. andar
Brooklin - S?o Paulo - SP
04578-000
Tel: 55-11-5503-1296, Fax: 55-11-5507-3626
E-mail: Mary.Ann.Oliveira@enron.com

Further information about the firm, a list of the Partners and their 
professional qualifications will be provided upon request.

No

	Stacy Carey <SCAREY@ISDA.ORG>
	04/27/2001 08:21 AM
		 
Mark -- just curious -- did you ever hear from the Financial Times on
electronic trading?  -- S

Stacy Carey
Policy Director 
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

Mary:

I would like to discuss seminars in Europe to further promote the isda form 
among energy companies on the continent.  Please give me a ring at your 
convenience.
 
Regards,

Mark
	Mark Evans
	04/27/2001 04:59 AM
		 
Mark,

Enron Europe's experience is that there is some resistance to ISDA 
documentation in most of the European countries in which we are active. Our 
list of countries which we feel would benefit from promotional sessions 
arranged by ISDA is as follows. The countries are in order ranked by Enron 
Europe's view of the significance of the market in each country and where 
ISDA resistance is strongest. Most significant market and most resistance 
ranked at the top of the list for both Europe and the Far East: 

Europe
Germany
Switzerland
Austria
Spain
Nordic countries: Denmark, Norway, Sweden, Finland
Netherlands
Italy
France
Poland
Czech Republic
Hungary

Far East
Singapore
Japan
Hong Kong

Thanks

     Mark

Thanks for the resume.  Mark

Please set up 15 minutes.  Mark
	"Dilg, Joe" <jdilg@velaw.com>
	04/27/2001 12:53 PM
		 
   I have arranged a meeting at Enron's offices with Jim Derrick on
Monday May 7 from 10 to 11 for Stephen York, Ben Sheppard and other members
of Vinson & Elkins International Arbitration and Litigation Practice Group.
Stephen York who will join our London office as a partner in May is an
experienced UK solicitor who began his legal career with Slaughter & May,
spent 7 years in Hong Kong and most recently headed Hammond Suddards
arbitration practice in London.  Jim asked if I would contact each of you
about your availability that morning. Please let me know and I will work
with Stephanie Harris to arrange a location.  Thanks  Joe Dilg
PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL:
Contains attorney-client communications
and/or attorney work product

          ++++++CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE+++++
The information in this email may be confidential and/or privileged.  This
email is intended to be reviewed by only the individual or organization
named above.  If you are not the intended recipient or an authorized
representative of the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any
review, dissemination or copying of this email and its attachments, if any,
or the information contained herein is prohibited.  If you have received
this email in error, please immediately notify the sender by return email
and delete this email from your system.  Thank You

Sorry I missed you.  Please call and ask to interrupt me.   Thanks.  Mark

	Steve C Hall
	04/23/2001 10:24 AM
		 
Mark,

Good morning.  

Do you have some time today or tomorrow to go over a few last details about 
the job?  I have questions about (1) post-remodeling office location, (2) 
payment of professional dues, CLE expenses, and (3) vacation for this year.

Thanks,

Steve

J
	Gina Corteselli/ENRON@enronXgate
	04/27/2001 10:12 AM
		 
A meeting of the PRC Committee is scheduled for  May 30, 2001, at 10:00-12:00 
in EB8C1 to discuss mid-year 2001 PRC issues and the VP PRC.  A detailed 
agenda for this meeting will follow separately.
Tele-conference/Video conference will be provided where appropriate.  For 
those of you who are participating via these means, David Oxley or myself 
will call you before the meeting to capture your thoughts and comments on the 
agenda and issues.   
Please don't hesitate to contact me should you have any questions or 
concerns.  

Gina Corteselli
Global Performance Management
713 345-3377
713 569-5589 (mobile)

Steve and Peter:  From a control point of view, we should have at least one 
director based in Houston.  Does that present any significant tax risk?  Let 
us know.  Mark Haedicke
	Mark Powell
	05/01/2001 10:24 AM
		 
A.  Corporate Structure - To facilitate the meshing of EES' existing Canadian 
affiliate (Enron Energy Services Canada Co. Ltd. ("EES Canada")) and Enron 
Canada Corp.'s mass market retail venture (Enron Direct Limited Partnership 
("Enron Direct Canada")), I propose a simple corporate structure as follows:

Enron Direct Canada's business will be set up as a subsidiary of EES Canada.  
This will involve:
a. a general conveyance of the assets of Enron Direct Canada to its general 
partner, Enron Direct Canada Corp.;
b. the sale of the shares of Enron Direct Canada Corp. from Enron Canada 
Corp. to EES Canada; and
c.  a services agreement whereby Enron Canada Corp. provides key services to 
Enron Direct Canada.

By setting up Enron Direct Canada as a distinct subsidiary of EES Canada, 
both entities will continue to operate as they do today.

As such, (i) Enron Direct Canada will continue to be operated by the staff 
currently in place in Calgary, but within the EES corporate structure, and 
(ii) EES Canada's existing business will continue to be operated as it is 
currently.

B.  Governance - I understand from Peter that a few years back, it was 
decided, for corporate law and, more importantly, tax-related "permanent 
establishment" issues, that all directors and officers of Enron Canada Corp. 
would be Canadian-resident employees of Enron Canada Corp.  Accordingly, 
Enron Canada Corp. was re-organized with a nominee board of directors now 
consisting of Rob (as the senior Canadian commercial employee) and Peter (as 
the senior Canadian legal employee) with officers being the Vice-Presidents 
or Managing Directors in Canada responsible for the various commercial or 
commercial-support groups. 

Following this model, Rob Milnthorp and an employee from the legal department 
would appear to be the appropriate directors of the EES' Canadian 
subsidiaries.  In the short term, the Iegal employee/designee would be me; 
however, the new lawyer hired to work for Enron Direct Canada would assume 
the role. 

With respect to the officers, no changes are required with respect to Enron 
Direct Canada.  With respect to EES Canada, I propose that Rob be appointed 
as the Chairman, President and CEO and I be appointed as Secretary for the 
interim.

Unless I hear otherwise, I will proceed on the basis of these proposals.

Regards,

Mark Powell

no changes.  Mark

	Cynthia Richards <CRICHARDS@isda.org>
	05/01/2001 09:02 AM
		 
 - BOD-Bios.doc

Is signing a unanimous consent in Houston an issue?  Mark

	Stephen H Douglas/ENRON@enronXgate
	05/01/2001 05:08 PM
		 
Mark Powell's recollection of the reasoning behind having an all-Canadian 
officer and director slate is correct and we generally like to isolate all of 
the business decision makers of a foreign subsidiary in the country where the 
subsidiary is incorporated.  The concern is that having officers and 
directors located outside of the country of incorporation of the subsidiary 
could provide a basis for a country other than the one where the subsidiary 
is incorporated to assert taxing jurisdiction (the PE issue).  That said, I 
appreciate the control concern and so long as the authority of the 
non-Canadian Director is never exercised outside of Canada (of course, this 
presents a proof issue) having a non-Canadian Director is permissible (from a 
tax perspective, that is).  Let me know whether such a restriction would be 
compatible with the expressed control concern.  Steve. (x30938)

I don't think there is a bright line, so that should not be a problem per 
se.  The idea was to make it as "Canadian" as possible for tax purposes.  I 
would of course defer to Steve.

Steve and Peter:  From a control point of view, we should have at least one 
director based in Houston.  Does that present any significant tax risk?  Let 
us know.  Mark Haedicke
A.  Corporate Structure - To facilitate the meshing of EES' existing Canadian 
affiliate (Enron Energy Services Canada Co. Ltd. ("EES Canada")) and Enron 
Canada Corp.'s mass market retail venture (Enron Direct Limited Partnership 
("Enron Direct Canada")), I propose a simple corporate structure as follows:

Enron Direct Canada's business will be set up as a subsidiary of EES Canada.  
This will involve:
a. a general conveyance of the assets of Enron Direct Canada to its general 
partner, Enron Direct Canada Corp.;
b. the sale of the shares of Enron Direct Canada Corp. from Enron Canada 
Corp. to EES Canada; and
c.  a services agreement whereby Enron Canada Corp. provides key services to 
Enron Direct Canada.

By setting up Enron Direct Canada as a distinct subsidiary of EES Canada, 
both entities will continue to operate as they do today.

As such, (i) Enron Direct Canada will continue to be operated by the staff 
currently in place in Calgary, but within the EES corporate structure, and 
(ii) EES Canada's existing business will continue to be operated as it is 
currently.

B.  Governance - I understand from Peter that a few years back, it was 
decided, for corporate law and, more importantly, tax-related "permanent 
establishment" issues, that all directors and officers of Enron Canada Corp. 
would be Canadian-resident employees of Enron Canada Corp.  Accordingly, 
Enron Canada Corp. was re-organized with a nominee board of directors now 
consisting of Rob (as the senior Canadian commercial employee) and Peter (as 
the senior Canadian legal employee) with officers being the Vice-Presidents 
or Managing Directors in Canada responsible for the various commercial or 
commercial-support groups. 

Following this model, Rob Milnthorp and an employee from the legal department 
would appear to be the appropriate directors of the EES' Canadian 
subsidiaries.  In the short term, the Iegal employee/designee would be me; 
however, the new lawyer hired to work for Enron Direct Canada would assume 
the role. 

With respect to the officers, no changes are required with respect to Enron 
Direct Canada.  With respect to EES Canada, I propose that Rob be appointed 
as the Chairman, President and CEO and I be appointed as Secretary for the 
interim.

Unless I hear otherwise, I will proceed on the basis of these proposals.

Regards,

Mark Powell

FYI
ALarsen120@aol.com on 11/29/99 06:03:58 PM
Mark:
    Following up on the suggestion from Al Alexanderson that you were
expecting "a phone call and a resume" from me, I am sending you my resume as
a Word document attachment to this note. I presume that you are in fact
looking for a lawyer as Al described.  I'm not going to go into any detail in
this note, but if you are looking, we should talk.  I have extensive
experience in both transactional and regulatory aspects of energy practice.
As Sr. VP and deputy general counsel at an energy development company, I did
project development work, including turnkey project sales and power purchase
arrangements.  In private practice, I represented some end users, but mostly
utilities, in power purchases, transmission arrangements, project
development, joint ventures, and all of the other business relationships and
transactions that have been used as the industry has evolved from the
regulatory model to the market model.  I am assuming from Al's description
that you are looking for someone for Portland, Oregon, but Al said he wasn't
sure of the location.  Tell me what you are looking for, and I'll give you an
honest assessment of whether I think I would be a good prospect for filling
that need.
    Al Larsen     phone 703-351-9547

 - RESUME~2.DOC

I rate her a 2.

	Becky Spencer
	04/30/2001 09:38 AM
		 
Your comments are needed for Elaine Strahan who sat in for Janette 
Elbertson.  Please return as soon as possible.  Thank you!-Becky
  
 Excellent = 5       Above Average = 4      Average = 3            Below 
Average = 2            Poor = 1

 Initiative

 Cooperation

 Punctuality

 Attendance

 Quality of Work

 Would you request this person again Y/N?

Comments:

I will be in San Antonio, but available by phone.  Mark

	Louise Kitchen
	04/30/2001 08:49 AM
		 
Bearing in mind,that its the Board meeting tomorrow, I would like to suggest 
we look to making a decision on the declaratory judgement on Thursday as 
opposed to Wednesday as we will not be able to run far enough up the flagpole 
by Wednesday.

Please put on my schedule.  Mark
	John J Lavorato/ENRON@enronXgate
	05/02/2001 04:29 PM
		 
Hello everyone.

In December we decided to kill our planned offsite due to market volatility.  
Louise and I would like to get everyone together offsite, probably in late 
June (once Louise is back from holiday (just kidding)).  I think it's time to 
go have a little fun with the group driving Enron's success. 

I would like suggestions as to:

1)  Where to go.

2)  What should be the focus of the business meetings.

3)  Should we have business meetings or should we do something else (ie. 
climb a mountain)?  I'm not a strong bid on climbing a mountain. 

4)  And any other ideas you have.

In addition I would like to start having staff meetings about once a month.  
The first one will be Friday May 11th at 2:30 p.m.  Please add this to your 
schedule.  I have invited everyone who has P/L responsibility.  Portland, 
Calgary and Toronto will have to be on Video or Phone conference.    

Regards

John

It looks a good deal to me.  Mark

=09Peter Keohane
=0905/09/2001 09:56 AM
=09=09=20
SOLICITOR/CLIENT PRIVILEGED COMMUNICATION

John and Mark, we have finalized our negotiations with NGX and have receive=
d=20
from them final executed paper for our execution.  All of them (NGX, OM,=20
Enerdata and Zarzeczny) have agreed (with the exception of Westcoast, who i=
s=20
not really relevant and who sold out their position in NGX to OM after=20
commencement of the litigation). =20
By its terms, we have until Friday to confirm our agreement.  The key terms=
=20
are:
1. EOL third-party transaction data will be included in the index on a=20
real-time basis;
2. Other electronic trading systems may have their data included in the ind=
ex=20
if they meet the criteria for inclusion (similar product, audit rights) (i.=
e.=20
we deleted the "most favour nations" requirement for inclusion of other=20
systems not being on more favourable terms);
3. Enron pays a one-time C$25,000 set-up fee;
4. Enron pays an index management fee of C$5,000 per month, unless Enron=20
trades at least 50,000 TJ=01,s per month on NGX;
6. Enron pays normal NGX trading fees;
7. Enron pays no audit fees or other fees or costs;
8. Lawsuit is released with everybody bearing their own costs;
9. Enron agrees to confidential audit rights to independent auditor =01) bu=
t no=20
customer information is provided to NGX;
10. No non-compete.  Enron is expressly allowed to:
 (a) develop, establish, publish or promote any alternative or competing=20
index:=20
 (b) post, settle against, or use in any transaction, any alternative or=20
competing index;
 (c) provide information to Gas Daily and Inside FERC, etc;
 (d) display any transactional information on EOL;=20
11. Term is 3 years, commencing after information transfer systems are in=
=20
place, but not later than Dec. 31 (failing which lawsuit is revived, but=20
against NGX only);
12. Enron can terminate at any time on 60 days notice (but lawsuit is=20
released);
13. Enron can terminate at any time for NGX breach (lawsuit is revived, but=
=20
against NGX only);
14. NGX can change its products and Enron has the option to change and be=
=20
included or not to change;
15. The method for calculating and compiling the index cannot be changed in=
=20
the future without our approval, and the agreements between NGX and Enerdat=
a=20
which give NGX the rights to the index cannot be amended or terminated=20
without our consent;
16. Deal is subject to ENA senior management approval by Friday; and
17. The above has been approved and executed by NGX, OM, Enerdata and=20
Zarzeczny.
This has been a tremendous amount of work with little involvement by outsid=
e=20
counsel.  Both Rob and I believe it is an excellent deal for Enron given th=
e=20
fact that pursuing the lawsuit will be extremely costly (both in terms of=
=20
expenses and the time and effort of dedicating resources to the litigation)=
=20
and difficult to litigate.  The deal really amounts to an option to Enron t=
o=20
have its EOL data included in the index for C$25,000 and releasing the=20
lawsuit.  Please let me know by Friday if we want to execute.

Regards, Peter.

I will be out of town that day.  Maybe the next one.  Mark

	Lisa Mellencamp
	05/10/2001 08:38 AM
		 
michael tribolet cannot attend this meeting.
i will go with someone from leboeuf. is this something you might want to go 
to??
may be good meeting to get feel for committee, debtor etc. if you have time. 
unfortunately need to go night before when they set at 10.

Lisa J. Mellencamp
	AMarks@milbank.com
	05/09/2001 08:56 PM
		 
PG&E has asked to make a presentation to the Creditors' Committee at our 
meetings in San Francisco on Tuesday, May 15, 2001.? The presentation, which 
is expected to cover a wide range of pending issues, will start at 10 am and 
will last for approximately one to two hours.? Please see my earlier email 
for the full agenda, location and call-in information for the meeting, which 
will still start at 9:30 am and should last most of the day.? 

Regards, 

Allan 
______________________________ 
Allan T. Marks 
Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy LLP 
email:? amarks@milbank.com 
website:? www.milbank.com? 
(213) 892-4376 (L.A. telephone) 
(212) 530-5312 (N.Y. telephone) 
(213) 892-4739 (L.A. direct fax) 
(213) 629-5063 (L.A. main fax)????????????????  

 <<...>> 

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential 
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee 
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended 
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited. 
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify 
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer. 

ok

	Carlos Sole@ENRON
	05/09/2001 06:02 PM
		 
Mark,

I have a unique outside counsel request on which I'd like your approval.  I 
am involved with a potential power plant development project with the 
Seminole Indian Tribe of Florida.  The project would be on their land and 
would potentially involve a joint venture with them.  Although we are at a 
preliminary stage, even the initial letter of intent that we are negotiating 
raises unique issues that will set the precedent for our project development 
agreements with respect to enforceability, jurisdiction and dispute 
resolution matters.  

I have identified and spoken with Lynn Slade of the New Mexico law firm of 
Modrall, Sperling, Roehl, Harris & Sisk on whether he could advise us on the 
Indian law issues associated with this project.  Lynn and several of his 
colleagues specialize on Indian law matters, and Lynn has experience both 
with representing Enron and in handling energy transactions in general.  In 
fact, Lynn gave a presentation at the 1999 Enron law conference entitled 
"Energy Business in 'Indian Country': Opportunities and Obstacles" (credit 
goes to Jeff Hodge for remembering that presentation and suggesting I contact 
Lynn); Lynn has represented several of Enron's pipeline companies, as well as 
the government affairs department, in connection with their Indian law issues 
and, at one time, prepared an opinion letter for ENA in a transaction 
involving the Ute tribe.  

Lastly, please note that I had asked our Florida counsel of Greenberg Trauig 
on whether they had any Indian law expertise, including specifically, any 
experience involving the Seminoles.  Unfortunately, the Seminoles are one of 
their clients so Greenberg cannot represent us in a manner adverse to the 
Tribe.  

Thanks in advance for your attention and consideration of this request.

Carlos Sole'
Senior Counsel
(713) 345-8191 (phone)
(713) 646-3393 (fax)

No problem with the no litigation exception.  Mark

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	05/09/2001 05:07 PM
		 
please let me know asap if you have a problem with our waiving the conflict 
below.

Thanks. 
Marty Keyser
05/09/2001 12:05 PM

Vicki:  Have you received a response from Mark?  If not, I would be pleased 
to follow up directly with Mark if you wish.  I have received a second 
request from Reed Smith regarding our position on the potential conflict.  
Thanks, Marty

	Enron Energy Services
	

 This is a Pittsburgh firm we use from time to time, primarily for EFS and 
litigation matters.  It seems that we should waive these conflicts.  Please 
let me know if you agree or if you need more detail. 
Marty Keyser
04/30/2001 07:51 AM

Vicki:  Attached is a memo from Reed Smith, our local counsel in Pittsburgh, 
regarding two (2) potential conflict situations.  Please let me know how you 
would like me to proceed.  Thanks, Marty
	
Per our discussion yesterday Marty I've been asked to check on two issues
regarding Enron.  First an attorney in our Philadelphia office has been asked
to do some work for Wiser Oil Company as follows.  Wiser is acquiring the
stock of a Canadian Corporation called Invasion Energy.  Enron Canada owns
about 50% of the stock of Invasion.  Wiser has Canadian counsel who has asked
us to work with them.  Enron Canada is represented by Bennett Jones LLP.
Although we don't do any work for Enron Canada, I thought I needed to see if
anyone at Enron had any problems with Reed Smith getting involved in this
transaction as stated above.  I'm told an answer to this one ASAP would be
nice.

Second question is a little more confusing.  An attorney in our New York 
office
has been asked by a broker for Enron Global Services to get involved in
negotiating a financial guarantee insurance agreement about providing
insurance coverage for Winterthur International.  We would be representing
Winterthur in the transaction.  I can get more information if needed.

Thanks for checking on these Marty.  Let me know 

Let's have Lance attend.  Mark
	John J Lavorato/ENRON@enronXgate
	Sent by: Kimberly Hillis/ENRON@enronXgate
	05/10/2001 12:54 PM
		 
The staff meeting that is scheduled for tomorrow, May 11 has been rescheduled 
to next Friday, May 18th.  The meeting is scheduled to start at 2:30 pm 
central time and will be in EB30C1.  If you are not able to attend, please 
make sure that you send an email to Kim Hillis with an explanation.  

Currently, the meeting will have Portland, Calgary, Sao Paulo, San Fran and 
Monterrey video conferenced. Orlando, please call 713-646-3062 when you are 
not in the Sao Paulo office.  If anyone else is required to call in, then a 
conference bridge line will need to be set up.  Please let Kim know this 
information as well so that this can be done.

The staff meeting is monthly and I will alert you when the June meeting will 
happen.  Please make all efforts to be at the meetings.

If you have a response to the previous email of where you would like for the 
management meeting to take place, please send them to myself or Kim.  I have 
not received many responses!  

If you have any questions, please let me know.

Next week, I will be in only on Monday.  I want Lance to sign dash if it 
comes later in the week.  Mark

	Lisa Mellencamp
	05/10/2001 02:45 PM
		 
comments on sithe documents are going to sithe today.
skilling meeting we have heard is next weds. tax meeting with douglas and 
donahue on monday at 1. still unresolved.
we are waiting on dash draft which hopefully we should get shortly.
when we get we will refine legal risk memo (sheila, i have draft) and we 
should all talk about both maybe monday after tax meeting??

Lisa J. Mellencamp

The 9th Circuit of the U.S. Ct. of Appeals granted EES' request to stay an 
injunction granted by the District Court in the UCS litigation, which would 
have required EES to continue to directly serve UCS.  The stay allows EES to 
return the customer UCS to PG&E and SCE for utility service and thereby save 
the future accrual of an additional $144 million of negative CTC 
receivables.  In approximately two months, the 9th Circuit will conduct a 
further review of the stay, at which point the litigation will return to the 
District Court for discovery and eventually trial.

Greetings:

John, I would like to promote Hodge to VP this time around.  I know our 
system has changed to get that done, but I wanted to get your support on 
this.  I believe Jeff has done a good job  and added significant value for a 
long time and has earned it.  Give me your thoughts.

Mark

__________________

The 9th Circuit of the U.S. Ct. of Appeals granted EES' request to stay an 
injunction granted by the District Court in the UCS litigation, which would 
have required EES to continue to directly serve UCS.  The stay allows EES to 
return the customer UCS to PG&E and SCE for utility service and thereby save 
the future accrual of an additional $144 million of negative CTC 
receivables.  In approximately two months, the 9th Circuit will conduct a 
further review of the stay.  It is likely EES' service contract with USC will 
expire before any trial at the District Court.

Here are my thoughts so far:

1.  Initial Legal Team -- Jeff Hodge, Jim Keller, Carol St. Clair, Aaron 
Rothwarg

2.  Spot Check the Forms -- over the next week

3.  Conform Forms to ENA Forms -- over next two months

4.  Develop Form Approval Process -- dual approvals by EES and ENA

5.  Develop Deal Approval Process -- deals above a certain size (or material 
variations from the form) would require concurrent EWS approval

6.  Request List of Major Contract Concerns from Traders -- items that cannot 
be hedged

FYI
	Mark E Haedicke
	05/11/2001 05:46 PM
		 
Here are my thoughts so far:

1.  Initial Legal Team -- Jeff Hodge, Jim Keller, Carol St. Clair, Aaron 
Rothwarg

2.  Spot Check the Forms -- over the next week

3.  Conform Forms to ENA Forms -- over next two months

4.  Develop Form Approval Process -- dual approvals by EES and ENA

5.  Develop Deal Approval Process -- deals above a certain size (or material 
variations from the form) would require concurrent EWS approval

6.  Request List of Major Contract Concerns from Traders -- items that cannot 
be hedged

I think we will need to do something for Peter.  I would be interested in HRs 
view on how much.  Mark

	David Oxley/ENRON@enronXgate
	05/14/2001 02:19 PM
		 
Mark,

I was chatting with HR rep in Calgary and she mentioned in doing the new 
contract on Gaffney it brings him very close to Keohane and possibly we might 
look to do something for him also?

What are your views?

David

The lawyers had a kick-off meeting today.  Vicki and I echoed your point on 
not shutting down the business.   We have a great team assembled and I think 
it will calm down the traders in EWS.  I will keep you posted.

Mark Haedicke

	David W Delainey@EES
	05/11/2001 05:55 PM
		 
Mark, I appreciate your help in these matters.  We need to be accurate and 
manage our risk but we can't "land the plane" or kill current and future deal 
velocity in the process.  Let me know how I can help.

Thanks much
Dave
Here are my thoughts so far:

1.  Initial Legal Team -- Jeff Hodge, Jim Keller, Carol St. Clair, Aaron 
Rothwarg

2.  Spot Check the Forms -- over the next week

3.  Conform Forms to ENA Forms -- over next two months

4.  Develop Form Approval Process -- dual approvals by EES and ENA

5.  Develop Deal Approval Process -- deals above a certain size (or material 
variations from the form) would require concurrent EWS approval

6.  Request List of Major Contract Concerns from Traders -- items that cannot 
be hedged

The attached report summarizes current significant legal activities of EWS 
Legal as of May 15, 2001.  This report does not attempt to list all 
transactions or include reference to on-going maintenance of completed 
transactions.

Please let me know if you have questions.

Not clear at this point.  No deals have been done.  My guess is that it will 
be Lance and his group.  I will let you know when it gets sorted out.  Mark

	"Swanstrom, Bill" <BSwanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
	05/20/2001 12:04 PM
		 
Mark, who within the Enron legal group is responsible for Enron Excelerator?  
From what I've heard about this initiative, it sounds like it may be doing 
deals similar to what we've done for Enron in the past.  We'd love to get the 
opportunity to help -- we have valuable experience we can bring to bear in 
this area.  Thanks.
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com
(713) 226-1143
 
 

Please review and set up a meeting with me to establish a plan for this 
committee.  Mark
	Stacy Carey <SCAREY@ISDA.ORG>
	05/23/2001 11:36 AM
		 
Hello Mark -- given our e-mail traffic the last couple of days I wanted to
quickly summarize our thoughts on next steps:

1.  Conference call - Mark, Ruth and Stacy re: agenda for NA Energy
Committee
2.  Conference call - Mark, Ruth, Stacy, Christophe, Katia, John re:
coordination of committee activities and agenda for December conference

Depending upon your schedule, we hope to try to get these calls scheduled
either this week or early next week.

Many thanks!  -- Stacy

Hello Mark -- The European Energy Committee meeting was held in London
today. The attached documents, including the agenda, a memo on the Bridge
agreement, and a copy of the Bridge agreement, were reviewed at this
morning's meeting. 

Much of the discussion focused on explanation of the Bridge Agreement. There
was some discussion about the German regulatory structure and the bridge
agreement.  Katia ran through the agenda in Houston and asked for ideas on
December conference.  I was not able to hear all of the questions entirely
but questions were asked about the outcome of the meeting.  Katia and
Christophe explained that it was a forum to exchange ideas and to promote
use of ISDA within industry. The minutes should give us more detail.  

In addition to a call re: the NA agenda, I think it would be worthwhile to
also have a call w/Christophe, Katia and John Berry to discuss European
activities and to begin discussion on the December agenda. ISDA should begin
to focus on an agenda as soon as possible so that we assure December's
conference is as productive as the Houston conference.  Thanks!

Stacy Carey
Policy Director 
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

	"Liz O'Sullivan" <LOSULLIVAN@isda.org>
	12/13/2000 03:56 PM
		 
Mark:

I am writing in regards to ISDA's Energy and Developing Products conference
in Houston on March 6, 2001.  I have attached a copy of the agenda for your
information.
 <<Houston speaker agenda.2001.doc>>

We are now in the process of trying to find suitable speakers for the
conference.  I know Mary Cunningham had mentioned to you about inviting a
senior person from Enron to open the conference on the Overview of Energy
and Developing Markets from 9:00 AM to 9:30 AM.  We are concerned that if
Jeffrey Skilling spoke at the conference his participation would take away
our draw at the AGM in April.  We would be delighted to have you open the
conference unless you think we should invite a business speaker to give an
Overview of Energy and Developing Markets.

Should you have any questions, please call me at 212-332-2559.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Best regards,

Liz

Ms. Liz O'Sullivan
International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.
600 Fifth Avenue - 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY 10020
(212) 332-2559

 - Houston speaker agenda.2001.doc

Stacy and Ruth:

I propose the following agenda for the NA energy committee:

1.  convergence of commodity forms -- need to build a team to pursue this
2.  California energy issues/solutions
3.  standardized provisions for master energy contracts -- setoff, netting, 
termination, etc.
4.  bankruptcy 
5.  CFTC study of retail derivatives
6.  emerging market forms for paper, steel, etc.

Mark Taylor will send a list of proposed topics for the European conference.  
Let me know what you think.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

	Stacy Carey <SCAREY@ISDA.ORG>
	05/23/2001 11:36 AM
		 
Hello Mark -- given our e-mail traffic the last couple of days I wanted to
quickly summarize our thoughts on next steps:

1.  Conference call - Mark, Ruth and Stacy re: agenda for NA Energy
Committee
2.  Conference call - Mark, Ruth, Stacy, Christophe, Katia, John re:
coordination of committee activities and agenda for December conference

Depending upon your schedule, we hope to try to get these calls scheduled
either this week or early next week.

Many thanks!  -- Stacy

Hello Mark -- The European Energy Committee meeting was held in London
today. The attached documents, including the agenda, a memo on the Bridge
agreement, and a copy of the Bridge agreement, were reviewed at this
morning's meeting. 

Much of the discussion focused on explanation of the Bridge Agreement. There
was some discussion about the German regulatory structure and the bridge
agreement.  Katia ran through the agenda in Houston and asked for ideas on
December conference.  I was not able to hear all of the questions entirely
but questions were asked about the outcome of the meeting.  Katia and
Christophe explained that it was a forum to exchange ideas and to promote
use of ISDA within industry. The minutes should give us more detail.  

In addition to a call re: the NA agenda, I think it would be worthwhile to
also have a call w/Christophe, Katia and John Berry to discuss European
activities and to begin discussion on the December agenda. ISDA should begin
to focus on an agenda as soon as possible so that we assure December's
conference is as productive as the Houston conference.  Thanks!

Stacy Carey
Policy Director 
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

Wow!  Dan please go ahead and make the call and be sure to let them know we 
are schocked at the amount of the billing!

Mark

I am ok with it.  Mark Haedicke

	"JOHN KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	05/29/2001 09:43 AM
		 
Mark:  As I am sure you agree, I thought that CA Attorney General Lockyer's 
comment last week in the WSJ was one of the most outrageous I have ever seen 
from a major public official.  I wanted to send a brief "Letter to the 
Editor" of the WSJ to that effect.  However, in light of the sensitivity of 
the entire CA situation in general and the further press last week in the New 
York Times, I did not want to do that without confirming with you that doing 
so would not be objectionable to the Company.  A copy of the proposed letter 
is attached.  I would propose to submit this in my individual capacity, not 
as counsel to the Company.  I'll wait to hear from you, or from Mark, Vicki 
or Rick before doing anything.    Thanks.  John

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  
The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this 
e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================
 - wsj-ed.com.doc

please handle.  Mark
	Darlene McKeever@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/29/2001 09:17 AM
		 
You are a director of Pacific Energy Financing Ltd.  I am in the process of 
converting this Cayman Islands company to a St. Lucia company.  The process 
requires me to obtain a copy of each directors' passport (only the pages with 
the photo and name information).   After obtaining the copies I will prepare 
a statement to attach to the copy and return for each directors' signature.

Please let me know when the copies are available and I will send someone to 
pick them up.  Thank you for your cooperation.

Darlene McKeever, CLA
Enron Global Assets
333 Clay, Suite 2000
Houston, Texas 77002
ph. 713-646-7837
fax 713-345-5352

Why don't you sign the opinion.  Let's get together later in the week.  I 
have some ideas to pitch to you.  Mark

	Barbara N Gray
	05/29/2001 09:44 AM
		 
Mark, please advise whether you wish to sign or you wish me to sign.  Deb 
Korkmas is taking care of ordering certificates etc.  Thanks bng
	Anne C Koehler
	05/25/2001 04:03 PM
		 
See attached form

Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3839
713-853-3448

Looks great!  Change the company to Enron Wholesale Services and send it 
out.  Mark

	Margaret Doucette@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/29/2001 05:53 PM
		 
I've made a flyer with some picture inserts.  Please let me know if you 
rather not use the pics.  See attachment.
Thank you 
Margaret

Please set a meeting for Mark Taylor and me wih ISDA.  Mark
	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	05/24/2001 07:42 PM
		 
 Mark - thanks and thank you for Mark Taylor's London Conference draft
agenda as well.  

All of your topics sound appropriate and significant. Clearly, this is an
ambitious agenda, which I assume contemplates a series of meetings over the
next months.  Also, the issue of updating the 1993 Commodity Definitions
comes up from time to time and we'd like to hear your thoughts re taking on
this very large project.

We had talked about meetings every two months - should they be more
frequent?.  

We'd much like to have a very brief call to discuss all this further next
week and to schedule the next meeting.  Could you suggest a 15-30 minute
period that works for you?

Regards, Ruth

Stacy and Ruth:

I propose the following agenda for the NA energy committee:

1.  convergence of commodity forms -- need to build a team to pursue
this
2.  California energy issues/solutions
3.  standardized provisions for master energy contracts -- setoff,
netting,
termination, etc.
4.  bankruptcy
5.  CFTC study of retail derivatives
6.  emerging market forms for paper, steel, etc.

Mark Taylor will send a list of proposed topics for the European
conference.  Let me know what you think.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

 

                    Stacy Carey

                    05/23/2001

                    11:36 AM

 

 

Hello Mark -- given our e-mail traffic the last couple of days I wanted
to
quickly summarize our thoughts on next steps:

1.  Conference call - Mark, Ruth and Stacy re: agenda for NA Energy
Committee
2.  Conference call - Mark, Ruth, Stacy, Christophe, Katia, John re:
coordination of committee activities and agenda for December conference

Depending upon your schedule, we hope to try to get these calls
scheduled
either this week or early next week.

Many thanks!  -- Stacy

Hello Mark -- The European Energy Committee meeting was held in London
today. The attached documents, including the agenda, a memo on the
Bridge
agreement, and a copy of the Bridge agreement, were reviewed at this
morning's meeting.

Much of the discussion focused on explanation of the Bridge Agreement.
There
was some discussion about the German regulatory structure and the bridge
agreement.  Katia ran through the agenda in Houston and asked for ideas
on
December conference.  I was not able to hear all of the questions
entirely
but questions were asked about the outcome of the meeting.  Katia and
Christophe explained that it was a forum to exchange ideas and to
promote
use of ISDA within industry. The minutes should give us more detail.

In addition to a call re: the NA agenda, I think it would be worthwhile
to
also have a call w/Christophe, Katia and John Berry to discuss European
activities and to begin discussion on the December agenda. ISDA should
begin
to focus on an agenda as soon as possible so that we assure December's
conference is as productive as the Houston conference.  Thanks!

Stacy Carey
Policy Director
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

I need at least 5 years of experience.  Mark

	"Fretz, Elizabeth" <EFretz@LucasCareers.com>
	05/31/2001 01:48 PM
		 
Mark -
Attached is a resume for your review and consideration.  Please feel free to
give Debra Cimitile or me a call if you have any questions.  Thanks.
Liz
 <<Tobola, John.doc>>

Liz Fretz
Executive Recruiter/ Legal Search
LucasGroup
Recruiting Excellence Since 1970

Two Riverway, Suite 400
Houston, TX 77056
713-864 5588 Ext. 260
Fax:713-599-1657
800 878 7060
efretz@LucasCareers.com
www.LucasCareers.com

 - Tobola, John.doc

J
	Melissa Dozier/ENRON@enronXgate
	05/31/2001 11:46 AM
		 
Attached please find the following documents:
 
 

That makes sense.  Thanks.  Mark

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	05/31/2001 11:33 AM
		 
Mark, we are working with Ken Raisler to evaluate these products as an 
alternative to the other "swap" type product we talked about a few months 
ago.  Let me know if you want to stay in the loop on this at the development 
stage.  I  would suggest that we finalize with Raisler and then bring Carol 
in the loop.  

Thanks. 
	Enron Energy Services
	

Ken, we will want to discuss these new products with you on our Tuesday 
call.  

Thanks. 
	Enron Energy Services
	

Descriptions look pretty good to me.  Do we want to forward to Raisler before 
our Tues tele conf?
	Enron Energy Services
	

Attached is a narrative describing some of the products offered by Enron 
Direct USA.  We are seeking a legal opinion if these products are considered 
Swaps in the legal sense and will require the Swap Criteria language in the 
contract. 

Thanks,

Chris

Great questions!  It is fine with me if you would like to distribute them.  I 
may cover some in the floor talk.  Thanks for the help.  Mark

	Marcus Nettelton@ENRON
	05/31/2001 02:33 PM
		 
Mark,
 
Attached are a few questions that you might like to have asked and have a 
prepared answer for, to assist in your Floor Meeting.
 
As a suggestion you might want to allocate these questions, or any others to 
be asked to your direct reports at your regular meeting on Monday and where 
necessary they can provide you with any particular details to give as full an 
answer as you would like. Janette could possibly ask question numbered 1.
 
Let me know if there is anything you would like me to do. I will of course be 
happy to ask any question, provided you have had the opportunity to prepare 
an answer.
 
Regards,
 
Marcus

1.When will EWS Legal Department be moving to the new building and where will 
we be located? 

2.Will all attorneys have an office?

3.While we expect all areas of the EWS business to grow, which areas , over 
the next 6-12 months, do you believe will grow the fastest and require the 
greatest support from the EWS Legal Department?

4.With the bankruptcy of PG&E what were we able to do using our existing 
contracts to mitigate our exposure?

5.Are there any changes that you believe we will need to make to our 
contracts or any new contracts we will need to consider entering into with 
counterparties to assist us in managing our risk in the event of future 
bankruptcies?
 
6. Are you able to tell us what we estimate financial our exposure is to PG&E 
as a result of their bankruptcy?

7.Why is Enron winding down its power trading operations in Japan?
 
 

Please provide me with a list of your accomplishments and complete your self 
evaluation by 4:00 p.m. Central time on Monday, June 4.  

Thank you.

I appreciate the request, but have never given the slides I use out in 
electronic form.  To do that we would need to have very detailed 
conversations about how they would be used.  Give me a call if you still want 
to talk about it.  

Mark

I want to be involved as we are in the process of signing up employment 
contracts with Sami Arap, Louise Wantanabe and Vicki Martinez.  John Novak 
and I need to approve all the changes.  Thanks.

Mark

	David Oxley/ENRON@enronXgate
	06/01/2001 03:27 PM
		 
Kishkill is planning to adjust a couple of the legal guys salaries (Valle, 
Calo). This part of a broader "retention" initaitive in response to concerns 
over competitors raiding us. How much do you want to be involved?

David

Enron has complained about the quality of the information given to Inside 
FERC.  It is my understanding that requesting the counterparty data is a due 
diligence step that the trades really happened and that Inside FERC keeps the 
name of the counterparty confidential.  We want the data to be as good as 
possible.  If my assumptions are correct, I come out -- give the name of the 
counterparty with stated limitations.  Jeff Hodge, please let me know if my 
assumptions are correct in the US.

	Peter Keohane
	Sent by: Sharon Crawford
	06/01/2001 02:56 PM
		 
Mark, our contracts at Sumas (which is a U.S. border delivery point in 
British Columbia) are settled against the Inside F.E.R.C. Sumas Index.  
Inside F.E.R.C. is now requiring that, in addition to pure trading data, we 
must also provide counterparty identification.  On the basis that we cannot 
provide that counterparty identification, both due to contractual obligations 
and business policies/practices, our information was excluded from the Sumas 
Index for the last index period.  I know, for example, in negotiating the 
settlement with NGX, that the provision of counterparty identification was a 
matter of very serious concern, particularly for Andy Zipper who manages EOL.

However, I am advised by Jon McKay that, notwithstanding these apparent 
contractual restrictions and business policies/practices, Houston provides 
counterparty identifications to Inside F.E.R.C.

The problem is that if we do not provide these counterparty identifications, 
our information will be excluded from the Sumas Index, which is particularly 
problematic with Sumas already being a relatively illiquid point.  On the 
other hand, if we do provide counterparty identification, we run the risk of 
breaching confidentiality obligations, business policies/practices and 
upsetting our trading counterparties.

I guess we have two alternatives, one is to continue to not disclose 
counterparty identifications and hope that Inside F.E.R.C. will change its 
view on this (although, as I mentioned, their position is that Houston 
provides them with that information), or provide counterparty identifications 
at the risk of getting offside our counterparties.

My preference would be to do the former, but I think this is a matter you may 
want to review with Lavo and let me know how Houston intends to proceed.

Regards,
Peter

Glad to have you as an employee of Enron!   Mark

	Steve C Hall/ENRON@enronXgate
	06/01/2001 01:38 PM
		 
Mark,
This article confirms your skepticism about the CDWR deal.  Davis is already 
planning to violate confidentiality provisions of CDWR contracts signed 
earlier this year.  The State of California simply cannot be trusted to honor 
its agreements.  
Look at Davis's spin on breaching contract provisions:  State negotiators 
"worried little about the [confidentiality] clauses" in their haste to sign 
the contracts, but now, "administration officials insisted they are 
attempting to find a way around the secrecy clauses in long-term contracts."
From here it is a very small step for Davis to justify breaking long-term 
contracts once prices go down in a year or two:  "We didn't think a lot about 
the prices we were paying at the time because we were just trying to keep the 
lights on.  But now we are attempting to find a way around the payment 
clause."
* * *
On another note, thank you for meeting with me on Wednesday.  I am thrilled 
to be working for Enron.  Meeting with you, Jim Derrick, and others in the 
legal department reinforced my decision to join your company.  I am excited 
about our prospects for the future and will work hard to continue to add 
value and keep your confidence.

Best regards,
Steve

Davis to divulge details of costly energy buys 
By Steve Geissinger
SACRAMENTO BUREAU 
SACRAMENTO -- Amid mounting attacks on Gov. Gray Davis' energy-crisis 
secrecy, administration officials said Thursday they will soon begin 
revealing full details of the state's costly, last-minute power purchases 
aimed at thwarting blackouts. 
The Davis administration told ANG Newspapers that in the next two weeks it 
will start disclosing information on the initial, multimillion-dollar 
purchases it made on the volatile spot market in January. 
In doing so, the administration will begin honoring Davis' promise to reveal 
the details after a period of six months or less. The governor said 
disclosing the information any earlier would compromise efforts to hold down 
power costs. 
But there has been a growing chorus of protest of the secrecy from 
open-government advocates, consumer activists, Republican lawmakers and 
others. 
GOP legislators and news agencies have filed separate lawsuits, under the 
state's Public Records Act, seeking disclosure of details on about $8 billion 
in emergency, short-term purchases and additional billions on less costly, 
years-long contracts. 
A San Diego Superior Court judge is scheduled to issue initial rulings on the 
lawsuits today in San Diego. 
On Thursday, the Foundation for Taxpayer and Consumer Rights called on 
Californians to phone the governor's office in protest. 
"The public has a right to know how our money is being spent and who is 
getting it," said Harvey Rosenfield, the group's director. 
The governor "won't let us look at them (contracts) to make sure they won't 
cause further rate hikes in future years," Rosenfield said. 
"It is also important to know how much power he has negotiated for this 
summer so we can determine how much it will cost us to stop the blackouts," 
he said. "We believe the governor is refusing to divulge because the 
contracts are inflated and contain damaging provisions." 
Administration officials dismissed critics' assertions and said that full 
disclosure will eventually come when the data is no longer a sensitive 
marketing matter. 
Officials acknowledged for the first time, however, that some of the state's 
less costly, long-term power contracts with generators contain secrecy 
clauses that may prevent public disclosure. 
The administration said state negotiators were so intent on securing less 
expensive, long-term power supplies that authorities worried little about the 
clauses requiring them to keep terms of the contracts secret unless they have 
the suppliers' permission to divulge them 
Though violating the agreement could void the contracts, industry 
representatives said they doubted generators would break existing pacts. 
Suppliers might, however, sign no more contracts with the state, the 
representatives said. 
"Apparently there are some contracts with that (secrecy clause), and our 
legal people are looking at it," said Davis spokesman Steve Maviglio. "I 
don't know what the end result is going to be, but it's the governor's intent 
to release the contracts." 
While administration officials insisted they are attempting to find a way 
around the secrecy clauses in long-term contracts, they said disclosure of 
the initial short-term purchases will soon begin. 
Maviglio said the administration will start posting the details of 
short-term, spot-market buys made in mid-January within the next two weeks on 
the Internet, easing a controversy that has enveloped two of Davis' fellow 
Democratic statewide elected officials. 
State Controller Kathleen Connell scrapped plans to reveal the costly state 
power bills in February during a dramatic, 11th-hour reversal under pressure 
from the Davis administration. 
The controller, who has emerged as a sharp critic of the administration's 
handling of the energy crisis, indefinitely postponed plans to put 
information from electricity-purchase invoices on the Internet and canceled a 
news conference to announce the disclosures. 
In March, Attorney General Bill Lockyer, representing Davis in this instance, 
provided Connell with a letter of advice that the governor is not legally 
bound to reveal the details of billions of dollars in state power purchases. 
Lockyer's letter said the public's interest in maintaining confidentiality in 
matters relating to negotiations between the state and prospective power 
contractors far outweighed its interest in disclosure. 
But Lockyer, a former East Bay politician, said last week he personally 
favors making public the details of the purchases. 
"In my mind at least, and as a matter of philosophy, the expenditures are so 
extraordinary, the issues are so important, that the contracts ... need to be 
made public," he said at the annual meeting of the National Freedom of 
Information Coalition. 
Open-government advocates point to a recent poll conducted for the California 
First Amendment Coalition that indicates seven out of 10 Californians believe 
they are getting too little information about how state officials are 
responding to the power shortage, and a whopping 86 percent want details of 
long-term power purchasing contracts made public. 
"Californians reject government secrecy as a matter of law in the state's 
Open Government Act," said Kent Pollock, the coalition's executive director. 
"The poll results are an overwhelming repudiation of state policies that 
shield information from public scrutiny."

Mark:

Only your self-evaluation form is attached.  Please e-mail or fax the others 
to me as soon as possible.  As you know, the PRC meeting starts at 8:30 a.m. 
Central time on Tuesday.  The fax number is 713 646 2600.

	Mark Evans/Enron@EUEnronXGate
	06/04/2001 12:26 PM
		 
Mark,

the attached fax comprises the forms for:

myself
Justin Boyd
Marcus Von Bock
Jon Chapman.

As you know, Mary Nell is dealt with in Kristina's PRC.

We will no doubt speak tomorrow on Jim's call. Talk to you then.

       Mark

Sender:   020 7783 8014
Received:  04 June 2001 17:30 
Pages:   4 
Serviced By:   FACSys server EULON-APFX1P (Device 23) 
Routing Info:  38287

                            

Mark:

Please disregard the prior e-mail.  We couldn't view all of the forms; 
however, when we printed your form, they all printed out.  Mark Haedicke has 
everything needs for the meeting.  Many thanks.

Janette Elbertson

        

The Museum of Fine Arts Houston

Delayed.  I prepared an outline but have made no progress beyond that.  
Nothing will be available this summer.      

Regards,

Mark

	"Mogel, William" <WMogel@ssd.com>
	06/06/2001 10:45 AM
		 
Mark--Can you give me a status report on your article? Saw Ken Lay on PBS'
program last night seeking to uncover scandal and conspiracy. I thought he
came off well. 

William A. Mogel
Squire, Sanders & Dempsey, L.L.P.
1201 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W.
P.O. Box 407
Washington, D.C. 20004-0407
Telephone No. (202) 626-6678
Fax No. (202) 626-6780
EMail Address: WMogel@SSD.com

Almaty  Beijing  Bratislava  Brussels  Budapest  Cincinnati  Cleveland
Columbus  Hong Kong  Houston  Jacksonville  Kyiv  London  Los Angeles
Madrid  Miami  Moscow  New York  Palo Alto  Phoenix  Prague  San Francisco
Taipei  Tokyo  Washington  including the Renaissance Network of independent
counsel in China: Beijing, Shenzhen, Chengdu, Shijiazhuang, Dalian, Suzhou,
Fuzhou, Taiyuan, Guangzhou, Wenzhou, Haikou, Wuhan, Nanjing, Xiamen, Ningbo,
Yantai, Shanghai, Zhengzhou.

Looks ok to me.  Mark

	Elizabeth Sager
	06/06/2001 10:17 AM
		 
In accordance with my voice mail, attached is a revised version of the waiver 
letter for Janice.  After you have a chance to review, please let me know if 
this OK.  Thanks for your help.

Elizabeth 

36349

We need to address both issues unless there is some compelling reason not 
to.  Mark

	Andrew Edison@ENRON
	06/06/2001 09:19 AM
		 
Attached is a draft arbitration demand our outside counsel has prepared on 
the confidentiality issue only.  For what it is worth, outside counsel does 
have some concerns with just arbitrating the confidentiality issue. First, 
they raise the possibility that by only raising the confidentiality issue, we 
might be waiving the guaranty assignability issue. To try to prevent this 
argument, you will note that we have put preservation language in the 
arbitration statement of claim.  We will need to do some additional legal 
research to make sure that would do the trick.  Second, outside counsel tends 
to think the two claims together (confidentiality and the guarantee 
assignability) work better together.  Let's talk soon.

 - Letter to Timothy D. Bourn.DOC

Best wishes at AEP!  Mark

	Shawna Flynn
	06/05/2001 01:53 PM
		 
Dear Mark, Barbara, and Julia-
 Thank you so much for the opportunity to work in EWS Legal.  My seven years 
here have been a wonderful learning experience. Thank you for making it 
possible -Shawna

 I will see you there.

The right person is Sami Arap in Sao Paulo.  

Mark Haedicke

	Pedro Martinez <PMARTINEZ@isda.org>
	06/04/2001 06:04 PM
		 
Dear Mark,

Per our conversation during the AGM, I would like to inform you that ISDA is
now committed to focus its efforts in Brazil. We are currently in the
process of organizing a small working group to further push our initiative
in that market. I would greatly appreciate it if you could refer me with
someone from your institution that would like to participate in this effort.

I look forward to having a representative from Enron participate in the
Brazilian working group.

If you have any questions regarding this matter please do not hesitate to
contact me

Best regards,

Pedro Martinez - Delgado
International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.
600 Fifth Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY 10020-2302
Direct: (212) 332-1207
Fax: (212) 332-1212
Email: pmartinez@isda.org

	Outlook Migration Team@ENRON
	06/07/2001 11:04 AM
		 
Current Notes User: 

To ensure that you experience a successful migration from Notes to Outlook, 
it is necessary to gather individual user information prior to your date of 
migration.  Please take a few minutes to completely fill out the following 
survey. Double Click on document to put it in "Edit" mode. When you finish, 
simply click on the 'Reply With History' button then hit 'Send'  Your survey 
will automatically be sent to the Outlook 2000 Migration Mailbox.

Thank you.

Outlook 2000 Migration Team

Full Name:        Mark E. Haedicke   

Login ID: mhaedic   

Extension:  36544 

Office Location:  EB3325 

What type of computer do you have?  (Desktop,  Laptop,  Both)  both

Do you have a PDA?  If yes, what type do you have:   (None, IPAQ, Palm Pilot, 
Jornada)  no 

Do you have permission to access anyone's Email/Calendar?  no 
    If yes, who?  

Does anyone have permission to access your Email/Calendar?  
    If yes, who?  Yes, Janette Elbertson

Are you responsible for updating anyone else's address book?  No
    If yes, who?  

Is anyone else responsible for updating your address book?  Yes
    If yes, who?  Janette Elbertson

Do you have access to a shared calendar?  
    If yes, which shared calendar?  No

Do you have any Distribution Groups that Messaging maintains for you (for 
mass mailings)?  
    If yes, please list here:  No

Please list all Notes databases applications that you currently use:  None

In our efforts to plan the exact date/time of your migration, we also will 
need to know:

Will you be out of the office in the near future for vacation, leave, etc?  
Yes
       If so, when?        From (MM/DD/YY):   06/11/01    To (MM/DD/YY):     
06/15/01   Janette Elbertson is going to handle the migration for me while I 
am on vacation 

Mark:  It looks like Paul Simons got a copy of this e-mail.  Let me know if 
it is useful  to work with ISDA on any of these matters.   

Mark Haedicke
	Ruth Ainslie <RAinslie@isda.org>
	06/07/2001 01:46 PM
		 
>    Dear all,
>
Pls find attached the FSA consultative paper on a new regulatory regime for
Energy Market Participants and an invitation for the ISDA Energy and
Developing Products Committee on 25 June at 3 pm, where this paper will be
discussed.

Any comments in advance of the meeting are welcome.

Deadline for the response to the FSA is 17 July 2001.

Could you pls confirm your attendance to Judith Birch at
jbirch@isda-eur.org.

>
>    <<fsajune.pdf>>  <<KDMemoJune601.doc>>
Thank you in advance.

 - fsajune.pdf
 - KDMemoJune601.doc

Put this as tentative on my schedule.  Mark
=09Stephanie Harris/ENRON@enronXgate
=0906/07/2001 09:29 AM
=09=09=20
Mr. Derrick would like to invite you to attend a presentation by the law fi=
rm=20
of Winston Strawn in the 50th floor board room of the Enron building on=20
Wednesday, June 27, 2001.  The meeting will start at 9:00 a.m. and run abou=
t=20
2 hours.  Please plan to attend, if possible. =20

So far, the following individuals from the law firm of Winston Strawn will=
=20
attend.  This is a preliminary list, so please allow for the possibility of=
=20
substitutions or additions to their roster.   =20

Joanne Gregory
Bruce Toth =01) Corp.
Jerry Farano =01) Broadband
Steve Molo =01) Litigation
Chris Mcisaac =01) Energy Project/Facility Deals
Chris Chase
Charlie Papavizas =01) Maritime
Tim Oxley =01) Finance and/or
Andy McDonough - Finance

Great!  John L said he was going to leave legal to us.  So please take the 
lead in proposing changes for the legal team and propose the changes to me so 
we can get it done.  

Regards,

Mark

	John Novak@ENRON
	06/06/2001 01:25 PM
		 
next step: Luiz and Vicky.

I loved it!   Mark

	Michelle Cash
	06/08/2001 09:05 AM
		 
Here is the mock up of the Star Wars invitation.  There are a few tweaks, but 
this is essentially what it will look like.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Dorie Hitchcock/ENRON@enronXgate
	06/07/2001 01:45 PM
		 
I just received the last catering proposal, so I am working on the cost 
estimate and should have it completed this afternoon.  Attached is a proof of 
the animated invitation.  Let me know what you think.
Thanks.
 

Dorie, We put out our "save the date" email, and there is good buzz on the 
event.  In your voice mail, you mentioned that you would have menus and 
invitations ready this week.  I am only here a half day tomorrow and then out 
all next week, so I am ready to see that stuff today, if possible.  Thanks!  
Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Wanted to let you know the status on the following:
Working with Ivy Bradberry (with the Image Center) on the cost & production 
of the animated invitation.
Should have all catering proposals by Tuesday, June 5.
I will have a cost estimate and approval form prepared for you no later than 
Wednesday, June 6.

Questions for you:
Do you have any idea how many children are expected?
What was the final decision on the starting time for the program?

Thanks.

Dorie Hitchcock
Event Manager
Enron
1400 Smith Street, EB 3640a
Houston, TX  77002
Office  (713) 853-6978
Fax  (713) 646-5800
Cell  (713) 594-7093
E-Mail - dorie.hitchcock@enron.com

I am willing to wear the risk.  Remember, my $100.  Mark

	Andrew Edison@ENRON
	06/07/2001 04:30 PM
		 
After our discussion this afternoon, I have given some additional thought -- 
and talked to outside counsel -- about the negative potential consequences of 
filing an arbitration against El Paso.  While I think we should accept the 
risks, here they are all from our vantage point:

First, El Paso could move the Swap Agreements from EPME and claim
the Guaranty Agreements do not follow.  

Second, we could lose on our claims.  This would give El Paso the right to 
move the Swap Agreements from EPME and claim the Guaranty Agreements do not 
follow. 

Third, El Paso could fight us on the arbitrability of the Guaranty
Agreement claim.  We could end up with two proceedings -- our arbitration and
a court proceeding El Paso initiates on the Guaranty Agreement claim.
Unfortunately, El Paso would have the opportunity to choose the forum on the
Guaranty Agreement claim.

Fourth, El Paso could counterclaim on the breach of the confidentiality
provision.  I think they would have a good argument that we have breached
that provision by showing the Swap Agreements etc. to people outside the
company such as our bankers.  I am not clear what damages they could claim
based on that alleged breach.

I haven't heard anything to suggest there are other claims out there for El
Paso to assert, but we haven't done much investigating in that area either.
I suppose if El Paso got really mad, they might look back over the 
negotiations in this deal and others to see if they have any other claims 
they could construct.

Andy

Are these correct?  Please let John know.  Mark
	John Novak@ENRON
	06/04/2001 10:46 AM
		 
Mark -- Just to confirm the rankings that we discussed on Friday:

1. None
2. Vicky Martinez
 Luiz Watanabe
 Fabian Valle
3. Andrea Calo
 Patricia Dutra
 Karla Azevedo
4. Miguel Mendoza
 Celina Ozorio
5. None

http://207.21.193.94/starwars/          

Please click on the link below for the invitation to the museum.  

http://207.21.193.94/starwars/          

Should we try Akin Gump?  What is your recommendation off the list?  Mark

Per my voicemail message to each of you.  Thanks.  Lance.

W. Lance Schuler
http://www.assetnews.com/ped/attorneys/intro.htm

Marc Poulson
Enron Xcelerator
1400 Smith St. 0518e
Houston, TX 77002
713.345.7875
Fax: 713.646.4735

Thanks, I will have my assistant call to set a date and time.  Mark

Hello Mark: 

That is a great article in this month's Corporate Legal Times on the Enron legal department.  I know that the wholesale group has been critical to the company, and your role has been critical to the success of the legal department. 

Thanks for looking to Milbank on PG&E and EBS this year, among other things. 

In order to review where we are, and what we ought to be doing to better service your group, I would like to arrange a meeting with you at your convenience.  To suggest dates: do any of 10/19. 10/26, 11/2 or 11/8 work for lunch or an afternoon meeting?

Hope to hear from you soon. 

Regards, 
______________________________ 
Ed Feo 
Milbank Tweed Hadley & McCloy LLP 
601 South Figueroa Street, 30th Floor 
Los Angeles, Ca. 90017 
Phone: 213 892 4417 
Fax: 213 892 4717 
Cell: 213 446 3206 

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential 
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee 
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended 
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited. 
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify 
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer. 

[Haedicke, Mark E.] J , please arrange for a meeting.  It is ok for it to be lunch.  Mark -----Original Message-----
Hello Mark: 

That is a great article in this month's Corporate Legal Times on the Enron legal department.  I know that the wholesale group has been critical to the company, and your role has been critical to the success of the legal department. 

Thanks for looking to Milbank on PG&E and EBS this year, among other things. 

In order to review where we are, and what we ought to be doing to better service your group, I would like to arrange a meeting with you at your convenience.  To suggest dates: do any of 10/19. 10/26, 11/2 or 11/8 work for lunch or an afternoon meeting?

Hope to hear from you soon. 

Regards, 
______________________________ 
Ed Feo 
Milbank Tweed Hadley & McCloy LLP 
601 South Figueroa Street, 30th Floor 
Los Angeles, Ca. 90017 
Phone: 213 892 4417 
Fax: 213 892 4717 
Cell: 213 446 3206 

This e-mail message may contain legally privileged and/or confidential 
information. If you are not the intended recipient(s), or the employee 
or agent responsible for delivery of this message to the intended 
recipient(s), you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this e-mail message is strictly prohibited. 
If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify 
the sender and delete this e-mail message from your computer. 

John:

Should we get you, Scott and me (and Teresa Bushman) together to flesh out the deal further for the term sheet?  Teresa and I have worked on a term sheet but it is pretty bare bones so far?

Mark

Louise:  I talked to Jim and we have worked through a revised strategy as we talked about yesterday.  So no call from Jim.

Mark

Dear John:

I am proud of MSU and would like to help.  I will ask my assistant to set up a time for us to talk through your questions over the next week.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

Dear Mark,

I am the Associate Dean for MBA Programs at Michigan State.  I'm writing to
ask for your advice regarding a new initiative here. I am not sure how much
you have remained in touch with MSU since your graduation.  I am proud to
report that US News and World Report recently named the Eli Broad College of
Business #16 in its annual ranking of undergraduate business schools.  And
last April, the Wall Street Journal ranked our full-time MBA program #12.
As an alum, I hope you are as proud of these accomplishments as are the
faculty, staff, and current students of the Broad School.

The Broad School recently opened a financial analysis laboratory and trading
room to help our students understand options theory better and learn trading
skills.  I would like to expand the scope of the lab to include the energy
marketplace.  That interest led me to the EnronOnline and Enron web sites,
where I found your bio.  Because Enron is the world's top energy trader, I'd
like to get your views on how I can best expose our students to the energy
marketplace.  For example, do students need access to specialized energy
trading information and software (e.g., EnronOnline.com) or do they need
advanced courses in options theory (or both)?  Similarly, is it better to
focus on risk management more generally or the energy market in particular?

I have also been working with our MBA Placement Director to better
understand career opportunities in energy and bandwidth trading.  Given the
background of many of our students (with experience in operations and
finance), we think they'll be qualified for opportunities in the energy
market (as traders or analysts) if we give them the right tools.  Finally, I
saw an announcement that Enron has collaborated with Rice University in an
e-commerce, energy and bandwidth initiative and wonder if any type of
collaboration with Michigan State is possible.

If you are willing, I would like to discuss these and some related issues
with you.  I'd be happy to call at any time that is convenient for you -
just let me know a time and phone number.  If you'd prefer to schedule a
specific time, please have your assistant call mine - Cathy Chubb at
517-432-5100 - to set a time on our calendars.

Thanks in advance for your consideration.  I wish you much luck and
continued success in all your activities.

Best regards,

John Delaney

John T. Delaney
Associate Dean for MBA Programs
Eli Broad Graduate School of Management
Michigan State University
East Lansing, MI  48824
(517) 432-5100

I would love to, but I cannot.  Thanks for the offer.  You should be getting a call today from one of our lawyers re a potential deal.  Take care.  Mark

 
 

Mark and Robbie, can you join me in the Diamond Seats for this Wednesday's playoff game at noon?  Let me know.
 
H. William Swanstrom
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com <mailto:bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com>
(713) 226-1143
 
 

I am doing well!  I look forward to catching up.  I do plan to play golf so it would be great to play together.

Regards,

Mark

Mark:

How are you?  From what I can tell from talking to others, it sure sounds like you have been buried on a whole host of difficult matters the past few months and traveling a lot.  I hope that at some point you are able to come up for some air, although it does seem like "your world" just seems to be getting bigger and bigger which, I assume, will keep making that harder to do.

I am looking forward to attending the EWS legal Conference at the end of next week, and appreciate the invitation to make a presentation with Elizabeth.  Lisa told me she scheduled our presentation on Thursday afternoon, but I thought if it was ok with you I might also attend the morning session as well on Friday.  Are you planning to play golf in the afternoon on Friday after the Conference ends?  If you were, and you had room in your foursome, I thought I might play a quick round before I headed back to New York like we did a few years ago.  I thought that might give us a chance to catch up on things in general  since I would imagine you will be pretty tied up during the Conference.  I'll touch base with Janette on Monday or Tuesday to see if something like that might be possible.  If that does not work out, I'll try to get on your calendar the next time I am in town.

I hope that you and your family are doing well.  I hope that no one in the immediate circle of you, your family and your friends was directly impacted by the tragedy of September 11.  It has been a very difficult time up here the past two and a half weeks and it will no doubt take a fairly long time for things to start to heal since the devastation that was wrought will continue to be a daily reminder for the foreseeable future.  But, hopefully, the coming together of numerous groups of people in New York City and the country in general that has occurred since September 11 will continue well into the future and make it a bit easier for people to try to move on, as difficult as that will be.

Best regards, Mark.  I'll be in touch, and I look forward to seeing you in a week or so.

John

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
john.klauberg@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

Very impressive.  Mark

That's my own horn, but I am proud of this (the message is from our new chairman) and thought you might be interested. 

I thought we could all use some good news.  The recent American Lawyer associates survey -- which ranked us as the best law firm in California and ninth best in the country -- capped off a year of tremendous accolades to McCutchen.  These honors are the result of our firm values, our mutual commitment to each other and a lot of hard work. The challenge of the coming year will be not just to maintain these distinctions, but to do even better.  In the meantime, I wanted to share these with you because we all should be very proud of ourselves.

Fortune magazine lists McCutchen as one of "The 100 Best Companies to Work for in the U.S."  (January 2001). 

Ranked #1 as having the largest percentage of female attorneys (and the second highest percentage of female equity partners) among the top 250 law firms in the country. (National Law Journal, December 2000). 

Ranked one of the "25 Most Diverse Law Firms in America" (Minority Law Journal, December 2000). 

Ranked #1 law firm in California and #6 in the country for commitment to pro bono work (American Lawyer, August 2001). 

Ranked #1 in California (#9 in the country) in AmLaw's Annual Associates Survey (American Lawyer, October 2001). 

Vault's Guide to the Top 100 Law Firms ranks McCutchen one of the "100 Most Prestigious Law Firms in the country (Winter 2001). 

McCutchen's environmental practice is ranked in the top 3 nationwide (American Lawyer, October 2000). 

McCutchen lawyers defended two of the top ten defense cases in California in 2000 (Daily Journal's Verdicts & Settlements, April 2001).   

Donn 

E-MAIL NOTICE

This e-mail message is for the sole use of the intended recipient(s) and may contain confidential and/or privileged information. Any review, use, disclosure or distribution by persons or entities other than the intended recipient(s) is prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient, please contact the sender by reply and destroy all copies of the original message. Thank you.

To reply to our E-mail Administrator directly, send an email to Postmaster@mdbe.com or call (415) 393-2000 and delete this email.

McCUTCHEN, DOYLE, BROWN & ENERSEN, LLP

http://www.mccutchen.com

Thanks for the offer, but otherwise occupied.  
 
Regards,
 
Mark

If you're interested, I have a variety of single day and all tournament passes for The Tour Championship (next Thursday thru Sunday at Champions Golf Club).  Best of all, you don't have to hang out with me.  First come, first serve, so let me know if you'd like any.

H. William Swanstrom 
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP 
Phone:  (713) 226-1143 
Fax:  (713) 229-2518 
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com 

John:  There is a conflict of interest in Thompson having all the info and selling to a group formed by him and other employees.  We need to talk this through.  Maybe, he should take a leave of absence.  Should Jesus negotiate the deal for ENA?  Selling to employees is sensitive now.  Mark

Jim:  I want to put Aronowitz for ENA as well as EGM.  He will get an assist from Sager but he will lead.  Mark

All,

We had a preliminary meeting on Friday.  The attached is a summary of the matrix we developed as well as changes from subsequent e-mails.  Note, only one name has been placed in the matrix where two may have been suggested - if the name is not correct then please e-mail me back as soon as possible - only person per box please.  The names placed in the matrix will be directly responsible to the estate.

We need to meet Monday to: (1) agree on the matrix; (2) develop detailed processes for capturing value (trade books, structured deals, hard assets and business sales); (3) understand the approval process required on a go forward basis; (4) develop compensation / retention program for estate, (5) address any administrative concerns.

If you have not done so, please check the names in the matrix to ensure that they are correct and please send me any changes as well as their full names to be utilized for future e-mails.

Regards,

Jim

 << File: REORG1.doc >> 

Who rejected your plan?  The view I heard is that the proposal was too rich.  Are you looking for a counterproposal?  Mark

The situation from where I sit is fairly uncertain - as I understand it Corp has rejected our proposal and we are not sure under what authority or funding we are operating.  The preliminary list of names is as follows.  This list changes each day and includes both current employees and onew we need to get back.

A good number of these will be leaving today and not returning until I can give them some certainty on coninued employment and a retention plan.  If that happens, value lost to Corp. will be significant.

Eric Shaw
Naomi Connell
Mary Nell Browning
Melissa Allen
Janine Juggins
Marcus Von Bock
Kathy Tibbs
Ted Murphy
Rod Nelson
Cindy Horn
Chris Mahoney (+small team tba)
Ralph Jaeger
David Williams
Rob Sexton
Sally Bennett
James Vickerman
Pauline Wilson
[HR]
[Cash Management]

The proposed scope is not just ECTRIC but also ECT Europe Inc. and orderly wind up of european companies and operations.

Please let me know how to proceed.

Eric
	
John Sherriff has advised us of the proposal for you to lead a team to close out and maximise the value of the ECTRIC assets. Michelle Cash is the employment lawyer who is best placed to provide you with the agreements you require to obtain and keep the team you require.
	
Please could you send the list of individuals you need on the team to David Oxley and Michelle Cash who will advise further.
	
Kind regards,
	
Marcus

Jim:  The last sentence was changed to "we expect you to perform".   Mark

Here is the letter we discussed.  MDS

[Haedicke, Mark E.]  Fall 

Thanks for the offer.  I cannot use them either.  Mark

I have my tickets (4 in Row 31 Section 122) available for Wednesday's
game.  I have a conflict and would be pleased if any of you could use
them for you or your people.  Game time is 12:15.  Let me know as soon
as you can.  Go Astros!

I don't know of any now.  Mark

Andy Edison has notified me that Jones, Day is representing a party in a litigation matter adverse to Enron. Please notify me if you are aware of any work that Jones, Day is performing for any Enron entity or for any lender or underwriter on an Enron matter.  Thank you. Jim

It can wait his return.  Please ask him if he is available to speak on Dec 4 at the conference.  Mark

Mark

Paul Simons is away from the office returning next Friday, 12 October.  Please let me know if this matter is urgent or whether it can await his return.

Many thanks.

Nina

Mark, Justin, Paul: Do you have any comments on the agenda?  Let me know and I will forward them on.  Mark

I am writing in regards to ISDA's Energy and Developing Products conference
in London on December 4, 2001.  Attached is a copy of the final agenda for
your review.  Thank you both for your input and expertise. 

 <<draft3.doc>> 
Please let me know if you have any more suggestions to improve the agenda
before it goes to print. 

Again thanks,
Liz

Liz O'Sullivan
ISDA
600 Fifth Avenue
Rockefeller Center - 27th floor
New York, NY 10020
Phone: (212) 332-2559
Fax: (212) 332-2561

morale, deal flow, how the open plan is working

Mark:

	My next trip to the UK is scheduled for the week of November 5.  Is there anything specific you need me to address?

Thanks,

Jeff

There are some more developments re Bob that we should talk about.

Mark

Mark, Justin, Paul: Do you have any comments on the agenda?  Let me know and I will forward them on.  Mark

I am writing in regards to ISDA's Energy and Developing Products conference
in London on December 4, 2001.  Attached is a copy of the final agenda for
your review.  Thank you both for your input and expertise. 

 <<draft3.doc>> 
Please let me know if you have any more suggestions to improve the agenda
before it goes to print. 

Again thanks,
Liz

Liz O'Sullivan
ISDA
600 Fifth Avenue
Rockefeller Center - 27th floor
New York, NY 10020
Phone: (212) 332-2559
Fax: (212) 332-2561

It looks like a great program.  Mark

Janette:  Would you please forward on the notice of the ADL program to the energy group legal team.  It looks like a great program!   Mark

Hi Mark. How are plans for this year's BEAR program? I wanted to forward an invitation to a community program I am chairing later this month. I thought this would be of interest for your legal team. We are working on CLE credits for this as well. Call if you need more details.
 
Laura

Look forward to the discussion.  Mark

Mark, I have next Wednesday at 3:00 to meet with you in advance of the law conference.  I am participating in Vicki's Retail offsite Wednesday morning.  When we meet, we can discuss whatever you would like re: Canada, but I thought I would list high level items that may be of interest.  We can discuss any or all of this as you would like:

1.  Staffing - I would like to discuss with you my earlier memo re: an additional Toronto lawyer
2.  Forms Development - Wholesale, but especially Retail
2.  PPA - I sent you an update e-mail on the outstanding issues but can give you an overview
3.  Alberta Wholesale Power - Progress since deregulation
5.  Alberta Wholesale Gas
4.  Ontario Wholesale Power - Progress to market opening
5.  Ontario Wholesale Gas
6.  Alberta Retail
7.  Ontario Retail  

____________________________________
Peter C.M. Keohane
Vice President, Assistant General Counsel
and Secretary
Enron Canada Corp.
Phone:	(403) 974-6923
Fax:	(403) 974-6707
E-mail:	peter.keohane@enron.com

Liz:

Greg is scheduled to speak on Friday, October 12 at 8:30 am for 30-45 minutes.  No slides are necessary.  The lawyers will be interested in where Greg sees the growth in the company and where the business is strong.  There will be Q&A and I think he will get some good questions.  Some possible questions:  What does Greg expect from the legal department?  How will the attacks impact on our business?  What will be his focus in his new job?  It should be a very friendly crowd -- since Greg knows most of the lawyers and they know him.

I miss you too!  

Mark Haedicke  

Hi Mark,

Boy, I'm missing you and Janette!

 I wanted to drop you an email to get more information on Greg's talk at your conference on 10/12.  I believe he's going to address your group on business updates.  Are there particulars you wish for him to cover?  How long is he speaking and at what time?  Do you wants slides?  Will there be a Q&A and if yes, any thoughts on what people will be asking?  

Many Thanks,

Liz Taylor
Exec. Assistant to Greg Whalley
Office of the Chairman
Enron Corporation
Tel.   713.853.1935
Fax   713.853.1838

I am disappointed on the timing but I understand.  Thanks.  Mark

Mark -

FYI - I have attached below a screen shot of the proposed new look and feel for the site.  We have a couple of tweaks to make, but I believe this is a much cleaner look than what we have now.

Unfortunately, because of the virus we lost a good part of development time last week.  This has pushed back the completion schedule at this time by at least a week, which means that the site will not be updated and operational by the time the law conference comes along.  If you want information about the site disseminated, I can provide an overview of the new look and feel and new functions that we anticipate having.  I believe a new target release date is realistically Nov. 1.

Please let me know if you should need anything further.

Mark

 << File: lg-0928-withmenu.gif >> 

Thanks for inviting me.  I unfortunately will not be able to attend.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

As part of the festivities of the 25th anniversary of Tozzini, Freire, Teixeira e Silva Advogados, the firm has the pleasure of inviting you to the cocktail party that will open the exhibition of the works of the French artist Auguste Rodin, in Sao Paulo, Brazil.

The event will be held at "Pinacoteca do Estado de Sao Paulo" on the evening of the 30th of September, 2001. Please find details in the attached file (invitation-rodin.exe)

Shortly you will be receiving the invitation by mail.

Yours Sincerely,
Tozzini, Freire, Teixeira e Silva Advogados
Sao Paulo - Brazil

Did we talk about the cap on breakage fee?
Mark Haedicke

Where did we come out on a cap on breakage fee?
Mark Haedicke

Mark Haedicke

Thanks Derek.  Mark

Please find attached a legal risks memo regarding the AUMA deal.

 

Derek S. Flaman
Enron Energy Services Canada Corp.
Phone: 403 663 2829

Is there anything I need to work on tonight?  What is the schedule tonight?  Mark

3 percent, around 350 million. They still want 1 billion cap on top of the 2 for litigation.

Please handle.  Mark0

Mark Haedicke

Pls send me final executed copies of all the Merger related documents ASAP!!
 
Thanks

We will get you a summary soon.  Mark
Mark Haedicke

Clem:  Thanks for raising that question because it is very important that we are coordinated.  I have forwarded this question on to Jordan and I think he and I need to work together on this matter.  Perhaps the three of us should get on the telephone to resolve.

Mark

Mark,

I have attached the letter that Enron Corp. recently sent to V&E regarding legal contingencies.   In conjunction with Arthur Andersen working on its opinion with respect to the Northern and Transwestern financials, it has asked Enron Corp. to furnish information related to contingencies (including the SEC investigation).  V&E is currently working on providing its response to Arthur Andersen.  Joe Dilg would like your confirmation that we are making a consistent statement in the Enron Corp. letter with that which would be given to the banks with respect to draw requests reps (draw downs).  I have highlighted the language in red.  It is the last sentence of the first paragraph under the heading Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) Investigation and Pending Litigation.  Your prompt response would be much appreciated.

Clem

 << File: 2828coa.doc >> 

 

Coordination is a major problem at Enron.  You are asking all the right questions.  Mark

FYI; let me know if you have any thoughts about my approach below.  I met with Jeff Golden earlier today and he suggested that such a "matrix" was being prepared and should be ready for distribution early next week.  It amazes me that we don't have all of this in a nice, neat little package.  I will push hard to make sure this gets put together.

Jordan

Good luck on the forms of documents.  I tried to implement this for two years, but I couldn't get anyone in the legal department to take it on, nor could I get buy-in from the satellite corporate development groups.  I sincerely hope you are successful, although it may fall into the category of too little, too late....

Take care,
Mark

Some of what follows may be old news or otherwise outdated, but as I try to get up the learning curve w/r/t our efforts regarding asset dispositions, I thought it may be helpful to summarize some items that I would think could be extremely helpful in the organization of our commercial and legal actions.  I recognize that there is no "one template fits all"; nevertheless,  it would be extremely helpful if we already have or are otherwise organizing the following:

(1) Forms of CAs, LOUs/MOUs, PSA Agreements, and other relevant M&A docs;
(2) Matrix-type organization for every asset/business/investment that is "for sale" providing for the following:
   (a) Asset description and location;
   (b) Ownership of asset, including ownership schematics;
   (c) Book value of asset; estimated market value--and support for such; relevant financial information;
   (d) Likely purchasers;
   (e) Restrictions on transferability, including tax issues, consents, regulatory approvals, financings, etc.
   (f) Lead commercial contact;
   (g) In-house legal support, accounting support, tax support;
   (h) Outside counsel (U.S. and local, where appropriate);
   (i)  Outside advisors (investment bank, etc) and their counsel;
   (j) Status report and likely (realistic) timeframe; and
   (k) Other

If any of you can advise me whether we already have these items in place or, if not, your suggestions in this regard, I would very much appreciate it.

Jordan

Sami:  Please set some time on my schedule tomorrow to talk this through.  Mark

Mark;

Today, Brett Wiggs told me that there will be a significant number of cuts on our Brazil staff (including Legal) within the next couple of weeks.  He asked me to think about a new structure to assist a small commercial team.  I asked about John Novak and he said "he will probably end up being repatriated and you will become General Counsel".  I was obviously a bit puzzled about his comments/questions and, since he was travelling to the Eletrobolt site today, I asked for some time before giving him any answers.  I wanted to know from you if this is something I should discuss with Brett Wiggs only, or you/Brett, or you/Brett/Novak, or ????

If the Brazil office remains open/alive focusing (primarily) on power marketing activities, I am sure that Karla Azevedo and I could handle all the business guys.  However, I anticipate that, within the next couple of months, there will be plenty of corporate work to be done in the near future such as Central Bank and Board of Trade matters (we would have to decide whether we keep Patricia Dutra in-house OR whether to outsource all corporate & institutional workload to outside counsel  -  I'd rather keep Patricia Dutra until everything is worked out well) as well as a lot of legal work to do on the Eletrobolt financing (where Luiz Watanabe and his trainee Aline Merone are focused).

I'd very much appreciate it if you could find a few minutes to provide me with your thoughts on the matter.  I know we are all going through heavy turbulence these days ...  sorry to bother you with this matter.

Tks & Rgds,

Sami

I think it wii be about 7 or 8?  Dad
Mark Haedicke

Justin, I do not think I am going to nyc.  Love Dad
Mark Haedicke

Good luck.  I will email you later.  Dad
Mark Haedicke

Rosalee:  Mark Taylor and I can get this done through Enron Net Works.  Thanks.   Mark Haedicke

Mark, is this what you were working on at one point?  Maybe it should go to Sally Beck, but I'm not sure.

Rosie

Ken,

I don't know if you are the right person for this - but I thought that someone should register Enron in the new domain(s) asap before we lose them.

Although I am in IT, I am not really in the right area and neither is my direct chain of command (although I think they are just great to work for)

http://news.bbc.co.uk/hi/english/sci/tech/newsid_1569000/1569222.stm

Sorry to have troubled you, but I KNOW that if I mention it, then you will get it to the right person for consideration.

Many thanks

Andrew Henderson

I need to talk through our cash position for tomorrow at with our contingency team. I would like to do it today at 4:30 pm central time. Mark Haedicke

Congrats!  Thanks for your help.  Mark

Happy to confirm this deal closed about an hour ago.  We rec'd $135,000,000.

EDD

The transaction for the sale of the New Albany Peaker Plant just closed.  Paul Garcia of Enron treasury confirmed that we received the wire transfer of the purchase proceeds from Duke. 

I would like to personally thank everyone that was involved in the sales process.  This transaction went very smoothly and I received several compliments from our counterparty regarding our professionalism on this deal.

Please take all post-closing actions that are required to finally consummate the conveyance and also be aware that the Purchase and Sale Agreement requires us to keep any and all data or information regarding the project and the transaction confidential for a period of two years.  In order to comply with the foregoing provision, I would strongly suggest that conversations regarding this transaction be limited to only those Enron employees who have a "need to know."

Thanks

Stuart
 

no problem

Mark:

	I intend to take Friday, November 2 as a vacation day if that works with you.  That is my son's birthday and we are planning on spending the day with him.  

Jeff

I am ok so long as the firm would never pursue litigation against Enron -- on that basis I would grant the waiver.  Mark

I have periodically received requests from Andy Kramer in the form of the attached.  How should I address this issue?  I would not want to provide a waiver that may otherwise raise an issue for Enron.  Thanks in advance for your guidance.  SHD. << File: McDermott Will Waiver.DOC >> 

Rob:

Congratulations!  We will need to talk about some additional coordination.  Let me know when is convenient for you. 

 Mark

Today, we are forming Enron Global Services (EGS) in order to more closely align our asset-based businesses.

This reorganization will allow EGS to focus our resources on opportunities that present the highest value to Enron.  It will also accomplish the following:  1) enhanced synergies among our assets and personnel, 2) more effective prioritization of business opportunities, and 3) better management of Enron's asset-based businesses throughout the world.

Enron Global Services' energy asset portfolio includes the North American pipeline businesses of Enron Transportation Services (ETS), including Northern Border; the international pipeline, power and distribution operations of Enron Global Assets & Services (EGAS); Portland General Electric; EOTT Energy Corp; Enron Wind; Azurix and Wessex Water.  

Reporting to me as the heads of their respective business units are:
?	Jim Hughes, President & COO - EGS/International
?	Danny McCarty, Managing Director & CCO - ETS
?	Bill Cordes, President - Northern Border Partners
?	Peggy Fowler, President & CEO - Portland General Electric
?	John Garrison, President & CEO - Azurix
?	Dana Gibbs, President & COO - EOTT Energy Corp
?	Colin Skellett, CEO - Wessex Water
?	Adam Umanoff, President & CEO - Enron Wind

With the creation of EGS, we hope to enhance the efficient utilization of our commercial support services.  To accomplish this, EGS' staff and operational functions will be headed by:
?	Rod Hayslett, Managing Director & CFO 
?	Rob Walls, Managing Director & General Counsel 
?	Phil Lowry, Managing Director, Pipeline Operations and Engineering & Construction
?	Brian Stanley, President & CEO - EEOS
?	Steve Hotte, Vice President & CIO
?	John Ambler, Vice President, Communications & PR	
?	Gary Smith, Vice President, Human Resources

In addition, Rob Walls will continue to perform his role as Deputy General Counsel for Enron reporting to Jim Derrick.

Phil Lowry will be responsible for domestic pipeline operations, technical services and engineering & construction, as well as, international pipeline technical services and engineering & construction.  Brian Stanley will be responsible for technical services and engineering & construction for international power and distribution facilities.  

Below is an organization chart for Enron Global Services, which displays the changes described here.  We are confident this new organization will focus our talent and capital appropriately.  Please join me in supporting this management team as it strives to maximize Enron's return on its assets.

 

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

I will call.  Thanks. M

Mark -
 
Let's discuss this so there is no misunderstanding about where EFI is likely to come out on their claim.
 
Thanks.
 
Rob

Bruce:
 
After a couple of go arounds, below is the Indian counsel's (Mr. Talwar) opinion with respect to Enron Fuels International's (EFI) claim as to the Fixed Fee as provided in the Fuel Management Agreement (FMA).  I am sure Doug Leach has mentioned to you the mark-to-market and accrual income exposure of $14 million should the FMA also were rescinded or parlayed in the final resolution.  EFI is continuing to invoice for the Fixed Fee every month although the plant is not operating as is DPC to MSEB.
 
Mr. Talwar's view is that as long as the PPA is valid, EFI has the right to collect the fee.  If, however, the PPA is declared to be invalid as per MSEB's claim, then EFI would not be entitled to the fee.
 
I just want to point out that as DPC (and Enron) is working for a resolution, EFI's role should also be considered.  And along those lines, EFI should take an active role in pursuing that its interest is protected.
 
Please call me at 35336 to discuss.
 
        -- Tushar
 
Gentlemen:
 
I think this e-mail I received early Saturday morning directly and succinctly answers the questions we posed to Indian counsel.  Let's talk at your convenience.
 
Andy

Dear Andy,

The answers to each of your questions is as follows :

1.      There is no theory under Indian law that Enron could use, to make an enforceable claim against MSEB in the context of the facts placed before us.

2.      The concept of agency relationships does exist under Indian Contract Law.  The concept of third party beneficiary claims does not exist under Indian Contract Law.  However, Enron cannot make use of the agency relationship theory as the Agreement has not, apart from stating that DPC will be Enron's agent, stated that DPC will be acting under the Agreement as agent for Enron for all purposes.

3.      Yes, our view is that Enron has no enforceable claim against MSEB on the basis of the facts placed before us and the provisions of the Agreement.  However, if DPC makes a claim against MSEB and a judgment is awarded to DPC for recovery of the Fixed Fee, either as such or by way of damage, then Enron would have a right to attach the amount that may be payable by MSEB to DPC.

Kind regards,

Suresh

Sent:   Friday, September 21, 2001 6:41 PM

Cc:     kiran.khanna@crawfordbayley.com

I am a little bit confused.  Is there any theory under Indian law we could

use to make a claim against MSEB?  In America, we might have a claim under

an agency relationship or a third party beneficiary claim.  Is there any

such creature under Indian law?  Is your advice that we have no claim

whatsoever?

    -----Original Message-----

             [ <mailto:IMCEANOTES-suresh+20talwar+20+3Csuresh+2Etalwar+40crawfordbayley+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com>]

   Sent:   Friday, September 21, 2001 7:05 AM

   Cc:     kiran.khanna@crawfordbayley.com

   Subject:  Fuel Management Agreement

   Hello Andy,

   I refer to your email of 20th September, 2001 seeking clarification in

   respect of the advice we gave you on the 19th of September, 2001 on the

   Fuel Management Agreement (Agreement).

   You wish to know whether Enron Fuels International Inc (Enron/Fuel

   Manager) could make a claim under Indian law against MSEB on any

   potential theories such as agency relationship, third party beneficiary

   claims etc.

   MSEB has to discharge certain functions under the Agreement.  These

   include amongst others, approving of the Fuel Management Plan proposed

   by the Fuel Manager, providing copies to the Fuel Manager of notices

   issued by MSEB to DPC pursuant to certain clauses in the PPA, etc.

   There is no provision in the Agreement to suggest that Enron has entered

   into the Agreement relying on the continued subsistence of the PPA and

   no commitment has been made by MSEB under the Agreement in that behalf.

   Enron's right to the Fixed Fee from DPC under the Agreement, is

   contingent upon DPC being paid the corresponding PPA Fuel Management Fee

   by MSEB.  I assume that the only parties to the PPA are DPC and MSEB.

   The payment of the PPA Fuel Management Fee by MSEB to DPC is governed by

   the provisions of the PPA, to which Enron is not a party.  Therefore

   there is no privity of contract between Enron and MSEB/DPC as regards

   the PPA.  As a result, Enron has no claim against MSEB for non-payment

   of the PPA Fuel Management Fee to DPC and therefore has no claim against

   MSEB under the Agreement as there is no breach by MSEB of its functions

   under the Agreement.

   I trust I have answered your query adequately.  Please feel free to call

   for any questions that you may have.

   Kind regards,

   Suresh

This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate and may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or reply to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete all copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence a binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not be relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise. Thank you.

Scott Tholan.  Regards, Mark

I couldn't find a phone number for your guy who is working the security/background check issue we discussed yesterday (I think I garbled his name by the time I got back to my office).  Pls let me know who to contact as I'd like to make sure we have some uniformity of practice on this issue.  Thanks. df

Not necessary.  Thanks.  Mark

Would it be helpful if I start copying you on these?

Robert H. George
Just wanted to let you know that I have booked plane reservations on my remaining airline miles for the above dates.  I will be back on the 2nd. I hope your vacation is going well.  

That makes sense.  How do we notify our trading counterparties?  Mark

Due to the extent of work required to modify our annexes, GTCs etc. on EOL (IT coordination, counterparty notification and the like) and the traders' strong preference to not often make changes on EOL product documentation, we propose to implement the EOL form change in one aggregate revision as and when the trading forms committee concludes its work on events of default and termination valuation/remedies.  Should you think this should be handled differently, please advise.  Mary

Cordially,
Mary Cook

Dear Mark:

As you may know already, the American Chamber of Commerce - Rio de Janeiro Chapter postponed the Brazil Energy Seminar into November 16. In view of such postponement, we have cancelled our trip to Houston next week.

Nevertheless, Jos? Luis Freire, Marcio Baptista and myself have already scheduled to be in attendance of such Seminar. Therefore, we will keep you posted on our travel arrangements later so that we are able to reschedule our visit with you.

Best regards,
Jos? Emilio

Jos? Emilio Nunes Pinto
Tozzini, Freire, Teixeira e Silva Advogados
Rua L?bero Badar?, 293 - 21? andar
01095-900 S?o Paulo, S.P.
Brasil
Tel: (5511) 3291-1232
Fax: (5511) 3291-1111
jenp@tozzini.com.br

Yes.  I was very lucky to get back Saturday!  Mark

Are you back yet? 

Thanks.  Let's get together after the end of the quarter and discuss.  Mark

 Attached is a first draft of the EES legal risk  matrix.  We will need to discuss what should go in the right columns.

 << File: Legal Risk.doc >> 

J:  Please add this to our spiral bound book.  Mark

 Attached is a first draft of the EES legal risk  matrix.  We will need to discuss what should go in the right columns.

 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Thanks.  Let's get together after the end of the quarter and discuss.  Mark

 Attached is a first draft of the EES legal risk  matrix.  We will need to discuss what should go in the right columns.

 << File: Legal Risk.doc >> 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Looks good  to me.  Mark

Attached for your review is our position (prepared by me and Kevin Liss in the EWS Tax Department), to be presented by me on Thursday morning in Washington D.C., regarding expanding the category of hedgeable risks for U.S. tax purposes to include weather and other appropriate volumetric risks.  I will call you each to follow up.  SHD.

 << File: IRS Weather Derivative Submission.doc >> 

I am stuck in London.  I will attend either in person or by video from our London office.
 
Mark Haedicke

PLEASE NOTE THE TIME FOR MONDAY'S MEETING 

Date:           Monday, September 17 
Time:           11:30 a.m. (Central) 
Location:       50th Floor Boardroom 
Video:          Connections will be established with remote locations upon request. 
Conf. Call:     Please contact me for dial-in number and passcode. 

Please indicate if you plan to attend this meeting and through what medium. 

_____   I will attend in person 
_____   By video conference 
_____   By conference call 
_____   I will not attend 

Please return this e-mail to me with your response by 4:00 p.m. today. 

Thanks, 
Joannie 
3-1769 

I am stuck in London -- hope to get out  Sunday.  Nice to hear from you.
 
Mark

Mark--Washington still is very somber and far from normal. Hope all is well 
with you. 

Bill 

This from a German trader in the RT group .... 

Sent: Wednesday, September 12, 2001 9:01 PM 
> Like so many of you, I feel deeply for the terrible tragedy that has 
> occurred. My thoughts and prayers are with the victims and their families, 
> and with the American people. 
> 
> Germany is in shock. All public building are flagged at half-mast. In 
> uninterrupted streams for the past 30 or so hours, people have been 
placing 
> flowers in front of the American embassy in Berlin, and the American 
> consulates in other cities. During working hours, you could see many 
school 
> children who came individually or with their teacher, trying to place 
their 
> flowers as close to the embassy gates as possible; during lunch break and 
> after the offices close, the other age groups come. Many are sobbing, or 
> have tears in their eyes. Now, at night, you see numerous windows that 
have 
> candles placed in them. Memorial services are being held all over the 
> country for the victims. This morning a memorial service was held in a 
large 
> cathedral in Berlin, with the Chancellor and other dignitaries present. 
The 
> cathedral was filled to the overflowing, with so many people wanting to 
> attend that a second service had to be scheduled immediately thereafter. 
> 
> The world, and Germany in particular, has much for which to be thankful to 
> America; now America deserves the loyalty of her allies. Her kind, 
> large-hearted, and freedom-loving spirit, more than any technological 
power, 
> has made America the leader of the world and a beacon of light and hope 
for 
> the downtrodden nations. I know this great nation will prevail over the 
> present crisis, and come out the stronger for it. God bless America! 
> 
> Michael Suesserott 
> 
> 

J:  Please forward this on to the Enron employees that plan events.  Shira is a family friend and I would recommend her.  Also give me a status report.  Mark

_________________________________________________________________ 
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at <http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp> 

That sounds  positive.  Mark

FYI re:  glass ceiling audit.  It looks like DC is more receptive than the local offices.  I'll keep you posted.  Michelle

Yesterday, Steve heard back from Harold Busch at OFCCP inWashington.  Steve's description of their conversation was more encouraging than any of the discussions we have had with the Regional Office.  Steve gave me a general description of the conversation, which is summarized below.  
 
Mr. Busch indicated that he wanted to discuss this matter as a "last step before litigation."  He said that although it was an old case, it was not a closed case from the agency's perspective because there still might be victims out there.  He also suggested that the open audit probably was a "sore thumb" for Enron.  Therefore, he was interested in talking about possible resolution.
 
Steve indicated that he appreciated that, but wondered what Busch had heard about the audit.  Busch had heard only from the OFCCP side, and had no perspective on Enron's side (although he had reviewed our response to the show cause notice).  In response, Steve did a little water dropping.  He told Mr. Busch that the Regional Office never identified a specific victim of discrimination or unfair treatment, but provided only a statistical approach.  He said that Enron did its own, individualized analysis.  Enron looked at specific individuals to find out why there were pay distinctions in those groups where there may have been a statistical concern.  In most instances, we found legitimate explanations for the disparities; in those where we could not, we took care of the situation.  
 
Steve also clarified that there was a fundamental difference of opinion between Enron and the agency over which statistical analysis to use. The agency's approach was broad, which resulted in a demand for a big payment, as opposed to our individualized review.  Mr. Busch responded that this was why he thought it would be productive for us to get together.
 
Busch indicated that he was interested in closure of the matter, if possible.  Either it is closed through a conciliated resolution, litigation, or, if the agency is wrong, it could close the case itself.  
 
At the end of the conversation, Steve indicated a willingness on our part to talk with him and his team.  Busch offered to come to Houston to meet, or to have Enron go to DC for the first meeting, with the second meeting taking place in Houston.  Steve thought that Busch may want to come to Houston.  In terms of timing, we are looking at the week of Sept. 24 as the earliest possible date for such a meeting.  
 
All in all, it sounds like an encouraging conversation.  I believe that the first meeting should be in DC to reduce the likelihood of facing players from the local office, as I believe that they will pursue their prior view of the matter.  We are going to regroup next week to begin work on a high-level presentation to discuss with Busch when the meeting actually takes place.
 
Steve, if I left anything out, or am misquoting what happened, please let everyone know.
 
Michelle
 
 
 

Dave, in the Dunn Committee case, we just got a great order in our favor out of the courts.  We need to try to leverage off this order to slow down the AG.  Mark

Vicki/Mark, the harrassment of EES's customers in California continues at great pace - it seems like I am getting messages like this everyday.  Can we get a restraining order/sue the government, etc.

This is going to start hurting business soon and is clearly a witch hunt....

Regards
Delainey
 
Dan Leff
09/06/2001 11:54 AM
David Tagliarino, Enron Sports Marketing Group, received a call today from John Yee, CFO of the SF Giants.  David, John and I got back on the phone this morning.  Following is a summary of our discussion:

John Yee, CFO, SF Giants, received a letter from the CA AG's office requesting their cooperation in an "....investigation concerning Enron....".  (John will fax that letter to me and I will circulate it)
John called the AG's office per their request in the letter received
The AG's office was digging for a bunch of information:
total MWH consumed
contract start date
term of contract
general questions about T's & C's
whether Enron had cancelled the contract
who was supplying electricity
copies of the agreements and letters of communication from Enron to the SF Giants
John was generally responsive and indicated that Enron has been great, has honored its contract, still has a contract in place, etc.
John pushed back on supplying any more information without a written request from the AG's office, and then also indicated that they would only supply what was required by law
The AG's office responded by indicating that they may have to subpoena the Giants
John will wait and see what the AG's office does
He will keep us in the communication loop and make sure that we have copies of the communication from the AG's office

Thanks - Dan

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Calpine in ok.  Mark

The following 11 applications will go for approval at the next Board meeting
on September 13.

Please let me know if anyone is familiar with the Subscriber applicants
Northwater Capital Management or Castle Mountain Group.

Thanks
Mary

Primary Regional
1.  Calpine Energy Services , L.P. - U.S. based

Associate
2.  VOB - Service GmbH - software company (application was deferred from
August 2, Executive Committee meeting for full Board consideration)
3.  Beachfire, Inc. - software company
4.  Vischer LLC Attorneys at law - Swiss law firm

Associate Emerging
5.  Shearn Delamore & Co. - Malaysian law firm

Non-Dealer Financial Subscriber
6.  Federal Home Loan Bank of Boston

Subscriber
7.  JWM Partners, LLC - investment management firm (application was deferred
from August 2, Executive Committee meeting for full Board consideration)
8.  Clarica Life Insurance Company - (application was deferred from August
2, Executive Committee meeting for full Board consideration.)
9.  Northwater Capital Management Inc. (formerly Newcastle Capital
Management Inc.) - investment management firm based in Toronto.
10.  Glencore International AG - Swiss based commodities company
11.  Castle Mountain Group, LLC - investment management group based in
Michigan

Thanks!  Yes, please keep me off the Section 16 list!   Mark

Mark:  I have been so busy with all the legal issues relating to all the changes going on at the Company that I forgot to congratulate you for your appointment to the Management Committee---Congratulations!  I think that's great, and certainly well deserved.  I will endeavor to keep you off the Section 16 list!  Rex

I am pleased to announce the formation of the Enron Management Committee.  The Management Committee comprises our business unit and function leadership and will focus on the key management, strategy, and policy issues facing Enron.  The Management Committee will supplant the former Policy Committee and will include the following individuals:

Ken Lay - Chairman and CEO, Enron Corp.
Ray Bowen - COO, Enron Industrial Markets
Michael Brown - COO, Enron Europe
Rick Buy - Exec VP & Chief Risk Officer, Enron Corp.
Rick Causey - Exec VP & Chief Accounting Officer, Enron Corp.
Dave Delainey - Chairman and CEO, Enron Energy Services
Jim Derrick - Exec VP & General Counsel, Enron Corp.
Janet Dietrich - President, Enron Energy Services
Jim Fallon - President & CEO, Enron Broadband Services
Andy Fastow - Exec VP & CFO, Enron Corp.
Mark Frevert - Chairman & CEO, Enron Wholesale Services
Ben Glisan - Managing Director & Treasurer, Enron Corp.
Mark Haedicke - Managing Director & General Counsel, Enron Wholesale Services
Kevin Hannon - CEO, Enron Global Assets & Services
Stan Horton - Chairman & CEO, Enron Transportation Services
Jim Hughes - President & COO, Enron Global Assets & Services
Steve Kean - Exec. VP & Chief of Staff, Enron Corp.
Louise Kitchen - COO, Enron Americas
Mark Koenig - Exec VP, Investor Relations, Enron Corp.
John Lavorato - President & CEO, Enron Americas
Mike McConnell - President & CEO, Enron Global Markets
Jeff McMahon - President & CEO, Enron Industrial Markets
Jeff Shankman - COO, Enron Global Markets
John Sherriff - President & CEO, Enron Europe
Greg Whalley - President & COO, Enron Wholesale Services

	After we convene the Management Committee later this week, I will make a further announcement regarding the Executive Committee.

Greg:  It has been 120 days for voice mail that is not deleted.  It should be further reduced to 7 days.  
 
Mark Haedicke

who sends out messages like these?  what is the current policy?  does this mean that deleted items are kept, or just saved ones?  30 days is a really long time!!!1

Please be advised that effective Monday, September  10, 2001, the retention policy for all voice mails will be 30 days. 

 
who sends out messages like these?  what is the current policy?  does this mean that deleted items are kept, or just saved ones?  30 days is a really long time!!!1

Please be advised that effective Monday, September  10, 2001, the retention policy for all voice mails will be 30 days. 

Thanks for the message.  Mark

California Power Authority ("CPA") held its first meeting with developers last week.  We attended and presented ourselves as a potential developer and seller of turbines to either the CPA or CPA developers.   CPA has issued a form of non-binding LOI for interested developers to sign.  It needs to be signed in the next 24 hours (!) in order to stay in the CPA program.   I would like to do that (subject to legal edits) so that we can stay at the table.  

I bring this to your attention because it may be press-released that we have reached agreement with CPA and that we are offering to build a project for the CPA. 

Please let me know if you have any issues with this.

Regards,

Chris Calger
503-464-3735

Sounds like a great result!  Congratulations.  Mark

All,

I am pleased to report that we have resolved the infamous James River contract with BPA under favorable terms.  The signed agreements are on my desk right now.  Besides significantly reducing our litigation risk, the addition of 7.5 MW/h and the change of delivery point have added $22.8 million to the value of the contract.

BPA and EPMI have amended the original contract to specify that (i) BPA will deliver 102 MW/h 24/7 for the 5-year term of the agreement (an increase of 7.5 MW/h over the original), (ii) the disputed "alternative delivery point" is designated as Mid-C, (iii) all language to the contrary is deleted from the agreement, (iv) the parties agree to "book out" the James River physical deliveries against EPMI sales to BPA at the Mid-C delivery point (so no power will flow); and (v) we will continue to invoice BPA each month for the term of the agreement, just as if the power was still flowing.

Although my preference would have been to terminate the James River agreement, BPA refused to do so because it would not have been able to recover the costs of this contract in its rates.  Similarly, I had hoped that we could do a one-time book-out, but BPA refused to do so because--according to BPA's finance person---such a book-out would have converted this to a financial deal requiring BPA to use mark-to-market accounting.  Therefore, we executed two documents:  one amending the original contract, and another called the "Book-Out Agreement," which sets out an agreement to book-out specific transactions over the next five years.  

I am satisfied that this is a favorable deal for EPMI because (1) we resolve the disputes over quantity and delivery point, which (2) will make it very difficult for BPA to change its mind in the future and argue that we are not entitled to receive power unless we are selling it to James River, and (3) the negotiated increase in quantity and change in delivery point add over $22 million in value to the contract.  

Thanks to everyone for your help.

Steve

Andy:  Can you look into this while Richard is out of the office.  

We need some guidance on voicemail retention in Portland for both PGE and ENA.  This should be driven by legal -- not technology.  ENA currently uses PGE's voicemail system in Portland.  I'm not sure if there can be a different set of rules for each.  We need clear direction on what legal thinks the policy should be for each entity.  Please advise.

Tim,

	Not to question Kathy, but should we not have a lawyer (Richard Sanders for example) sign off on this?

If so, please give me direction today.

Dave

Dave:  I would leave PGE retention policy as it is.  Once you get your own system in the next few months, we will use the 30 day retention policy to govern voicemail boxes.  Thanks!

Kathy

As you know, ENA PDX is using the PGE Meridian Centrex Phones and Mer Mail voice mail system.  As a result of this email, I have contacted PGE Telephony services to evaluate our ability to comply.  

We, ENA PDX and PGE, already have a couple of questions:

Is PGE subject to this policy?
If for some reason the existing system keeps us, ENA PDX, from being able to comply, what are our options.
Is the phone system we have ordered (and its voicemail system), able to meet these needs without modification to the order. 

I am sure that other questions will come up, and I will communicate back to you what PGE finds				.

Please get back to me with thoughts.

The PGE Contact is Ruth Ash ruth_ash@pgn.com (503)464.8663

Dave

Please be advised that effective Monday, September  10, 2001, the retention policy for all voice mails will be 30 days. 

I will be attending.  Mark Haedicke

Dear ISDA Board of Directors:

This is a reminder that the next meeting of the Board of Directos will be
held on Thursday, September 13, 2001 at the offices of Deutsche Bank in
London.  Please confirm you attendance at the meeting by email as soon as
possible.  The meeting agenda and materials will be sent to you shortly.
Thanks

I have asked J to send it out.  Mark

Mark: a suggestion re email to specialists. my assistant has list and we can send for you or janette could do from there. let me know...

As you know, our group of attorneys within the Enron Wholesale Services legal department has recently grown substantially.  As a result, our space at the previously scheduled EWS legal conference at the Woodlands in October has become constrained and we have outgrown our budget. Instead of having legal specialists attend the conference this year, we have scheduled a lunch on October 26, 2001 at the Doubletree Hotel from 12 to 3. We are scheduling several outside speakers to talk about current topics at the lunch. You will be getting further information from Lisa Mellencamp about the details, but please mark your calendars and plan on attending!

Mark: the doubletree hotel has a room available and charges $500. there are 35 specialists (including ebs and ees). they will serve mexican style buffet lunch for about $24 a person, plus tax/service charge. thinking of 2 outside speakers (local--i liked the ve guy the other day on privacy and documents e.g.) and for you to speak as well. janette booked you for 12-1:30 so you can eat lunch and speak and duck out if you want. i will go and think will have a couple other attorneys to sprinkle around at tables (let me know if you have view or i will just do). my assistant will handle details and i will arrange speakers etc. total cost: about $1,800 (tho having pr people see if can get any cheaper...).

 i have revised budget for conference which i will send you within next day (waiting on one thing from woodlands re it) and the lunch will be on it as well in a second category so we can get turned in and approved. i want to send this email out on the same day as a reminder of date on the woodlands to applicable people. steve kean not available but rick shapiro/ jim steffas are. bruce lundstrum signed up with skadden lawyer. klauberg signed up with elizabeth.i  were you going to talk to evans? i have call into vicki re retail ideas.

J, please get this message ready to send from me to the Specialists.  Mark

Mark: a suggestion re email to specialists. my assistant has list and we can send for you or janette could do from there. let me know...

As you know, our group of attorneys within the Enron Wholesale Services legal department has recently grown substantially.  As a result, our space at the previously scheduled EWS legal conference at the Woodlands in October has become constrained and we have outgrown our budget. Instead of having legal specialists attend the conference this year, we have scheduled a lunch on October 26, 2001 at the Doubletree Hotel from 12 to 3. We are scheduling several outside speakers to talk about current topics at the lunch. You will be getting further information from Lisa Mellencamp about the details, but please mark your calendars and plan on attending!

Mark: the doubletree hotel has a room available and charges $500. there are 35 specialists (including ebs and ees). they will serve mexican style buffet lunch for about $24 a person, plus tax/service charge. thinking of 2 outside speakers (local--i liked the ve guy the other day on privacy and documents e.g.) and for you to speak as well. janette booked you for 12-1:30 so you can eat lunch and speak and duck out if you want. i will go and think will have a couple other attorneys to sprinkle around at tables (let me know if you have view or i will just do). my assistant will handle details and i will arrange speakers etc. total cost: about $1,800 (tho having pr people see if can get any cheaper...).

 i have revised budget for conference which i will send you within next day (waiting on one thing from woodlands re it) and the lunch will be on it as well in a second category so we can get turned in and approved. i want to send this email out on the same day as a reminder of date on the woodlands to applicable people. steve kean not available but rick shapiro/ jim steffas are. bruce lundstrum signed up with skadden lawyer. klauberg signed up with elizabeth.i  were you going to talk to evans? i have call into vicki re retail ideas.

Peter:

This is a tough battle.  It may be worse because your clients are either th=
e same ones or geographically very close.  I would try to address it by poi=
nting out the limitations of the simplier forms and as a fallback emphasize=
 the increased risk (legal and otherwise) when using the shorter forms.

Mark

Mark, on the "retail" front, I did not want to get into all of the detail a=
round what is happening in Canadian Retail in the Legal Committee call (did=
 not realize Vicki et al. are now joining our calls), but I am meeting with=
 Vicki later today (4:00 pm central) to review Canadian Retail.  Do you wan=
t to join?  The major "retail" issue is the commercial pace to transact out=
stripping the pace at which we can catch up legally to certain aspects of t=
he business - not so much for transacting between us and the counterparties=
 - but more in terms of understanding and mitigating "distribution" risks w=
ith and behind the LDC under applicable tariffs, T&Cs, policies and procedu=
res.

On the related but "wholesale" front, I would also like to talk to you for =
5-10 mins. to get your thoughts on transacting within the cross-over betwee=
n "retail" and "wholesale".  More precisely, wholesale traders/originators =
have more and more pressure to transact at or behind the LDC rather than ar=
ound a wholesale "hub" - particularly when it comes to power or Eastern gas=
.  This introduces "retail" type issues into the wholesale transacting proc=
ess, with implications for our transacting/forms procedures.  Since the dis=
tinction here between retail and wholesale has developed around commercial =
"turf", and not the nature of the counterparty, the wholesale traders/origi=
nators are looking more and more at transactions that are "retail" in natur=
e.  The result is the wholesale traders/originators pushing to use the "sim=
pler" or less rigorous contracting procedures and forms developed for our "=
retail" market for these "wholesale/retail" deals, which I am not sure is a=
lways appropriate, but for which I am having difficulty drawing the line.  =
I have an idea, which is to create wholesale products under our Master Agre=
ements which address "retail" type issues.  The problem is where to draw th=
e line and the resistance to what is perceived by wholesale traders/origina=
tors as a more rigorous standard, as compared to both internal Enron Direct=
 "competitiors" and external competition.

Peter. =20

____________________________________
Peter C.M. Keohane
Vice President, Assistant General Counsel
and Secretary
Enron Canada Corp.
Phone:=09(403) 974-6923
Fax:=09(403) 974-6707
E-mail:=09peter.keohane@enron.com

Peter/Chris:

Have we put the updated netting language in the contract?  Would it ever come into play?

Regards,

Mark

Chris/Mark, I am very familiar with the form and with the issues and I am happy with the contract, on the understanding that for any meters behind the LDC there is no "consumption/balancing risk" with the LDC - i.e. as it is a wholesale meter for a fixed volume, I am OK provided that if Domtar over/under consumes they are directly liable to the LDC for any balancing obligation.  There is also the issue of the a new charge "at" the Bruce Delivery Point which does not uniformly affect the market price for all market participants, but I understand that is a commercial risk Paul has accepted.  Peter.

Mark/Peter - Attached hereto is an Electricity Purchase Agreement pursuant to which Enron Canada Corp. would sell power to Domtar Inc.  The agreement is in the form that we have been using for deals back-to-backed with the British Energy position (similar to the Ivaco, Atlantic Packaging, TransCanada and Sunoco agreements). Please let me know if you have any questions with respect to the agreement.  We hope to be in a position to execute within a week.

Peter, we have discussed this agreement and the modifications required to take into account the revisions in the British Energy deal.  The only other changes that I have made are simple modifications to take into account Domtar's request for multiple delivery points (some of which are behind LDCs but still considered wholesale as they are registered with the IMO).

Regards
Christopher J. Gaffney
Senior Legal Counsel
Enron Canada Corp.
416 865 3711

This communication may be solicitor/client privileged and contains confidential information intended only for the persons to whom it is addressed.  Any other distribution, copying or disclosure is strictly prohibited.  If you have received this message in error, please notify the sender immediately and delete this message from your mail box without reading or copying it.
 << File: EPA-Aug 15.doc >> 

Thanks Rob.  Mark

Mark -

A belated (we just got back from Bombay last night) congratulations on your appointment to the Management Committee.  Having another lawyer on the committee can't hurt!  Again, congratulations and good luck.

Rob

I am pleased to announce the formation of the Enron Management Committee.  The Management Committee comprises our business unit and function leadership and will focus on the key management, strategy, and policy issues facing Enron.  The Management Committee will supplant the former Policy Committee and will include the following individuals:

Ken Lay - Chairman and CEO, Enron Corp.
Ray Bowen - COO, Enron Industrial Markets
Michael Brown - COO, Enron Europe
Rick Buy - Exec VP & Chief Risk Officer, Enron Corp.
Rick Causey - Exec VP & Chief Accounting Officer, Enron Corp.
Dave Delainey - Chairman and CEO, Enron Energy Services
Jim Derrick - Exec VP & General Counsel, Enron Corp.
Janet Dietrich - President, Enron Energy Services
Jim Fallon - President & CEO, Enron Broadband Services
Andy Fastow - Exec VP & CFO, Enron Corp.
Mark Frevert - Chairman & CEO, Enron Wholesale Services
Ben Glisan - Managing Director & Treasurer, Enron Corp.
Mark Haedicke - Managing Director & General Counsel, Enron Wholesale Services
Kevin Hannon - CEO, Enron Global Assets & Services
Stan Horton - Chairman & CEO, Enron Transportation Services
Jim Hughes - President & COO, Enron Global Assets & Services
Steve Kean - Exec. VP & Chief of Staff, Enron Corp.
Louise Kitchen - COO, Enron Americas
Mark Koenig - Exec VP, Investor Relations, Enron Corp.
John Lavorato - President & CEO, Enron Americas
Mike McConnell - President & CEO, Enron Global Markets
Jeff McMahon - President & CEO, Enron Industrial Markets
Jeff Shankman - COO, Enron Global Markets
John Sherriff - President & CEO, Enron Europe
Greg Whalley - President & COO, Enron Wholesale Services

	After we convene the Management Committee later this week, I will make a further announcement regarding the Executive Committee.

Mary:

The  company seems to have a bad reputation.  I don't know if Marc Rich owns any portion of it or not because it is private.  I think, the UK started some investigations re Glencore over the past couple of years.  I am not sure we want the company as part of ISDA.  I am sure others will have an opinion on that.

Mark

Mark:

I have an application for Subscriber membership from Glencore International
AG, based in Switzerland.

They identify themselves as 'trading in commodities of any kind and other
goods for its own and for another's account; may perform or mediate services
and carry out financing transactions connected therewith, may establish
subsidiaries, participate in or associate with other enterprises as well as
acquire, hold, mortgage and alienate real estate.'

Sounds to me like they should be a dealer?

Bob thinks it's the famed Marc Rich's company.

Any idea?

Thanks
Mary

Please meet in Mark's office at 1:00 Tuesday for the referenced call to discuss margin and netting issues.

Cordially,
Mary Cook

I agree.  Mark

We should waive this.  I waived a similar conflict for Guido last year. He represents us in the Stamp Tax case in Argentina and frequently represents the Bolivian govt. We'd rather have someone we know is a good lawyer and objective than someone we don't know.   FYI, Guido wrote the Supreme Decree that enabled Transredes to get its deferred account back.
Dear Michelle, 

The Superintendencia General del SIRESE (Bolivia) just send me the background of the Transredes case in which they are requesting my advise. 

It is an administrative appeal before said agency of resolutions SSDH Nbr. 0257/2000 and 0014/2001 concerning the assesment of a fine of 710.000 bolivianos due to an oil spill and the rejection of the appeal filed before the Hidrocarbons Agency.  

As mentioned in our conference call, I informed the Superintendencia General about my assistance to Enron in different matters and they expressed no concern about the independence of my advise nor potential conflicts of interest. Please be kind enough to confirm me that Enron acknowledges that no conflict of interest arises of my eventual assistance to the Superintendencia General cocerning this matter and, therefore, that it has no objection in order for me to provide such assistance.

Best regards, 

Guido Santiago Tawil 
M. & M. Bomchil 
Suipacha 268, piso 12 
(C1008AAF) Buenos Aires 
Argentina 
Tel  (54 11) 4321 7500 
Fax (54 11) 4321 7555 
E-mail gt@bomchil.com.ar 
www.bomchil.com.ar 

Yes.  Thanks!!!    Mark

Mark, I have the 4 seats right behind the Rockets bench for this Sunday's game vs. the Spurs.  Unfortunately, I'll be in LA on a deal.  Would you like the tickets for your family?

H. William Swanstrom 
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP 
Phone:  (713) 226-1143 
Fax:  (713) 229-2518 
bswanstrom@lockeliddell.com 

As was earlier announced, we will be bringing all Managing Directors togeth=
er on a quarterly basis.  Please note on your calendars the first Monday of=
 every quarter from 8:30 a.m. to 12:00 noon for this purpose.  The first me=
eting will take place on Monday, October 1st.  I look forward to seeing you=
 there.

If you have any questions, please call Joannie Williamson at 713-853-1769.

I want to go through a list of each counterparty we think is going to go into bankruptcy and what we are doing to prepare for that.  Thanks.  Mark

DTI Holdings, Inc. could file for bankruptcy at any point in time.  The Company is solely dependent upon financing from it's parent, KLT Telecom Inc.  The board of KLT has been advised that they have no further obligation to fund the remaining $30.5MM of availability under the Credit Facility.  Even if DTI Holdings received the remainder of availability under the Credit Facility it would only last 1-2 quarters (through the end of the calendar year) due to a cash burn rate from operations of approximately $15MM and capex of approximately $12MM for the 2Q01.  The Company also has a demand loan to its parent of $94MM and interest payable of $4.7MM.

If you would like to discuss further please feel free to call.

Jane Wilhite
ext. 35063

I am working on it.  Mark

Mark

This e-mail from Bradford worries me.  Can you take a look.

John
It appears the cash margin may not be a problem.  Initial feedback from EES legal is that we may not be able to cut them off immediately due certain provisions in the EES Masters.  I have a call in to Haedicke to address.  I have also attached the current exposure information.  I am currently in discussion with New Power to better understand the liquidity risks they face.

Let me know if you would like to discuss.

Bill

 << File: New Power Exposure.htm >> 

Cadwalader confirms their opinion that margin postings under the netting arrangement (inclusive of forwards and derivatives) are excepted from preference provisions and that this should not be altered merely by having an insider position, absent other claims.  I have touched base with Tribolet and Sanders to let them know that Cadwalader is available to discuss the netting agreement/bankruptcy issues as desired.

Cordially,
Mary Cook

Thanks for the kind words.  Mark

	Mark,

		Its good to see more legal on the committee. Congrats!
 
		It should be very educational, and the whole department will benefit from the insight you take away.

	Ned

I am pleased to announce the formation of the Enron Management Committee.  The Management Committee comprises our business unit and function leadership and will focus on the key management, strategy, and policy issues facing Enron.  The Management Committee will supplant the former Policy Committee and will include the following individuals:

Ken Lay - Chairman and CEO, Enron Corp.
Ray Bowen - COO, Enron Industrial Markets
Michael Brown - COO, Enron Europe
Rick Buy - Exec VP & Chief Risk Officer, Enron Corp.
Rick Causey - Exec VP & Chief Accounting Officer, Enron Corp.
Dave Delainey - Chairman and CEO, Enron Energy Services
Jim Derrick - Exec VP & General Counsel, Enron Corp.
Janet Dietrich - President, Enron Energy Services
Jim Fallon - President & CEO, Enron Broadband Services
Andy Fastow - Exec VP & CFO, Enron Corp.
Mark Frevert - Chairman & CEO, Enron Wholesale Services
Ben Glisan - Managing Director & Treasurer, Enron Corp.
Mark Haedicke - Managing Director & General Counsel, Enron Wholesale Services
Kevin Hannon - CEO, Enron Global Assets & Services
Stan Horton - Chairman & CEO, Enron Transportation Services
Jim Hughes - President & COO, Enron Global Assets & Services
Steve Kean - Exec. VP & Chief of Staff, Enron Corp.
Louise Kitchen - COO, Enron Americas
Mark Koenig - Exec VP, Investor Relations, Enron Corp.
John Lavorato - President & CEO, Enron Americas
Mike McConnell - President & CEO, Enron Global Markets
Jeff McMahon - President & CEO, Enron Industrial Markets
Jeff Shankman - COO, Enron Global Markets
John Sherriff - President & CEO, Enron Europe
Greg Whalley - President & COO, Enron Wholesale Services

	After we convene the Management Committee later this week, I will make a further announcement regarding the Executive Committee.

Yes.  They are fine.  Mark

Mark:

Do you know Calpine Energy Services?  They are located at 700 Louisiana.
Janet Dixon, Senior Counsel, would serve as their primary contact.  Calpine
has applied at the Primary level.

I'd like to put them through at the Sept. 13 Board meeting.

Regards,
Mary

Just do the best you can.  We will probably end up moving it to a different day.  Mark

It will be hard for me to make these meetings on time, since Dave's meeting often ends after 10 and he/Janet often do followup meetings right after.   If others have a similar problem, I would like to suggest reconsidering the afternoon or  Tuesday am slot. 

	It has become necessary to change the starting time for our Monday morning staff meetings (Policy Committee and Office of the General Counsel) from 11:00 am CDT to 10:00 am CDT.  Also due to the time change, we will need to return to meeting in EB38C2.  

	The next Policy Committee meeting will be on Monday, August 27.

	Monday, September 3, is the Labor Day holiday; therefore, the next Office of the General Counsel meeting will be on Tuesday, September 4.

	The call in numbers have not changed.  

	Thank you. 

Steve:

Per our conversation, I would like to talk about "Managing Legal Risks".  I think it would follow the RAC presentation.  I want to talk through the system of legal risk memos and legal risk ratings we have used on wholesale deals for two years with great success.  There is a very important risk control aspect to legal that needs to be highlighted.  Let me know if you need more information.

Regards,

Mark

Per our conversation yesterday, I propose we send out the following memo:

In order to better coordinate the various west coast power matters, effective immediately, Jim Steffes and Richard Sanders will jointly take the lead role.  Jim and Richard will be responsible for preparing a comphrehensive strategy for all the matters, reviewing the strategy with the California Committee and seeking approval of the California Committee before taking any material action.  Please do all you can to assist Jim and Richard on the west coast power matters.

I would copy only the people working on these matters including Steffes, Sanders, Belden, Mellencamp, Shapiro, Sharp, Williams, Tribolet, Lavorato and Delainey. 

Per our conversation yesterday, I propose we send out the following memo:

In order to better coordinate the various west coast power matters, effective immediately, Jim Steffes and Richard Sanders will jointly take the lead role.  Jim and Richard will be responsible for preparing a comphrehensive strategy for all the matters, reviewing the strategy with the California Committee and seeking approval of the California Committee before taking any material action.  Please do all you can to assist Jim and Richard on the west coast power matters.

I would copy only the people working on these matters including Steffes, Sanders, Belden, Mellencamp, Shapiro, Sharp, Williams, Tribolet, Lavorato and Delainey. 

Thanks, I will send a copy to Alan in EGM.  Mark

Mark and Julia: FYI re potential attorney needs.  Jim

Jim--- my wife Carolyn is looking for a job.  

Since she is one of the best lawyers I know, and for other obvious reasons, I am attaching her resume in case some Enron position is available.  A natural might be Enron Freight, which I understand is looking for an attorney.

Although her title was Associate General Counsel, she was essentially the General Counsel at Eagle USA Airfreight [now EGL, Inc.] while she was there since the General Counsel at that time was a trial lawyer in an outside law firm and Carolyn did all of Eagle's business-related legal work except for litigation.  Also, as a consequence, she became well versed in all aspects (regulatory and otherwise) of the freight business.

I would appreciate your providing her resume to the appropriate person or persons for their consideration.  She has any number of references, should anyone want that.

Should someone want to contact her, she can be reached at 713-533-0330.  Thank you.

				 << File: RESUME-Carolyn.DOC >> 

J

We have not been able to secure video conference facilities for the Board
meeting on Tuesday, Sept. 25. We will proceed with a teleconference. The
information to connect to the call is as follows:

International Number is 1-865 524 4287

	U.S. Domestic Number is 800 417 3187

	Participants Code is 169 326

	The meeting will be more effective if we can gather several Board
members in locations in New York and London. We will host the New York
session at our offices at 600 Fifth Avenue (entrance on 48th Street), 27th
floor. The London session will be at our offices at One New Change, EC4.
Please proceed to the Allen & Overy reception desk at that location and you
will be directed to a conference room.

	The meeting will begin promptly at 9:00 am New York time/2:00 pm
London time. Based on responses we expect to have several more Board members
on the phone than are necessary to satisfy quorum requirements, but we do
need you to join us from the beginning of the call.

	If you are joining us in person, please arrive at the New York or
London location in advance of the start of the call. If you are connecting
by phone, please do so a few minutes prior to the start of the call. Our
Board members in Asia and Australia are starting this call at 9:00 pm, 10:00
pm or 11:00 pm, depending on their location. We will make every effort to
keep the meeting to an hour and a half.

	We will consider the following issues from the original September
agenda:

	Filling of the vacancy created by Damian's resignation

	Membership applications (Mary will send a separate email with
details on each application)

	Relationship with FpML

	Market convergence issues

	An abbreviated review of the three-year plan

If you need the materials for any of these matters, please contact Cynthia
Richards or me.

I look forward to speaking with you on Tuesday.

Bob

J
Gentlemen,

Please find attached the new TBS board meeting notice and agenda faxed to you early this am.
 

Regards,

Federico A. Cerisoli
General Mgr.,TBS

fyi
 

The Enron Americas Commercial Management Off-Site will be held in Beaver Creek, Colorado on Thursday, August 16 through Sunday, August 19. 

Attached is a PowerPoint presentation containing the following information: 
        Meeting Agenda (includes lodging information and contact numbers) 
        Attendee List (includes video team information) 
        Thursday corporate and charter aircraft information with passenger lists 
        Sunday corporate and charter aircraft information with passenger lists 
        Enron Aviation Map 

TRAVEL 
Please carefully review the corporate and charter aircraft information and advise me of any changes to the passenger lists.  If you are booking individual travel and have not sent your travel itinerary to me - please do so immediately.  Enron is providing ground transportation to/from Denver and Eagle/Vail.  Sunday departure notices will be distributed at the Elkhorn Lodge in Beaver Creek.

VIDEOS 
Each video team is responsible for creating and transporting their video to Beaver Creek.  Video topics must be clearly labeled on the tapes.  Upon arrival into Beaver Creek, meeting coordinators Kristen and Rich Nye will be collecting the videos for the presentation on Friday evening at SaddleRidge.

ACTIVITIES 
Everyone is strongly encouraged to participate in the daily activities.  Below is a brief description of these events. 
Friday White Water Rafting 
The rapids span approximately 2/3 of a mile and are categorized as a Level 3.  Trip will include a double shot through the rapids, followed by a river float.  Individuals, on each raft, will be urged to work together as a team to 'capture the flag' during the float.  Guides will be provided and life jackets and raincoats are available upon request.

Recommended attire:  swimsuits, shorts, t-shirts 
Saturday Mountain Biking 
Individuals will be equipped with a mountain bike (with full front and rear suspension), helmet, trail map and a day pass for the Centennial Chair Lift (4 person detachable quad).  Trails are clearly marked and are categorized in the following manner:

Green - Beginner (wide dirt road) 
Blue - Intermediate (wide dirt road) 
Black Diamond - Advanced (single track path) 
Participants are free to experience the various trails and unlimited use of the chair lift during this four hour period.  Guides will be provided for assistance and equipment maintenance.

Recommended attire:  comfortable apparel, sturdy shoes 

ATTIRE 
Casual is the recommended attire for all scheduled events, including business meetings and dinners. 

For additional information, please contact me at (713) 853-6978. 
<<01EAbeavercreekmtg.ppt>> 

  
        

Dorie Hitchcock 
Phone:  281.370.0695 
Fax:      281.370.0385 
Cell:      713.594.7093 

Stacy:

I would like to know who on the committee is willing to spend time and resources on what issues.  I think that is critical.  Thanks.

Mark

Attached is a memorandum summarizing the July 27, 2001 meeting of ISDA's
North American Energy and Developing Products Committee. ISDA's Energy and
Developing Products Committee, Chaired by Mark Haedicke, General Counsel of
Also attached is a table outlining various documentation projects reflecting
our July discussion.  We would appreciate your reviewing the attached table
and forwarding your suggestions and comments so that the Committee is able
to plan the agenda moving forward.  Thank you in advance for your thoughts
and views. 

Additionally, ISDA is in the process of updating the database for the Energy
Committee.  Our apologies if you have received this e-mail in error,
received duplicate versions of this e-mail or if one of your colleagues had
been inadvertently omitted. Please notify Scott Marra: smarra@isda.org
regarding any modifications (additions or deletions) to this mailing list as
soon as possible. 

Many thanks. 

 <<NA Energy Committee Memo 8-10.doc>>   <<Documentation Projects.doc>> 

Stacy Carey
Policy Director 
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

put on my schedule.  Mark

 
 - Outlook.bmp 

We had a great time and got home without a hitch! Thanks!   Mark

We had a glorious morning of golf at the Fazio and then rushed to the
Traverse City airport, made the puddle jumper to O'Hare and had the
flight to Houston cancelled due to mechanical problems. We may get into
Houston by 10:00 tonight if we're lucky.  Captain Pear and I just
decided no more trips that involve connections. I hope you guys had
better luck. We really enjoyed the trip and look forward to a game in
Houston soon to check progress. Talk to you soon. 

John, thanks for the message.  I think, I would like to plan a trip and discuss the issues in person at GE.  Early October would work for me.

Regards,

Mark Haedicke

Mark:  I caught up with Henry Hubschman, the President of the GE Aircraft Leasing subsidiary, last week.  He spoke to Ben Heineman who said he would be happy to discuss with you some of the issues you mentioned concerning the management and organization of GE's legal department.  Ben told Henry that he was just heading out on vacation for a good portion of August (apparently, this is the practice for most of the GE senior executives since Welch has historically done the same thing for most of August), so he suggested touching base in early September. If you want, I could follow up around that time and then get back to you. As I noted in one of my prior e-mails, Henry thought you may want to also touch base on these types of issues with the Chief GE Transactional Counsel (and/or the Chief Litigation Counsel) and, if you wish to do that, Henry said he would be glad to make contact with either or both of them for you.

I hope that you are doing well, and I'll be in touch.  Thanks.  John

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

Mark and John:

The Wholesale legal conference is coming up soon.  I wanted to get a head count and the names of the attendees from each of you.  For planning purposes, I have assumed 5 lawyers from each of your groups.  Let me know.  Also, are there any European or South American topics you would suggest we cover?  So far, we have Whalley and Frevert signed up to give us a business update.

Regards,

Mark  

Looks fine to me.  Thanks.  Mark

Mark and Jeff, 

I have finalized my plans for going to part-time status.  Effective October 1, 2001, I will work the following schedule:

Monday  off
Tuesday   8 hours
Wednesday  8 hours
Thursday 4 hours 
Friday 4 hours

I would be glad to rearrange my schedule as needed to help cover the other physical gas attorneys' vacation days.  Please let me know if my schedule is not acceptable.  I appreciate your allowing me to go part-time.

Stacy Dickson Granmayeh
Senior Counsel
Phone (713) 853-5705
Fax (713) 646-3490
Stacy.E.Dickson@enron.com

I have a few thoughts on the offsite.  I think we could have a theme of restructuring and change.  We would have to make sure it is forward looking and upbeat in that we have learned a lot that will make us better in the future.  The presentations could include the following:

1.   What we learned in CA -- Sager
2.   Preparing for workouts -- Mellencamp
3.   Lessons learned in international -- Lundstrom
4.   Deregulation of energy markets -- Kean/Shapiro
5.   Managing Legal Risks -- Haedicke
6.   Executives -- Frevert and Whalley
7.   Europe presentation
8.   Retail presentation

Richard is looking into whether we can tape in Houston or Portland and have a CA person on the line.  Mark

Mark, someone from our side dug this up with the help of outside counsel it appears.

Here is the answer on taping.  Looks like we can't do it w/o consent.  MDS
 
Mike/Sarah,

California Penal Code Sections 631 and 632 make it a misdemeanor to record a telephone conversation without the consent of all the parties.  In addition, civil penalties are available in the amount of $5,000 per violation.  This is true whether the caller is in California or some other state.  If either party is in some other state, however, you may want to also check the law of that state.

If you are planning on taping a conversation, you should get unambiguous consent from all parties on the call before you begin taping.  Once you begin taping, you should again say words to the effect of, "the parties have consented and awknowledge that this conversation is being recorded" so that you have a record of the consent.  There does not appear to be any requirement of a periodic beep or tone (but it probably doesn't hurt so that the parties don't claim they didn't know that portion of the call was being recorded).

Monitoring and/or eavesdropping also is not acceptable in California without the consent of all parties to the call.  Similar disclosures would need to be made in that regard.

We have numerous former prosecutors in the office with experience with the statute so let me know if we can help with anything specific.

Regards,
Kristen

Kristen Bird
Quinn Emanuel Urquhart Oliver & Hedges, LLP
865 S. Figueroa Street, 10th Floor
Los Angeles, CA 90017

(213) 624-7707 (phone)
(213) 624-0643 (fax)

>>> "Sarah Dietrich" <sdietric@enron.com> 08/02/01 04:47PM >>>

What is the law regarding the taping of telephone conversations in California in
the following instances:

--  both the caller (taping party) and recipient are located in California and

--  the caller (taping party) is not in California but the recipient is located
in California.

Must a statement be made that the call is being taped?  If so, are there any
magic words?

Should there be a beep or tone periodically during the conversation?

Any other requirements?

We would appreciate a response as soon as possible, preferably early Friday.

Since I will be out of the office on Friday, please include Mike D. Smith in
your response so that he can relay it to our business people.

Thank you again for your assistance.

Regards,

Sarah

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Lisa:  What is the quality of our contracts and do we hold any collateral?  Any particular legal issues at this point?  Will we have to get quotes?  Mark

for your information:
bethlehem steel has filed bankruptcy in new york.
metals in london has $200,000 or so in exposure (mostly mtm).
ena has gas deal with exposure of about $1.2 million.
industrial markets has nothing.
these are being terminated. hodge sending letter on gas/other from london.
i will file proof of claim.

Yes, so long as they are employees and not on contract.  Move them to Lance Schuler's group.  Mark

	Mark, can you confirm that you approve these legal employees transfer from EBS legal to EWS legal?  I will need to determine which
	legal team they should transfer to.
	

		
EWS - Mark Haedicke
Cooper, Tracy
Garner, Joanne
Harkness, Cynthia
Hicks, Michelle
Hill, Robin
Rossi, Roberta

EWS - Mark Haedicke - Portland / Sheila Tweed
Merten, Eric

Fran Mayes
HR Manager
Phone (713) 853-7211
Fax (713) 646-8100
Cell/Pager  713 875-3820 or
7138753820@messaging.nextel.com

Let's discuss.  Mark

Mark,

Per our conversation, here are the items we would like specific guidance on from outside counsel as soon as possible:

1.  Regarding the 4 undelivered routes (Memphis to D.C., San Diego to Austin, Seattle to Vancouver, and Salt Lake to Denver), what is the probability someone could buy the contracts from 360 and "Put" the routes to EBS?

2.  If 360 were to reject the contracts where they pay EBS annual lease payments (Amarillo to Austin and Houston to New Orleans):
	How would the court go about calculating EBS' damages (would future payments be included)?
	Would we have the right to offset the damages against future lease payments to them?
	Would EBS get the fibers back?

3.  Regarding the swap where EBS delivered its route to 360 over a year ago, and 360 delivered Minneapolis to Detroit 1-2 weeks previous to filing (papered as one deal):
	What is the probability this would be viewed as a preferential transaction?
	If preferential, would the entire swap unwind, or could the court unwind only the 360 delivery?

4.  If 360 rejects IRUs where they have paid EBS (or LJM/Trust) the total amount up-front, what is the probability EBS will have to refund all or a portion of the money?

5.  Worst case scenario, if 360 rejects all contracts where they are paying EBS for future O&M and Collocation:
	How would the court go about calculating EBS' damages (would future payments be included)?
	Would we have the right to offset the damages against future payments to them for O&M and Collocation?

Thanks again for your help.
Jim B.

Don, we are looking into this.  I wonder how traders operate in LA.  Mark

Mark, someone from our side dug this up with the help of outside counsel it appears.

Here is the answer on taping.  Looks like we can't do it w/o consent.  MDS
 
Mike/Sarah,

California Penal Code Sections 631 and 632 make it a misdemeanor to record a telephone conversation without the consent of all the parties.  In addition, civil penalties are available in the amount of $5,000 per violation.  This is true whether the caller is in California or some other state.  If either party is in some other state, however, you may want to also check the law of that state.

If you are planning on taping a conversation, you should get unambiguous consent from all parties on the call before you begin taping.  Once you begin taping, you should again say words to the effect of, "the parties have consented and awknowledge that this conversation is being recorded" so that you have a record of the consent.  There does not appear to be any requirement of a periodic beep or tone (but it probably doesn't hurt so that the parties don't claim they didn't know that portion of the call was being recorded).

Monitoring and/or eavesdropping also is not acceptable in California without the consent of all parties to the call.  Similar disclosures would need to be made in that regard.

We have numerous former prosecutors in the office with experience with the statute so let me know if we can help with anything specific.

Regards,
Kristen

Kristen Bird
Quinn Emanuel Urquhart Oliver & Hedges, LLP
865 S. Figueroa Street, 10th Floor
Los Angeles, CA 90017

(213) 624-7707 (phone)
(213) 624-0643 (fax)

>>> "Sarah Dietrich" <sdietric@enron.com> 08/02/01 04:47PM >>>

What is the law regarding the taping of telephone conversations in California in
the following instances:

--  both the caller (taping party) and recipient are located in California and

--  the caller (taping party) is not in California but the recipient is located
in California.

Must a statement be made that the call is being taped?  If so, are there any
magic words?

Should there be a beep or tone periodically during the conversation?

Any other requirements?

We would appreciate a response as soon as possible, preferably early Friday.

Since I will be out of the office on Friday, please include Mike D. Smith in
your response so that he can relay it to our business people.

Thank you again for your assistance.

Regards,

Sarah

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

FYI, Mark
Mark, someone from our side dug this up with the help of outside counsel it appears.

Here is the answer on taping.  Looks like we can't do it w/o consent.  MDS
 
Mike/Sarah,

California Penal Code Sections 631 and 632 make it a misdemeanor to record a telephone conversation without the consent of all the parties.  In addition, civil penalties are available in the amount of $5,000 per violation.  This is true whether the caller is in California or some other state.  If either party is in some other state, however, you may want to also check the law of that state.

If you are planning on taping a conversation, you should get unambiguous consent from all parties on the call before you begin taping.  Once you begin taping, you should again say words to the effect of, "the parties have consented and awknowledge that this conversation is being recorded" so that you have a record of the consent.  There does not appear to be any requirement of a periodic beep or tone (but it probably doesn't hurt so that the parties don't claim they didn't know that portion of the call was being recorded).

Monitoring and/or eavesdropping also is not acceptable in California without the consent of all parties to the call.  Similar disclosures would need to be made in that regard.

We have numerous former prosecutors in the office with experience with the statute so let me know if we can help with anything specific.

Regards,
Kristen

Kristen Bird
Quinn Emanuel Urquhart Oliver & Hedges, LLP
865 S. Figueroa Street, 10th Floor
Los Angeles, CA 90017

(213) 624-7707 (phone)
(213) 624-0643 (fax)

>>> "Sarah Dietrich" <sdietric@enron.com> 08/02/01 04:47PM >>>

What is the law regarding the taping of telephone conversations in California in
the following instances:

--  both the caller (taping party) and recipient are located in California and

--  the caller (taping party) is not in California but the recipient is located
in California.

Must a statement be made that the call is being taped?  If so, are there any
magic words?

Should there be a beep or tone periodically during the conversation?

Any other requirements?

We would appreciate a response as soon as possible, preferably early Friday.

Since I will be out of the office on Friday, please include Mike D. Smith in
your response so that he can relay it to our business people.

Thank you again for your assistance.

Regards,

Sarah

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Thanks for the message.  I would e-mail Alan Aronowitz.  Regards,  Mark

 
Mark-I met with you a couple of weeks ago regarding the legal position for the new freight group. After we met, I visited with Dan Reck (I had already met with Shawn Cumberland). I am very interested in the position and in Enron. I think my general corporate experience and my specific experience in freight forwarding from having been with Eagle Global Logistics readily adapts to the position.  I am used to a fast pace in a changing corporate environment. For your convenience, I have attached a slightly revised copy of my resume.
 
Regards, Donald Duncan

Sami, by copy hereof, I have asked Jeff Hodge to look into this matter.  He is at 36911.   Mark

Hi  Mark;

We just started discussions with Duke and El Paso regarding the execution of a Master Trading Agreement for Brazilian spot market deals (physical power deals).  I have already been informed by Duke's local counsel that Enron and Duke have executed some sort of a worldwide master trading agreement which may or may not cover Brazil.  Haven't heard from El Paso yet.  Who, in North America, could provide me with information on these Duke and El Paso agreements ?

Hope all is well.

Tks & Rgds,

Sami

Thanks Paul.  Mark

Raj Thapar asked that I provide you with a report on the conference call held at 3:00 p.m. today with representatives of 360networks regarding our proposed settlement.

The primary participants in the call on 360networks' side were commercial people charged with responsibility for various aspects of the proposed settlement. There are a fair number of details to track, and the commercial team at 360networks has experienced virtually 100% turnover. The focus of the discussion was simply to ascertain whether the commercial counterparts were of one mind about the intended outcomes with respect to route cancellations, calculations of payments due, details of collocation requirements going forward and similar commercial details.

The 360networks team raised a number of questions regarding the types of questions described above. Some were addressed on the call, but the primary thrust was identification of the outstanding commercial issues for 360 (none of which seemed to be major) and the identification of the members of each commercial team responsible for each detail, so that we can break into working groups each of which can solve for a particular type of problem. A subsequent conference call will be necessary to gather the reports of the participants and to resolve any remaining issues.

Tim Aschoff, in-house counsel at 360, indicated that he was still awaiting comments from their outside counsel at Willkie Farr with respect to the settlement documents, and that those would be forwarded as soon as they become available. 

Tim Aschoff also emphasized that the deal was still of interest to 360, that the questions and issues being raised were not an attempt to re-trade anything, and that 360 regrets the delays and the confusion resulting from the turnover of its commercial team.

If anyone has any questions regarding the details of this call or the status of settlement negotiations, please feel free to call me.

Paul Puchot

Thanks.  I will try!   Mark

Thought that you might want to attend one of these meetings.

Cynthia

Please plan to attend one of the following floor meetings with Jim Fallon.  At each of the meetings, Jim will discuss the changes occurring at EBS, provide insight to the near-term focus of the business, and address employee questions.

						EB4325 - 10:00 a.m. Wednesday, August 1
					
						EB4422b - 3:00 p.m. Wednesday, August 1
					
						EB4523 - 10:00 a.m. Thursday, August 2

						Shepherd Facility - 3:00 p.m. Thursday, August 2*

*EBS field employees can conference into the Shepherd meeting by dialing 800-713-8600, pass code 344546.

I am ok as long as you and Alan are ok.  Mark

I had submitted the 2001 update to Ken Raisler for an accuracy check.  His comments are very minor and look like they can be addressed without much re-writing. -- Bob

I had only a few minor comments and nits.  It looks very good to me.	
   The following files have been attached to this mail by DeltaView...

Redline.rtf  ( Rich Text Format )
 <<Redline.rtf>> 

This e-mail is sent by a law firm and contains information
that may be privileged and confidential. If you are not the
intended recipient, please delete the e-mail and notify us
immediately.

Travis and I will cover the suggested topics.  Mark

Hello Mark -- just wanted to touch base before tomorrow's meeting.  Attached
is our latest attendee list.

1) John Berry w/Allen and Overy (NY) will give a 10-15 minute overview of
the European Bridge agreement.
2) Meg Timberg (Ontario Power) is set to deliver an update on the Ontario
Electricity Market.
3) I will give brief updates on the US/European Regulatory Issues
4) Will you and Travis cover: standardized provisions for Master Energy
Contracts, Convergence of Commodity Forms, Developing products and
California?
5) Material Distribution - my recommendation would be to make any necessary
materials (i.e. European Bridge Agreement presentation, Ontario Power market
presentation) available on the website after the meeting
6) Other issues ?

Stacy

 <<Attendees 7-27.doc>> 

Stacy Carey
Policy Director 
International Swaps and Derivatives Association
600 5th Avenue, 27th Floor
Rockefeller Center
New York, NY  10020
(212) 332-1202 ph
(212) 332-1212 fax
(917) 543-9622 cell
scarey@isda.org

I will be on the telephone on this one because of a management meeting the same day.  Mark

Our board meeting is scheduled for Tuesday, November 13, in New York. It is
our annual budget meeting so it is an important meeting. I am aware,
however, that some firms have instituted temporary bans or limitations on
travel. It would be helpful to know for planning purposes whether you will
be able to make it to New York for the meeting. George James is hosting the
meeting here at the Morgan Stanley offices.
 
Bob

We discussed at the Kyoto session the dates for the strategic planning
session next year and agreed on the last week in May 2002. The specific days
would be Wednesday, May 29, to Friday, May 31. We will go back to our
typical strategic planning schedule of gathering on Wednesday evening for
dinner, a full day on Thursday (meeting, activity and dinner) and a half-day
on Friday, ending with lunch. This is the week of Memorial Day in the U.S.
and Monday bank holiday in other countries, but the timing of the schedule
should mean that people would not need to travel on the Monday and, in most
cases, could travel on Wednesday.
 
As for location, we have made arrangements with the Ritz Carlton Resort in
Palm Beach, Florida. The resort is a smaller Ritz Carlton property and is
one of the top U.S. resorts according to a number of travel publications.
The website is
http://www.ritzcarlton.com/html_prop/resort.asp?Property_ID=13
<http://www.ritzcarlton.com/html_prop/resort.asp?Property_ID=13&PageNo=9>
&PageNo=9. Additional information on the resort will be in the September
board book. 
 
Domestic flights to Palm Beach are plentiful and there are a number of
international flights to Palm Beach (very near), Ft. Lauderdale (near) and
Miami (1-1/2 hours away). There are many activities of different sorts
(recreational and cultural (yes, even in Florida!)) nearby.
 
For your information, the schedule for upcoming Board meetings is as
follows:
 
Thursday, Sept. 13            London (tentatively at Deutsche Bank)
Tuesday, Nov. 13               New York (location tbd)
Thursday, Jan. 17              City and location tbd
Wed.-Thurs., April 17-18    Berlin, Intercontinental Hotel (AGM)
Wed.-Fri., May 29-31        Palm Beach, Ritz Carlton Resort
 
You may also wish to note our member update schedule in September and
October. Board attendance at these sessions is encouraged, particularly for
the Tokyo and Hong Kong updates since they are our principal events for the
year in those regions. If your schedule permits, please join us for all or
any part of the day. I would be happy to provide further details.
 
Wed., Sept. 12        London, One Whitehall Place
Thurs., Sept. 20       New York, Windows on the World
Mon., Oct. 15          Hong Kong, Conrad International Hotel
Thurs., Oct. 18        Tokyo, Royal Park Hotel
 
I hope your summer is going well.
 
Bob
 
 
 

I think it is something we watch closely as you suggest.  Mark

Mark:

As you may know, the FERC recently instituted a mediation proceeding regarding a potential Southeast RTO  (Docket RT01-100), as well as a similar RTO proceeding for the Northeast as well.    We presently represent a number of the participants involved in these proceedings (for example, Florida Power, Alcoa and Lockhart Power in the Southeast; the NY Transmission Owners and some other parties in the Northeast) and we (particularly our DC regulatory lawyers) are in the process of trying to iron out potential conflict situations among those parties that wish for us to represent them in these proceedings.  My overall sense at this point is that we will end up with representations of multiple parties in the same proceedings, with each of the party's consent.  My understanding is that your DC regulatory people (e.g., Sarah Novasel, Joe Hartsoe, et al) and Bracewell (and, perhaps, other internal folks in Houston) are involved in these proceedings for you.

At this point, it is hard for me to tell how all of the various interests line up, how the proceedings will be conducted and where the proceedings in the various geographic regions may lead, although Rick Shapiro and others in his group may have more insight into that issue.  Nonetheless, I wanted to alert you to this situation and I thought it would be helpful if we could discuss it for a few minutes at your convenience to make sure that you do not foresee a problem from your standpoint with our representations in these proceedings.  It goes without saying that even though we are not representing Enron in these specific FERC proceedings, we do not want to inadvertently be put in the position of being (or being perceived to be) adverse to the Company.

I always find these large, multiple party regulatory proceedings to be difficult ones to assess from a conflicts standpoint.  I will try to catch you tomorrow to see if we might be able to discuss this subject for a few minutes.  Since Bracewell handles most of your FERC work, I know that in the past when these types of situations have arisen, after discussions with you, we have "kept a close eye" on the proceedings to make sure we did not become adverse in a real sense, with an understanding that we would re-evaluate the situation if that were to occur.  I don't know if something like that makes sense here as well, but that is the type of thing I would like to get your views on.

Thanks, Mark, and I'll be in touch.

John

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
john.klauberg@llgm.com

==============================================================================
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

==============================================================================

Type:Single Meeting
Organizer:Haedicke, Mark E.
Start Time:Friday, July 27, 2001 2:00 PM
End Time:Friday, July 27, 2001 2:30 PM
Time Zone:Central Time (US & Canada)
Location:EB3325

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Type:Single Meeting
Organizer:Haedicke, Mark E.
Start Time:Monday, July 23, 2001 2:00 PM
End Time:Monday, July 23, 2001 2:30 PM
Time Zone:Central Time (US & Canada)
Location:EB3325

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

My accomplishments for the first six months of 2001 include the following:

1.    Developed New EES Trading Forms -- provided key legal technology and intellectual capital to rewrite EES forms to be largely consistent with the wholesale trading forms.

2.   Developed Setoff and Netting Strategy in the PG&E Bankruptcy -- led legal and credit team across all Enron entities in minimizing Enron credit and legal risks.  This required an expedited evaluation of Enron positions and coordination across Enron entities to determine the best possible approach to terminate and then value all PG&E contracts.

3.    Implemented New Document Retention Policy for Microsoft Outlook -- led the resolution of many critical document retention policy issues and implementation of a new policy across company lines in Enron. 

4.    Thought Leader on Legal Risk Managment -- continued to develop legal technology for better management and reporting of legal risks across Enron.  Legal Risk Memos and legal risk ratings are two examples.  These legal risk policies have been newly applied in South America and EES to better evaluate and manage the legal risks in those businesses.

5.     Developing New Businesses -- integral part in developing new businesses in freight, paper, steel, lumber, etc. by preparing trading forms and formulating new ways to manage legal risks.

6.     Deal Machine -- projects having lots of complex issues including LV Cogen II, Pastoria, Sithe, Invasion Energy, Electrobolt and Huntco.

7.     Management -- continued to build a deal-oriented legal team that understand the underlying businesses.

8.     New Generation of Master Agreeements -- taking the lead with ISDA in developing the next generation of trading master which would be a single master for all commodities, whether physical or financial.  This would reduce the legal work by half.

Please join me for a baseball game.  The Astros are playing the NY Mets on Wednesday, August, 1.  The game starts at 7:05 p.m.  

Please RSVP to Janette by e-mail to let her know if you will be able to attend.  (Unfortunately due to the limited number of seats available in a suite, we were not able to extend this invitation to your spouse or significant other.)

Hope to see you there!

Elizabeth:  Does the RTO order require a task force to draft new language?  Let me know.  Mark

Has anyone begun to address the issues surrounding the EEI product definitions and the new rules associated with "transporting" power across the new RTO/ISO control areas? Upon discussions with parties involved with the Midwest ISO ("MISO") when scheduling power through the MISO control area a party will no longer designate an interface but only a source and a sink and the Control Area will determine the best path through its system. How will this affect the obligations of the products as defined under EEI. In particular how will this affect the "Into" product definition if the buyer and seller no longer have the ability to select an Interface?
Lora Herff Aria
Sr. Contract Administrator
LG&E Energy Marketing Inc.
Louisville Gas and Electric Company/Kentucky Utilities Company
220 West Main Street, 7th Floor
Louisville, KY 40202
Phone: (502) 627-4251  Fax: (502) 627-4222
e-mail: lora.aria@lgeenergy.com

This e-mail message is confidential, intended only for the named recipient(s) above and may contain information that is privileged, attorney work product or exempt from disclosure under applicable law. If you have received this message in error, please immediately notify the sender at (502) 627-4251 and delete this e-mail from your computer. Thank you.

The preceding message was sent to members of Contract List Server, the EEI Contract Standardization Mailing List.----- *** EEI - A Powerful Partner in a Competitive World sm ***----- You have received the above message as a subscriber to the EEI Contract Standization Electronic Mailing List: contract Your subscription address is listed as: [mhaedic@ect.enron.com] To stop receiving these messages, send a blank message to the list administrator: kSeaman@eei.org with the subject as: UNSUBSCRIBE You can reply to the EEI Contract List by using your email program's "ReplyTo" function, or by sending a message to the list administrator. ********** Log on to Our Energy Future ( http://www.eei.org/ ) to get the facts on today's issues and learn about solutions in which we can all take part. 

I am fine with the agenda except that I will have E. Sager talk about the trading forms.  Mark

Hello Mark - Attached is an updated agenda for the July 27th Meeting.  I
would like to get your sign-off on the agenda so I can circulate to the
members with the meeting invitation tomorrow.

Would you let me know your thoughts about which items to cover and how long
we want the meeting to last.  The attached agenda will likely lead to a 2
hour meeting.  This might be an adequate time frame since this is the first
meeting in a while but let me know what you think!  Many thanks!  -- Stacy

 <<Agenda Discussion Document.doc>>

 - Agenda Discussion Document.doc << File: Agenda Discussion Document.doc >> 

Let's try this time on for size!

We will have to do project economics by pipeline as well as in total.    A 
way to allocate costs however is to do so according to the benefits 
received.      That way no one can argue that they didn't get the same 
deal.    If the deal makes sense from a group standpoint, then it should make 
sense from an individual pipeline standpoint.

Project economics need to be looked at in 2 ways.     1) The project 
economics on a stand alone basis and then 2) the more accurate approach of 
what does the project do to the entity (the with and without approach).     
The accounting return in the second approach has become actually the more 
important measure of success.     

When we meet on Friday after Rod's meeting, should we also address the 
pipeline "cost allocation" issue if we have to continue do project economics 
by pipeline in addition to by ETS?

James Saunders
11/07/2000 11:28 AM
It's a bit difficult to distinguish capital vs. o&m from your list below, 
since you've used the same item description in both categories ie., 
"Resources" . I would be more than happy to develop a specific list or matrix 
with you.
Additional  "discretionay" items to consider are overheads, perhaps AFUDC, 
and perhaps indirect allocations (ie corporate allocations). 

There is more than capital and o&m to consider when developing a 
comprehensive project economic analysis or accounting recap.

From an economic standpoint its critically important to identify all of the 
cash flows and their timing, both "in" (savings) and "out", and not worry 
about accounting. From an accounting standpoint; and if an ORR is necessary 
its important to identify
the accounting flow of a project which will always vary from the cash flow. 
Components may include:

Initial Capital,
Ongoing Capital
Overheads and AFUDC, if applied
Net O&M, direct and indirect
'Book"Deperciation
Tax Depreciation
Advalorem 
Current taxes
Deferred taxes
"Capital" allocations

In addition to the DCF return, I believe Rod wants us to determine the 
Operating Rate of Return (ORR).  If a new project is to replace an old 
project, we also need the net book value of the old project.  I am forwarding 
my September e-mail on Project Evaluation to you all.

Caroline Barnes
11/07/2000 08:21 AM
Please read my note to Rod and his reply.  Thanks...cvb
Rod Hayslett

11/07/2000 06:29 AM
Pretty good.       I would suggest you run these by Jim Saunders (to check on 
what should be capitalized and what shouldn't) and by Denis Tu (to see if he 
has run across any other things you might have left out in his experience).

As to the question "How will we account for the additional O&M budget dollars 
which could start hitting the O&M budget in the same year the project is 
completed?" that's pretty easy, they aren't authorized to be spent.    If the 
dollars for the support of projects aren't budgeted or specifically 
authorized in the project funding document, then something must be cut to 
allow for the dollars to be spent, or we will have to request additional 
funding to carry out the program.    When we do that, unless we are beating 
budget somewhere else, it would appear that we would not meet our goal and 
therefore the bonus pool of dollars would be reduced directly as a result of 
the additional costs.    (Bonus pool = about 2.5% of net income.)    This is 
why it's so important to get the numbers right as soon as is practical.

Caroline Barnes
11/06/2000 08:12 PM
Steve asked me to put together something for everyone to follow in regards to 
Projects ASAP.  If my understanding is correct, to do the economics on a 
project, all costs must be included, ie. capital dollars, O&M dollars, and 
ongoin O&M dollars for the estimated project life.
This is a sample breakdown of what I came up with:
Current year Budget
 Capital Dollars
  Hardware
  Software
  Resources (all areas IT and User) - includes pagers, cell phone, salaries 
and benefits, etc.
   -internal existing
   -internal additional
   -contractors existing
   -contractors additional
  Project related Expenses
  Special services (dedicated phone line while in development, etc.)
  Other

 O&M Dollars
  Training and related expenses
  Resources (all areas IT and User) - includes employee expenses (training, 
pagers, cell phone, salaries and benefits/taxes, etc.)
   -internal additional
   -contractors additional
  Special services
  Other

Future Years Budget
 O&M Ongoing Dollars - project life
  Hardware maintenance
  Software maintenance
  Resources (all areas IT and User) - includes employee expenses (training, 
pagers, cell phone, salaries and benefits/taxes,etc.)
   -internal additional
   -contractors additional
  Special services
  Other

Current and Future Years Budget
 Capital/O&M Offset Dollars - project life (savings)
  Hardware
  Software
  Hardware maintenance
  Software maintenance
  Resources (all areas IT and User) - includes employee expenses (training, 
pagers, cell phone, salaries and benefits/taxes, etc.)
   -internal existing
   -internal additional
   -contractors existing
   -contractors additional
  Special services
  Other

I know we did not budget O&M costs related to projects in the 2001 budget 
because it would be unknown at budget time and not known until the project is 
actually studied in detail to be recommended to be done.  How will we account 
for the additional O&M budget dollars which could start hitting the O&M 
budget in the same year the project is completed?  Once a project is 
completed it is easy to account for the additional O&M dollars in future 
budgets.  Please let me know ASAP if I am on the right track with this.  From 
what Steve stated in his staff meeting and our brief phone conversation this 
is what I came up with.   Thanks...cvb

In order for me to effectively represent you at the ETS PRC  and for some of 
you at the Accounting and Finance PRC's I will need some information from 
each of you.      Please send the following to Kathy Campos who will put it 
together for me in a book.

1. Copy of your goals for 2000 and the latest status.
2. A list of accomplishments/things you are proud of this year, specifically 
indicate any involvement in the    Associates/Analysts Program or the 
Recruiting Program.
3. Copy of a Self Evaluation you completed in the PEP System.
4. Your Supervisor will provide me with a Copy of a Preliminary Evaluation.

I will need these by the 29th of November for those in the accounting and 
finance ranks.   For all others I will need the input for the 13th of 
December. 

FYI
Rod Hayslett

11/15/2000 06:45 AM
What does this mean to our budgets?     Is there a contract with EES that=
=20
allows them to make an "intercompany profit" on this business?     The reas=
on=20
for my concern is 1) EES is a marketing affiliate and 2) profits paid to=20
affiliates are not allowed under several of our joint venture agreements an=
d=20
will come under intense scrutiny at the FERC.     I will need to understand=
=20
in detail what I am going to be billed from EES.

Sent by: Enron Announcements

Responsibility  for daily operations of building support services in the=20
Enron Building, Houston leased offices, and Two Pacific Place (Omaha) will =
be=20
transitioning from Corporate to Enron Energy Services (EES) by year-end.  T=
he=20
areas affected include facility operations and maintenance of mechanical,=
=20
electrical, and air-conditioning systems; mail delivery;  housekeeping; =20
food, copier, and records services.

This transition of services, as presently managed by Enron Property and=20
Services Corp. (EPSC), is designed to optimize value to Enron=01,s Business=
=20
Units by leveraging facility management businesses now offered by EES to=20
their commercial customers.  EPSC staff having administrative responsibilit=
y=20
for these services will report to Enron Facility Services, a subsidiary of=
=20
EES=01,s Global Energy Services group led by Daniel Leff, President and CEO=
.

EPSC is responsible for Enron=01,s internal real estate and office developm=
ent=20
needs, including leasing, space allocations and facility planning, project=
=20
and construction management, furniture systems, and office relocation.  EPS=
C,=20
in its development role, remains a part of Enron Corporate Administration=
=20
Services (ECAS) along with Corporate Security and the Aviation Department,=
=20
reporting to Bill Donovan, Vice President, Corporate Administrative Service=
s.

This alignment of responsibilities offers the opportunity for EPSC to focus=
=20
resources on effective utilization of our existing office space assets and=
=20
managing the development of Houston=01,s new Enron Center Campus project.

All OK>

Hi, Rod.  Please review my records below and give me any additions or
corrections.  Thanks.

Hayslett, Rod (Mr.)

Office:
Enron Transportation Services Company
PO Box 1188
Houston TX  77251-1188
Exec. Asst: Kathy Campos
E-mail:  kcampos@enron.com
Phone: 713.853.6178
Fax: 713.646.3708
Mobile: 713.201.6135
E-mail:  rod.hayslett@enron.com

Home:
10714 Whisper Willow Place
The Woodlands TX  77380
Spouse: Kathy
Phone: 281.292.2467
E-mail:  hayslett@flash.net

Please provide whatever assistance you can in getting info to Tracy to 
respond to the attached request.

Rod Hayslett

11/22/2000 06:47 AM
Please provide a status report to Stan, with copies to Cindy Stark and I, on 
the goals on the attachment.   We are being asked to provide a report to 
corporate NLT close of business next wednesday, November 28th, so your input 
is needed 
not later than tuesday afternoon.    Your assistance is greatly appreciated.
  
Stanley Horton
01/17/2000 08:41 AM
Sent by: Cindy Stark
Attached is the final version of our "Year 2000 Goals & Objectives".

A reminder of what was in the Enron goal presentation and what we did last 
year.
 
Rod,
Mark asked me to forward the attached files to you.
Terry

FYI
Tod A Lindholm
11/22/2000 11:12 AM
Since ETS has third party debt on it's books, the debt and cost of carry will 
be excluded from the calculation so as not to double count.  

Rick wants it to actualy be booked.  I lean towards just calculating it and 
not actually make entries (I know that entries will cause all sorts of 
additional issues).   Nothing has been formalized yet.

Rod Hayslett

11/22/2000 11:01 AM
What do we do with debt on the books of the entities?  Ignore it?   And my 
understanding is that this will not be used for actual booking of anything  
in the books,

Tod A Lindholm
11/22/2000 10:31 AM
Over the last few months, we have been working on a new methodology to 
measure and report business unit's retrurns on invested capital.   Several 
different variations were considered, and I am glad to report that Skilling, 
Causey and Fastow have approved the process outlined here.

Simply stated (with an example shown below):  Return on equity will be 
calculated based on a pre-determined debt/equity structure.  Business unit 
capital will include both on-balance sheet and off-balance sheet uses of 
capital and business unit's will be charged for the cost of their debt at 
Enron's cost of funds.  Business unit's should focus on improving their 
return on equity over time.

This metric will not replace other targets (i.e., IBIT and Funds Flow).  

We are currently working to overlay this approach to the submitted 2001 
Plans.  If you have questions, please contact myself or Mike Deville.

Please approve and forward for payment.    Thanks.

Kathy Campos
11/29/2000 10:34 AM
Here is the revised expense report.

Thanks,
Kathy

Maggie Schroeder
11/30/2000 02:32 PM

I guess I would only request that we get some review put in front of ETS' new 
Risk Management Officer and his crew, Jerry Peters.    I also understand that 
this is a part of the Revenue Management project.
 

Lisa Sawyer
12/08/2000 12:55 PM
Rod,
Caroline forwarded me your questions regarding the Risk System so I wanted to 
go ahead and respond since Steve is out this week.

I don't think Philippe requires the level of due diligence that we performed, 
but we were getting questioned on buying a 3rd party product vs. using an 
Enron Risk System.  We did more research and got the other groups involved so 
that they would understand our decision.  I believe everyone is now 
comfortable with our purchase decision.

In our analysis of systems, we selected the Caminus product in part because 
we had several individual references from Arthur Andersen, Deliotte &Touche 
and Ernst & Young.  These organizations, especially Arthur Andersen, have 
audited this application and have actually participated in numerous 
implementations.  Ernst & Young recently selected Caminus for Equitable 
Resources.   Arthur Anderson implemented the application for Conoco and 5 or 
6 other companies, and Deloitte Touche recently selected the product for 
Tractabel.  After talking with individuals from these accounting firms, we 
felt very confident that the product was sound, and we should not have audit 
concerns.  Obviously, we have a lot of business procedures that have to be 
established, and there is time in the work plan to do that work, but a lot of 
those decisions drive how the application is configured so we need to get the 
product purchased work through the details of how we implement the new 
business procedures since the system does drive a lot of processes. 

Regarding costs, we have an approved work order for $650,000 which covers all 
the initial hardware, software, implementation costs and first year 
maintenance.  This cost does represent a very limited implementation with 
only 10 concurrent users, no customization except a few reports, and no 
electronic interfaces or data conversion.  The assumption is that initially 
the volume would be so low that an automated interface may not be cost 
justified, and the data would manually be loaded since it was low volume as 
well.  The on-going costs are estimated at approximately $100,000/year.  We 
did not perform a separate cost/benefit analysis as this was in the original 
cost of the Revenue Management RAROC.  Let me know if you have any other 
questions or there are open issues that we need to address prior to 
completing the contract.  We are hoping to get this signed and the project 
underway next week.  Thanks.

I would like to have the dollars subdivided into pools for each of my direct 
reports with about 10% of my pool reserved for my use.    Can you help me 
with this?    I also understand that we are doing a handoff from Ben to 
Shanna for my support point, therefore I am sending this to both of you.     

For Ben:    Where are we on the job description I sent  
James Saunders
03/02/2000 02:54 PM
Do you know how much is available for PBAs?? I'd like to make better use of 
it this yr -rewarding  people quickly for "job's well done".

I would think we can do the same as we do in Florida, which is similar to 
your suggestion.     We did create a non-regulated affiliate to do the 
business in the name of, but that leaves the revenue in the venture and 
solves the fiduciary problem.   

Jerry Peters
12/08/2000 03:51 PM
For O&M fees at interconnects NBPL has been charging the customer an 
estimated incremental cost, which under the cost of service tariff was 
credited back to O&M (where the incremental costs were originally charged).  
We are definitely going to change this now.

In at least one situation in the past, NPNG had the contract for maintaining 
a short lateral for the Synfuels plant in ND (in fact Phil may have been 
involved with this when he was District Manager in Glasgow).  In that case, a 
small amount of O&M was left at NPNG and the revenue was booked at NPNG.  

In most cases the customer is negotiating the fees as a part of service on 
NBPL and I would suggest that unless these are significant contracts the 
amounts be left at NBPL.  The main reasons are accounting ease, avoidance of 
fiduciary issues, and customer relations.

Rod Hayslett

12/06/2000 10:05 AM
How have you guys been doing this?     NBPL doesn't have any employees so 
it's got to have been done as Plains, yet I understaood that Plains could not 
provide services to others?     

	
	

In other similar situations where Operations has had an opportunity to 
provide a service for a fee, we have been looking to EAMR as the entity to do 
the work.  Does the NBPL sitiuation preclude EAMR from taking on this role?  
I would assume, unless there has been a change, that given the fact that NBPL 
does not have any employees it would be difficult for NBPL to provide the 
service.
Michel Nelson
12/05/2000 08:02 PM
This seems like a revenue opportunity to me. Could this be considered a 'new 
service'? 

Loretta McGowan
12/05/2000 09:42 AM
The issue of O&M fees at new interconnects has been raised by several 
customers.  A meeting to discuss this issue and how Operations will determine 
these fees, is scheduled for Monday, December 18, on your calendar.  Your 
input is very important at this meeting.

Several of NBPL's customers are currently waiting for answers on this issue 
and NBPL needs to respond very soon to these customers.  NBPL has been asked 
to renegotiate fees (PGL&C) as well as set fees for a period of longer than 1 
year (Harvest States).  NBPL has also been asked to operate a 1/2 mile of 
line from a meter station to a power plant (Lakefield Junction).  We need to 
agree on a decision from both a business and an operations perspective.  
Currently, we have estimated operating fees at interconnects where we charge 
a fee and charge a standard monthly fee of $2,000 per month with the 
exception of two interconnects.  With the tariff changes, operating fees will 
not automatically be recovered in the future.  How are these operating fees 
going to be tracked and charged?  Does NBPL charge all interconnect customers 
the same fee?  Should NBPL absorb some or all of the operating costs as a 
cost of doing business?  These questions need to be answered at the meeting.

Thanks!

I still have a PRC tomorrow am, but will let Kathy know my status as I get 
closer to lunch.

Julie Armstrong
12/11/2000 03:43 PM
A reminder of our lunch tomorrow, December 12th at America's.  We are 
confirmed for 12:30 and the reservation is under my name.  
America's is located on 1800 Post Oak Blvd.  in the Pavilion Shopping 
Center.  713-961-1492
Please call me if you have any questions at x33597.  Thanks.  

FYI
Kim Pattison
12/11/2000 04:16 PM
A meeting concerning the above subject is schedule for 2pm with Stan Horton 
on Thursday, December 14th.  Please try to arrange your schedules to attend, 
as Stan's schedule is not flexible.  

Please confirm your attendance by email or voice mail to me by tomorrow, so I 
can provide Cindy Stark with a headcount.

Thank you so much!

Kim Pattison
68301

James Saunders
12/08/2000 07:02 PM

Rod - below is a prliminary list of 2001 objective ideas.

SAP
a. Participate in Enron's Project Sunrise to improve utiliation of SAP, SAP=
=20
"bolt ons" and SAP/accounting related processes.
b. Enhance ETS SAP user groups to remedy post implemetation "bugs" and=20
improve user understanding and utilization
of the system.

AUDITS AND CONTROLS
a. Implement an ETS approval authorization policy (and ensure compliance),=
=20
incorporating all possible ETS transaction
commitments
b. Implement improved ETS project controls (beyond workorder authorizations=
)
c. Establish improved financial risk management procedures (interrelated to=
=20
a. above)
d. Utilize internal audit resources to provide process improvement ideas=20
(versus traditional audit findings) and drive process changes.
e. Achieve no material financial effects from external audit negotiations

FINANCE
a. Refinance TW note with Enron
b. Issue 144A or equivalent to meet FGT cash requirements in 2001.

REPORTING
a. Meet year end external reporting requirements and deadlines, complicated=
=20
the mid 2000 MSA/SAP conversion.

ACCOUNTING
a. Implement FAS133 with no adverse effect to income.

BUSINESS SUPPORT
a. Provide innovative accounting solutions in support of:
a1. pipeline regulatory initiatives
a2. pipeline expansions
a3. pipeline and ETS new business/deal initiatives (including divestments)
a4. unique business projects, ie. TW Navajo ROW settlement negotiations, NN=
G=20
South End opportunities
b. Develop improved upfront accounting linkage on pending ETS business=20
transactions

ORGANIZATION
a. Implement and document process and reporting improvements; realizing the=
=20
benefits of the 2000 ETS accounting functional realignment. (There are=20
opportunities in financial accounting, property accounting, reporting,=20
reconciliations/ controls, and staff development)
=20
b. Implement an ETS acounting analyst program

Patricia Wiederholt
12/05/2000 10:47 AM
My input for items I believe need to be accomplished in the year 2001:

 Improve timing of accounting close to 5th workday
 Complete refund for NBPL rate case
 Develop manageable allocation methodology for new organization structures
 Implement financial forecasting model for NBPL SFV tariff
 Establish additional Audit Committee member for NBP by June 2001 to meet n=
ew=20
audit committee requirements

These are in addition to our "standard" objectives for reporting deadlines,=
=20
financial targets, etc.

  =20
=09
=09
Here's a laundry list of various potential 2001 Goals/Objectives per Rod's=
=20
request below:

Implementation of FAS 133
Possible 3rd party refinancing of $150MM TW note to Enron Corp.
Implementation of Datamarts to replace DSS.
Implementation of Risk Management System (Lee Ferrell - Commercial)
Filing of Forms 2 using 6 mos. MSA and 6 Mos. SAP.
Completion of year 2000 audited financials using 6 Mos. MSA and 6 Mos. SAP
Progress toward resolution of TW ROW renewal issue.
Completion of NNG depreciation study in support of south end strategy
Establishment of SLA recovery mechanism through Order 637 settlement=20
discussions.
Implementation and fine-tuning of new ETS Finance organization.

1. Develop and implement a Citrus Board capital report for Phase V and VI=
=20
similar
to the current Phase IV reports and support the expansion construction team=
=20
in the   monitoring and reporting of costs, etc.

2. During the First Quarter, 2001 identify any Year End / FERC Form 2=20
reporting issues and implement solutions to meet reporting deadlines and as=
=20
necessary improve on any interim solutions prior to year end, 2001.=20

3. During the First Quarter, 2001 confirm the accuracy and FERC compliance =
of=20
the Composite Depreciation and AFUDC calculations.=20

4. Manage the quarterly CTC contract valuations (FAS 133/138) so as to=20
minimize any adverse earnings impact.

5. Support the implementation of an ETS Accounting =01&Analyst=018 Program

6. Identify and implement at least one (per department) =01&best practice=
=018=20
procedural improvement as a result of the new functional organization with=
=20
identified cost savings, efficiencies and/or revenue enhancements.

7. During the First Quarter, 2001 review the =01&Assessments=018 (Fixed=20
Distribution) in conjunction with the new organization and initiate changes=
=20
as appropriate.

Cindy Stark
12/07/2000 04:07 PM
Please disregard the "middle" message to Bill Cordes and note the below 
request from Stan for your 2001 Goals & Objectives to be received in our 
office by MONDAY, December 11.   I don't believe we've received a single one 
yet., and Stan wanted me to remind everyone.

Thanks,
Cindy

Cindy Stark
11/27/2000 12:18 PM
Hello, Bill!    This was sent out during my absence, and I see that your name 
was inadvertently omitted from the distribution.   Sorry about that!

Cindy

Stanley Horton
11/20/2000 02:19 PM
Sent by: Cindy Stark
I would like to see a first draft of the 2001 Goals & Objectives by December 
11, 2000.

I specifically would like to see goals dealing with the following:

1.) Resolution of the Navajo Right -of- way issue;
2.) Development of a specific business plan for NNG's South End;
3.) Timetable for TW's new expansion;
4.) Timetable for the completion of FGT's Phase IV, Phase V, and PhaseVI;
5.) Pipeline safety legislation;
6.) Divesting of Enron's clean fuels business;
7.) Business developments efforts;
8.) NNG's Equivalent Unit Risk Account  (how do we get our money back now !); 
and,
9.) E-Commerce Strategy.

We will discuss further at up-coming staff meetings.

This is a work in Progress.

Forgot the attachment. Here it is.

Rod Hayslett

12/12/2000 07:36 AM
Here is a start at the 2001 goals.      It will take more specifics before it 
is done, dates and measureable objectives but it is a start.     Please feel 
free to suggest changes, additions, deletions.     In the end we will turn 
this idea list into a scorecard.    I have not meant to exclude anyone, but I 
didn't get a lot of input from everyone on the beginning of the list.    
Thanks to Jim there is a longer list, than I might have started with.

Hi Felicia,

I would like to have one (1) AMEX gift certificate for $50.00 processed as 
soon as possible.

Thanks,
Rod

What is the deal? 

Hayes suggested I run by you what the possible MTM situation looks like, 
particularly since I'm
not sure I know what I am doing as regards the discount factors allowed and 
how to or whether to
account for the factor that the cash moneys don't start flowing in until 2nd 
quarter of 2002.

Here is my take: 

We are still working on the plane, and the answer is that the plane will be 
billed to the RC reserving it for the flight.    If commercial wants to take 
it to a lower level than that it will be up to them to do so.     It will 
take some actual doing on our side to make this happen, but it can be 
done.     The budget will be taken care of in Planning as we go through the 
year.      From an ETS point of view all of the plane is in Commercial or 
Executive (Stan) and so it should not be a problem to track the budget.   
Tracy has the point on this one.

Jim Saunders:    What do you know about the other comments?

Mike McGowan
12/12/2000 10:16 AM
Rod--

I never heard back from you on this airplane accounting issue for year 2001.  
Any thoughts on timing as to who we can work with to finalize by year end?   
Can we work with Dave Waymire here in Omaha??

Also,  there was an article in  this past  Sunday's World Herald that   FASB 
has reversed its position on merger accounting and will not require firms to 
amortize Goodwill  over time and  write it off against current income of a 
merged company.  In addition, the new plan would eliminate the  "pooling of 
interest"  restrictions and allow merged companies to sell off unwanted 
assets prior to the two year waing period now required.  I'm not sure if this 
revision would be applicable to mergers which occurred before this FASB 
revision or not.  

Do you have any insights on this???

Thank You.

Mike McGowan
Mike McGowan
11/21/2000 11:40 AM
Rod - we have discussed the accounting for plane uasage on year 2001 and have 
determined that  the actual trip costs will be billed direct to the user's 
RC.  However,  the 2001 budget costs for the plane have been included in Dan 
McCarty's executive RC budget.  Thus, we will have to develop a procedure to 
charge the RC for atctual costs, but credit the plane budget and maintain 
some control as to the overall status of the budget.

Who would you like me to work with to develop/coordinate these procedures?

Thanks!

Do you have the same for the income side?

Gregory Adams
03/14/2000 08:26 AM
Rod,

Here are the credit rating ratios you requested for evaluating a potential 
deal.

In the spreadsheet I have given you two sets of figures for the year 2000 -- 
one set represents what was shown to the Board of Directors in December, the 
second set is the current set of "rating agency targets" for the year.

Please call me if you have any questions -- or need assistance formulating an 
analysis.

Greg Adams

FYI.   You got it!
John Gillespie
12/12/2000 09:03 AM
Rod,

After receiving feedback from both yourself and Phil Lowry through George 
Wasaff, we will cancel this meeting. Originally Peter Buettgen and I were  
anticipating the need to share the details of our process assessment strategy 
with you prior to our kickoff. However, it has been pointed out that Morris 
has been identified as the lead player and has responsibility for all 
decision making. Therefore we will be working directly with Morris and will 
not burden you with details unless Morris feels appropriate.

Thank you for your support and commitment in the completion of the iBuyit 
process assessment.
John

New meeting request from Rod Hayslett

  12/13/2000 08:30 AM Local Time
  12/13/2000 09:00 AM Local Time

Title: John Gillespie re IBUYIT (here)
Location:  -No room information available-

Chair:  Rod Hayslett/FGT/Enron

To (required): Morris Brassfield/OTS/Enron@ENRON, John Gillespie/Corp/Enron
cc (optional): Kathy Campos/GPGFIN/Enron

John: Morris can't make this time and he needs to be in it.

Morris and Elaine are responsible for this area of the ETS world and as such 
should be there and hopefully will know what this is about.     I have seen 
nothing on this proposal and probably will not be available, as I have a PRC 
on that date, out of the office.
 

Kim Pattison
12/12/2000 09:02 AM
Rod,

Are you attending this meeting with Morris and Elaine or just yourself?

Thanks,

Kim
68301

Rod Hayslett

12/11/2000 04:21 PM
FYI
Kim Pattison
12/11/2000 04:16 PM
A meeting concerning the above subject is schedule for 2pm with Stan Horton 
on Thursday, December 14th.  Please try to arrange your schedules to attend, 
as Stan's schedule is not flexible.  

Please confirm your attendance by email or voice mail to me by tomorrow, so I 
can provide Cindy Stark with a headcount.

Thank you so much!

Kim Pattison
68301

Ultimately more definition, but for now, it's a good start.

James Saunders
12/12/2000 08:47 AM
Regarding the preliminary list, generally, 
are you "ok" with what we sent you?  
Or, were you looking for more stretch or creativity????

I'm fine.

Michael Ratner
12/12/2000 08:39 AM
I do not see why not.  I would prefer that we have shipped the computers 
before there is any announcement.  Do you have an exact date?  If your 
announcement is before we actually ship the computers, which hopefully will 
be this week, then I would just say something like NALMP has established a 
new relationship with Enron Transportation Services, the pipeline subsidiary 
of the Enron Corporation.  If your announcement is after we ship then I would 
feel more comfortable mentioning some of the details.

Let me know what you think.

Michael

Mmvmunson@aol.com on 12/11/2000 09:29:27 PM
 Michael-- 

??????At this time of year, I usually send out an update to NALMP supporters 
and donors about what we have been up to in the past year and what lies 
ahead. ?Do you think that I can mention this pending project with Enron? 

??????Mary

I would like to see the results of that method before we just agreed to do so.

James Saunders
12/12/2000 08:26 AM
I proposed that we allocate residual costs using a documented ETS "modified 
Massachusetts formula"
I think Tracy was "ok" with that approach.  
Rod?

JAMES 
WEITEKAMP        
12/11/2000 04:54 PM

Jim - Has there been any determination on spreading the SAP costs to the 
BUs?  We need to load the 2001 plan into SAP soon.

Rod Hayslett

11/15/2000 06:59 AM
Yes.      Let's ask Jim for a recommendation as to the method of allocation. 

JAMES 
WEITEKAMP        
11/14/2000 03:46 PM

How do you want to allocate to the BUs the SAP costs that Company 0366 
receives from Corp?

 Brasher  Excellent
 Clements Strong
 Fenstad Satisfactory

These are my thoughts based upon general knowledge of the year and some 
specifics for the last few months.     A short discussion with Phil might 
lead me to believe that he would think I might be being too generous on 
Dave.     What are your thoughts?

FYI

Steve Hotte
12/12/2000 02:09 PM
The following change in policy to e-mail and voicemail has just come to our=
=20
attention.  This change in policy limits our exposure.  This type of exposu=
re=20
was discussed at this years management conference in San Antonio, listing=
=20
examples with Microsoft.  The largest impact of this change is your "sent=
=20
mail" retention being reduced to 30 days from the current 365 days.  You wi=
ll=20
note that if you move your sent mail to a folder it will be retained for an=
=20
entire year which should minimize this impact.  The rationale for the=20
continued longevity in folders is that if you physically move mail to a=20
folder you are making a conscious decision to keep that document.

If you have not dealt with folders please give me a call and I can assist y=
ou=20
on their creation and on moving the documents into them.  Unless I hear a=
=20
concern, this new policy will be implemented on Friday, December 15th.  Our=
=20
help desk will be sending a message to the entire team tomorrow to notify=
=20
them of this action.

=09Mark Frevert@ENRON
=09Sent by: Enron Announcements@ENRON
=0911/07/2000 09:44 PM
=09=09=20
As a reminder, ENA=01,s policy regarding retention of electronic mail, incl=
uding=20
Lotus Notes mail, Internet e-mail, cc:mail and voicemail is as follows:

Message Location    Maximum Retention

Inbox       30 Days
Message Log/Sent Mail   30 Days
Trash       Rollover from Inbox for 15 days
Bulletin Boards     30 Days
Folders/Archives    E-mails placed in Folders or Archives =01) one year
Voicemail     90 days

E-mail and voicemail older than the maximum retention will be purged=20
automatically by IT, which is responsible for monitoring compliance with th=
is=20
policy.  Any exception to this policy requires approval by Mark Haedicke or=
=20
Richard Sanders.

Mark Frevert and Mark Haedicke

The cash flows for 2001 are currently locked, but if we get a chance to 
adjust for carry forwards we will.   Worst case is that the dollars will have 
to be reapproved as outside of the budget.     Likely that we will be able to 
do some internal moving of dollars to compensate for this, but not guarenteed.

Steve Gilbert
12/12/2000 01:55 PM
While talking with Kim and Martha a question was asked  on capital budgeting 
for Revenue Management..  The question has to do with carrying over 
previously  approved dollars from 2000 to 2001.

The facts ($millions) :

2000 Revenue Management Budget:

$5.7 - Original RM Phase one approval
$(1.0)  In July 00, this amount was approved to spend in 2001 (in the 2001 
budget as a line item)
$4.7    Expected expenditures in 2000 for Phase one.

$(1.0) Current assessment of money not needed for Phase one deliverables 
(estimated, may still change)
$3.7     Amount  approved  with current work-orders
$  .8     Possible amount to be carried over and spent in 2001 
$2.9     Phase one amount to be spent in 2000

2001 Revenue Management Budget:

$ 1.0   Phase one approved carryover  (in 2001 budget)
$  .8  Estimated additional carryover   (not currently in 2001 budget)
$3.0 Phase two   ( in 2001 budget  in the Marketing Pool)
$ 4.8  Total to be  spent in 2000

Question:  
Since the $.8 was approved and is covered in the existing work-orders, can 
this be additive to the 2001 budget without any further approval - even 
though it is not currently a line item in the 2001 budget?  Or does the  $.8 
have to be offset against the Marketing Pool?

If this $.8 does go against the Marketing pool of $15.0 million, will the 
revenues generated from Revenue Management  reduce the revenues generated 
from the pool?  In other words If the capital dollars from the pool are 
reduced because of RM will the revenues also be reduced?

Any idea on when I can get your info?

	
	

The Market Service Team has reviewed their requirements for the proposed 
relocation of ETS within the Enron building.  Under this plan, Gas Control 
would not move from their current location and the Market Service Teams would 
be in close proximity to Transactional Marketing and Facility Planning.  
Julia's intent is to have discussion with Danny to make sure the 
organizations are aligned to support the commercial teams. 

Please let me know if you have any questions.
Donna

For Kathy:    How many have been submitted?
Rod Hayslett

11/14/2000 07:20 AM
Please respond to Kathy Campos who will collect our data and work with Pam to 
develop the plan.
   
Pamela Daily
11/03/2000 06:58 PM
To begin the process of thinking about what is needed to plan our space for 
the future, we need to pull together some very simple information from each 
of you.   Please provide the following to Rod Hayslett or to me as soon as 
possible:

Number of work spaces by category:
 Office
 Cubicle/work station - high walls
 Cubicle/work station - low walls

Number of additional work spaces (visitors, auditors, etc.)

Number of Conference/Team Rooms:
 Small (4-6 person)
 Medium (7-12 person)
 Large (more than 12 - please specify)

File Rooms: Specify the linear footage of file space required and/or list 
special requirements for maps, etc.

Special:  Model Office
  Computer Rooms/Cold Rooms
  Map Tables and/or walls
  Writable walls
  Video Conference Equipment/Connections
  Other

Also, please identify one person from your organization that can be used for 
coordination purposes. For instance, Rod Hayslett will assign Kathy Campos 
for his section.

Thanks for your help in this effort!

FYI.    This close date is of large significance to GPG as we are going to be 
asking management to wait an extra week for monthly info that ties out to the 
financials.     This variance from what we thought was a "Common Design" is a 
huge deal, in fact the agreed upon close timing was a major consideration in 
getting agreement within GPG to go forward as it was an improvement that we 
could see had value.   I agreed to and "stacked hands" with all on the 
"Common Design", yet somehow there has been a failure to deliver the "Common 
Design".   I just want to make sure that the two of you are aware of my 
position on this issue.
 
Michael Sullivan
06/21/2000 02:14 PM
I think Steve was planning to add my comments on impact of prolonging GPG 
close to the risk document, but  I did not see it in the document I edited 
yesterday.  To restate, it needs to be noted under org impact that GPG's 
close is going from 5 to 8+ days which is unacceptable.  We have the 
impression that there is not sufficient desire/potential across the BUs to do 
what is necessary to get it down to the committed 3 days that we all agreed 
to at the ASE.  We view this as a showstopper and will hold the  project and 
COE and our own team accountable for meeting that committment by the end of 
the year if not sooner.  It seems like we should already have a plan in place 
on how we are going to achieve that.  This was a design signoff exception too.

Also, info for risk document below.  My question below was taken from the 
risk doc and responded to for actions that have been taken..

If you can, please update for these two items before next distribution

Thanks

FYI.     This was the detail provided to Sarabeth.
12/11/2000 10:07 AM
John Jesse

To recap our recent discussion, my understanding was that you were looking 
for an Enron or NBP entity to serve as the lessor in a lease financing 
transaction that would be offered as an option in the pending EAMR bid for 
the Trailblazer construction project.  Since such transaction would need to 
be priced based upon the credit rating of the entity or the sponsors 
(depending upon the structure) the expected returns will not justify the 
balance sheet impact on Northern Border Partners if this entity were to 
function as lessor.  Furthermore, I have assumed that this conclusion also 
holds true from Enron's perspective given their strategy of reserving balance 
sheet capacity for higher return projects.

Since the bid parameters do not specify a lease requirement, Trailblazer may 
already have funding in place.  If not, EAMR could insert language in the bid 
that they or their designee would arrange lease financing for the project 
upon selection of EAMR as the winning bidder.  At that point, we would work 
with commercial banks or major leasing companies to develop a cost-effective 
financing transaction.

I hope this addresses your questions regarding the feasibility of such a 
transaction, but please call me at x7843 in Omaha if you wish to discuss 
further.  Good luck with your bid!

FYI.
    
Brasher  Excellent
Clements Strong
Fenstad Satisfactory

12/12/2000 02:26 PM
Morris Brassfield
Morris Brassfield
Morris Brassfield
12/12/2000 02:26 PM
12/12/2000 02:26 PM
From casual observations, I cannot dispute your ratings.   I do feel that 
Dave needs to step up to the plate and start delivering some new and creative 
solutions for outstanding issues.  He has the capabilities.   It seems he 
tends to manage too much by wandering around and not taking the lead.

I fully support Barney's rating, but could see both Dave and Larry's ratings 
being on the lower edge of the recommended ratings.

I will do all I can to shore up the organization by placing some expectations 
for improvements before the whole group and dividing up the accountabilities 
accordingly.

I fully support what you have recommended.

Rod Hayslett

12/12/2000 01:53 PM
	

 Brasher  Excellent
 Clements Strong
 Fenstad Satisfactory

These are my thoughts based upon general knowledge of the year and some 
specifics for the last few months.     A short discussion with Phil might 
lead me to believe that he would think I might be being too generous on 
Dave.     What are your thoughts?

What were the individual participation rates by entity?

	
	Shirley Jo Wilson
	
	12/12/2000
	
Before I answer this email, thought I would confirm with you how we intend 
collecting and distributing the $180K  rebate for the pre-buy program.  The 
methanol plant contributed $300K toward the $1.500K goal.

Thanks,

Shirley Jo Dickens-Wilson
Director - Process and Operating Equipment
Global Strategic Sourcing
713-646-7545
shirley.jo.wilson@enron.com
	Kerry Roper
	12/12/2000 08:29 AM
		 
How will we recieve this rebate on our books.  Will it be credited to the 
same place the charge hits?
Stephen Busick
12/11/2000 02:18 PM
Stephen Busick
08/09/2000 03:16 PM
Shirley,

Now that we have discussed it, I understand sufficiently to be confident that 
it's good all around for us to participate.  It will alter our procurement 
timing a little if we do delay our overhauls to next year (we would be buying 
the long lead, high dollar stuff this quarter even if we do delay), but it 
seems clear that it is in Enron's best interest to make those slight changes. 

I will let our controller and Finance Manager know what's up just to keep 
them informed.  They may be helpful to us in figuring out how to get the 
rebate to come into GPG through Enron Methanol Company or Enron Clean Fuels.  
I will admit to very limited knowlege of how those transactions take place.

I will also let Debbie Hinkle (our buyer, 281/882-4232) know to expect your 
call about prices we have been receiving from Cooper.

Thanks again, 

Steve

	Shirley Jo Wilson
	08/09/2000 09:28 AM
	
Steve,

Per my voice mail today.

We would like to offer your operation the opportunity to receive 12% rebate 
on parts purchased from Cooper.  We have prepaid $1.5MM for parts and will 
receive a 12% rebate.

Other parts of GPG have used about $600K of the pre-buy and we would like to 
role your shutdown requirements into the program.

Please call me as soon as possible and I will answer any questions you have.

Look forward to talking to you. 
Regards,
Shirley Jo Dickens-Wilson
713-646-7545

This is an FYI, but I think that Insurance probably fits into Jerry's world.

Phil Lowry
12/13/2000 07:18 AM
Attached is list of the outstanding insurance claims provided to us by Risk 
Management.  As I indicated to Rod yesterday, I have been informed that the 
premiums that were paid this year were $15,000,000 and given the claims 
submitted at $43,000,000, Corp is looking for a way to mitigate anticipated 
rising premium costs.   They are looking very hard at Hawkin's Audit Program 
to help them out.  As this list indicates, International assets should bear 
the brunt of future costs.  The Transwestern train derailment will be about 
$700,000 ($200k for repair and $500k for buisness interruption), both of 
which will ulitmately be reimbursed by the railroad.

I can't make it.     I have another PRC to do.

John Keiser
12/13/2000 09:29 AM
Non-replies at this time:  Saunders, Hayslett, Lev

I think we had Afflerbach, Jolibois and Keiser as drivers.  I can take 
three.  Please contact the others for rides as soon as possible.  I will be 
parked in front of building at 11:15 am to pick up.  Maggie took her group to 
the same restaurant on Monday and was quite pleased.

John Keiser
12/05/2000 04:16 PM
	

In Between Holidays, Post Budget, Post Election, Post Ballot Recount(s), 
Pre-Election Results Determination, Pre-Reorganization Celebratory 
Extravaganza:

How about lunch?

Place:  Maggiano's Little Italy, 2019 Post Oak Blvd., between Westheimer and 
San Felipe, on east side of street.

Thursday, December 14th
11:30 am
We need a few drivers.

Please RSVP to me!

Will he be having one the first tuesday of January, 1/2/01?

Sharron Westbrook @ ENRON

12/13/2000 11:14 AM
The CAO Staff Meeting scheduled for Tuesday, Dec. 19 has been canceled.

I will have both Jim Saunders and Jerry Peters in attendance.

Cindy Stark
12/13/2000 01:52 PM
Thanks for the "heads-up", Julie!   Stan would like for both Danny and Rod to 
send subs to our staff meeting on January 8th, and please let me know who 
they will be.

Thanks,
Cindy

Julie Armstrong
12/13/2000 09:38 AM
Cindy:

Please note that I just received information from Cindy Olson on the Year-End 
2000 VP and MD PRC meeting.  It is scheduled for Monday, January 8th and 
Danny is required to attend as he serves on that committee.  Danny would not 
be able to attend Stan's staff meeting.  Thanks.

FYI
	Dortha Gray
	12/13/2000 02:18 PM
	
Find attached (i) a schedule detailing draft distribution dates and (ii) the 
responsibility matrix for the 2000 Enron Annual Report.  The responsibility 
matrix lists the responsible business unit contact, a corporate contact as 
well as due dates.  

Gary

Approved.

Tracy Geaccone
12/13/2000 04:33 PM
For your approval.

Thanks

Tracy
Kathy Campos
12/13/2000 03:47 PM
Tracy, 

Attached is your expense report, please review and forward for approval.

Thanks,
Kathy

Approved.

Kathy Campos
12/13/2000 03:56 PM
Rod,

Attached is my expense report, please review and approve.

Thanks.
Kathy

I haven't heard back from Rebecca on this, but I'm sure she is busy.   Do 
either of you care to answer my question below.

Rod Hayslett

07/20/2000 12:44 PM
I'm not sure what you have heard back from the crew in Bristol/Bath, but I 
found them to be very interested in achieving maximum success.    There was a 
lot of learning on my part, but I'm now more convinced than ever that Wessex 
is very much like our gas pipeline business.    Even to the fact that the 
internal regulatory types don't believe the regulators will approve it.     I 
have offered continuing assistance as needed (in fact have a conference call 
setup for tomorrow).    I was able to give them the benefit of my experiences 
and tried to create analogies to our experiences here.   In some cases I'm 
sure it made a difference, in others the group may actually be in front of 
some of our thinking.    I think I can see an opportunity to expand the 
thinking on both sides of "the pond" in the regulated businesses  with just 
some simple contacts and have promised to help them at least start 
conversations with more counterparts in the pipeline group.    

Let me know how you want me to charge you the travel costs.     I can submit 
the claim here and bill you or I can submit the claim to you.

I didn't forget.  

   

Do you still have the instructions for the wire to Compass Bank in the 
files?   I would like it wired there.

Rod,
we executed those shares yesterday at 85.1875.
call when you need me to wire.
Erik

Here is the info:
Bank:   Compass Bank
Transit #: 113 010 547
Account #: 0600 1564
For credit to the account of Roderick J. and Kathleen R. Hayslett

Thanks.   I would like this done as soon as possible as I will be needing the 
funds at the end of the week.
Rod Hayslett

unfortunately, i do not have those instructions in my files. could you please 
offer them again.

Do you still have the instructions for the wire to Compass Bank in the
files?   I would like it wired there.

Rod,
we executed those shares yesterday at 85.1875.
call when you need me to wire.
Erik

Consulting Group that may be able to help with SAP stuff.

We won't have a permanent place until sometime after the end of December.

Rod,

This is a good opportunity to make the consolidation we discussed last week.  Property Services is indicting the move needs to be completed in two weeks.

Keith Dodson

Steve,

Enron Property Services may need us to move Accounting from the 9th to the 8th floor - this is due to the relocation of personnel from 21&22 to 9&10.  They are to get back to me today or early next week with more details.  Do we know already or would it be possible to expedite the answer to Accounting's long term home from an organizational standpoint?  Depending on the answer maybe it would be possible to move them to their 'final' home now (if it is outside of EEOS) instead of moving them twice.

Please advise,
Marilyn

What's the first day you have free for lunch?

Hi Rod,

I know you will be looking into cost and support issues relating to the services we get from Enron Global Finance.  I am of the opinion that the dedication of a talented Global Finance professional will provide us with a much better work product (service) at a significantly lower cost, if we can get EGF to allocate 100% of the cost of the employee and eliminate their allocation to us entirely.

I would like to suggest that you consider Dan Castagnola as the dedicated resource.  Not only is Dan very familiar with all or a majority of our projects from both the commercial as well as the finance perspective, but in my experience working with him, he is an extremely creative and talented business person.  I would feel very fortunate to have Dan on my team.

Just a recommendation ... 

Thanks, Mariella

ps: Jeff has worked with Dan so he can also give you his independent perspective.

Do you have a history with Hughes?

Rod:

I think it may eventually be appropriate, but I would prefer not to do it r=
ight away.  My team has had a bad experience with Global Finance over the y=
ears.  They have always had an arrogant attitude and often did deals involv=
ing our assets without consulting or even involving the commercial team res=
ponsible for the asset.  Kevin is going to need to overcome this and demons=
trate that he is coming in to behave differently.  It is very important to =
me to have a centralized analytical team so that I know there is consistenc=
y, independence and thoroughness in the analytics related to the EGAS busin=
esses.  I have learned the hard way that analytical groups under the contro=
l of a commercial team sometimes produce lower quality results. I also like=
 to have a single point of contact for other parts of the Enron organizatio=
n that want or need models, valuations and analytics.  Again, historically =
I have seen disastrous results when there are multiple sources of informati=
on relating to any given project.

I do think it makes sense to describe Louie Fischer's relationship to Kevin=
 as a dotted line and then we can reevaluate over time.  I would also sugge=
st that prior to or immediately following an announcement you have Kevin go=
 meet with each manager of a significant business (namely Pete and Mariella=
) to introduce himself and describe how he is going to fit into the organiz=
ation.  I also think he needs to make that introduction interactive and do =
some listening not just talking.  He will ultimately find them more coopera=
tive and trusting if he makes an effort to assure them that he is part of t=
he team and not just a finance guy trying to get his name on a deal and ear=
n a big bonus.

Jim

I am getting ready to announce that I am bringing Kevin Howard into EGS as =
Vice President of Finance and Transaction Support.    Thinking about the cu=
rrent organization, do think it appropriate to consider putting Ms Fischer =
in his organization?   The kind of things she is doing for you currently ar=
e similar to the kind of things we are going to have Kevin working with Cor=
p on.   I will be putting into his organization the economic analytic talen=
ts and special projects people from the pipeline group as well as some othe=
rs.    We will not be charging out these costs into the specific commercial=
 units, but instead expect them to generate the ideas and value to pay for =
themselves.    His group will be providing services to all, but I am willin=
g to carve out some priorities.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Understood, that's what I thought this was.

Rod,

The primary change to the Plan is to add the ability to grant Phantom LP Units. Right now the Phantom Units under the Plan are valued based upon a general partner distribution rate divided by the distribution yield, which depending upon what assumptions are used, makes these phantom units quite expensive. It was decided that the grants should be based upon the Common Unit price and not the general partner valuation. I am not sure of the breakdown of employees per NP and NBP that have elected to defer bonuses into this Plan to date. Benefits have asked that we have the changes put into place by Friday in order to incorporate them into the year-end deferral package offered to employees. If you need financial projections, I will have Jerry provide those. Hope this addresses your concerns.  If not, I will be happy to provide more.  Janet

Can someone send us a synopsis of the changes in the plan and what the expected impact on NP and NBP services comapny is? 

Drew and Rod,
I thought that I would give you a heads-up that a Unanimous Consent is being circulated for your signature. Northern Plains and NBP Services Corp are the sponsors of the Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. We have been working with the benefits group and Pat Mackin and have now prepared an Amended and Restated Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. The Consent authorizes the adoption and execution of that Plan. I have initialed the Consent for your execution. Should you need any further explanation, please let me know. Thanks.  Janet

FYI

>  <<...OLE_Obj...>> 
> E-Notes provides regular briefings on new developments in global energy
> and public utility law.
> 
> October 31, 2001
> 
> RISK CONSIDERATIONS FOR ENRON COUNTERPARTIES:
> FAILURE TO EXERCISE RIGHTS MAY CONSTITUTE WAIVER
> 
> 
> 	The reduction by Moody's Investor Service Inc. of Enron Corp.'s
> senior unsecured long-term debt to Baa2 from Baa1 this week may be an
> issue of concern for companies that are counterparts to Enron obligations.
> This downgrade may have immediate consequences under existing transactions
> with Enron given that its current credit rating is now two levels above
> non-investment grade.  Any further downgrade into non-investment grade
> levels could seriously affect relationships between counterparties and
> Enron, and possibly Enron counterparties and their counterparties. 
> 
> 	Enron is the principal in nearly one-quarter of all electricity and
> natural gas trades in the United States.  For Enron's power and gas
> trading counterparties, a credit event such as a downgrade by Moody's may
> precipitate certain obligations under the terms of their trading
> transactions.  For example, any downgrade, not just a downgrade resulting
> in a sub-investment grade rating, may entitle a counterparty to require
> Enron to provide additional credit in support of Enron's purchase
> obligations.  Counterparties should examine all power, gas or other
> commodity purchase and sale documentation to confirm whether they possess
> this right.  The failure to exercise this right may constitute a waiver
> and foreclose access to critical performance and payment assurance,
> threatening to alter the risk assessment and mitigation considerations
> upon which the transactions were originally based.  Furthermore, a failure
> to declare a credit event or default against Enron could cause a default
> on the part of the counterparty itself in collateral or ancillary
> arrangements, such as its financing.  The potential for a domino effect,
> causing defaults or credit events in a series of transactions, is
> considerable.
> 
> 	It is uncertain whether Enron's efforts to obtain new lines of
> credit will be sufficient to overcome the current difficulties.
> Regardless, it is prudent to review the terms of existing transactions
> with Enron or its affiliates, including any guarantees or other forms of
> corporate credit support.  It is also advisable to examine the terms of
> transactions dependent on, or otherwise ancillary to, transactions with
> Enron or its affiliates to avoid any consequential effects of the Enron
> credit ratings downgrade.
> 
> 	For further information on how Enron's current financial situation
> could impact your firm's transaction risk profile, please contact Michael
> Zimmer at 202.452.7055 or michael.j.zimmer@bakernet.com, Jonathan W.
> Gottlieb at 202.452.7084 or jonathan.w.gottlieb@bakernet.com or Samir
> Desai at 202.452.7057 or samir.s.desai@bakernet.com . 
> 
> Michael J. Zimmer
> Jonathan W. Gottlieb
> Samir S. Desai
>  
> 
> 
> 
> __________________________________________________________________________
> __
> E-Notes is a publication of Baker & McKenzie.  It does not constitute
> legal advice or a legal opinion on any specific facts or circumstances.
> The contents are intended as general information only.  You are urged to
> consult your attorney concerning your situation and specific legal
> questions you may have.  For further information on the subjects discussed
> in E-Notes, contact Michael J. Zimmer,
> mailto:michael.j.zimmer@bakernet.com or
> Jonathan W. Gottlieb, mailto:jonathan.w.gottlieb@bakernet.com.
> 
> For more information about BAKER & McKENZIE and our global energy and
> utility practice, click on our electronic business card:
>  <<...OLE_Obj...>> 
> 
> or visit our website at <http://www.bakerinfo.com/Practice
> Areas/nabfmp/energy/!viewme.htm> .
> 
> 
> 

FYI

Jim, thanks for the note.  Please forward this on to Clint Walden, Rick Causey and Rod Hayslett (and anyone else you think needs this information)

I have a couple of comments on the conditions below that were discussed on the phone but were not included in the list below.  We would expect a
representation from the Board as well as outside legal counsel on point #4 below.  Also, I assume this review is a condition precedent in the debt
documents.  Enron should be aware that there may be issues that arise that do not allow us to complete our work in the timetable necessary and should
consider whether wording the loan documents relating to this cp should be modified to describe the review as something that is a condition precendent
"if it is professionally able to be completed."   Also, all of these conditions assume there are no financial obligations from the entities in
the reviews from or to Enron corp.  If so, those contractual relationships will need to be evaluted to determine if "overhang" issues combined with
the financial obligations might preclude us from completing our review.   This is a high priority item.  I would ask that the company assist us in
immediately identifying and evaluating those financial obligations, if any,  to determine if significant issues exist.  We can get started now on that.
Please call Heather Mueck and Chris Herbold.  I would like to get that identification work completed by end of business tomorrow.  Heather and
Gerrad will be leading the review work and Chris will be assisting also.

Overall debt questions.  We need to understand terms, conditions and debt documents.  Who has these? We are ready to start reviewing today.

Financial statements and review work. What periods are going to be included in the documents? The comment below says quarterly.  Which quarters?
Year-to-date? Comparison to prior years? We would expect a full set of financial statements with footnotes for all periods presented (balance
sheets, income statements and cash flows?   Who is drafting the footnote that describes the overhang issues? This is a high priority item that will
get much review and scrutiny. l would like to get the Company's signed off footnote disclosure on the "overhang" issues tomorrow.  Also, we will need
immediate access to the financials and your people to answer questions. When can we get the financials that will be included in the deal.  I assume
Enron personnel will be available to answer questions 24/7 beginning today to complete this work in the necessary timeframe?

I know these are many questions.  More to come I am sure.  But I also want to get started and focused on time consuming issues.  We will be
determining our expanded scope procedures that are referred to below. 

fyi

we have provided draft third quarter nng and tw financials to gary peng
and clint walden at ene

>  -----Original Message-----
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

How do we get this loop closed?     Is this a meeting?

i have yet to hear from rex rogers (for obvious reasons), and have yet to get satisfactory (to Andersen) closure on the MTBE tax
issue

What can we do about getting this done?

If you want to have a "snowball" chance of getting this done this year, we need sign-off on the acctg comments.

Still want to try and get it done this year. Per Stan this am. Cash is king for now and we need thepricing to get the rest of the cash.   If it has to be pushed to next year, that works, but if it can be done it needs to be.

Let Warren and Tom know that this is a critical. 

i am attempting to coordinate a tax w Roger W, Warren Schick, and Tom Meers

How do we get this loop closed?     Is this a meeting?

i have yet to hear from rex rogers (for obvious reasons), and have yet to get satisfactory (to Andersen) closure on the MTBE tax
issue

What can we do about getting this done?

If you want to have a "snowball" chance of getting this done this year, we need sign-off on the acctg comments.

Still want to try and get it done this year. Per Stan this am. Cash is king for now and we need thepricing to get the rest of the cash.   If it has to be pushed to next year, that works, but if it can be done it needs to be.

713 646-3708

I do have a copy, although it is not all in electronic form.  I am happy to fax if you give me a number.

Do you have a copy of your response?

Rod-

This is the AA memo they discussed with us last Friday.  I have prepared a package to respond to all the points.  I plan to send it to them tomorrow morning.  I have discussed the package and its contents with Rick and Rodney.  Let me know if you have any questions.

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Attached please find a summary memo which details our review of Azurix's
valuation analyses (DCF and market approaches) related to possible goodwill
impairment at Wessex.  We look forward to discussing these points at 3 PM
today.

(See attached file: Memo re Azurix (Wessex) Review.doc)

Ken
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >>  - Memo re Azurix (Wessex) Review.doc << File: Memo re Azurix (Wessex) Review.doc >> 

I would be happy to do so.   Do you have a preference, or Lawrence do you have a preference as to how this is handled? 

Should someone from the pipes be in the bank meeting, for moral support, if not for the steel.

Rod,

I spoke to Jack Insinga of Standard Chartered yesterday. He specifically needs to speak to someone with Enron who can address the EOTT situation from Enron's perspective.  I told hiim I thought you were the best person for this discussion. We are having a bank meeting next Friday a.m. , November 9th and perhaps sometime prior to that would be a good time to meet.

All of the banks are looking for more information before they will do anything for us so realistically I am not optimistic that BNP Paribas will change their credit view at this time.  Hopefully after the banks have had time to digest the bank meeting information, credit committees will calm down a bit.

Thanks, Kelly

FYI

Rod I do not have Kelly Boots e-mail address and am traveling today without a phone directory... but I wanted to share or at least ask that we treat Standard Chartered real nice as we go through this crisis.  These guys are stepping up for us in every way....they (along with ING) are 100% behind us and are putting their money on it.  Also BNP Pays Bas is having an awful time with their credit committee...the business people have approved this and do not feel that Enron's problem effects us but the credit committee is not so forgiving.  If Kelly or anyone can do anything to help Paysbas in this situation it would be greatly appreciated.   My account executive there is Lincoln Payton and Marci Weiss...

Would you be so kind as to pass this along to Kelly or anyone else that you feel appropriate?
Jack Insigna just called me and he has gotten approval from his credit officer to do:

		Apache 
		J. Cleo Thompson
		Newfield Exlporation
		W.C. Miller 

jc 

Josie Castrejana
Director - Credit/Finance
Ph.: 713/993--5285
Fax: 713/402-2886

Do you have his number?

Rod,

I spoke to Jack Insinga of Standard Chartered yesterday. He specifically needs to speak to someone with Enron who can address the EOTT situation from Enron's perspective.  I told hiim I thought you were the best person for this discussion. We are having a bank meeting next Friday a.m. , November 9th and perhaps sometime prior to that would be a good time to meet.

All of the banks are looking for more information before they will do anything for us so realistically I am not optimistic that BNP Paribas will change their credit view at this time.  Hopefully after the banks have had time to digest the bank meeting information, credit committees will calm down a bit.

Thanks, Kelly

FYI

Rod I do not have Kelly Boots e-mail address and am traveling today without a phone directory... but I wanted to share or at least ask that we treat Standard Chartered real nice as we go through this crisis.  These guys are stepping up for us in every way....they (along with ING) are 100% behind us and are putting their money on it.  Also BNP Pays Bas is having an awful time with their credit committee...the business people have approved this and do not feel that Enron's problem effects us but the credit committee is not so forgiving.  If Kelly or anyone can do anything to help Paysbas in this situation it would be greatly appreciated.   My account executive there is Lincoln Payton and Marci Weiss...

Would you be so kind as to pass this along to Kelly or anyone else that you feel appropriate?
Jack Insigna just called me and he has gotten approval from his credit officer to do:

		Apache 
		J. Cleo Thompson
		Newfield Exlporation
		W.C. Miller 

jc 

Josie Castrejana
Director - Credit/Finance
Ph.: 713/993--5285
Fax: 713/402-2886

Was there a plan here, like you guys decided to not pay, or was this just overlooked?

just as an fyi.

Every time I think we're bringing closure to IT expenses related to Azurix another item to discuss/debate turns up...

Scott,the information on the Ariba invoice follows.  We don't physically have the invoice here but the vendor is inquiring on payment.

OM0007622 dated 02/22/01 due 03/24/01 $83,000.00  The invoice was sent to
Randy Dutton WaterDesk Corp. 333 Clay Street
Suite 1000 Houston, TX  77002-7293.

The contact at Ariba is:
Lisa Kahn
Ariba Inc.
Credit Analyst
650-390-4268

Thanks

Please forward to Scott for review.  How much is the invoice for and when was it dated?

Steve, Ariba has invoices still open related to the Waterdesk Marketplace.  Do you know if there are any points of contact that can address Ariba's invoices?

Thanks

Raul,

I believe all the WaterDesk folks are gone. I would suggest getting in touch with someone within EGS group. I recall the WaterDesk folks believing they would not pay Ariba for this as their marketplace has shut down. I don't know if contractually they have this right. Maybe Mike Sullivan can help.

Sorry.
John

John, Do you know who took over the Waterdesk stuff for Azurix?  Ariba is calling to get their invoices paid.  The invoice is not in iPayit but Ariba doesn't know who to contact on it.  Any ideas?

Raul,
Need your help on this,  I have no idea if we indeed are working with Azurix invoices.  Maybe you know of a contact that we can ask or forward this issue to.  

Let me know.

Letty

Thanks -- I have no idea who at Azurix would be resonsible for this.

Hal,

Your name was provided to me from our records.  I am looking for payment
status on an outstanding invoice which is for WaterDesk Corporation.  Enron
purchased WaterDesk in December 2000.  The invoice is for 2nd year license
of Dynamic Trade software.  The invoice information is:

OM0007622 dated 02/22/01 due 03/24/01 $83,000.00  The invoice was sent to
Randy Dutton WaterDesk Corp. 333 Clay Street
Suite 1000 Houston, TX  77002-7293.

If you are not the correct person to contact, please provide me with a
contact name, phone #, & email address.

I look forward to your response.

Thank you,

Lisa Kahn
Ariba Inc.
Credit Analyst
650-390-4268

Yes, my mistake.

Rod, I noticed that Caroline was not invited.  Should she be?

The consensus is now for an am meeting.     I will have Kathy Campos, my assistant, begin to set things up.    For those out of town, you can consider attending via the telephone and if Kathy can get it set up, we will have a video conference call as well.

I would like to have a meeting on October 31st (maybe later if that date won't work), either in the AM or the PM, but probably about 3 hours or so.    I would like to discuss organizations and how we are going to provide the support the EGS organization requires both at Stan's level and at each level in the organization.    I would also like to discuss the top 3-5 concerns you have for your business and your people.   You should decide if there are people in your organization that are needed to discuss basic functions of Planning, Accounting, Finance and Tax and feel free to include them in this process, but I would like to keep the group to Director level or above.    Please let Kathy know who they are.    I would like to know if you are available or have a preference for morning or afternoon.

Thanks.      

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

FYI

status - interim 3rd qt to date TW and NNG noteholder reports (w/o notes) have been provided to Andersen.
Andersen is developing detailed "pbc", other requirements listing.

As part of the recent pipeline financings, Andersen will be performing "comfort" tests and preparing a review report. This may entail
"pbc" preparation in ETS Acctg.  I have been designated the ETS Acctg. "point" person, so hopefully "pbc's" will be coordinated
systematically. I do NOT know the volume of data required, but please make every effort to quickly compile, review and submit requested data.  More to follow...

Patty, I do NOT think your NBP team will be impacted.

Are these any of our floors?

During a recent review of Enron's High-rise Fire Evacuation Plan, the City of Houston Fire Department noted that several of our floors did not have the required number of trained Fire Wardens.

I need your help.  If you are a full-time Enron employee, please consider being a Fire Warden for your floor.  Newly designated Fire Wardens must complete a two-hour certification training sponsored by the Fire Marshall's Office on Thursday, Nov. 15.

Please contact Monica Rodriquez (x35393) or Harry Grubbs (x35417) to participate as an Enron Fire Warden.

Thank you for your commitment to safety in our workplace.

Stan

Fire Wardens are needed on the following floors:

Building	Floor	Number of Wardens Needed	
Three Allen Center	3	2	
Three Allen Center	9	1	
Three Allen Center	17	2	
Three Allen Center	19	2	
Three Allen Center	21	2	
Three Allen Center	33	3	
Enron Center North	2	4	
Enron Center North	8	1	
Enron Center North	9	2	
Enron Center North	13	2	
Enron Center North	14	1	
Enron Center North	24	1	
Enron Center North	32	4	
Enron Center North	43	2	
Enron Center North	45	2	
Enron Center North 	46	4	
Enron Center North	50	1	
Enron Center North 	50-M	4	
Enron Center North	B-2	3	
			
			

Explain what you are looking for?

I work for Jeff Donahue, Mitch Taylor, etc.  They have asked me to get the financial forecasts for  NNG ASAP.  They said you'd be able to help me with this effort.

Regards,

Mark Wadlington
Director
Enron Corp.

Agreed.

Make sure they are current.

FYI

CONFIDENTIAL
Kevin, for your use, note, this is confidential information from rate case settlement negotiations.

Below are the Rate Base, Capitalization, Overall Return and Return on Equity for NNG and TW, in response to query No. 8.  Note, that for TW the only "official" numbers in the RP93-34 Settlement were $68,122,500 for pre-tax return, 14.65% pre-tax return percent and 11.50% return on equity percent. For Northern, the Rate Base and Pre-tax return were stipulated in Article 1 of the RP98-203 Settlement.  The Capitalization Structure and Return on Equity were provided in the "Workpapers" attached to the Settlement.

						NNG					TW

Rate Base				$$1,064,104,088			$465,000,000

Capitalization Structure		Debt: 41.57%; Equity: 58.43%		Debt: 42.00%; Equity: 58.00%

Overall Return					10.35%					10.29%

Return on Equity				12.27%					11.50%

As you can see we are working to get our floors covered.

Yes, I'll work with the 9th floor residents next week to set up fire wardens.

We have six fire wardens on 3AC 6th floor -- I'll get 2 more.

Stan's list indicated we need 3 more on 3AC 33, but we have 8. I'll e-mail names to Monica.

RF

Ruthann, I think you have already taken care of the 3AC floors, but could you please follow up on 9th floor to see what needs to happen after EGAS moves? Also, have you already taken care of 3?

I'll take care of Enron Building. Looks like we're pretty okay except for 13.

Thanks!

Are these any of our floors?

During a recent review of Enron's High-rise Fire Evacuation Plan, the City of Houston Fire Department noted that several of our floors did not have the required number of trained Fire Wardens.

I need your help.  If you are a full-time Enron employee, please consider being a Fire Warden for your floor.  Newly designated Fire Wardens must complete a two-hour certification training sponsored by the Fire Marshall's Office on Thursday, Nov. 15.

Please contact Monica Rodriquez (x35393) or Harry Grubbs (x35417) to participate as an Enron Fire Warden.

Thank you for your commitment to safety in our workplace.

Stan

Fire Wardens are needed on the following floors:

Building	Floor	Number of Wardens Needed	
Three Allen Center	3	2	
Three Allen Center	9	1	
Three Allen Center	17	2	
Three Allen Center	19	2	
Three Allen Center	21	2	
Three Allen Center	33	3	
Enron Center North	2	4	
Enron Center North	8	1	
Enron Center North	9	2	
Enron Center North	13	2	
Enron Center North	14	1	
Enron Center North	24	1	
Enron Center North	32	4	
Enron Center North	43	2	
Enron Center North	45	2	
Enron Center North 	46	4	
Enron Center North	50	1	
Enron Center North 	50-M	4	
Enron Center North	B-2	3	
			
			

Sally:   Can you help me figure out who I need to talk to to get the deals we did with you as ECT back in 1999, modified?

I have twice emailed Sally Beck, the signatory on the last agreements signed by ENA, with NNG and TW, to see if she could give me a lead on whom to contact.  I also left her a voice mail.  She has not responded.   We cannot proceed with the Northern Border implementation without a confidentiality agreement between ENA and NBP.  

Caminus is still looking to set up a meeting for gathering requirements for both NBP and possibly the Risk Analytics package.

Sally,

Thanks

Vince Strohmeyer
713.853.6701

Here is my shot at it.

 

Kevin and Rod,

I'm working with Corp. PR to develop q&a's for the press release that communicated Enron securing commitments for additional $1billion in financing.  

Would you both take a look a the questions and answers and fill in the missing/incorrect information?

Can I hear back from you this afternoon?  This document will have to be reviewed by legal before finalized.

Thanks for your help.

Gina

 << File: Financing commitment q&a.doc >>  

Jim should call with aphone number so that I don't ave to over there

Please send me an email to let me know

I missed you again.    Sorry.   Its for the am, can you make it?

I would like to have a meeting on October 31st (maybe later if that date won't work), either in the AM or the PM, but probably about 3 hours or so.    I would like to discuss organizations and how we are going to provide the support the EGS organization requires both at Stan's level and at each level in the organization.    I would also like to discuss the top 3-5 concerns you have for your business and your people.   You should decide if there are people in your organization that are needed to discuss basic functions of Planning, Accounting, Finance and Tax and feel free to include them in this process, but I would like to keep the group to Director level or above.    Please let Kathy know who they are.    I would like to know if you are available or have a preference for morning or afternoon.

Thanks.      

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Thanks

Hole is unlikely, but is a real weak point in any sales discussion.

Please forward to kevin howard.
As per your request please see the attached document.

Thanks,
Gary Allen
Safety System & Reporting Advisor
713-646-7488
gallen@enron.com

Ralph, please get with Rod and provide what ever he needs in the way of Safety Stats.

Where can I get info on safety statistics for the pipes?

finalizing due diligence. do you have the ingaa/aga report you referenced in
our meetings?

Call Luitgard Fischer

Cancel me out of lunch and any other meetings tomorrow.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Agree

Rod / Paul:

I would suggest that we mention that the financing would be secured by the assets of the company but that the final terms and conditions have not yet been determined.  I would rather not say anymore just yet.

NNG ( Kent Miller and Dave Neubauer ) is in the process of entering into a Fixed Price Swap with Transcanada Energy Financial Products Limited for 7BCF for the months of June 02 to October 02 and 14BCF for June 03 to October 03. We presently have a guaranty from Transcanada Pipelines in support of TEFP, however it will have to be increased to cover the transaction.  TCPL posed a question about NNG in regard to the 1B of financing. They want to know if the financing encumbers the assets of the pipes and what amount of the financing is attributed to NNG and TW. I did not reply. Please advise as to how I should respond.

Thanks and Regards.

FYI

As per your request please see the attached document.

Thanks,
Gary Allen
Safety System & Reporting Advisor
713-646-7488
gallen@enron.com

Ralph, please get with Rod and provide what ever he needs in the way of Safety Stats.

Where can I get info on safety statistics for the pipes?

finalizing due diligence. do you have the ingaa/aga report you referenced in
our meetings?

Can you give me a quick definition of the frequency rates (formula please)?

As per your request please see the attached document.

Thanks,
Gary Allen
Safety System & Reporting Advisor
713-646-7488
gallen@enron.com

Ralph, please get with Rod and provide what ever he needs in the way of Safety Stats.

Where can I get info on safety statistics for the pipes?

finalizing due diligence. do you have the ingaa/aga report you referenced in
our meetings?

Thanks.

Frequency or incident rates are calculated as follows:

Lost Time = no. of incidents x 200,000/total no. man hours worked

Recordable= same as above.  There are individual recordable cases and ALL lost time incidents are counted as "one" lost time and "one" recordable.  In other words every LT adds one to LT and one to Recordables.

Vehicle Frequency= no. of accidents x 1,000,000/total miles driven.

More explanation at http://www.ets.enron.com/safety/statistics/default.asp .

Thanks
Gary Allen

Can you give me a quick definition of the frequency rates (formula please)?

As per your request please see the attached document.

Thanks,
Gary Allen
Safety System & Reporting Advisor
713-646-7488
gallen@enron.com

Ralph, please get with Rod and provide what ever he needs in the way of Safety Stats.

Where can I get info on safety statistics for the pipes?

finalizing due diligence. do you have the ingaa/aga report you referenced in
our meetings?

I'm here

That would work well if I was trying to do projects, but I am trying to be able to utilize the curves in the business to measure VaR.    We now use them for NNG & TW in the Caminus System, and want to do so for our other pipes as well.

Rod -    If you can't get access to the curves, possibly RAC could run the models and provide output to you. We'll need to review non-budget capital projects anyway.

Dave - any other thoughts ?

Sally: 
Where do I go inside Enron to get straight what it is that I need to do in order to be able to use the curves I am told that we need to be using?	

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Rod,

Can you give me some help here on the pricing confindentiality agreement?

vince
713.853.6701

I have twice emailed Sally Beck, the signatory on the last agreements signed by ENA, with NNG and TW, to see if she could give me a lead on whom to contact.  I also left her a voice mail.  She has not responded.   We cannot proceed with the Northern Border implementation without a confidentiality agreement between ENA and NBP.  

Caminus is still looking to set up a meeting for gathering requirements for both NBP and possibly the Risk Analytics package.

Any progress on this?

Sally,

Thanks

Vince Strohmeyer
713.853.6701

I agree.   Let's go. 
Rod, 

I can keep Rutherford assisting me with process reviews probably indefinitely...but, they are expensive, and frankly, over the last 3 to 4 weeks, because of the ENE stock crisis, and related pipeline debt support activities, we've lost process improvement project momentum. I believe I can restart a continuous improvement effort relatively quickly thru a internal "steering committee" after things settle down a bit.
 
As a result, I would recommend we go ahead and have Rutherford timely close out their projects. 

I have drafted a notification below.  

Comments??
 

To 
J. Mark Kearns
Rutherford Consulting, Inc.
8609 Northwest Plaza Drive, Suite 410
Dallas, Texas 75225

Mr Kearns,

Pursuant to our agreement, please accept this as 30 day notification of Enron Transportation Services (ETS) decision to end its relationship with Rutherford Consulting, Inc.

In that regard we request that all projects, currently underway, except the "E&C Value Assessment"  be discontinued. We request
that remaining Rutherford efforts focus on quick completion of the "E&C Value Assessment".

Please note we have been very satisfied with the assistance the Rutherford team has provided in reviewing and assessing ETS (particularly ETS Accounting) operating processes.

Sincerely,

Rod Haylsett

Who will sign theses?

Rex - thanks for the quick response...please note the revised letters below. 
Previous email had a clerical error.

Contents the same, I just had a misspelling!  Sorry

(See attached file: Special Committee Letter.doc)(See attached file: V&E
Legal Letter.doc)(See attached file: Wilmer, Cutler & Pickering Legal
Letter.doc)
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

I agree with Jim.  FERC has not issued an order yet.

I am just now leaving the office, I hope.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

To the best of my knowledge, there are no market studies or other documents that have been prepared that appear to meet the requirements of 4c

Drew: Can you think of anything we may have done while you were in Omaha that might fit this request? 

Attached is a Memorandum put together by Robert Eickenroht requesting Item 4(c) documents in connection with Project Notre Dame. This information is required for our HSR filing.  The request includes all documents prepared internally and by outside advisors.  I will follow up with JPMorgan and SSB, but I will need your help on the internal piece.

Please forward this request as you see necessary and forward the 4(c) documents to me or to Robert directly.

The HSR filing is Tuesday so we need your information quickly.

Thank you for your help.

Suzanne Vann
713-857-6235 (c)

I think there is still the possibility that, just like has happened to El Paso, that Enforcement could still open the case since FERC is still out trying to find a way to get us.   It is true that the ALJ did not help them out, but that decision is not binding upon the commission.    Neither Stan, Drew or I are comfortable yet that we have the win.  We are pleased with the ALJ decision, but know that the ALJ did not get to the answer the Commission intended.

i think mgmt will rep that it is still operating under a show cause order, and the ultimate outcome has yet to be determined

Unlike your regulatory liabilities in the past - "subject to refund" - in
which there is an order from the FERC stating you can increase rates but
you need to reserve for them because they are subject to refund until the
final order comes out, this is a GAAP contingency and must meet the
definition of "probable" liability.  Does mangement really believe that it
is probable they will not be able to recover the $10 million?  Especially
given the 10/24/01 initial decision, do you really believe it is not
recoverable given the fact you've publicly stated that you are entitled to
it, the paying parties have stated you are entitled to it and now the ALJ
has stated that you are entitled to it?

Will management represent to us that it is probable TW will not be able to
recover in the general rep?

I'm not sure this qualifies as a subsequent event because it isn't
conclusive enough to trigger a reserve reversal. I think we should disclose
it in the interests of full disclosure, but certainly doesn't require a
change in financials.

      -----Original Message-----
     I very much agree with the below and the reason for establishing the
     reserve, however, given the positive order from the ALJ is this a type
     I or
     type II subsequent event (one requires adjustment to the financial
     statements and one that does not).  I realize the FERC still needs to
     approve, however I think that the "heat" as described below has cooled
     down
     and a recommendation from the ALJ to the FERC would be viewed as a
     positive
     thing causing the need to reverse the reserve.  (see below literature
     from
     SAS 12).

     .02 Two types of subsequent events require consideration by management
     and
     evaluation by the independent auditor.

     .03 The first type consists of those events that provide additional
     evidence with respect to conditions that existed at the date of the
     balance
     sheet and affect the estimates inherent in the process of preparing
     financial statements. All information that becomes available prior to
     the
     issuance of the financial statements should be used by management in
     its
     evaluation of the conditions on which the estimates were based. The
     financial statements should be adjusted for any changes in estimates
     resulting from the use of such evidence.

     .04 Identifying events that require adjustment of the financial
     statements
     under the criteria stated above calls for the exercise of judgment and
     knowledge of the facts and circumstances. For example, a loss on an
     uncollectible trade account receivable as a result of a customer's
     deteriorating financial condition leading to bankruptcy subsequent to
     the
     balance-sheet date would be indicative of conditions existing at the
     balance-sheet date, thereby calling for adjustment of the financial
     statements before their issuance. On the other hand, a similar loss
     resulting from a customer's major casualty such as a fire or flood
     subsequent to the balance-sheet date would not be indicative of
     conditions
     existing at the balance-sheet date and adjustment of the financial
     statements would not be appropriate. The settlement of litigation for
     an
     amount different from the liability recorded in the accounts would
     require
     adjustment of the financial statements if the events, such as personal
     injury or patent infringement, that gave rise to the litigation had
     taken
     place prior to the balance-sheet date.

     .05 The second type consists of those events that provide evidence
     with
     respect to conditions that did not exist at the date of the balance
     sheet
     being reported on but arose subsequent to that date. These events
     should
     not result in adjustment of the financial statements.(superscript: 1)
     Some
     of these events, however, may be of such a nature that disclosure of
     them
     is required to keep the financial statements from being misleading.
     Occasionally such an event may be so significant that disclosure can
     best
     be made by supplementing the historical financial statements with pro
     forma
     financial data giving effect to the event as if it had occurred on the
     date
     of the balance sheet. It may be desirable to present pro forma
     statements,
     usually a balance sheet only, in columnar form on the face of the
     historical statements.

          (superscript: 1.)This paragraph is not intended to preclude
     giving
          effect in the balance sheet, with appropriate disclosure, to
     stock
          dividends or stock splits or reverse splits consummated after the
          balance-sheet date but before issuance of the financial
     statements.

     .06 Examples of events of the second type that require disclosure to
     the
     financial statements (but should not result in adjustment) are:

        a.      Sale of a bond or capital stock issue.

        b.      Purchase of a business.

        c.      Settlement of litigation when the event giving rise to the
     claim
          took place subsequent to the balance-sheet date.

        d.      Loss of plant or inventories as a result of fire or flood.

        e.      Losses on receivables resulting from conditions (such as a
          customer's major casualty) arising subsequent to the
     balance-sheet
          date.

     .07 Subsequent events affecting the realization of assets such as
     receivables and inventories or the settlement of estimated liabilities
     ordinarily will require adjustment of the financial statements (see
     paragraph .03 (Document link: P/AU560.03/AUPROSTD)) because such
     events
     typically represent the culmination of conditions that existed over a
     relatively long period of time. Subsequent events such as changes in
     the
     quoted market prices of securities ordinarily should not result in
     adjustment of the financial statements (see paragraph .05 (Document
     link:
     P/AU560.05/AUPROSTD)) because such changes typically reflect a
     concurrent
     evaluation of new conditions.

     Comments?

     At the time the reserve (early '01) was eatablished, the CA situation
     was much much much more contentious, and likely recovery of amounts
     negotiated was -at that time- in jeopardy. Over the course of the year
     via much time and effort (legal, regulatory, commercial), and to a
     certain degree -stablization of the CA market, customers, and the FERC
     ALJ have seen their way clear to a reasonable position.

     -----Original Message-----
     I got Greg Porter's message too, however this doesn't tell me why the
     reserve was initially established in the first quarter - i.e. a
     probable
     liability.  In fact, this document seems more to weigh against your
     need
     to
     establish a liability.  Did I miss something?

     Click on this hyperlink to open a copy of the document from the FERC
     web
     site:

     http://cips.ferc.fed.us/Q/CIPS/GAS/RP/RP97-288.0AI.TXT

     **********************************************************************
     This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant
     affiliate
     and may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use
     of
     the intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or
     disclosure
     by
     others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient
     (or
     authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
     reply to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and
     delete
     all copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto)
     are
     not
     intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or
     evidence
     a
     binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
     affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
     be
     relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or
     otherwise.
     Thank you.
     **********************************************************************

     *******************Internet Email Confidentiality
     Footer*******************

     Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.
     If
     you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible
     for
     delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver
     this
     message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and
     kindly
     notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or
     your
     employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
     Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do
     not
     relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as
     neither
     given nor endorsed by it.

     *******************Internet Email Confidentiality
     Footer*******************

     Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.
     If
     you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible
     for
     delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver
     this
     message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and
     kindly
     notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or
     your
     employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
     Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do
     not
     relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as
     neither
     given nor endorsed by it.

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

Has Cheryl seen the stuff?    Need to get her and Jerry on board as well.
 
You. That's the reason for the changes (other than the capital which changed this week.).  The risk analysis type stuff has all been sent to Brad Larsen.  

Who has reviewed these internally at Enron?

The attached includes the standard economic analsyses for Phase VI. 

<<Synopsis Phase 62.xls>> 

The pertinent worksheets are: Capital, Economics on Total Capital, and Detailed Leveraged Books Grossed Up.  The last item includes the working capital impact.  For consistency with prior analyses, the total capital economics do not.  

One other twist:  Rather than use the equity AFUDC as non- cash, I recalculated the "AFUDC" using real life short term interest to come up with a more realistic estimate of the total cash requirements.

FYI, there are a couple of other worksheets in the workbook.  Among them is one for the the leveraged books on a non-grossed up basis.  I did this primarily to make sure that there were no busts, since the results must come out the same whether or not you gross up.

Just catch Cheryl up then on the changes.
The original send-out went to everyone.  Long ago and far away, since engineering took so long to do the Level B's.  We reviewed briefly at one of the Commercial meetings when you were absent.  I made changes to the CB assumptions as a result of suggestions by Cheryl.  I made changes to the straight-up and also the CB model as result of suggestions by you regarding doing the books more precisely.  
 
The results of this were rerouted. Also long ago.
 
Finally, late week before last, received the Bs.   
 
Hence the latest revision.
 

Has Cheryl seen the stuff?    Need to get her and Jerry on board as well.
 
You. That's the reason for the changes (other than the capital which changed this week.).  The risk analysis type stuff has all been sent to Brad Larsen.  

Who has reviewed these internally at Enron?

The attached includes the standard economic analsyses for Phase VI. 

<<Synopsis Phase 62.xls>> 

The pertinent worksheets are: Capital, Economics on Total Capital, and Detailed Leveraged Books Grossed Up.  The last item includes the working capital impact.  For consistency with prior analyses, the total capital economics do not.  

One other twist:  Rather than use the equity AFUDC as non- cash, I recalculated the "AFUDC" using real life short term interest to come up with a more realistic estimate of the total cash requirements.

FYI, there are a couple of other worksheets in the workbook.  Among them is one for the the leveraged books on a non-grossed up basis.  I did this primarily to make sure that there were no busts, since the results must come out the same whether or not you gross up.

That works for me.   I will attempt to answer some of Heather's questions as well.

Bob - I believe we need to classify the notes w ENE on TW and NNG as long term (Other).

Jim -

I'm afraid I have another "to do" for you.  Given the potential for all of
the overhang issues and given the significance of the receivables from the
parent, we developed some pro-forma balance sheets for NNG and TW, which
are attached.  These assume:

   The note receivable from parent company continues to be classified as
   current (represents net of all prior cash flows between NNG/TW and
   parent)
   The only borrowings under the revolvers relate to draw downs to repay
   the Citibank bank debt assumed by NNG and TW

We have highlighted in red the critical numbers. Given the overhang issues
at Enron Corp. I have the following questions:
   Should the note receivable from parent be classified as current? (i.e.
   would Enron truly be able to pay this amount to NNG/TW if needed)
   How will the debt be repaid in one year if Enron Corp.'s note receivable
   is not available to the pipelines?  Would you be able to draw down
   additional debt?
   Basically, what is the plan?
   Is the only debt expected to be drawn on these revolvers the assumed
   debt?  How much more in addition, if any?

Here is the basic plan, if something were to happen so that Enron was unable to pay NNG /TW back in time, then the notes with the bank would be transformed into term deals (length to be determined later).     The banks are comfortable that the ability to repay the notes exists in the pipes from the existing and projected cash flows of the entities.     There is no question that we should be able to borrow more against the pipes, with market multiples at 9X EBITDA and lenders willing to lend against it, there never has been a problem in that regard.   The securitizations of course will prevent the same kind of deals being done, but they are really to protect the banks from an Enron credit event (preference issues).

(See attached file: NNG FS pro forma.xls)(See attached file: TW FS pro
forma.xls)

I have to believe that the banks did this before agreeing to extend so much
credit - you might want to check around and see who provided this to the
banks rather than re-creating the wheel (Kevin Howard maybe).

Heather
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

Reclass both please

Thanks.

I already sent our responses to Rick and Bob this morning as well as to Stan.  Attached is a copy for you.

 << File: FinalSECAcctgResp10.01.doc >> 

What do you think?

Further to our conversation Friday night...??was that Friday?   anyway we
have the following needs.

An L/C to Henry petroleum for $1.4  mil.  This app is at Enron and was
originally sent  to Chase for issuance..now Chase says no.  ( this one is
getting touchy)

New apps being forwarded this morning that need issuing.

Ultramar Diamond Shamrock $15.0 mil
Astra Energy Canada $3.3 mil
Koch Canada  $800,000

Pending:

Choctaw II Oil and Gas :   $1,0 mill.....we are waiting for the verdict on
this one..but don't hold much hope for getting out of it.   Should know
this morning.

ALSO;;;;;;;NEED TO HAVE COST NUMBERS ON THESE L/C'S   SOME OF THE CUSTOMERS
ARE OFFERRING TO PAY FOR THEM BUT WANT A NUMBER

Yes

You might say that we are lending the Money to Enron and therefore are now looking further than nng and tw

Just send the package to kevin, we just need backup, not pesentations

Unless you can think of a reason why not it makes it simpler, I think.

Where are you?

Can you help?

Rod  UDS has now asked for closer to $19.0 mil ( the trades are there to justify it)  andyway I understand that  the SCB agreement for cash is for $20,000,000....that means we are way over already!   

I think that is the right answer

I am in agreement with Tod on #1.    It's your call, but you should make the call on whether or not we will integrate it into Enron.   If we do, then we will get Adam the help he needs, but it will be more efficient than providing stand alone support.

Stan,

Knowing that your schedule is tight, I wanted to drop you a not on two items;

1) I have had a couple discussions with Rod on the finance/accounting organization for Wind.  I understand that Adam is pushing for a new full-time CFO including a CFO for Europe.  Being open, Adam and I have different views on the direction of the organization.  My view is that many functions should be supported by the Enron infrastructure (including treasury, cash-management, insurance, IT, etc.).  Adam would prefer to stay autonomous and is attempting to direct initiatives to that end.  I continue to push the organization in the course that I believe makes most sense.  While we are both professionals, this situation does create a conflict.  In my opinion, the most serious issues in this business are not financial, they are operational and commercial.  I'll continue to work with Rod, but would be glad to discuss with you in further detail.

2) I understand that Steve Hotte is transferring to Wholesale and you are looking at several candidates.  I would like to offer you input on two candidates that I have had considerable experience with.  Both are worthy of serious consideration, and both capable of meeting your needs.

Everett Plante - I recruited Everett into Enron from a fairly high position at Compaq.  Initially he was in Enron International.  After the dissolution of EI he rolled into corporate for a short time, subsequently, I helped get him moved into EBS.  He was thought of very highly.  He has great organization skill and a practical view on technology.  He has been through several organizations since coming to Enron and he has adeptly dealt with change.

Andrew Parsons - Andrew has worked for me on Y2K and in his current role in IT Compliance.  Andrew has great interpersonal and teamwork skills.  He is very focused and goal oriented.  Andrew is currently a Sr. Director, but will be up for VP at yearend.  While not as experienced as Everett, Andrew has a lot of potential.  I know that Causey also thinks highly of Andrew.

Tod

PS -  I am always open to buying lunch.

I will not make the cio mtg at 1

I am un available for the 1 pm meeting.    I like Nick and Everett

Please send to gary smith
I am un available for the 1 pm meeting.    I like Nick and Everett

Bring whole thing if this is the notee agreement with ENE

I am in 50M if you need me.

Still tied up

When do we review with el paso?

Fyi
Adam / Stan,

I had a follow-up meeting with Gary Fitch regarding Enron Wind's aviation.  Gray indicated the following:

*	Aviation budget number look comparable to operator standards (approx. $1,900 / hour, 600 hour estimate)
*	The plane has a market value of $1.8 - $2.0 million and a book value of $2.2 million
*	Turbo prop charters for trips to Tehachapi would run in excess of $1,100 / hour and may be limited as there are only two qualified operators
*	The Cessna is the only jet suitable for use to Tehachapi based on runway length and altitude
*	Gary will make a site visit before the end of the year

Assuming that of the budgeted 600 hours of operation, only 400 hours would require charter, the cost of charter would approach $0.5 million of the total budget of $1.2 million.  This plus the flexibility of using the plan on longer hauls (e.g., to Houston) make it economically justified.

My recommendation is that based on the current situation, we retain the aircraft.

Tod

Need before board meeting

No

What is/was this meeting about? 

I have also sent your assistants this e-mail.  We are going to try to reschedule the meeting for next week (10/29-11/2).

Sorry for the late cancellation notice.

PLEASE NOTE THAT THE:

EAS STRUCTURE MEETING SCHEDULED FOR TODAY, 10/23 FROM 3-4PM HAS BEEN CANCELLED.

ALSO, PLEASE SEND ME ALL OF THE YOUR AVAILABILITIES FOR NEXT WEEK (10/29-11/2) ASAP SO WE CAN RESCHEDULE.  THANKS FOR YOUR PROMPT ATTENTION.

Ladies,

We have Success!

The above meeting has been scheduled for Tuesday, October 23 from 3pm-4pm in EB4052.

Attendees:	Wes Colwell
		Rod Hayslett
		Bob Butts
		Jeff Sommers
		Kent Castleman
		Wade Stubblefield
		Brent Price
		Beth Apollo
		Andrew Parsons
		Bob Sparger (Traveling)

All three.

Can you guys take care of this part?

I did receive the voice mail from Rod stating "he personally assures us this obligation will come off at 12/31/01 and why it has to expire at January 31, 2002". 

Mary and I talked to Glisan and thought a side letter stating that fact as well as saying "Enron could demand payment at 12/31/01 if this obligation is not closed out" is necessary to correctly document this transaction.  I have left a voice mail this morning for Rod asking if you guys already have some documentation that would suffice for this matter.

Any help you can give is greatly appreciated.  This is going to come up many more times before the end of the year gets here.  Jessie Mata already has three more EOTT LC's on her desk to be processed once we get more capacity.

Thanks,

JR

please reference my voice mail from Rod Hayslett.

Barry suggested I try to reach you with this question.  Can we issue a $1.4MM LC for EOTT for a crude shipment that expires after 12/31/01?  They say they need a 01/31/02 expiration date.  I can be reached at x57283.

Thanks,

JR

Do you want me to attend the meeting at 11:00 in 32C2?

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

On the other deal, they are back to total capital expenditures and not just expansion dollars.  I will need you to resurrect your language on the gas for Mitch tomorrow.

There is no fair value.

Tracy / Rod:

How much is TPC's current Fair Value balance?  The banks want to exclude "goodwill" from the tangible net worth computation - I realize goodwill and fair value are slightly different but they could make the argument to exclude.  I seem to recall a $300MM number.

There is fair value, and you can figure it out by comparing the Form 2 with the GAAP financials.

To confirm, in tpc's financials, tangible net worth does not reflect any increase for fair value. I seemed to recall that the 1B in equity included such amount.

In the "for what its worth category", I'm not certain the functional accountability is playing itself out as intended...or maybe it is...

Points of interest on this small project
This project is in Phase VI economics (yet to be formally reviewed and approved)    Probably belongs in the economics.	
It will NOT be in the Phase VI filing     That's to keep it out of the headlights.
$3.5mm was approved by the Board, (but it alledgedly needs $4mm)   We will have to approve the increase.    Commercial will have to take care of getting in on the agenda and a resolution prepared.
Its being functionalized as a "commercial" project    I think it is, since it is to support a new FTS-2 commercial transportation contract
Its going to be managed by "operations"    Not sure what this means 
It will probably actually be built by "construction and engineering"    I am assuming this is a non-profit transaction and is actually being done without a contract, otherwise the contract will require separate Board Approval.

We are going to give this a "M" Capital Budget Code since the cost for the Loop was included in the Phase 6 economics.  I will also count the budget dollars and capital spending in the Commercial budget for 2002 Plan and as we go forward in 2002 and forecast dollars.  So Operations should not count it.  This is how we did the 24" ML Replacement which was part of P5.  Operations will management the project but Commercial will count the dollars.

See comment below.

Fair Value is applied to plant and is being amortized over a useful life.
TW Fair Value is very similar to Goodwill in that it represents an excess over historical book value, and is not formally being recoverd in rates; BUT at the time of the  acquistion it was treated as a purchase price allocation an applied to plant. Goodwill is meant to be a "leftover" after all costs have been allocated.

?????

Banks want to exclude goodwill. How would you explain the difference between the two?

I will attend.

Given recent events surrounding Enron, it has been decided that we will have a Bank Conference in order to answer questions concerning our institution.  You, along with our banks, have been invited to attend this event. Please  RSVP with Mary Border by filling out the attached registration form.  This is an invitation only event so please do not forward this email.  We look forward to your attendance.  

When:		Friday, November 9

Where: 	            Hyatt Regency Downtown Ballroom 

Time:		8:00 AM-1:00 PM (lunch will be provided)

Attire:		Corporate Casual

RSVP:		Return to Mary Border via email or fax to 713 646 3422

  

Jimmy Simien
Enron Global Finance
713-345-7752

That was the discussion late last night

kent, et al, 
quick feedback from rod:
1. gas purchase - need to get approved thru stan    $'s required make it a Stan approval.    We will need a DASH to get his signature on.
2. hedge of gas purchase - no issues; need to quickly develop hedge documentation     
3. hedge of sba "spread" - we need to regroup to better clarify how the commodity component of the sba can be identified within the
sba contract, for hedge purposes

Robert Guthrie

Can you help me out here?     I don't know what the purpose of the language is but I think from a purist point of view that it is accurate.

                    John O'Shea                                                         
                                                                                        

Define Working Capital  as cash plus accounts receivable plus investories
plus material and supplies plus exchange gas receivable plus prepayments
less accounts payable less exchange gas payable.

                                                                                               
                    Joshua.Davidson@bake                                                       
                                                                                               

We do, but this can be very company specific on exactly how people define
it.

Yes.  I assume that you have boiler plate language that we can start from.

                    Joshua.Davidson@bake

                    11/06/01 11:41 AM           Subject:     RE:

You capitalized Working Capital.  Will you want to define it in this
agreement?

(See attached file: Option Agreement.DOC)

FYI

Attached are the 2nd draft of the NNG 3rd Qtr 2001 Notes to the Financial Statements
 

Drew is correct, but we can tell them where we want the money wired.

Mary Perkins of the Treasurer's office needs to know which account the money comes into if Notre Dame closes.  The way I read the new structure chart, looks to me like Rockne, Inc. buys preferred from Northern, so the $1.5 b should be paid to NNG.  Pls confirm and I'll let her know.  dF

If you want us to pursue getting this cash directly to ENE we will be happy to try.

None that I am aware.

Any updates or new docs?

we will get it handled.     CAn you send out the notice that the dates are changing and we will have to reschedule before you leave?

Rod,

I had just talked with Jeff prior to sending out my email asking for volunteers.  Now we're changing the dates.  I will be out of the office Thurs and Fri so someone will have to communicate with the UH recruiting team.  

Tracey

Tracey,

I have contacted U of H CSC and have moved back the interview dates as we will not have enough time to review the reumes and select those we wish to interview for the 12th and 13th interview dates.  I will contact you tomorrow with more details. 

I am up with STAN if you need me.

You're right.

I thought this one was canceled. So I declined to get it off my calendar.

Why not?

If it keeps going the way it is now there is a possibility.

border is contemplating a buyout of ene...

(joke...sorry, if this was not funny)

Is there anything here that I need to be concerned about?

Please respond to Greg Schlender with any comments.

Dortha, attached are drafts of our 10Q's.  Please distribute in Houston.  I'm asking for comments back by Thursday, November 8.  We plan to file the 10Q on Monday or Tuesday of next week.  Let me know if you have any questions.

Greg

 << File: FM10Q0901_NBPL_clean1.doc >> 

 << File: FM10Q0901_NBP_clean1.doc >> 

Too bad I can't be there.    I have a staff meeting to run.

This meeting has been moved to Friday, October 26 from 9:00-11:00 in EB 42C2, Omaha Room 696.

Thanks

Tracy

Please plan to attend a run through with Danny of your 2002 Plan Presentations for the Lay Reviews on Thursday, October 25 from 9:00-11:00 in 42C2.  For Omaha room 696.

Thanks

Tracy

All spending that can be delayed needs to be delayed.	I want to make it clear that items for health, safety, security and reliability that need to be spent will be spent, if necessary, but all other spending needs to be slowed down as much as possible and delayed until further notice.   This is a directive I have just received from Stan.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

I am hearing all sorts of noise and need confirmation and guidance.  Phil Lowry just have Nick Rahn $2.7 mil to do various upgrades in the field, from server upgrades to phone switch upgrades as well as purchase the new software/hardware for the PHD rewrite. All are necessary upgrades if not done this year will have to be done next year.  Not one of these upgrades projects is over $900k but together it totals $2.7.  We also are continuing to do upgrades in the Houston offices - all budgeted items and if not upgraded this year will have to be done next year.  Do I say STOP - and if so for all companies or just for NNG and TW?   cvb

What was the original question?

John, I think that's adequate.  If a great deal comes up that exceeds that limit we simply have to convince them to grant a waiver, right? Rod, would you confirm please?  Thanks.  DF

	This message was sent earlier today to the finance/accounting/operational support people in the group to make them aware that we are in need of slowing down the cash outflow.  Your assistance in this regard is important to the success of preserving capital at this critical time.   

All spending that can be delayed needs to be delayed.	I want to make it clear that items for health, safety, security and reliability that need to be spent will be spent, if necessary, but all other spending needs to be slowed down as much as possible and delayed until further notice.   This is a directive I have just received from Stan.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

 

OK

Sorry--John's email didn't forward.  Notre Dame includes a $50 mm per deal limit for allowed asset sales-- is that enough (Beaver may be over but we can get a specific waiver if we need it).  Thanks.  Df

Got me to thinking, how are you guys doing?    Where are you in the cash management world?     I know you were tight before, is the situation any better?

	This message was sent earlier today to the finance/accounting/operational support people in the group to make them aware that we are in need of slowing down the cash outflow.  Your assistance in this regard is important to the success of preserving capital at this critical time.   

All spending that can be delayed needs to be delayed.	I want to make it clear that items for health, safety, security and reliability that need to be spent will be spent, if necessary, but all other spending needs to be slowed down as much as possible and delayed until further notice.   This is a directive I have just received from Stan.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

 

I nee to go to stans office apologize to steve dowd for me

On my way down

Please handle
Could you provide Rob, Bob and me with the aggregate litigation reserves for each business unit for which you are responsible?  Thanks!!!!

THe enron situation has slowed down the process as we have not been able to get a clean OK from the SEC to go forward as yet.    

Rod - the banks are asking what our plan is regarding the EOTT shares and the conversion.  I was wondering where you saw the process standing.  I've heard that there has been some trouble in the recap events and I didn't know if the conversion vote was tied to that or if we were planning on going ahead with it as soon as possible.  I believe the Koch deal on the subs expires at year end, but I'm not sure.  Also, Gay Mayeaux has been calling me on what's going on with Nikita and I directed her to you to discuss why ETS was selling its EOTT shares.  When you get a chance, will you let me know what the update is?  Thanks.

Jodi Marcussen Coulter
Enron Global Finance
713-345-6318

I will work with her and Dan to try and figure out a better solution in the short term.     Now that some space is available from the moves to the new building, it is possible that there is a better place to move to for a period of time.

Calm down.  The operative word is it has been put on hold.  These are not normal times.  No one saw this coming or we could have planned better.  Give us a few days to figure everything out.  We just made the decision today to preserve cash while we were waiting to see what was going to happen.  Thanks for your cooperation which I desperately need right now.

I was very disappointed to not have any advance warning about the announcement that construction on 41 has been put on hold for financial reasons.

The Gas Logistics team was "relocated" off the 41st floor on October 5.  Prior to the move, we had a very efficient, open configuration that let us work together as a unified team.  

After the move, we are located on 3 different floors.   Besides the general impact on team unity, this move also means that our evening staff work alone on separate floors, rather than in a group.  It means fewer individuals to cover customer calls.  It means having more equipment to cover the day to day business.   I have worked hard to calm the team that this arrangement is just temporary and that we will eventually be put back together as a team.

Prior to our move I constantly questioned whether our move was necessary.  I asked about smaller, more practical changes to fit more people on the floor.  And, I specifically asked about whether Enron issues might impact the groups desire to continue to spend $7-$10 million -- even as I reluctantly packed up my boxes.

I hope you can appreciate that the current seating arrangement is a serious issue for my team and one that generates constant questions as my staff meetings.  Finding out  that we moved off of 41 for no reason at an all-employee floor meeting undermines my team's faith in my leadership.

Not before you scheduled the meeting.   Only as a result of it.

I heard its been canceled.

Too bad I can't be there.    I have a staff meeting to run.

This meeting has been moved to Friday, October 26 from 9:00-11:00 in EB 42C2, Omaha Room 696.

Thanks

Tracy

Please plan to attend a run through with Danny of your 2002 Plan Presentations for the Lay Reviews on Thursday, October 25 from 9:00-11:00 in 42C2.  For Omaha room 696.

Thanks

Tracy

CAll Stan when you get in probably closer to 7 our time.

Rod,
    Should we all meet at 6 ish tomorrow to discuss our preferred course of communication? 

Dan

Comments below.

On Tuesday we will have an EOTT conference call with investors to discuss EOTT's third quarter earnings.  I am concerned about some questions that may be asked relating to Enron.  Here is my stab at answering certain questions.  Please review and let me have your comments as soon as you can.  I would like to distribute on Friday the complete conference call script and Q&A that will include these answers.  Thanks

1.  Why did Enron sell its stake in EOTT?
Enron decided in September of 2001 to monetize its ownership in EOTT (other than its 2% general partner ownership) which consisted of 3.3 million common units, 7 million subordinated units and $9.3 million additional partnership units. The monetization was recognized as a sale for book purposes and a financing for tax purposes.  Enron retained voting and dispositive power with respect to these interest.  Enron, being deemed a control person, filed the appropriate SEC documents with repect to this transaction.

2.   Does Enron still have an economic reason to care about the price of EOTT stock?
As the general partner, Enron has a fiduciary responsiblity to act in the best interest of the unitholders of the partnership.    [I like your answer for simplicity sake, however in the interest of full disclosure here's more:  the pricing of the transaction was based upon a floor price with a final price for the units to be established at the conversion date of the sub units and the apis.    So besides the fiduciary responsibility, there is the fact that the final pricing on the deal has not occurred yet.]

3.  What is Enron's ownership of EOTT?
From a voting and dispositive power standpoint, it is 39%.

4.  Is the general partnership for sale? 
You will need to ask Enron that question.
[Enron filed a 13D on September 6, 2001, stating the following:
"It is Enron's intention to review the disposition of and to possibly dispose of all or a portion of its direct and indirect interest in the partnerhip (including the common units and its interest in the general partner)."]

5.  What impact does Enron's current situation have on EOTT?
[Two areas need to be addressed here - the tolling agreement and EOTT's ability to obtain three party bank financing.  I have EOTT to address these two questions.]
 

  

_________________________
Gay Mayeux
Vice President, Investor Relations
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith Street, EB 4931a
Houston, Texas 77002

Phone:  713-853-9905
Cell:      713-416-8821
Fax:      713-646-3002
email:    gay.mayeux@enron.com

Sounds like they have a deal already.     

fyi... will talk to you tomorrow about it.

Pam,
As you know, we negotiated a deal for EOGR to take over our recently vacated space at 3AC 17, 18, 19, 20 and 21. We also negotiated a deal for them to purchase only the Teknion workstations which were already in the spaces on Levels 17-20 (not 21 furniture). The total purchase price is $205,000. plus all taxes.

I've been informed that the former EI groups report up to ETS. Therefore, the Bill of Sale shall be signed by an officer in ETS (Rod Hayslett), not EPSC. The Bill of Sale has been prepared by our legal team and is ready for Rod Hayslett to sign. I would like to get the document to you for signature and over to EOGR for signature by Friday, 11/9/01.

Let me know if you need anything further.

Thanks,
Reggie

What do you think we should focus on for the crew?     Attached is a data sheet that I would like to keep up as things change.

 

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Was it an actual downgrade or just that they wouldn't agree not to do so?

Basically yes

Will get back to you.

FYI

 

Jay and I say $850-900mm, maybe $950 mm if we are in hard sell mode.

Regards
Mark and Jayshree

The $550 of debt that is in the calcualtion assumes we borrow the 550 next week.   Otherwise there is only 17 or so there.

 << File: twn.xls >> 

Jay and I say $850-900mm, maybe $950 mm if we are in hard sell mode.

Regards
Mark and Jayshree

FYI

> THE "TWO-COW EXPLANATION" OF WHAT MAKES...
>
> A CHRISTIAN:
>
>   You have two cows. You keep one and give one to your neighbor.
>
>
> A SOCIALIST:
>
>    You have two cows. The government takes one and gives it to your
neighbor.
>
>
> A REPUBLICAN:
>
>   You have two cows. Your neighbor has none. So what?
>
>
> A DEMOCRAT:
>
>   You have two cows. Your neighbor has none. You feel guilty for being
> successful. You vote people into office who tax your cows, forcing you to
> sell one to raise money to pay the tax. The people you voted for then take
> the tax money and buy a cow and give it to your neighbor.  You feel
righteous.
>
>
> A COMMUNIST:
>
>   You have two cows. The government seizes both and provides you with
milk.
>
>
> A FASCIST:
>
>   You have two cows. The government seizes both and sells you the milk.
You
> join the underground and start a campaign of sabotage.
>
>
> DEMOCRACY, AMERICAN STYLE:
>
>   You have two cows. The government taxes you to the point you have to
sell
> both to support a man in a foreign country who has only one cow, which was
a
> gift from your government.
>
>
> CAPITALISM, AMERICAN STYLE:
>
>   You have two cows. You sell one, buy a bull, and build a herd of cows.
>
>
> BUREAUCRACY, AMERICAN STYLE:
>
>   You have two cows. The government takes them both, shoots one, milks the
> other, pays you for the milk, then pours the milk down the drain.
>
>
> AN AMERICAN CORPORATION:
>
>   You have two cows. You sell one, and force the other to produce the milk
of
> four cows. You are surprised when the cow drops dead.
>
>
> A FRENCH CORPORATION:
>
>   You have two cows. You go on strike because you want three cows.
>
>
> A JAPANESE CORPORATION:
>
>    You have two cows. You redesign them so they are one-tenth the size of
an
> ordinary cow and produce twenty times the milk.
>
>
> A GERMAN CORPORATION:
>
>    You have two cows. You reengineer them so they live for 100 years, eat
> once a month, and milk themselves.
>
>
> AN ITALIAN CORPORATION:
>
>    You have two cows but you don't know where they are. You break for
lunch.
>
>
> A RUSSIAN CORPORATION:
>
>    You have two cows. You count them and learn you have five cows.  You
count
> them again and learn you have 42 cows. You count them again and learn you
> have 12 cows. You stop counting cows and open another bottle of vodka.
>
>
> A MEXICAN CORPORATION:
>
>    You think you have two cows, but you don't know what a cow looks like.
> You take a nap.
>
>
> A SWISS CORPORATION:
>
>   You have 5000 cows, none of which belongs to you. You charge for storing
> them for others.
>
>
> A BRAZILIAN CORPORATION:
>
>    You have two cows. You enter into a partnership with an American
> corporation. Soon you have 1000 cows and the American corporation declares
> bankruptcy.
>
>
> AN INDIAN CORPORATION:
>
>   You have two cows. You worship them.
>
>
> A TALIBAN
>
>    You have two cows. You turn them loose in the Afghan "countryside" and
> they both die. You blame the godless American infidels.  >>
>
>

Service agreements and construction jobs, as well as capital expenditure, obligate Enron and as a result the rules for RAC approval for commitments apply.    Please get Denis or James involved on all appropriate deals.

Thanks.
Rod
	
Rod,
Here is the memo I mentioned in the Shared Employees Agreement e-mail.

This memo is being forwarded to you to address issues that have developed during recent Enron Asset Management Resources (EAMR) transactions and to establish appropriate procedures for going forward.  EAMR, as you are probably aware, is an affiliate of Enron Transportation Services Company that performs services for third parties as well as other Enron affiliate companies. 

When EAMR enters into a contract with non Enron customers to deliver services, EAMR assumes all of the risk for any losses in the transaction  Additionally, EAMR is not to be supported financially by the affiliated pipelines.  All costs such as employee payroll expenses, travel and other related employee expenses, equipment usage fees, etc  associated with an employee performing services for a customer under an EAMR transaction must be accurately recorded pursuant to prudent accounting procedures. 

Going forward,  to ensure that there are no financial or contractual obligations that are not in the best interest of EAMR, the following process will be used on all transactions.

1) Cost estimates for services through EAMR will be sent to Sarabeth Smith in Houston for review and approval.  Sarabeth will ensure that all costs and appropriate margins are included in the cost structure and then release it through a non-binding agreement for presentation to the customer by appropriate marketing personnel.  Cost estimates, given to customers outside of this step in the process, run the possibility of having to be retracted due to the risk of committing EAMR to a transaction that is not contractually or financially sound.

2) It is the responsibility of every employee performing services for EAMR to be diligent in recording their time and expenses required to perform the services to the appropriately assigned project number.  Monthly reviews of the expenses associated with each project will be conducted to ensure that all costs have been accurately recorded.  Sarabeth will be the point of contact with the transaction originator, contract administration and legal to ensure draft agreements as well as the final agreement have been coordinated through all appropriate groups.   Legal agreements will not be issued without proper sign-off of authorization.

3) All contracts must adhere to fundamental risk parameters set forth by management.  These mandates are very clear concerning contract language and operating parameters for EAMR transactions.  Your cooperation by adhering to the processes described in this memo is critical to  the continued success of EAMR as a revenue generating entity as well as another "marketing tool" for the customer.  

Contact Information for EAMR will Sarabeth Smith at 713-345-5023, sarabeth.smith@enron.com, 1400 Smith 3AC-3147, Houston, TX  77002.

Please pass this memo on to team members or other members of your staff that currently work or may work on EAMR transactions. 

Thanks for your support in this endeavor.

I would like Morris Brassfield and Carolyn Centilli to play this role.

As part of the ongoing effort to enhance the iPayit AP process and software, a committee will be created whose purpose will be to manage future iPayit process/product changes.  The iPayit enhancement review committee will be made up of Enron representatives from multiple business units who will act as the primary voice of their respective organizations.  Please provide me with the names of 1-2 possible candidates from your organization who may be a good fit for the team.  Once the team has been identified, a kick-off meeting will be held.  Below are some specifics regarding duties of the committee and team member characteristics.  

Listed below are the primary responsibilities of this committee.

Meet quarterly
Identify potential iPayit process/software enhancements
Help with prioritizing the list of suggestions
Help functionally designing the enhancements 
Act as conduit between their organization and the overall iPayit process
Facilitate better communications regarding Enron's AP process

List of characteristics of a successful committee member:

Knowledge of the iPayit AP process
Knowledge of the iPayit software
Knowledge of the accounts payable issues associated with that business unit
Ability to make decisions representing their business area
Willing to help make iPayit successful at Enron

The goal of this committee is to drive continuous process and product improvements with iPayit.  The ultimate goal of the team is to create and manage the enhancement plan and give all Enron users a representative responsible for looking out for their interests in the process.  It also provides an avenue for sharing information and hints across business units and with SourceNet.  

If you have any questions, please call me at (713) 646-6222.  

Thank You
John

I apologize for the confusion but the interviews are being cancelled at thi=
s time.     Thank you for your patience and assistance in getting us ready =
to go.

UH Team:

I have just been notified that the UH On Campus Recruiting is being resched=
uled due to scheduling conflicts with both UH and Enron.  Once we determine=
 the new dates, I'll forward an email to the team.

I apologize for any inconvenience that this may have caused and hope that y=
ou will be able to participate in the future.

Regards,
Tracey Kozadinos
Risk Assessment & Control - Portfolio
713.853.3446

Do you have (or bob) copies of nng's debt agreements, current?

Please do. I'm in 49c1.  I think there are 3 deals 

Not currently under consideration, in fact would be a problem

Tracy and jim are trying to track down 6 more copies. Could you see where this stands? We are in 49c1

Don't know

5ravis is in charge.

Can you bring these to 49c1?

Are you aware of where this is coming from?

Waiting to hear back from Shawn on the definition. I'll pass that on when he responds. 

I agree that you can develop a rpeliminary assessment thru Lou and Don, as to environmental.
What is social risk???????????????????????

Should I work on this request? We will be doing our risk assessments for 2002 with Andersen in January but I could touch base with a few folks in the organization (Lou Soldano and Don Hawkins) if needed. Please advise.

As part of Ken Lays initiative to measure Enron's social and environmental risk, EAS has been requested to help with a baseline assessment of what our BU's are doing in those areas.  As such, please talk with your CAO's and/or BU leaders as part of your 2002 risk assessment and obtain answers to the following questions and send them back to me on or before Thanksgiving.  Please let me know if you're having any problems with this or need further clarification.

* Do the business units know the scope and nature of social and environmental risks associated with their business strategy, transactions, assets, countries where they operate, and/or counter parties? 
* Do the business units have a process to identify social and environmental risk?
* If so, what process does the business units employ in order to identify and manage social and environmental risk?
* What process do the business units use to quantify and/or qualify these exposures?
* Who is responsible for managing this process in the business?  
* Does the business review the quality of their social/environmental risk assessment and management activities?
* Is the business unit aware of the existing corporate function and processes?

This information will help Ken and his task team to  develop a proposed process for developing a consistent process for measuring social/environmental risk management performance across the business.  We may be asked for more assistance in this area in 2002.

Thank you for your assistance!

Shawn

Not yet

Please call. 36178

Thanks.
no in fact we are increasing our short term lines of credit until the Enron situation is cleared in the market.  We had planned on a $250 million bond deal in October after the market had absorbed the news about the PGE acquisition but then Enron stock cratered and the bankers told us their was no economic deal that could be done. So we are waiting for things to clear up a bit and hopefully get into the market before year end.  We requested the additional short term lines in case this problem continues through next year which it may.  Call me if you would like further info.  Stan is already aware of this situation.

>>> "Hayslett, Rod" <Rod.Hayslett@ENRON.com> 11/7/01 11:00:37 AM >>>
Got me to thinking, how are you guys doing?    Where are you in the cash
management world?     I know you were tight before, is the situation any
better?

>  -----Original Message-----

May as well cancel.

Kathy Campos
ETS Finance
EB4055
713-853-6833

Only Kevin and his assistant, no one else.

Rod:

	Can you confirm who, beside Kevin, is coming within your purview?

Brian

I was aware of Kevin Howard but didn't know he had a group that was transferring.  Talk to Rod Hayslett to get the straight scoop.

Gary:

	I was not aware of the transfer noted below.  However, there's no problem processing it unless you see an issue.  Any issues that I may not be aware of?

Brian

Brian,

Were you aware that Kevin Howard's group will now be reporting to Rod Hayslett?  If o'kay, we will process the changes, etc.

Dan 
Per your request.

As promised to you below.  Kevin Howard and his group will now be reporting to Rod Hayslett in EGS.  The company number is 0366.  The cost center is 111718.
If you need additional information, please do not hesitate to contact me at X36528.

Thanks so much for your help.

I understand that you have spoken with Leticia Leal in search of updated information on above group.  I have requested this information from Mr. Howard.  However, he is currently involved in the credit packages and has not had time to get this information.  I will get it from him as soon as he is available.  

Terri Bachand  

Enron Global Finance
(713)853-6528

FYI

Please feel free to forward this message throughout your organizations. =20

It has been decided that given current environment PEP will not open to the=
 general employee population until further notice. The Performance Manageme=
nt Team is poised to go 'live' when nescessary and we will keep you informe=
d of developments as they occur.

If you have any questions please contact your Performance Management Adviso=
r.

Global Performance Management Team

FYI

I received word today that given the current environment, PEP will not open to employees for feedback on Friday, November 9 as originally planned.  I will keep you informed of developments as they occur.

Which company?

Did we reduce interco int rate this year? number seems significantly lower than last year $21.7MM.  We have $23MM interest income shown in long range projections.

Where do you stand on this stuff now?

For everyone, if we are going to get this done, we need things taken care of.    If there is a problem you need to let us know ASAP!

we need to provide Andersen:
signed legal letters from V&E and the Special Committee (Rogers and Butts)
a legal perspective on backdrafts (Fossum)
a copy of the bank letter regarding material adverse changes (Howard)
signed management re letter (signees to be determined)
footnote cleanup (Saunders, et al)

we are scheduled to close on Friday but more likely over weekend and fund Tuesday of next week.  Any help I can give you with AA, just let me know.  What are we still waiting on from them?

Kevin

side question...when is the formal NNG and TW debt financing going to close.
we still have yet to finish Andersen review activities

Do you have a candidate?    I would argue that we are looking at a process review, so anyone who can do a process review could do this.

Rod,

I agree with Kenneth Cessac's response.  We should evaluate our current process for collecting, validating and distributing measurement data and consider new ideas and alternatives to improve the process.  Assistance from a consulting firm that specializes in this area would probably be better than using Rutherford.

Charlie      

This question has been raised several times over the past 10+ years, should we combine GMS, Field Operations, and some of the Gas Control functions to create a single source for measurement data.  I do not feel that changing a reporting relationship would correct any problems.  

I feel the time and effort can e better spent improving our current data collect process and data flow between SCADA and PGAS.  While this process is working I feel that it requires to much manual intervention and handling.  The IT department, Measurement Technology, Gas Control Hot Seat, and the Data Analysis are all involved in keeping the data flowing between SCADA and PGAS.  We should step back and re look and the current process and see what improvements can be made to better control and maintain this process.

 A second area that should be looked at is the data validation process.  Currently Field Operations, Data Analysis, and GMS all  manually review measurement data.  With all of the computer and software technology available I feel that we could easily automate most of the current manual data validation.

I have limited experience with the Rutherford company and what they could provide towards improving these items.  I feel that a company that specializes in SCADA and such as UTSI would be a better option.  

Charlie, Ken, I would like to meet with you this afternoon if possible (2:00 pm) so you can bring me up to speed on PGAS and Sullivan's concern so we can respond to Rod by early next week.

Thanks,

Don

I'm going to defer this to the experts.  Please convey your thoughts to Rod.

Would you agree that something needs to be done?

The PGAS reporting project recently completed requirements gathering meetings with data users in gas measurement technology, gas control, gms, gas accounting, and gas logistics.  We think, those discussions have pointed to a need to assess inefficiencies that appear to exist related to data integrity as data moves between systems and users that span the entire gas volume/quality collection, transformation and delivery process.  In other words there seem to be too many questions and reconcilliations that people have to address along the process as data changes hands and is used for different internal and external purposes.  There also appears to be a lack of a single point of responsibility in the organization for gas volume data from start to finish.
The PGAS reporting project proposed to assess this at a high level and make some recommendations.  But as important as the issue appears to be, you might want to consider using Rutherford to help ETS do a more thorough job of this.
This effort would extend outside FA&A.
Please advise.

Mike, Ellis and I are in agreement that the need for the Rutherford Consulting group is complete.  Rutherford achieved what their goal was; to provide structure and format for the PGAS issues to be addressed in an efficient manner.  The procedures for listing new issues are in place and are being followed by the team.  The meetings are efficient in that only status updates and priorities are reviewed and discussed. There is now only one list for all issues that are being addressed or need to be addressed and they are prioritized.   The monthly meetings are now only needed twice a month.  What is the procedure for notifying Rutherford that their services are no longer needed on this project as they have completed what was asked of them?   cvb

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

What gives?

OK

Ruthann, as soon as Rod Hayslett responds "approved" to this, please set up a churn for below. Work with Betty Alexander. Thanks!

Will, I talked to Phil this morning regarding the transfer of Dave Miller from EEOS to ETS E&C to fill the vacancy left by Tom Halpin.  Phil agreed, so please proceed with the transfer.  Pam, please proceed with the office move.

Thanks,
Jerry

Would you 2 think about those who helped us so we can attempt to get some award to those who really helped us out here.

I had specifically taken this deal to Jeff for approval, and he had decided to not go forward at that point in time.   I would like to get a review with Stan and Jeff to decide.
Rod

Brokerage accounts.   Do you have copies of the agreements?  Both TW and NNG.

I would like contact info on you and your key players, just in case.    I don't think I will need much accounting help before monday.
Thanks
Rod
any status updates?  timing of debt and/or equity?
will we need accounting-types here this eve or weekend?

fyi we are still working thru andersen issues

separately, we will need to get together w you -asap- to better understand the equity flow, for acctg purposes

FYI

I'll ask Greg to verify that the contract list includes these agreements.  Also, Kevin or Greg, do these agreements (standard trading counterparty brokerage agreements) constitute "lock box accounts" that we need to disclose under schedule 4.01(v)?

Brokerage accounts.   Do you have copies of the agreements?  Both TW and NNG.

I'm ok, deal is not quite announced.   Hope you are having a good time.

Are you getting all the info you need?  'ames should be in and I can tell him or Steve where to get schedules.  I will leave my Blackberry on.  Good luck!

Do you have volumes and rates info to go with the NNG current estimate and the 2002 plan?    If not you, can you get for me?

I am not aware of the volume/rate info you used - is this pulled in from another schedule?

Kevin,

Do you have the volume and rate information on Northern Natural that will
tie to Rod's forecast as well?

Kyle

Do you have a document signed by Stan authorizing the amount of dollars you need to spend?

Thanks for getting back to me on these.

Regarding the operational storage gas purchase, I did receive an e:mail back from Stan approving the November purchases.  We need to begin purchasing gas by the end of the week so please let me know what I need to do to refresh the dash that was completed a few months ago.

kent, et al, 
quick feedback from rod:
1. gas purchase - need to get approved thru stan    $'s required make it a Stan approval.    We will need a DASH to get his signature on.
2. hedge of gas purchase - no issues; need to quickly develop hedge documentation     
3. hedge of sba "spread" - we need to regroup to better clarify how the commodity component of the sba can be identified within the
sba contract, for hedge purposes

Any news?

What's going on?

Thank you!

Have you talked to Somerholder?

Agreed!

We plan on reviewing with Stan on monday.   Previously he had left it up to Jeff who had said no to.

Kathy,
I love you
Rod

It,s an entity set up to handle nng's and TW's cash.   Through this account cash flows to corp.  Joel will handle this.

Fyi
Will do.  I think we should manage for cash in these interesting times.  Thanks.

Ray

If you need it, go ahead and tell Dan to pull the trigger.     I will tell Stan.

Thanks. 

Ray 

Ok, but make sure the documentation of the email follows the invoice for the payment, otherwise we will have to go back to him to appriove the payment.   On the otherhand, there is no reason that a DASH can't be used for non-discretionary approvals as well, and if it doesn't have to go to RAC, then it doesn't.   

Rod,  for operational storage purchases we backed away from using a DASH to document signoff mainly because the purchase was determined to be non-discretionary (and cleared that with RAC).  Instead we got Stan's approval of the purchase by e-mail.  Given that the Cunningham purchase is budgeted (for 2002), the timing of beginning to enter the transactions, and the above, I would recommend requesting Stan's signoff by email.  OK?

Do you have a document signed by Stan authorizing the amount of dollars you need to spend?

Thanks for getting back to me on these.

Regarding the operational storage gas purchase, I did receive an e:mail back from Stan approving the November purchases.  We need to begin purchasing gas by the end of the week so please let me know what I need to do to refresh the dash that was completed a few months ago.

kent, et al, 
quick feedback from rod:
1. gas purchase - need to get approved thru stan    $'s required make it a Stan approval.    We will need a DASH to get his signature on.
2. hedge of gas purchase - no issues; need to quickly develop hedge documentation     
3. hedge of sba "spread" - we need to regroup to better clarify how the commodity component of the sba can be identified within the
sba contract, for hedge purposes

Fyi
Got you.  I'll talk to Joel, as VE will likely need to bring corp. formation, due authority, etc for the new entity into their opinion.  DF

It,s an entity set up to handle nng's and TW's cash.   Through this account cash flows to corp.  Joel will handle this.

I have a request, AA has asked if we can repay the notes to the pipes,. Not actually, but realistically from business unrelated to the pipes.   They may want to discuss with you.

Yes.  They want us to record the amounts loaned, normal loans, as a reduction of equity, if ENE does not currently have the ability to repay from either cash or other assets or credit capability.  They do not want to count the 1.5B or the bank loans since they will simply increase the size of the notes.  They are specifically concerned about the current intercompany notes.

The party at AA is Roger Willard 713 646 6360
Yes.  They want us to record the amounts loaned, normal loans, as a reduction of equity, if ENE does not currently have the ability to repay from either cash or other assets or credit capability.  They do not want to count the 1.5B or the bank loans since they will simply increase the size of the notes.  They are specifically concerned about the current intercompany notes.

The party at AA is Roger Willard 713 646 6360 if you feel up to trying to convince him.   

Rod
Cell 713 201 6135

Yes.  They want us to record the amounts loaned, normal loans, as a reduction of equity, if ENE does not currently have the ability to repay from either cash or other assets or credit capability.  They do not want to count the 1.5B or the bank loans since they will simply increase the size of the notes.  They are specifically concerned about the current intercompany notes.

Why is there a note showing NNG as a borrower from Enron?

We will keep trying

FYI
Ray,

Thanks for the feedback.  We'll get started right away.  With regard to the points below:

1 - I agree.  Divestitures, like acquisitions, require DASHs. 

2 - This should not be a problem.  The only rep. that I believe we'll have to give is that we own the note free and clear of any liens.  The rep. will be given by the holder of the note, Enron Caribe, Ltd.

3 - I will have to confirm sure that the buyers are still interested on buying the note.  I will let you know as soon as I know.  I have been talking to Michael Bax, Basic Energy - they own equity interest on the plant, and Humberto Sangiovanni with Banco Popular, a local Dominican bank.  People from EGA are aware of these individuals.

 I'll keep everyone posted and will get someone from EGA to help so that they can be in the loop.

 Dan

Dan, 

Rod Hayslett has agreed to support the sale of the Haina note.  Please proceed. 

1)      I want a DASH on the transaction.  RAC signoff on any asset sales is policy.  I view the sale of a note as policy.

2)      I want to make sure that Enron is not making any substantive reps or warranties that could bite us. 
3)      I want to know who the buyer is. 

Ray 

There is no need to get into a discussion with AA at this point.

I assume they are focusing on Enron's credit quality.  Correct?

Ray

I have a request, AA has asked if we can repay the notes to the pipes,. Not actually, but realistically from business unrelated to the pipes.   They may want to discuss with you.

any updates?

fyi - list of all open items...top 3, are -if you will- "outside" of ETS acctg control.

I thought since you called about this, I'd send you the list.

(See attached file: Outstanding List 11.04.01.doc)
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

I think we should have this discussion at Stan's staff meetings next monday.	 

Waiting to hear back from Shawn on the definition. I'll pass that on when he responds. 

I agree that you can develop a rpeliminary assessment thru Lou and Don, as to environmental.
What is social risk???????????????????????

Should I work on this request? We will be doing our risk assessments for 2002 with Andersen in January but I could touch base with a few folks in the organization (Lou Soldano and Don Hawkins) if needed. Please advise.

As part of Ken Lays initiative to measure Enron's social and environmental risk, EAS has been requested to help with a baseline assessment of what our BU's are doing in those areas.  As such, please talk with your CAO's and/or BU leaders as part of your 2002 risk assessment and obtain answers to the following questions and send them back to me on or before Thanksgiving.  Please let me know if you're having any problems with this or need further clarification.

* Do the business units know the scope and nature of social and environmental risks associated with their business strategy, transactions, assets, countries where they operate, and/or counter parties? 
* Do the business units have a process to identify social and environmental risk?
* If so, what process does the business units employ in order to identify and manage social and environmental risk?
* What process do the business units use to quantify and/or qualify these exposures?
* Who is responsible for managing this process in the business?  
* Does the business review the quality of their social/environmental risk assessment and management activities?
* Is the business unit aware of the existing corporate function and processes?

This information will help Ken and his task team to  develop a proposed process for developing a consistent process for measuring social/environmental risk management performance across the business.  We may be asked for more assistance in this area in 2002.

Thank you for your assistance!

Shawn

There are definitely issues here and we will have to deal with them for sure.    I will let you know when there is document to review so that we can get moving.

Rod,

After hearing the discussion on tighter restrictions and enforcement of "Market Affiliate" rules on the pipelines, should we be evaluating how we interface with GSS and SourceNet.   We openly share information on upcoming projects and strategies, at least with GSS.

Sounds like with the direction we are headed over the next several months, what division or subsidiaries are going to be left to buy materials or develop service contracts, other than ETS?   Should GSS be moved under ETS?    If so, it is way to big, just to cover our needs.

Any thoughts?

Morris A. Brassfield
Enron Transportation Services
Senior Director
Operations Support Services
Three Allen Center 3285
333 Clay Street
Houston, Texas 77002

713-646-7006  Business Phone
713-503-1409  Cell Phone

Fyi
As you know, the Enron Global Services Special Staff Meeting is scheduled for Thursday, Nov. 15 from 8:30 - 1:00 in 5c2.  

If you are planning to use a powerpoint presentation for your business unit overview, could I get that presentation by 5:00pm Tuesday, Nov. 13?  Once I have your presenation, we can get it ready for display at the meeting.

Thanks for your immediate attention.  Please call me with questions.

Gina
x37681 

The Enron Health Center has received its shipment of flu vaccine.  Shots will be given on a first-come, first-served basis.  NO APPOINTMENTS WILL BE ACCEPTED.  

	When:	Beginning Tuesday, November 13
	Time:	8 a.m. until 4 p.m.
	Where:	Enron Health Center, EB-312
	Cost:	Free to Enron employees, spouses, retirees, and EDS
		$10 for contractors

For more information email:  mailto:health.center@enron.com.  

I have none

WE are following the issue and I believe INGAA is going to be filing somethiong that we have had input on.

Rod:  Attached are AGA comments concerning the Exposure Draft of the Proposed Statement of Position. Are you following this issue or planning on filing comments? Comment letter deadline is November 15, 2001.

 << File: American Gas Association draft 06NOV01.doc >> 

FYI
Rod:  Attached are AGA comments concerning the Exposure Draft of the Proposed Statement of Position. Are you following this issue or planning on filing comments? Comment letter deadline is November 15, 2001.

 

Are you aware of any?  I'm not?

Do we have any big deposits that would be caught in investments?

MAybe the language should be "redeem".

In the Notes, under the heading "Dynegy Merger Agreement", consider adding the following clause to the end of the paragraph, "subject to Enron's right to repurchase".  Greg

Attached are the latest draft for the NNG 3rd Qtr 2001 in support of the revolver transactions

This draft does not include any changes related to backdraft or SLA settlement in principle issues.

 << File: NNGFINANCLRev.xls >> 
 << File: NOTES.doc >> 

I would like to but we may have to put it off until next week.    I am currently working weird hours trying to get the $1B of debt closed and funded.   I will get back to you.

Rod,

I suppose with everything going on you are probably pretty busy, but I was wondering if Biliana Pehlivanova and I can join you for lunch at your convenience.

Please let me know if this could potentially work. Thank you and hope to meet with you soon.

Sincerely,

Anya Beylin

Anya Beylin
Enron Corp.
EGM Financial Operations
713-345-4259

Approved.

I recommend approval of these.

Morris A. Brassfield
Enron Transportation Services
Senior Director
Operations Support Services
Three Allen Center 3285
333 Clay Street
Houston, Texas 77002

713-646-7006  Business Phone
713-503-1409  Cell Phone

Morris, I am forwarding two PAA formats for your review.  Jason and Nancy developed an agenda for reviewing O&M reporting requirements for our Field Point Persons that took them through the steps of reporting, forecasting and current estimating, not only as it relates to our requirements, but to those of Elaine's shop as well.

I recommend your approval.

dc

 << File: PAA - Jason Ruckle.doc >>  << File: PAA - Nancy Wood.doc >> 

Mike Zabawa
Mzabawa@enron.com

Thanks.    The date will probably have to move since the most recent events have some of us kind of hopping.    I understand that you have raised your forecast of the 4th qtr, significantly.    That's great.    Looking forward to the simple explanation.

Once you set the date and time let me know and Kirk Stevens, Jim Barnes, Jim
Murray and I will participate on the call.  

>>> Hayslett, Rod 10/15/01 3:45:33 PM >>> 
I would like to have a meeting on October 31st (maybe later if that date won't
work), either in the AM or the PM, but probably about 3 hours or so. I would
like to discuss organizations and how we are going to provide the support the
EGS organization requires both at Stan's level and at each level in the
organization. I would also like to discuss the top 3-5 concerns you have for
your business and your people. You should decide if there are people in your
organization that are needed to discuss basic functions of Planning,
Accounting, Finance and Tax and feel free to include them in this process, but
I would like to keep the group to Director level or above. Please let Kathy
know who they are. I would like to know if you are available or have a
preference for morning or afternoon. 

Thanks. 

Rod Hayslett 
EB4054 
713-853-6178

Are moving our IT support into our world?     Will Nick need to replace him?
This is a position that we have been working on for approximately the last six weeks.   Joe has completed interviews and is ready to finalize an offer to an individual that currently works in the IT department for Nick Rahn.   This position will broaden his work requirements beyond the IT world, and his knowledge of the databases will be extremely valuable to the successful execution of the Skill Base Pay program and the new Operator Qualification program under development.
 
If you approve, please forward to Dan Batista in HR.
 
Thanks,
 
Morris

The implementation of Operator Qualification has stretched the resources of the Technical Training Group.  Operator Qualification will also require future enhancements to the Skill Based Pay and Training Systems. Currently, I'm the only one in the group that understands relational databases well enough  to plan for system enhancements or troubleshoot data problems.  Data integrity and accuracy will be critical in managing the Operator Qualification program.

To solve this problem, I suggested that we fill our vacancy with an Administration Specialist that has a strong background in system solutions.

Below I've outlined a few of the responsibilities of the Administration Specialist.      

1.      Create plans for the future development of the Skill Based Pay, Training, and Operator Qualification systems, which will maximize the system's capabilities and support team objectives. 

2.      Work with management, EH&S, Pipeline Safety, and HR to understand their needs and develop effective system solutions.

3.      Ensure data integrity and accuracy in the Skill Based Pay, Training, and Operator Qualification systems. 
4.      Maximize the interface of the Training systems with other related employee information systems (SAP, Envision, Contracts DB, MP5, etc.); 

5.      Manage the self-service capabilities in order to empower the organization to access the Skill Based Pay, Training, and Operator Qualification information directly; 

6.      Develop reports, which transform Skill Based Pay and Training data into information, upon which management can base strategic decisions and improve operational efficiency. 

7.      Stay abreast of related technology and recommend future system enhancements, training software purchases, and/or system upgrades.

8.      Provide audio, audio visual and digital graphics support for the development of web based multi-media training modules.

I have already conducted interviews and have worked with Dan Batista to prepare an offer.  I am ready to conclude this offer and fill this vacancy.

Please approve and forward to Dan Batista.

Thanks,

I am OK, as long as the budget dollars are available to do it.
Rod, 
 
I believe and support what Shirley Jo is proposing here.   In light of all that is going on, I believe proceeding with this proposal makes good business sense and feel we should proceed.
 
If you approve, we will proceed.   If not, we will develop another strategy.
 
Thanks,
 
Morris

Both positions are essential to supporting E&C project work loads. 

The pipe buying has been temporarily moved to Josh Mayes.  He can support the work for a short time but this is not optimal because of his current work load.  We need an experienced pipe buyer rather than a generalist.  

The GTB project expediting was placed within EEOS because we did not have the staff to handle the work.  EEOS indicated they had the experienced staff and time available so Lisa hired them.  The performance has not been satisfactory.  We are concerned that the project will be impacted if we don't take steps to reassign the work.   

We also need approval to move offices.  Ruth Ann needs approval to move Tyrone, add a hub to his office, move two expeditors to Tyrone's office thus freeing up two spaces in the procurement office.

Thanks, 

Shirley Jo Dickens-Wilson 
Director 
ETS - Procurement and Supply Management 
Office: 713-646-7545 
shirley.jo.dickens-wilson@enron.com 

Do you fully support these positions?  Do you have anything to add to help justifiy our slant on these positions?   Why do we want to pull this work away from EEOS?  We may have to, due to Market Affiliate issues, but do you have other reasons?

Morris A. Brassfield 
Enron Transportation Services 
Senior Director 
Operations Support Services 
Three Allen Center 3285 
333 Clay Street 
Houston, Texas 77002 

713-646-7006  Business Phone 
713-503-1409  Cell Phone 

Morris:

I have two positions I would like to fill.  The first is a Pipe Buyer.  I have interviewed both internal and external candidates and my first choice is an external candidate.  He has excellent experience as a project buyer and solid experience in buying pipe both in mill quantities and distributor quantities.  Another fully qualified internal candidate for this position has withdrawn his application as he has decided to stay at EES.  My next choice would be an EBS buyer with good purchasing experience but no pipe experience.  There might be ramifications for bringing in a buyer with no pipe experience to replace the previous Pipe Buyer if he is eventually terminated.

The second position is an expediter for the Red Rock and GTB projects.  This work is currently being handled in EEOS.  I would like to bring in Debbie Hinkle who is currently in redeployment from the Methanol Plant. 

Both of this positions will be fully charged out to the projects.  Please let me know if you have any questions. 

Lisa Honey 
Project Procurement Manager 
Enron Transportation Services 
3AC 3281 
Tel. 713-646-9661 
Fax 281-664-4561 
Cell 713-594-9759 

We will propose to Stan and see where we are at that time.    If it was this week, the answer would probably be no.    

In light of the recent events, can we still attend the event at the Kayenta Boys & Girls Club?  This is the event that Senator McCain my be at and that we will be invited to make some remarks.  Lou also mentioned that it might be something for Stan to go to.

What do you think?

Cheers,

Michael

I am only concerned about moving IT types into our world that were previously in Nick's world if the job responsibilities move with them.   Sounds like this is not the case, so I am OK.
 
Looks like we will need some further explanation.  Joe, please respond to Rod and carbon me.
 
Thanks,

Are moving our IT support into our world? While this person will have an IT background, they will not be performing IT work, perse.   The IT knowledge will be invaluable in developing and maintaining the Skill Base Pay database, but Joe plans to have this person administering the Skill Base Pay and Operator Qualification program.   Currently Joe has had  to manage the organization and be the technical person developing the program and the databases.     Will Nick need to replace him?   We have this position budgeted in our organization, but I will have Joe check on whether or not Nick plans on replacing this person.
 
 
This is a position that we have been working on for approximately the last six weeks.   Joe has completed interviews and is ready to finalize an offer to an individual that currently works in the IT department for Nick Rahn.   This position will broaden his work requirements beyond the IT world, and his knowledge of the databases will be extremely valuable to the successful execution of the Skill Base Pay program and the new Operator Qualification program under development.
 
If you approve, please forward to Dan Batista in HR.
 
Thanks,
 
Morris

The implementation of Operator Qualification has stretched the resources of the Technical Training Group.  Operator Qualification will also require future enhancements to the Skill Based Pay and Training Systems. Currently, I'm the only one in the group that understands relational databases well enough  to plan for system enhancements or troubleshoot data problems.  Data integrity and accuracy will be critical in managing the Operator Qualification program.

To solve this problem, I suggested that we fill our vacancy with an Administration Specialist that has a strong background in system solutions.

Below I've outlined a few of the responsibilities of the Administration Specialist.      

1.      Create plans for the future development of the Skill Based Pay, Training, and Operator Qualification systems, which will maximize the system's capabilities and support team objectives. 

2.      Work with management, EH&S, Pipeline Safety, and HR to understand their needs and develop effective system solutions.

3.      Ensure data integrity and accuracy in the Skill Based Pay, Training, and Operator Qualification systems. 
4.      Maximize the interface of the Training systems with other related employee information systems (SAP, Envision, Contracts DB, MP5, etc.); 

5.      Manage the self-service capabilities in order to empower the organization to access the Skill Based Pay, Training, and Operator Qualification information directly; 

6.      Develop reports, which transform Skill Based Pay and Training data into information, upon which management can base strategic decisions and improve operational efficiency. 

7.      Stay abreast of related technology and recommend future system enhancements, training software purchases, and/or system upgrades.

8.      Provide audio, audio visual and digital graphics support for the development of web based multi-media training modules.

I have already conducted interviews and have worked with Dan Batista to prepare an offer.  I am ready to conclude this offer and fill this vacancy.

Please approve and forward to Dan Batista.

Thanks,

Here it is, it is not yet in final form.

 

Thank you. If you remember, would you send either Joe Hartsoe or myself a copy of the INGAA filing?

WE are following the issue and I believe INGAA is going to be filing somethiong that we have had input on.

Rod:  Attached are AGA comments concerning the Exposure Draft of the Proposed Statement of Position. Are you following this issue or planning on filing comments? Comment letter deadline is November 15, 2001.

 << File: American Gas Association draft 06NOV01.doc >> 

Maybe overkill, I would rather send them an email talking about the problems, and they have to let you 2 know when they going to use a space, and how they can coordinate stuff with you 2 instead of dictating.   I am little touchy right now about how to approach people, so we need to be careful.   I am open to more discussion on this, just would like to soften the tone a litlle.

That sounds good. We might also want to include any other request that would potentially use a "space" such as tables for data rooms, contractors, etc. If they think it only applies if they are actually moving a person or phone, the spaces we think we have available may be used without churns. For instance, sometimes I think spaces are available for use, only to find boxes and/or equipment has been set up. Just a thought. What do you think -- overkill?

What do you think of this to send out to the admins in 3AC?

In an effort to better control our space planning needs, effective immediately all ETS moves will be coordinated by Pam Daily and Ruthann Frausto. This pertains to all moves, including telephone only moves.

Please contact Pam (X36135)  regarding any moves in the Enron Building, and contact Ruthann (x66538) regarding any moves in the 3AC building. Of course, if one of us is unavailable, feel free to contact the other.

Thank you for your cooperation.

Feel free to make any changes you'd like.

RF

Let me talk to Stan when he gets back to town.    Lou and I need to discuss with him, and we are a little occupied with the credit agreement stuff.

Should Gabriel and I go ahead and make our plans to go out there?

We will propose to Stan and see where we are at that time.    If it was this week, the answer would probably be no.    

In light of the recent events, can we still attend the event at the Kayenta Boys & Girls Club?  This is the event that Senator McCain my be at and that we will be invited to make some remarks.  Lou also mentioned that it might be something for Stan to go to.

What do you think?

Cheers,

Michael

FYI

here's a revision to travis's draft for the private equity folks.

couple of comments for consideration at 2:00:

1.  we do not want to encourage a 338(h) 10 election for basis reasons that are different than existed in Northern.
2.  I have drafted as though TW is issuing the preferred, for tax reasons that may cost ENE +/- $30 million per year we want Newco 1 to issue.
3.  I am not convinced we want to offer same conversion terms as we did Dynegy.  Areas to think about removing or changing are (i) do we offer the makewhole and (ii) should we replace all "repurchase" scenarios with a redemption structure to avoid the whole change of control issue.  
4.  We need to add or relook at the exchange features given the private equity's motivation to participate in the closing of the merger.

Thanks
Jeff
 

What do you think of this?

Rod and Joe,

Here is a proposed write up of the procedures we use to protect the data that we send to RAC.
Please take a look and give me your comments.
Thanks!

Frazier

 

Can you help us here?
   
For Mariella and Jeff:    Has this divestiture been to RAC?  It will need to go, and probably sonner rather than later.

I have a quick question here:

In the LOI with the GoPhil., parties are required to show BoDirectors approval for the transaction.  This transaction will net to Enron approx. $100 million.  This is a divestiture and I don't know how we are handling approvals for that.  Can you help me understand the approval process and whether given such the Dec 1 deadline will be an issue?  I would think not but wanted to check.
Thanks

When: Thursday, October 25, 2001 10:00 AM-11:00 AM (GMT-06:00) Central Time (US & Canada).
Where: here

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Lance Schuler will help us deal with board issues related to the merger.

Thanks Rod.

Although I do not think RAC has approved the proposed transaction, I do know that RAC has gone over our models several times and, as recently as a few weeks, and has signed off on our Fair Market Value, which is some 20 to 30% below the proposed purchase price from the utility.  By copy of this to Steve (J), Steve (H) and Lian, I am asking them to start a formal process right now.
Thanks again. Mariella

Can you help us here?
   
For Mariella and Jeff:    Has this divestiture been to RAC?  It will need to go, and probably sonner rather than later.

I have a quick question here:

In the LOI with the GoPhil., parties are required to show BoDirectors approval for the transaction.  This transaction will net to Enron approx. $100 million.  This is a divestiture and I don't know how we are handling approvals for that.  Can you help me understand the approval process and whether given such the Dec 1 deadline will be an issue?  I would think not but wanted to check.
Thanks

We need your help ASAP.

We need your help ASAP.  ENBT Delaware and Potomac Capital are shown in Secretariat as being owners of preferred stock in Organizational Partner, Inc. a wholly owned sub of Enron.  Mike Moran had previously advised us that these entities were third parties and that they had 25% of the voting interest in Organizational Partner, Inc.  After sifting through the layers of subs between NNG/TW and Enron Corp. we calculated that if we ascribe 25% "ownership" in Organizational partner to third parties, then Enron owns 99.5% of NNG and TW.  On this foundation Mike Moran had advised us to refer to NNG and TW as majority-owned subs of Enron in our GAAP financial statements (notes) and FERC Form 2 filings.

As per the note below, Andersen is trying to verify that the two preferred stock owners are indeed third parties, and not subs of Enron.  Can you have some appropriate individual confirm this for us.  Heather needs the info for Andersen's review letter associated with the Revolvers.

Drew -

Bob Chandler said you were looking into the ownership structure questions.
If ENBT Delaware and Potomac Capital are truly third parties and not Enron
entities, I just want to make sure Enron does not control these entities,
because if Enron does, then we should probably say "wholly" owned in our
opinion rather than "majority" owned.

Thanks for your assistance!

Heather
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

I think it would be OK, but you might want to check with Stan.

Rod,
     I had approved an offsite Happy Hour for our Market Services Group following our string of emergencies (about a $2500-$3000 expenditure).  Considering everything that has happened, we're reviewing all costs, whether previously approved or not, and cutting where we can.  This is one that I don't think I should pull unless you feel strongly that I should.  Let me know your thoughts.

Dan  

I have.

Pls confirm that you have received your new WCom calling card.   Thank you.

Carolyn Graham
Enron NetWorks LLC
Vendor Management
713-345-8008

Fyi

Something for us to talk about during our next staff meeting.

There are three projects which have significant cash flow problems and thus=
 difficulties in meeting debt obligations: these are: SECLP, Panama and Gaz=
a.  In the past, as I suppose we have done in Dabhol, we have taken the pos=
ition that we would not inject cash into these companies and would be prepa=
red to face a default and possible acceleration of the loans.  SECLP has be=
en the biggest issue/problem.  Panama is much less (a few million of floati=
ng of our receivables from the company) would be sufficient to meet the cas=
h crunch in April of this year.  Note that, in Panama, the debt is fully gu=
aranteed by the government and is non-recoursed to the operating company, B=
LM.  In the past, we have discussed letting the debt default, which would c=
ause the bank to potentially seek complete payment and acceleration from th=
e GoPanama.  The reason: the vast majority of BLM's problems stem from acti=
ons taken by the regulator that have effectively amended our PPA's with pri=
vate parties; those actions resulted in significant loss of revenues, which=
 although today have stopped or have been limited, have left a "mark" on th=
e company's liquidity position. =20

Now the question is: come April of 2002, should any of our actions in Panam=
a or decisions related thereto (which we would have otherwise taken or made=
) be affected in any way by either the proposed merger or an effort by Enro=
n to preserve efforts to re-establish investor/creditor confidence?  The sa=
me could go for SECLP and Gaza.

This is simply an overall "guidance" question.  Let's take it up during our=
 staff meeting next week, if that's ok with you.

Many thanks, Mariella

OK
I guess now that we have obtained approval to hire the employee, we need your approval to move his phone number to his new work location.
 
Thanks,

Joe Jeffers has hired Russell Hardie to fill the vacancy in his group. Russell is currently working in Elaine Tombaugh's IT group, here on 3AC32. He'll be taking only his telephone and personal belongings with him.

I need to get the proper approvals before submitting a churn request to move his telephone from 3AC3234 to 3AC3204. 

If you approve of this move, please forward this message along with an indication of your approval, to Rod Hayslett for his approval.

Thanks. 

Ruthann 
x66538 

2 meetings on monday  8 & 9:30 and 2 on friday, 9 & 10.

Rod:
I have been meaning to ask you, what staff meetings should I be attending and
when are they held?

    -----Original Message-----
   Fyi
   --------------------------
   Sent from my BlackBerry Wireless Handheld (www.BlackBerry.net)

   -----Original Message-----
   Something for us to talk about during our next staff meeting.

   There are three projects which have significant cash flow problems and
   thus difficulties in meeting debt obligations: these are: SECLP, Panama
   and Gaza.  In the past, as I suppose we have done in Dabhol, we have
   taken the position that we would not inject cash into these companies
   and would be prepared to face a default and possible acceleration of the
   loans.  SECLP has been the biggest issue/problem.  Panama is much less
   (a few million of floating of our receivables from the company) would be
   sufficient to meet the cash crunch in April of this year.  Note that, in
   Panama, the debt is fully guaranteed by the government and is
   non-recoursed to the operating company, BLM.  In the past, we have
   discussed letting the debt default, which would cause the bank to
   potentially seek complete payment and acceleration from the GoPanama.
   The reason: the vast majority of BLM's problems stem from actions taken
   by the regulator that have effectively amended our PPA's with private
   parties; those actions resulted in significant loss of revenues, which
   although today have stopped or have been limited, have left a "mark" on
   the company's liquidity position.

   Now the question is: come April of 2002, should any of our actions in
   Panama or decisions related thereto (which we would have otherwise taken
   or made) be affected in any way by either the proposed merger or an
   effort by Enron to preserve efforts to re-establish investor/creditor
   confidence?  The same could go for SECLP and Gaza.

   This is simply an overall "guidance" question.  Let's take it up during
   our staff meeting next week, if that's ok with you.

   Many thanks, Mariella

What is driving the return of the cash?

Rod,

We need to make sure Enron Treasury understands the $300 million plus of NEPCO cash will have to flow back in the next year.  I have been involved in two situations where some smart people in the treasury functions did not really understand this impact. There is more cash to come from the projects, but for the most part that represents the profits and that cash will not really be ours until we have cleared the retainages and LOC's. If we can get a couple of new projects in NEPCO, we might be able to sustain the balance, but nothing is secure at this time.

Keith

Fyi
Jeff:

I've talked to Jayshree.  All we have to get out tonight is the info books.  Let's review the letter, term sheet, diagram and CAs tomorrow morning and send them up by e-mail.

I suggest we meet at 8:00 or 8:30 in my office tomorrow morning to finalize everything.

	 -----Original Message-----
	Attached is a draft cover letter and transaction diagram for the Dynegy deal.  Travis is going to forward me the executed versions of all the associated documents.  Let me know your comments.  Thanks.

	 << File: Transaction structure.ppt >>  << File: cover.doc >> 

2 meetings on monday  8 & 9:30 in 49C2 and 2 on friday, 9 & 10 in 49C2.

Rod:
I have been meaning to ask you, what staff meetings should I be attending
and
when are they held?

    -----Original Message-----
   Fyi
   --------------------------
   Sent from my BlackBerry Wireless Handheld (www.BlackBerry.net)

   -----Original Message-----
   Something for us to talk about during our next staff meeting.

   There are three projects which have significant cash flow problems and
   thus difficulties in meeting debt obligations: these are: SECLP, Panama
   and Gaza.  In the past, as I suppose we have done in Dabhol, we have
   taken the position that we would not inject cash into these companies
   and would be prepared to face a default and possible acceleration of the
   loans.  SECLP has been the biggest issue/problem.  Panama is much less
   (a few million of floating of our receivables from the company) would be
   sufficient to meet the cash crunch in April of this year.  Note that, in
   Panama, the debt is fully guaranteed by the government and is
   non-recoursed to the operating company, BLM.  In the past, we have
   discussed letting the debt default, which would cause the bank to
   potentially seek complete payment and acceleration from the GoPanama.
   The reason: the vast majority of BLM's problems stem from actions taken
   by the regulator that have effectively amended our PPA's with private
   parties; those actions resulted in significant loss of revenues, which
   although today have stopped or have been limited, have left a "mark" on
   the company's liquidity position.

   Now the question is: come April of 2002, should any of our actions in
   Panama or decisions related thereto (which we would have otherwise taken
   or made) be affected in any way by either the proposed merger or an
   effort by Enron to preserve efforts to re-establish investor/creditor
   confidence?  The same could go for SECLP and Gaza.

   This is simply an overall "guidance" question.  Let's take it up during
   our staff meeting next week, if that's ok with you.

   Many thanks, Mariella

Does this really have to be done?   It's probably too late now, but we really do need to watch our spending for awhile.  I would like to coordinate moves through our move people either Ruth Ann Frausto (3AC) or Pam Daily (EB) so I can keep up with space as well as costs that are coming down the pike. 

Rod, for your information and/or approval...

Hope Acosta in Right of Way advised me this afternoon that she had submitted a churn request yesterday (#10956) to move the phone from 3AC3172 to 3179, and that the request had been approved by the Move Team and Christina Yepez for tonight (11/13). They plan to have their desktop support person move the computer equipment in the morning from 3172 to 3179. I asked Hope if she entered your name for notification e-mail on the churn request, however she said she wasn't aware she was supposed to. She listed Johnny McGee, her Director, for notification e-mail.

Liz Beddingfield from Right of Way called me yesterday, asking about submitting a churn, and I told her we are currently not scheduling moves unless they affect the safety of a person or the pipeline. I suggested they leave the person in 3172 and let Janice Holloway, who's coming over from Corp for one month to work on a project for Don Hawkins, move into 3179. They expressed concern about giving up 3179, which is a larger, outside office with a window. I assured her Janice would only be here until the end of the year at most, and they would not be giving up that office.

Since they have already scheduled this move, I will put Janice Hollaway in 3172 tomorrow. I need approval to have a telephone installed for her.

Thank you.

Ruthann
x66538

FYI

Rod, was not aware of this.  Janice will only work two days a week so really doesn't matter where her workstation is.  Will follow up.

Don

Does this really have to be done?   It's probably too late now, but we really do need to watch our spending for awhile.  I would like to coordinate moves through our move people either Ruth Ann Frausto (3AC) or Pam Daily (EB) so I can keep up with space as well as costs that are coming down the pike. 

Rod, for your information and/or approval...

Hope Acosta in Right of Way advised me this afternoon that she had submitted a churn request yesterday (#10956) to move the phone from 3AC3172 to 3179, and that the request had been approved by the Move Team and Christina Yepez for tonight (11/13). They plan to have their desktop support person move the computer equipment in the morning from 3172 to 3179. I asked Hope if she entered your name for notification e-mail on the churn request, however she said she wasn't aware she was supposed to. She listed Johnny McGee, her Director, for notification e-mail.

Liz Beddingfield from Right of Way called me yesterday, asking about submitting a churn, and I told her we are currently not scheduling moves unless they affect the safety of a person or the pipeline. I suggested they leave the person in 3172 and let Janice Holloway, who's coming over from Corp for one month to work on a project for Don Hawkins, move into 3179. They expressed concern about giving up 3179, which is a larger, outside office with a window. I assured her Janice would only be here until the end of the year at most, and they would not be giving up that office.

Since they have already scheduled this move, I will put Janice Hollaway in 3172 tomorrow. I need approval to have a telephone installed for her.

Thank you.

Ruthann
x66538

Are you still going to be making a presentation?

 

Kelly M. Johnson
Executive Assistant
Enron Corp.
Tel: 713-853-6485
Fax: 713-853-2534
E-Mail: kelly.johnson@enron.com

Can you help explain how the data in the attached file matches the detailed budgets and current estimates you have provided to me?    It may simply, I just haven't had time to look.

Rod,

Thanks for the email.  Can you help me match the information in this email
to your operating plan or cash flow analysis?

Kyle

 
 <<AnnualStats.xls>>

>  
> Do you have the volume and rate information on Northern Natural that
> will tie to Rod's forecast as well?
>
> Kyle
>

(See attached file: AnnualStats.xls)

This staff meeting is monday at 9:30 in 3AC.

Something for us to talk about during our next staff meeting.

There are three projects which have significant cash flow problems and thus=
 difficulties in meeting debt obligations: these are: SECLP, Panama and Gaz=
a.  In the past, as I suppose we have done in Dabhol, we have taken the pos=
ition that we would not inject cash into these companies and would be prepa=
red to face a default and possible acceleration of the loans.  SECLP has be=
en the biggest issue/problem.  Panama is much less (a few million of floati=
ng of our receivables from the company) would be sufficient to meet the cas=
h crunch in April of this year.  Note that, in Panama, the debt is fully gu=
aranteed by the government and is non-recoursed to the operating company, B=
LM.  In the past, we have discussed letting the debt default, which would c=
ause the bank to potentially seek complete payment and acceleration from th=
e GoPanama.  The reason: the vast majority of BLM's problems stem from acti=
ons taken by the regulator that have effectively amended our PPA's with pri=
vate parties; those actions resulted in significant loss of revenues, which=
 although today have stopped or have been limited, have left a "mark" on th=
e company's liquidity position. =20

Now the question is: come April of 2002, should any of our actions in Panam=
a or decisions related thereto (which we would have otherwise taken or made=
) be affected in any way by either the proposed merger or an effort by Enro=
n to preserve efforts to re-establish investor/creditor confidence?  The sa=
me could go for SECLP and Gaza.

This is simply an overall "guidance" question.  Let's take it up during our=
 staff meeting next week, if that's ok with you.

Many thanks, Mariella

I need to send this to Jeff and Ray and get it back agreed to before we can actually fund otherwise I am not comfortable with the agreement and the reps we are making. 

The following representations (among others) have been made to various parties relative to both the credit agreement (with the banks) and the Preferred Stock Agreeement (Dynegy) to the Boards of Transwestern (TW), Northern (NNG) and Enron Transportation Services (ETSC) and it subsidiaries, as well as to Dynegy and the banks:

The funds that are being loaned out of NNG and TW to various entities and the further loans of these funds to Enron will carry Enron Corp guaranties.
The note agreements will reimburse NNG, TW and ETSC and their subsidiaries for their actual expenses associated with these endeavors.
The credit agreements actually require a large degree of separateness and an arm's length standard needs to be applied to dealings between ETSC and its subsidiaries and Enron and the rest of it's subsidiaries.

Before the funding under the credit agreement takes place I would like to make sure that you two are aware of this, have agreed to and understand the conditions and further agree that you will assist me in cleaning up whatever documentation needs to be cleaned up between Enron and ETSC and it's subs to make the above representations not be false.

Rod Hayslett
Managing Director, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer
Enron Transportation Services Company
EB4054
1400 Smith Street
Houston, TX  77002-7361
713-853-6178
rod.hayslett@enron.com

I don't know but I need you to call me (i'm at work) and check your email for one I just sent out.

Is the plan still to execute CA this morning?

The following representations (among others) have been made to various parties in due diligence relative to both the credit agreement (with the banks) and the Preferred Stock Agreement (Dynegy) to the Boards of Transwestern (TW), Northern (NNG) and Enron Transportation Services (ETSC) and it subsidiaries, as well as to Dynegy and the banks:

The funds that are being loaned out of NNG and TW to various entities and the further loans of these funds to Enron will carry Enron Corp guaranties.
The note agreements will reimburse NNG, TW and ETSC and their subsidiaries for their actual expenses associated with these endeavors.
The credit agreements actually require a large degree of separateness and an arm's length standard needs to be applied to dealings between ETSC and its subsidiaries and Enron and the rest of it's subsidiaries.

Before the funding under the credit agreement takes place I would like to make sure that you two are aware of this, have agreed to and understand the conditions and further agree that you will assist me in cleaning up whatever documentation needs to be cleaned up between Enron and ETSC and it's subs to make the above representations not be false.

Rod Hayslett
Managing Director, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer
Enron Transportation Services Company
EB4054
1400 Smith Street
Houston, TX  77002-7361
713-853-6178
rod.hayslett@enron.com

If we do this, we need to have both an internal group and an external group.

Rod, Charlie if we are looking for someone internally to do a review process, Sarabeth possibly can provide this function.  Your thoughts?

Do you have a candidate?    I would argue that we are looking at a process review, so anyone who can do a process review could do this.

Rod,

I agree with Kenneth Cessac's response.  We should evaluate our current process for collecting, validating and distributing measurement data and consider new ideas and alternatives to improve the process.  Assistance from a consulting firm that specializes in this area would probably be better than using Rutherford.

Charlie      

This question has been raised several times over the past 10+ years, should we combine GMS, Field Operations, and some of the Gas Control functions to create a single source for measurement data.  I do not feel that changing a reporting relationship would correct any problems.  

I feel the time and effort can e better spent improving our current data collect process and data flow between SCADA and PGAS.  While this process is working I feel that it requires to much manual intervention and handling.  The IT department, Measurement Technology, Gas Control Hot Seat, and the Data Analysis are all involved in keeping the data flowing between SCADA and PGAS.  We should step back and re look and the current process and see what improvements can be made to better control and maintain this process.

 A second area that should be looked at is the data validation process.  Currently Field Operations, Data Analysis, and GMS all  manually review measurement data.  With all of the computer and software technology available I feel that we could easily automate most of the current manual data validation.

I have limited experience with the Rutherford company and what they could provide towards improving these items.  I feel that a company that specializes in SCADA and such as UTSI would be a better option.  

Charlie, Ken, I would like to meet with you this afternoon if possible (2:00 pm) so you can bring me up to speed on PGAS and Sullivan's concern so we can respond to Rod by early next week.

Thanks,

Don

I'm going to defer this to the experts.  Please convey your thoughts to Rod.

Would you agree that something needs to be done?

The PGAS reporting project recently completed requirements gathering meetings with data users in gas measurement technology, gas control, gms, gas accounting, and gas logistics.  We think, those discussions have pointed to a need to assess inefficiencies that appear to exist related to data integrity as data moves between systems and users that span the entire gas volume/quality collection, transformation and delivery process.  In other words there seem to be too many questions and reconcilliations that people have to address along the process as data changes hands and is used for different internal and external purposes.  There also appears to be a lack of a single point of responsibility in the organization for gas volume data from start to finish.
The PGAS reporting project proposed to assess this at a high level and make some recommendations.  But as important as the issue appears to be, you might want to consider using Rutherford to help ETS do a more thorough job of this.
This effort would extend outside FA&A.
Please advise.

Mike, Ellis and I are in agreement that the need for the Rutherford Consulting group is complete.  Rutherford achieved what their goal was; to provide structure and format for the PGAS issues to be addressed in an efficient manner.  The procedures for listing new issues are in place and are being followed by the team.  The meetings are efficient in that only status updates and priorities are reviewed and discussed. There is now only one list for all issues that are being addressed or need to be addressed and they are prioritized.   The monthly meetings are now only needed twice a month.  What is the procedure for notifying Rutherford that their services are no longer needed on this project as they have completed what was asked of them?   cvb

Does this make us feel better?

Fine with me.

Regards,

Jeff

The following representations (among others) have been made to various parties in due diligence relative to both the credit agreement (with the banks) and the Preferred Stock Agreement (Dynegy) to the Boards of Transwestern (TW), Northern (NNG) and Enron Transportation Services (ETSC) and it subsidiaries, as well as to Dynegy and the banks:

The funds that are being loaned out of NNG and TW to various entities and the further loans of these funds to Enron will carry Enron Corp guaranties.
The note agreements will reimburse NNG, TW and ETSC and their subsidiaries for their actual expenses associated with these endeavors.
The credit agreements actually require a large degree of separateness and an arm's length standard needs to be applied to dealings between ETSC and its subsidiaries and Enron and the rest of it's subsidiaries.

Before the funding under the credit agreement takes place I would like to make sure that you two are aware of this, have agreed to and understand the conditions and further agree that you will assist me in cleaning up whatever documentation needs to be cleaned up between Enron and ETSC and it's subs to make the above representations not be false.

Rod Hayslett
Managing Director, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer
Enron Transportation Services Company
EB4054
1400 Smith Street
Houston, TX  77002-7361
713-853-6178
rod.hayslett@enron.com

I would like each of you to help take ownership of this project to be fully able to explain the trends on these sheets.   I would also like to begin to add 2001 3rd CE to this discussion as soon as possible.   Accounting quite possibly has the answers, but I want to get this documented as soon as possible so that we understand the changes and don't have to go back and do this again.   This is not a project that will be complete by friday, but it does need to get complete this year.

starting point, okay?
if possible, please indicate line items you woul like us to "drill down" on

 

I think I feel better, but I would like some comfort from the lawyer in the crew.

Be on the look out.

Maricela: Would you please coordinate with someone at Bracewell regarding wire transfer information to have paid today the following legal bills with respect to time through today:

(1) Bracewell: $950,000
(2) Shearman & Sterling: $265,000
(3) Davis, Polk: $185,291.59
(4) Local Counsel (to be designated as such, but wired to Bracewell): $60,000.

I'm sure there is more to follow (ie. Delaware counsel)
Let me know if you have any questions.
Thanks.
Jordan

Yes I did

Approved

We're there given his response.

Fine with me.

Regards,

Jeff

The following representations (among others) have been made to various parties in due diligence relative to both the credit agreement (with the banks) and the Preferred Stock Agreement (Dynegy) to the Boards of Transwestern (TW), Northern (NNG) and Enron Transportation Services (ETSC) and it subsidiaries, as well as to Dynegy and the banks:

The funds that are being loaned out of NNG and TW to various entities and the further loans of these funds to Enron will carry Enron Corp guaranties.
The note agreements will reimburse NNG, TW and ETSC and their subsidiaries for their actual expenses associated with these endeavors.
The credit agreements actually require a large degree of separateness and an arm's length standard needs to be applied to dealings between ETSC and its subsidiaries and Enron and the rest of it's subsidiaries.

Before the funding under the credit agreement takes place I would like to make sure that you two are aware of this, have agreed to and understand the conditions and further agree that you will assist me in cleaning up whatever documentation needs to be cleaned up between Enron and ETSC and it's subs to make the above representations not be false.

Rod Hayslett
Managing Director, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer
Enron Transportation Services Company
EB4054
1400 Smith Street
Houston, TX  77002-7361
713-853-6178
rod.hayslett@enron.com

Won't be able to make it.  Sorry.

Are you going to join us for lunch?

Stan called back and explained.    We need to do 100% and begin to look at dollars that could be saved.    This is an estimating process to figure out if we can effectively reduce our spending and by how much and then what portion of that benefits Enron.

Should I bring you something back?  Have you heard from Stan on the O and M?

FYI

MESSAGE FROM GREG PORTER

________________________________________________
As you know, Transwestern filed a complaint against Southern California Gas Company (SoCalGas) at the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission on September 28, 2001.  The complaint asked FERC to find SoCalGas' refusal to pay the tariff commodity rate constitutes a violation of Transwestern's tariff and the 1995 Global Settlement.  SoCalGas filed an Answer on October 18, 2001.  In summary, SoCalGas' Answer stated:

1.	SoCalGas did not affirmatively agree to pay the stated tariff rate during the Global Settlement.  

2.	The commodity charge SoCal has been paying is consistent with the course of performance/conduct prior to, and after, the Global Settlement.  

3.	Since the Global Settlement has been in effect, SoCalGas has relied on the commodity/usage charges that Transwestern has billed.    

4.	SoCalGas claims they had been paying the appropriate rate and that Transwestern failed to include the correct rate in its tariff; such omission has created ambiguity and any ambiguity should be construed against the drafter of the tariff, Transwestern.

5.	If the Commission disagrees with SoCalGas and declines to reject the complaint outright, any retroactive billing adjustment should be limited to a six-month period.

6.	SoCalGas admits that a retroactive billing adjustment for the escalation factor for six months is reasonable and an escalation factor going forward for the remaining term of its Contract No. 8255 is appropriate.

In addition to the foregoing statements, SoCalGas provided that it, like Transwestern, was interested in resolving this matter through ADR.  Accordingly, we will be coordinating with SoCalGas and FERC's ADR group to explore possible ADR procedures.

We will advise as new developments warrant.  In the meantime, should you have any questions regarding this matter please do not hesitate to contact me at (402) 398-7406 or Maria Pavlou at (402) 398-7097.

Mary Kay, Ray and Rob:  Can you 3 help her out on 1 & 2?
Tracy:   Please handle 3.

We have some investors who are interested in knowing more about the pipes.  Can you please tell me who can anwser/confirm the following:

1.  Per the latest rate cases the nominal ROE's and related capital structures are as follows:

	ROE				12.89%	12.18%	13.49%
	Equity Ratio(equity to debt)	60%	60%	42%

2. Is rate base calculated on equity or assets?

3. What was the percentage of capacity for each of the pipes for the first nine months of this year?

It would be very helpful if you or someone could respond this afternoon. 

Thanks!

_________________________
Gay Mayeux
Vice President, Investor Relations
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith Street, EB 4931a
Houston, Texas 77002

Phone:  713-853-9905
Cell:      713-416-8821
Fax:      713-646-3002
email:    gay.mayeux@enron.com

No, but thank you foroffering

If you need me I'm in the cafeteria for 5 minutes

Are you aware of this?

Stan's meeting with Phil's group is at 2:00 today in 2AC12 - Forum.

Is this a place that is big enough to handle some extras?

Stan's meeting with Phil's group is at 2:00 today in 2AC12 - Forum.

I was actually thinking only about the people in Morris's Brassfield's crew?  But he should now about already, as he supports Phil.

It is an auditorium-type room. I can't say it is big enough to bring your entire finance group, but I'm sure there will be room for some extras.

Is this a place that is big enough to handle some extras?

Stan's meeting with Phil's group is at 2:00 today in 2AC12 - Forum.

No, I'm working on the credit agreement.

Yes, Amelia sent us a note early this morning.   Are you coming to it?

Morris A. Brassfield
Enron Transportation Services
Senior Director
Operations Support Services
Three Allen Center 3285
333 Clay Street
Houston, Texas 77002

713-646-7006  Business Phone
713-503-1409  Cell Phone

Are you aware of this?

Stan's meeting with Phil's group is at 2:00 today in 2AC12 - Forum.

Thanks.

Don't work too hard.   Anything I can do for you, don't hesitate to call.

Morris A. Brassfield
Enron Transportation Services
Senior Director
Operations Support Services
Three Allen Center 3285
333 Clay Street
Houston, Texas 77002

713-646-7006  Business Phone
713-503-1409  Cell Phone

No, I'm working on the credit agreement.

Yes, Amelia sent us a note early this morning.   Are you coming to it?

Morris A. Brassfield
Enron Transportation Services
Senior Director
Operations Support Services
Three Allen Center 3285
333 Clay Street
Houston, Texas 77002

713-646-7006  Business Phone
713-503-1409  Cell Phone

Are you aware of this?

Stan's meeting with Phil's group is at 2:00 today in 2AC12 - Forum.

Talk to Steve, but I think he is working on a reliability issue that probably needs to handled, but may be able to be done over a period instead of all at once.   I really don't know, but he will.

Rod, did you and Steve talk specifically about the emergency back-up center Jean McFarland is trying to get set up at the hangar, and does this directive also mean to put that on hold?

All spending that can be delayed needs to be delayed.	I want to make it clear that items for health, safety, security and reliability that need to be spent will be spent, if necessary, but all other spending needs to be slowed down as much as possible and delayed until further notice.   This is a directive I have just received from Stan.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

I am hearing all sorts of noise and need confirmation and guidance.  Phil Lowry just have Nick Rahn $2.7 mil to do various upgrades in the field, from server upgrades to phone switch upgrades as well as purchase the new software/hardware for the PHD rewrite. All are necessary upgrades if not done this year will have to be done next year.  Not one of these upgrades projects is over $900k but together it totals $2.7.  We also are continuing to do upgrades in the Houston offices - all budgeted items and if not upgraded this year will have to be done next year.  Do I say STOP - and if so for all companies or just for NNG and TW?   cvb

I believe so

Rod, 
Has NNG received this??????????????????

Whalley predicted transactions would return to more normal levels by the end of the week with the recent $1.5 billion infusion of equity from Dynegy. 

It's an informal get together that shouldn't last more than about an hour.    I want to make sure you all have access to info and we can share concerns etc.
We have a conference call scheduled for tomorrow.  What is the specific topic of discussion and do we need to prepare anything and forward it to you for that discussion.
 
Thanks

FYI

Gay, In response to question No. 1 for NNG and TW, please see the following:

							NNG					TW

	Return on Equity				12.27%					11.50%

	Capitalization Structure		Debt: 41.57%; Equity: 58.43%		Debt: 42.00%; Equity: 58.00%

In response to question No. 2, rate base is calculated on assets, specifically: net plant, certain regulatory assets, working capital, offset by a credit for deferred taxes.

Please let me know if you have any further questions.  Tim

Tim,  we need to put this info together asap.  See me-  MK

Mary Kay, Ray and Rob:  Can you 3 help her out on 1 & 2?
Tracy:   Please handle 3.

We have some investors who are interested in knowing more about the pipes.  Can you please tell me who can anwser/confirm the following:

1.  Per the latest rate cases the nominal ROE's and related capital structures are as follows:

	ROE				12.89%	12.18%	13.49%
	Equity Ratio(equity to debt)	60%	60%	42%

2. Is rate base calculated on equity or assets?

3. What was the percentage of capacity for each of the pipes for the first nine months of this year?

It would be very helpful if you or someone could respond this afternoon. 

Thanks!

_________________________
Gay Mayeux
Vice President, Investor Relations
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith Street, EB 4931a
Houston, Texas 77002

Phone:  713-853-9905
Cell:      713-416-8821
Fax:      713-646-3002
email:    gay.mayeux@enron.com

	I think what the partnership values it does not have to have a relationship to what we value it at.

Jim?

FYI, we received the signed copy from Williams today on MOPS.

Steve Dowd called me about the sale of our interest in Trailblazer.  He wanted to know if we were valuing the interest would we treat it differently because we are buying the partnership interest?  Would we treat the depreciation differently at the partnership level than the asset level?  For example, if the asset sold for $110, but the partnership valued it at $100, how would we account for the $10 difference, assuming these figures represented ENE's interest in the assets?

Thanks,

Michael

Kathy Campos
ETS Finance
EB4055
713-853-6833

Thanks.    Great job.

Signed and funded. We will hit nng tomorrow.  Thanks for all of your help.

Do you have any critical people that you are afraid you will lose because of the merger?   How about a group?

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

The meeting will at the most last a little more than an hour or 2.    Nothing special to prepare for.

Please note this meeting will now be from 2:00 - 5:00 PM on Thursday, November 15, 2001 in EB49C2.

If unable to attend, please join via teleconference at:

Dial In:		1-800-432-2180
Passcode:	707819

Omaha participants please plan on meeting in OMA7C2.

Thank You,
Kathy Campos

Please note this meeting has now been rescheduled for Thursday, November 15, 2001 from 1:00 - 3:00 PM in EB49C2.

For Omaha participants this meeting will be in OMA 7C2. 

Please mark your calendars.

Thank You,
Kathy Campos

No reason to be other at this point.

FYI.  Recall that I directed Arnold to request this as a result of my conversations with Pete Weidler - he wanted to ensure we didn't get too far out in front on expenditures.  I'm going to ask Arnold to indicate that it is our normal review process, unless you guys disagree.

Jerry

Arnold,

I'm in Bolivia this week, returning to Houston over the weekend and then going on to Miami for meetings with GTB's lenders, Exim and CAF.  I will bring the information you requested back with me and give it you when I get back into the office the week after Thanksgiving.  In summary, GTB is in good shape....we raised $10MM more in bridge loans than we planned and are making good progress with our Exim and CAF financing.  The lenders have completed their due diligence and we are meeting next week to finalize term sheets before the lenders go to their respective boards for credit approval.  

Just curious...is this request in accordance with your regularly scheduled review process or something more?  GTB's financial condition if anything has improved since the EPC contract was signed...wish we could say the same for Enron.

BRS 

 << File: GTB Ltr 11.14.01.pdf >> 

where did you get this?

A little humor to keep us smiling in these troubled times:

Make sure to read the last one.
***************************************

Social Studies: Some Useful Definitions

Feudalism
You have two cows.
Your lord takes some of the milk.

Fascism
You have two cows.
The government takes both, hires you to take care of them and
sells you the milk.

Applied Communism
You have two cows.
You must take care of them, but the government takes all the milk.

Capitalism
You have two cows.
You sell one and buy a bull.
Your herd multiplies, and the economy grows.
You sell them and retire on the income

Enron Venture Capitalism
You have two cows.
You sell three of them to your publicly listed company, using letters of credit opened by your brother-in-law at the bank, then execute a debt/equity swap with an associated general offer so that you get all four cows back, with a tax exemption for five cows. The milk rights of the six cows are transferred via an intermediary to a Cayman Island company secretly owned by the majority shareholder who sells the rights to all seven cows back to your listed company. The annual report says the company owns eight cows, with an option on one more. - No Balance Sheet provided with the release.

FYI

A little humor to keep us smiling in these troubled times:

Make sure to read the last one.
***************************************

Social Studies: Some Useful Definitions

Feudalism
You have two cows.
Your lord takes some of the milk.

Fascism
You have two cows.
The government takes both, hires you to take care of them and
sells you the milk.

Applied Communism
You have two cows.
You must take care of them, but the government takes all the milk.

Capitalism
You have two cows.
You sell one and buy a bull.
Your herd multiplies, and the economy grows.
You sell them and retire on the income

Enron Venture Capitalism
You have two cows.
You sell three of them to your publicly listed company, using letters of credit opened by your brother-in-law at the bank, then execute a debt/equity swap with an associated general offer so that you get all four cows back, with a tax exemption for five cows. The milk rights of the six cows are transferred via an intermediary to a Cayman Island company secretly owned by the majority shareholder who sells the rights to all seven cows back to your listed company. The annual report says the company owns eight cows, with an option on one more. - No Balance Sheet provided with the release.

Fyi
Dorothy:

	I am dropping you this e-mail at the request of Rod Hayslett and in response to your voice mail message to him concerning the status of the price redetermination under the LNG contract with Duke.  The parties reached settlement on this issue about a week before arbitration.  The new price beginning September 1 is 92.5% of the Equivalent MMBtu Price of No. 6 Fuel Oil less $0.25 per
MMBtu.  Of course, the other provisions of the contract,  such as the ceiling price, the floor price and the bank provisions,  remain.

	I trust that makes some semblance of sense.  If you have additional questions, please call.

Jeff

I will approve the posting subject to the condition that it be internal only at this time.

I will submit that that may be the case today.  I am only concerned that when the situation changes that we will not be willing to discuss the opposite and the question still remains as to what the form 2 (regulatory) will require.

We have done it before, in fact it was the way all of the pipes were origin=
ally built, but not for short term stuff.    Gavin Russo can probably help =
us with his property tax background.   Lou, please try to get hold of Gavin=
 or whomever he believes should take part in the discussion.=20

Here's a little more detail on the voice mail I left you earlier.  The bank=
s want more than just secured debt.  They want a mortgage on all of TW and =
NNG's real property.  That's right, they want a filing with every county co=
urthouse where NNG and TW own assets.  I want to talk to you tomorrow befor=
e Stan's meeting about why that is just a terrible idea.  In short, at the =
same time we are doing this big loan and cash infusion into ENA to "calm th=
e market" we will simultaneously have dozens of right of way guys and local=
 real estate lawyers crawling all over the place doing something I don't th=
ink any pipeline has done before (at least not in my memory).  Nevertheless=
, I want to be able to move forward if there is no alternative.  For us to =
prepare mortgage documents we need (I think) to have approximate property v=
alues by county.  Do we have this info somewhere?  Are ad valorem tax value=
s kept by county?  I don't think our FERC books will be much help on this. =
 Lou is getting Johnny McGee and some folks together after Stan's meeting t=
o talk to me and the Vinson and Elkins folks about how we can do this proje=
ct if we have to.  It will be a challenge, particularly in the 2 week timet=
able they are talking about.       Talk to you tomorrow.  DF   

I'm about to return to the office to see it.  About 15minutes.

Listen to voice mail forwarded from Jim

treasury had not recorded a payment, so things should be clean now.  Accounting is double checking.  I have a call into Nora.

This is fine.

How's this?

Recently we've had a couple of mix ups regarding vacant office space and phone moves. In light of this, we'd like to help by coordinating the moves in 3AC like we've been doing in the Enron Building. We know you are all very busy, and we'll be happy to submit move requests for you, including telephone moves and reassignments.

This will also enable us to keep current on floor space billing and make sure it gets corrected when an employee moves.

Please contact Ruthann (x66538) for assistance with any moves in 3AC, and Pam (x36135) for assistance with any moves in the Enron Building. Of course, if one of us is unavailable, feel free to call the other. If an office or cubicle is vacant and you would like to put someone in it, please contact us, so we can help coordinate it and hopefully avoid confusion.

Thanks for your help.

Pam Daily and Ruthann Frausto

Maybe overkill, I would rather send them an email talking about the problems, and they have to let you 2 know when they going to use a space, and how they can coordinate stuff with you 2 instead of dictating.   I am little touchy right now about how to approach people, so we need to be careful.   I am open to more discussion on this, just would like to soften the tone a litlle.

That sounds good. We might also want to include any other request that would potentially use a "space" such as tables for data rooms, contractors, etc. If they think it only applies if they are actually moving a person or phone, the spaces we think we have available may be used without churns. For instance, sometimes I think spaces are available for use, only to find boxes and/or equipment has been set up. Just a thought. What do you think -- overkill?

What do you think of this to send out to the admins in 3AC?

In an effort to better control our space planning needs, effective immediately all ETS moves will be coordinated by Pam Daily and Ruthann Frausto. This pertains to all moves, including telephone only moves.

Please contact Pam (X36135)  regarding any moves in the Enron Building, and contact Ruthann (x66538) regarding any moves in the 3AC building. Of course, if one of us is unavailable, feel free to contact the other.

Thank you for your cooperation.

Feel free to make any changes you'd like.

RF

How about sending it out from me.

How's this?

Recently we've had a couple of mix ups regarding vacant office space and phone moves. In light of this, we'd like to help by coordinating the moves in 3AC like we've been doing in the Enron Building. We know you are all very busy, and we'll be happy to submit move requests for you, including telephone moves and reassignments.

This will also enable us to keep current on floor space billing and make sure it gets corrected when an employee moves.

Please contact Ruthann (x66538) for assistance with any moves in 3AC, and Pam (x36135) for assistance with any moves in the Enron Building. Of course, if one of us is unavailable, feel free to call the other. If an office or cubicle is vacant and you would like to put someone in it, please contact us, so we can help coordinate it and hopefully avoid confusion.

Thanks for your help.

Pam Daily and Ruthann Frausto

Maybe overkill, I would rather send them an email talking about the problems, and they have to let you 2 know when they going to use a space, and how they can coordinate stuff with you 2 instead of dictating.   I am little touchy right now about how to approach people, so we need to be careful.   I am open to more discussion on this, just would like to soften the tone a litlle.

That sounds good. We might also want to include any other request that would potentially use a "space" such as tables for data rooms, contractors, etc. If they think it only applies if they are actually moving a person or phone, the spaces we think we have available may be used without churns. For instance, sometimes I think spaces are available for use, only to find boxes and/or equipment has been set up. Just a thought. What do you think -- overkill?

What do you think of this to send out to the admins in 3AC?

In an effort to better control our space planning needs, effective immediately all ETS moves will be coordinated by Pam Daily and Ruthann Frausto. This pertains to all moves, including telephone only moves.

Please contact Pam (X36135)  regarding any moves in the Enron Building, and contact Ruthann (x66538) regarding any moves in the 3AC building. Of course, if one of us is unavailable, feel free to contact the other.

Thank you for your cooperation.

Feel free to make any changes you'd like.

RF

Is the same true for the current estimate?

Please find attached file. Transportation & Storage Revenue is right off the Earning Model Income Statement. Carlton data can be found in the Commercial Function detail within the "Database" worksheet of the Earning Model. The Cash Flow verbiage is very general related to the subject matter, but does provide a business reason on a Direct Cash Flow basis for an item buried within the Indirect Cash Flow format. Call me if you have any further questions.

                 

Can you help explain how the data in the attached file matches the detailed budgets and current estimates you have provided to me?    It may simply, I just haven't had time to look.

Rod,

Thanks for the email.  Can you help me match the information in this email
to your operating plan or cash flow analysis?

Kyle

 
 <<AnnualStats.xls>>

>  
> Do you have the volume and rate information on Northern Natural that
> will tie to Rod's forecast as well?
>
> Kyle
>

(See attached file: AnnualStats.xls)

Kyle:

Please find attached file. Transportation & Storage Revenue is right off the Earning Model Income Statement. Carlton data can be found in the Commercial Function detail within the "Database" worksheet of the Earning Model. The Cash Flow verbiage is very general related to the subject matter, but does provide a business reason on a Direct Cash Flow basis for an item buried within the Indirect Cash Flow format. Call me if you have any further questions and I will attempt to get you through them.    I can also get you set up to get even more detailed answers if you would like.   

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178
                

Rod,

Thanks for the email.  Can you help me match the information in this email
to your operating plan or cash flow analysis?

Kyle

 
 <<AnnualStats.xls>>

(See attached file: AnnualStats.xls)

That is understood.    He will be taking Glisan's position which had the same restrictions on it.    I don't plan on giving him any data other than daily cash positions and forecasted cash positions.   There would be no purpose in giving him E&F data. 

By the wya, Kevin needs to do the Marketing Affiliate stuff.

Rod,

There is a pending proposal to make Ray Bowen VP of Finance and Treasury.
They also want to give him a similar position on the marketing affiliates.
I just wanted to make sure that the pipelines will not give him E and F data.
Do you know how that what kind of data, if any, the pipelines will be giving to him?

Frazier

Aren't you being a little rough on her on a problem that really doesn't make any difference to Dynegy?

i don't think a detailed cash flow request is relevant. with respect to my simple yes...ene and dyn have investment grade credit ratings, positive cash flows, and indirect backing by chevron and and as such have tapped liquidity to the tune of $billion. As such they have the ability.  parent dividend policy normally extinguishes intercompany notes, and that is why we have agreed to classify the amount as a contra equity, but the subscription agreement states that nng can not declare dividends that cause the intercompany note to fall below 240mm...i interpret that to mean that be that nng will have a long term intercompany note of 240... and perhaps its reasonable to reflect it a such on the balance sheet.

pehaps you could ck w your peers on the dynegy account and see if they agree with classifying the 240 has negative equity. if your peers agree with your classification of the 240 then i believe i have sufficient support to tell my dynegy peer the same

A simple "yes" is not sufficient evidence.  I think this will be a very big
task, so you may want to put Enron Corp. Treasury on notice.  I want to see
where the money will come from that is not needed in other areas of Enron
to satisfy obligations of Enron as a whole.  This cannot include money from
NNG and TW operations, debt transactions, and Dynegy money sent to NNG.  If
this is the exercise, it may take more than 24 hours for treasury to
prepare and us to audit.

yes

Bob gave me the subscription agreement this morning.

Our one question still remains - does Enron have the ability to pay
this?
In order to remain as an asset rather than contra-equity, can you
demonstrate that Enron has sufficient funds (other than NNG and TW
operations, debt transactions, and Dynegy money sent to NNG) to repay
the
$240 million to NNG if NNG were to call upon it.  If Enron doesn't, then
the $240 should be as a contra-equity account for GAAP purposes whether
or
not you have a subscription agreement.

Let me know when you have a minute.

Thanks,
Heather

Is this somewhere in the merger agreement that we could see?  I think
the
issue for classifying it as equity is where would the funds come from.
I
know this is something Roger and Rod discussed.  Is there some other
source
of funds (other than NNG and TW operations, debt transactions, and
Dynegy
money) that we can point to as a source of funds that could be
distributed
to NNG if NNG called on it from Corp.?

fyi (i dropped an "a" from your name the first time i tried to send this

>  -----Original Message-----
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality
Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.
If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver
this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and
kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or
your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as
neither
given nor endorsed by it.

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

FYI

fyi - this is reflected in the credit agreements.  Just took Saunders and his team through deal - we are going to meet again next Monday to lay out the deal and the accounting treatment.  He has a very good team.

Paul,

I need two new bank accounts set up, one for Transwestern Pipeline Company and one for Northern Natural Gas Company. Per the Credit Agreements related to the $1 billion Pipeline Financing, Citibank and JP Morgan Chase have require us to set aside $10,000,000 in a Transwestern account and $30,000,000 in Northern Natural account.  These amounts cannot ZBA up to Enron Corp.  The banks require us to set aside these amounts (equal to one month of operating expenses) and have them available in accounts that are not swept to Enron Corp.

Let me know if I need to provide you with any further information.

Thanks,
Travis
5-8404

Per you request:
Also make sure that Jeff Sommers added his name to his list.   There is a separate wind retention program.    I am not aware of the EEOS situation currently, Keith Marlow has been out of town.

ETS
Management
Rod Hayslett*
Jim Saunders*
Tracy Geaccone*
John Cobb*
Bob Chandler*
Lisa Sutton+
Patty Wiederholt*
Dan Fancler+
Tim Bayles+
Frank Carriere+
Jennifer Lev+

Financial System Support
Greg Lewis*

Staff
Kim Bragg+
Daniel Pham+
Debbie Moseley+
Mark Walton+
Rudy Elizondo+
Vince Strohmeyer+
Traci Rainbow+
Joe Villela+
Maria Cisneros+
Allen Joe+
Donna Burns+
Greg Schlender+

*Very Critical
+Critical

 

I am going to begin discussions with the banks as soon as we get the Phase 5 financing locked down.     I would expect that we could have it in another month, unless I run into some kind of a buzz-saw out there, and I'll let you know as soon as I do.

Rod,

When can we count on the dividend?  From El Paso's perspective; the sooner
the better.

Thx.

Greg

******************************************************************
This email and any files transmitted with it from the ElPaso 
Corporation are confidential and intended solely for the 
use of the individual or entity to whom they are addressed. 
If you have received this email in error please notify the 
sender.
******************************************************************

If necessary I can go.  I will need to be in Houston on Wednesday am.

Rod:

Are you available the beginning of next week to be in New York with the private equity team?  The interest from the potential players is high and we'd like to have 3 to 5 hour meetings with three or four different groups to discuss both the pipeline financials and the preferred structure.

I only address this message to you because I think the rest of us are committed to the private equity raising full-time and recognize that you have at least one other full-time job.

Jeff

I'm on board.

As we have discussed, this is a memo I plan to issue today that will create=
 a vacancy in my organization (Director, Financial Planning).  Since this p=
osition is located in Omaha, I would like to immediately post internally an=
d externally; however, I will do everything I can to use an internal candid=
ate.  FYI, I believe Rod is on board with this.  I'll try to e-mail the job=
 description to you today.  Let me know if you have questions.

The following is a message I would like to send out tomorrow to all NPNG an=
d NBP Services employees, and ETS Finance and Accounting Directors and abov=
e.  Please work with system to make the distribution happen.  But, do not r=
elease until I give the go ahead!

Northern Border Partners Financial Planning Organization

Timely and accurate financial forecasting is critical to Northern Border Pa=
rtners in light of recent acquisition activity and continued focus by our i=
nvestment analysts on earnings and cash flow guidance for the partnership. =
 The following organizational changes are being implemented to improve comm=
unication and coordination in our financial planning process.=20

All financial planning functions for the Northern Border Partners entities =
will be centralized in my group under a new position, Director, Financial P=
lanning, reporting to me.  Reporting to the Director, Financial Planning wi=
ll be Phil Boggs,  Jay Nigh, Andy Schroeder and Cheryl Perchal.  Phil, and =
Jay will provide financial planning support to the Omaha based commercial f=
unctions for Northern Border Pipeline, Midwestern, Border Midstream and Bla=
ck Mesa.  Commercial support for these companies, i.e. deal and business de=
velopment analysis, will continue to be the responsibility of Gaye Lynn Sch=
affart.  Andy will be responsible for financial planning activities for Cre=
stone/Bear Paw in Denver.  Andy will also oversee Crestone's equity investm=
ents and will continue to report to Don Baldridge with respect to those act=
ivities.  Cheryl, as Manager, ETS Risk Management, will be responsible for =
monitoring trading risk management activities and performing/coordinating R=
AC analysis on capital projects for ETS and Northern Border. =20

No, because they are in networks.

Should I include Mike Sullivan's group as part of Global Accounting? Call me if you want to discuss.  Thanks!

FYI.    I understand Jim needs Tom Meers to review # 17

All, if no comments are received today we will assume okay to file.

Moving this forward again...please re-review, particulary wording of item 17...it probably needs a bit more editing

 

 

Are you OK?

All, if no comments are received today we will assume okay to file.

Moving this forward again...please re-review, particulary wording of item 17...it probably needs a bit more editing

 

 

I want to make sure that we are looking out for our people at this point in time.    If there is someone who is having a particular problem, now is a time to be comforting.   I also want to make sure that we are doing everything in our power to reduce spending.   If you have a vacancy, now may be the time to consider do you really have to fill that job right now.  

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

As to P6, it is in the budget for next year, but we want to start this year.     Timing is never perfect.

Rod and Joe,

Here is a proposed write up of the procedures we use to protect the data that we send to RAC.
Please take a look and give me your comments.
Thanks!

Frazier

 << File: PROCEDURES FOR CREDIT AND RISK DATA.doc >> 

Do we want to tighten these up somewhat?

Rod,

HR has added 4 new job groups, none which are currently being used by ETS. We are proposing the following ibuyit spend and approve limits for future use of the new job groups in ETS and will need your approval and Stan's before submitting the information to the ISC.

Job Group	Description	Spend Limit	Approval Limit
  23		HR Asso.	$1,000		$0		Consistent with all non-managerial levels
  24		HR Analyst	$1,000		$0		Consistent with all non-managerial levels
  26		Exec VP	$2,500		Unlimited	Consistent with Director and above
  27		BU Head	$2,500		Unlimited	Consistent with Director and above

Please email approval for you and Stan.	
Lisa,

Attached is the Spend/Approvals amounts for the new HR job groups that have recently been created and the most recent HR structure file that I received from Lessa Hutcherson in HR.  I inserted in red the Spend/Approval amounts that we discussed for the new groups.  Currently we have no employees in any of these new groups.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Thanks

Jeff

 << File: iBuyIt Report Request 3.xls >>  << File: ETS Spend_Approval Limits by Job Group 10_29_01.xls >> 

Sounds reasonable to me.

I will give you some comments on the Service Agreement (from Mary Perkins) on Monday.

I talked with Karen Choyce:

Some wire are paid by Ipayit.  But I think we all agreed that there are adequate controls in Ipayit already.

Karen's group handles other wires, many of the high value wires.  Maggie's interest and principal payment wires are probably paid by Karen's group.  Karen has three people who process the wires, none of which are dedicated to any particular Enron company.  They each process wires across all of Enron's entities.  The volume of Citrus/FGT's wires are not enough to justify one person's time.

In the Enron Policies, Approval Authorizations for Cash Disbursements on the Web, there is a Policy and list of authorized approvers.  There is a signature on file for each of these persons.  When Karen's people get a wire request form (and they are all on paper with orignial signatures, nothing electronic) they follow the Policy and note the appropriate signature applies.  They will check a signature to the approved signature on file if necessary.  Karen Choyce has the authority to change coding but not approval for payment.  I would guess there are enough coding errors that she needs that power.  Karen's people then input into SAP from which Mary Perkins' group makes the payments.

I did notice that Mike Moran and Rock Meyer are still on the Website Approval list.  You might want to consider adding Maggie to the above $1.0 MM approval list.

I mentioned to her the idea that we might institute a second level of approvals for wires but not the idea that we might take this function over in Citrus/FGT ourselves.

Recommendation:  Since this does not appear to be a full-time job to process Citrus/FGT wires, we could save some Corporate Charge dollars and find someone in Citrus/FGT who might be underutilized to do this function. 

Great Ideas.

fyi - Brian Stanley asked me to join him in a meeting to discuss a potential sale of EEOS to some financial investors.  Was not aware	

Also, are you aware of any monetization of the PGE "pre-sale"? Davis Thames, Paul Puchot (corpdev lawyer) and I may have an interesting idea on how we can get a perfected security interest in the future sales proceeds from the PGE sale.  Paul is an outstanding bankruptcy attorney who may have found a way, through the recently revised UCC, to accomplish this.  I did not want to spend much time on this if someone else was already working on it.  Sounds interesting, and I haven't heard anyone else talk about it.

On an unrelated topic, at some point, you and I should sit down with Jeff to discuss financing roles/responsibilities of EGS.  I would like to see less corp financing of EGS assets (especially when we are unaware of them a la TOPRs), since we will have to live with these deals post mortem.    I agree

Kevin

These would be in the debt tests performed for the lenders.    Do you know the answers?

Rod - do you know the answer to the question below?

Drew,

Can you confirm that Transwestern has a Consolidated Minimum Tangible Net Worth of $250 million and that Northern Natural does not have a Minimum TNW covenant?

Thanks,

David

Talk with Jim

Rod, I could work with Jim to determine if there is someone in our groups who could take on this responsibility.  Also, how should we handle the politics of taking this responsibility aware from Karen?

Sounds reasonable to me.

I will give you some comments on the Service Agreement (from Mary Perkins) on Monday.

I talked with Karen Choyce:

Some wire are paid by Ipayit.  But I think we all agreed that there are adequate controls in Ipayit already.

Karen's group handles other wires, many of the high value wires.  Maggie's interest and principal payment wires are probably paid by Karen's group.  Karen has three people who process the wires, none of which are dedicated to any particular Enron company.  They each process wires across all of Enron's entities.  The volume of Citrus/FGT's wires are not enough to justify one person's time.

In the Enron Policies, Approval Authorizations for Cash Disbursements on the Web, there is a Policy and list of authorized approvers.  There is a signature on file for each of these persons.  When Karen's people get a wire request form (and they are all on paper with orignial signatures, nothing electronic) they follow the Policy and note the appropriate signature applies.  They will check a signature to the approved signature on file if necessary.  Karen Choyce has the authority to change coding but not approval for payment.  I would guess there are enough coding errors that she needs that power.  Karen's people then input into SAP from which Mary Perkins' group makes the payments.

I did notice that Mike Moran and Rock Meyer are still on the Website Approval list.  You might want to consider adding Maggie to the above $1.0 MM approval list.

I mentioned to her the idea that we might institute a second level of approvals for wires but not the idea that we might take this function over in Citrus/FGT ourselves.

Recommendation:  Since this does not appear to be a full-time job to process Citrus/FGT wires, we could save some Corporate Charge dollars and find someone in Citrus/FGT who might be underutilized to do this function. 

Rod:

Let me know if you have any questions.  Thanks.

Joyce
x 33516

                                          AGENT GT/GT BOOKING REF YMBXQ4
 
                                          HAYSLETT/ROD
                                          EB 3842
                                          ETKT RECEIPT
 
 
 
 
 
 
  DATE:  NOV 16 2001
 
SERVICE               DATE  FROM           TO             DEPART  ARRIVE
 
CONTINENTAL AIRLINES  19NOV HOUSTON TX     NEWARK NJ      740A    1155A
CO 1710    Y          MON   G.BUSH INTERCO NEWARK INTL
                            TERMINAL C     TERMINAL C
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         3:15 DURATION
                  AIRCRAFT: BOEING 757-200
                            SEAT 34A NO SMOKING CONFIRMED HAYSLETT/ROD(ID
              THIS IS AN ADVANCE PURCHASE REFUNDABLE FARE.
             CHANGES MAY RESULT IN AN ADDITIONAL COLLECTION.
 
HOTEL                 19NOV W NEW YORK - UNION SQUARE
                      20NOV 201 PARK AVENUE SOUTH
                            NEW YORK, NY 10003
                            UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
                            TELEPHONE: 1-212-253-9119
                            FAX: 1-212-253-9229
                            TELEX: NONE
                            CONFIRMATION: 1033230
                            SINGLE ROOM KING SIZE BED
                            RATE: COR USD 289.00 PER NIGHT
                            GUARANTEE GIVEN
                            NONSMK KING ROOM
             TO AVOID BILLING CANCEL 24HRS PRIOR TO ARRIVAL
 
CONTINENTAL AIRLINES  20NOV NEW YORK NY    HOUSTON TX     619P    909P
CO 233     Y          TUE   LA GUARDIA     G.BUSH INTERCO
                            TERMINAL M     TERMINAL C
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         3:50 DURATION
                  AIRCRAFT: BOEING 737-800
                            SEAT 12E NO SMOKING CONFIRMED HAYSLETT/ROD(ID
 
RESERVATION NUMBER(S)  CO/UK5LE1
 
HAYSLETT/ROD  S1C0366R1117
 
CO  FREQUENT FLYER COBS608665
ASSISTANT: KATHY CAMPOS 713 853-6833
**********************************************
.............NEW FAA REQUIREMENTS.............
CHECK IN AT LEAST 2 HOURS PRIOR TO FLIGHT DEPARTURE
FOR DOMESTIC, 3 HOURS FOR INTERNATIONAL.
TO GO THROUGH SECURITY YOU ARE REQUIRED TO HAVE
AN ITINERARY GENERATED BY AN AIRLINE OR TRAVEL AGENCY
CONFIRMING AN ELECTRONIC TICKET INCLUDING TICKET NUMBER
OR A RECEIPT FOR AN ELECTRONIC TICKET INCLUDING TICKET NUMBER
AND/OR A BOARDING PASS FOR THE CURRENT DAY.
**********************************************
THIS IS THE PASSENGER RECEIPT FOR YOUR ELECTRONIC TICKET.
PLEASE CHECK-IN WITH PHOTO IDENTIFICATION AND WITH
EITHER (1) THIS RECEIPT OR (2) YOUR CONFIRMATION NUMBER.
OUR ETKT CONFIRMATION NUMBER IS: UKPRP2
********************************************************
:SEATS ARE AWFULL-TRY TO GET BETTER ONES BUT FLIGHTS ARE FULL

A little humor to keep us smiling in these troubled times:

Make sure to read the last one.
***************************************

Social Studies: Some Useful Definitions

Feudalism
You have two cows.
Your lord takes some of the milk.

Fascism
You have two cows.
The government takes both, hires you to take care of them and
sells you the milk.

Applied Communism
You have two cows.
You must take care of them, but the government takes all the milk.

Capitalism
You have two cows.
You sell one and buy a bull.
Your herd multiplies, and the economy grows.
You sell them and retire on the income

Enron Venture Capitalism
You have two cows.
You sell three of them to your publicly listed company, using letters of credit opened by your brother-in-law at the bank, then execute a debt/equity swap with an associated general offer so that you get all four cows back, with a tax exemption for five cows. The milk rights of the six cows are transferred via an intermediary to a Cayman Island company secretly owned by the majority shareholder who sells the rights to all seven cows back to your listed company. The annual report says the company owns eight cows, with an option on one more. - No Balance Sheet provided with the release.

CAn you 2 help her out here?    I believe the footnotes probably cover it, but to the extent you have more, it would be helpful.    

Hello Rod,

In the audited financials, there are footnotes that explain some of the environmental liabilities.  Is this what you referred to when you asked if I had the disclosures?  If not, is this a separate document that I need to have for the "data room?"

Thank you,
Jayshree

I am at the lake. 936 597 3905

If you already have forwarded the memo please pass along the warning and ask them not to forward again.

Are you sure I don't need to be there?

OK.   If I leave here I will call your cell so you know how to reach me.

Better than most recently.

I am assuming that by now you know that I am pledging my receivables into the secured deal Dan Boyle is working on.

Rod:

Global Finance is undertaking a corporate-wide accounts receivable securitization program. We closed a commercial paper conduit receivables securitization transaction program last quarter and are looking to close a second receivables transaction (most likely a privately placed term loan facility) by mid-November.  Towards that goal, we are investigating the receivables and payables position of all Enron entities.  We would like to enlist your team's assistance in better understanding ETS's receivables and payables position and how that data is generated and processed.

To better understand our project and data request, I have attached presentations and due diligence questions from the mandated banks' proposals to Enron.  Although all requested details are not needed immediately, what is urgent at bare minimum is net receivable balance, aging and roll forward for September and October.  We are scheduled to meet with banks tomorrow to discuss opportunities.

Any and all assistance and guidance is much appreciated.  Based on our prior experience, we understand the process of gathering and processing data may be time consuming.  However, I'd like to note that the other business unit teams assembled thus far are available to share their insights, techniques, and expertise.  We will do our best to provide you any assistance you may need in fulfilling our request. 

Please call me at your convenience to discuss the best way to proceed; my telephone number is 713-853-0920.  I look forward to working with you and your team.

Sincerely,
Michelle Wenz

 << File: Presentation 8-31.ppt >>  << File: DB data request2.xls >>  << File: DB Enron Info Request v2.doc >> 

                                                       
Michelle Wenz
Enron Global Finance
713-853-0920
michelle.wenz@enron.com

That is one of the things we are working on.   At this point in time Dynegy will be responsible for this debt, if theyexercise their rights under the preferred stock agreements, which would leave them with common pledged to the lenders.  The price they paid recognized the debt was there, if it is not there, the price will be higher.   Suffice it to say all of these things will be tken care of before it funds.

Yes.   When things get speculative the language always gets scary.

I am leaving the lake.  Use cell for next 40 minutes and then use home if you need me.  Remember blackberry doesn't work so well at home

Fyi
Bruce and Rob,

This is the latest from AA on what they want to see in an internal and external legal letter on Dabhol.  They now say they need both letters the earlier of 1) when they sign off on the 3rd Qtr 10-Q or 2) December 15, 2001.  Give me a call and we can discuss further.

Sommers 

For DPC letters...
Here is the Dabhal legal letter wording.l
Sheila

(See attached file: Dabhal Legal Letter Wording.doc)

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.
 - Dabhal Legal Letter Wording.doc <<Dabhal Legal Letter Wording.doc>> 

Hi.   I'm sitting in the airport waiting on the plane.   Going to New York tonight and will be home tuesday night.  Hope you guys are doing fine.  Sure was good talking to you this am.
Love,
Dad

Thanks.

Fyi
Summary Risk Data as of 11/16/2001		
		
Active Financial Deals	83	
Active Physical Positions	38	
P&L  Daily ($thousands)	345.0 	
VaR ($thousands)	159.4 	
		
ETS Margin Account Deals	0	
		

Physical deals modeled in the Caminus Zainet system are deals which have some form of price risk, (i.e. Index to index deals, and anticipated fuel sales) This does not include standard transport or storage agreements.

P&L  Daily:   Daily change in the  mark-to-market (MTM) valuation of all deals being tracked in the Caminus Zainet system.  This includes the origination and changes in value for both the physical and financial sides of hedges, along with any speculative trades and floating unhedged physical positions.

VaR is "Value at Risk":  Enron Corp policy defines this as the maximum expected one day loss on the portfolio given a 95% statistical confidence interval.  This number is currently calculated on the Caminus system using a variance covariance methodology, rather than a Monte Carlo simulation per the Enron Corp policy.

More detailed reports are available from the Caminus Zainet risk management system.  Please call Vince Strohmeyer at 713.853.6701 with any questions you may have.

Good morning.
I am staying at the W Hotel
Telephone 212 253 9119
FAX 212 253 9229
Room 1716
I have my cell phone and my !lackberry so I can get email.  I should be back in te office on wednesday.
Rod

Can you please review and get back to Tim?
Please review the one page updates for Transwestern and Northern and let me know if you have any comments.

Thanks,
Tim

Tim: Attached are updates I mentioned yesterday.

(See attached file: enronrpt.doc)(See attached file: northernnatural.doc)
(See attached file: transwestern.doc)

Does this cost center get allocated or direct charged?  Please get back to Morris for me.

Rod - What is our policy of accepting direct charges for corporate assistance?   Should this remain in corporate and be a part of the allocation?

Mike - Was any agreement made up front with Brindle to cover Kyle's expenses?   Was the request to travel made by Dave Odneal or yourself?

Morris A. Brassfield
Enron Transportation Services
Senior Director
Operations Support Services
Three Allen Center 3285
333 Clay Street
Houston, Texas 77002

713-646-7006  Business Phone
713-503-1409  Cell Phone

Morris, can you look at this for us.  I kinda think that the Corp Allocation is the right place for this expense.

I appreciate Kyle's expertise and work, but do we always pay the direct expenses for Corp assistance?  

Mike:  In regard to Sharon's note below, please confirm the entities responsible for the cost of Kyle's trip.

Thank you,

Kim

Kyle Norosky who works in Enron Corp Business Controls, recently flew to Minneapolis with regard to security issues.  He has told me that his trip is to be charged to ETS/Northern Pipeline cost center or project code.

Please can you let me know what company number and code to charge this to.  The total cost of his trip was $1603.28

Many thanks.

Sharon Killey
Assistant to John Brindle
Business Controls
Tel:  713-345-4999
Fax: 713-646-8838

Where do you want to meet to walk over there?   Do you want to eat lunch somewhere before?

Fyi

=20

Stan/Jim,
=20
Following is a list of last week's most salient events.
=20
Central America/DR:
=20
Guatemala:  MARAD will reply this week as to their position vis-a-vis the r=
eduction of Enron's contingent support from $28 to $10 million.  It is poss=
ible they will ask for additional information. =20
=20
Nicaragua:  Current credit ratings required the funding of approximately $6=
.3 million into a debt service reserve account (project was allowed to swee=
p the funds against a corporate guarantee by Enron, which was backstopped b=
y the partners pro-rata to their ownership in the project).  Partners to re=
imburse Enron their pro-rata share, such that Enron's ultimate outflow will=
 be approximately $2.2 million.  Team tried to get MARAD to agree to altern=
ative solutions but MARAD simply refused citing bad past experience and pol=
itical implications.
=20
Panama:  Team in Houston last week to review the upcoming PPA bids by Elekt=
ra (one of the two distribution companies in Panama).  Three issues are wor=
th noting: (i) requirement to post bid bonds (approximately $10 million) wi=
ll likely need some sort of Enron support (BLM can't get bid bonds on its o=
wn although local management continues attempting to do so); (ii) BLM's mar=
ginal costs are among highest in Panama.  A preliminary strategy has been m=
apped out; and (iii) PPA terms are a bit "one-sided" in favor of the distri=
butor.  BLM and other market participants have tried repeatedly to get the =
distco to change terms without success. =20
=20
Dominican Republic:  El Paso confirmed it can't work with us.  Operationall=
y, the plant is working well.  As noted on an earlier e-mail, EFI's fuel su=
pplier for SECLP, Vitol, asked for a letter of credit or pre-payment terms.=
  Enron rejected the request.  SECLP bought cargo directly from Vitol.  We =
are working closely with Tom Moran of ENE credit on these issues.
=20
Ecoelectrica:
This week was a very productive week.  Update as follows:  Lender Process: =
 Based on several conversations this week, lenders have stated they underst=
and that Mirant's insurance package is the result of market conditions.  Le=
nders are prepared to pursue credit committee approval with the $300 millio=
n coverage.  Mirant offered a 6-month only waiver on the deductibles.  Lend=
ers appear content with that option.  ENE insurance has approximately 75% o=
f the underwriters on board with our back-up plan to provide the additional=
 $200 million tranche.  Backup will be used only if credit committee(s) kic=
k back existing coverage.  Mirant to issue a certification of compliance wi=
th QF (by Eco) and a legal opinion asap.  Based on the progress this week a=
nd the remaining commitment on deliverables, it is expected that the lender=
's agent can put together the entire lender package and submit it to the le=
nder group by Tuesday of next week.  Finally, Mirant also committed to prov=
iding comments (if any) to the Lender Consent Agreement.  ENE and EME have =
reviewed and provided comments already.  GE Consent:  Mirant committed to s=
ending their "versions" of the key documents on the GE buy-out on Friday ni=
te (late).  I have not seen the document but they have repeatedly stated th=
at the documents are "conforming".  Union Carbide Guarantee:  Plan to final=
ize language early next week.  Schedule:  Mirant has committed to fulfillin=
g CP's as early as possible (and is acting on that statement) as long as we=
 can allow them to fund on 12/19.  They state they are confident they can c=
lose CP's by earlier than 12/14 and can fund on 12/19.  CSFB has not shed l=
ight on the apparent funding (timing) limitation but has offered to investi=
gate further. =20
=20
APACHI =20
=20
Philippines: The team did an excellent job of advancing discussions and neg=
otiations with NPC but was unable to move the slow government machinery fas=
t enough to make it to a signing by last Thursday's New York event.  Nevert=
heless, momentum is high and team continues to work toward a 12/15 agreemen=
t date; funding wouldn't occur until early next year.=20
=20
Guam:  Continue discussions with Mirant and AES with a focus on getting the=
m over the hump on the issue of Enron's contingent obligation to cover the =
potential shortfall under a GPA buy-out event.  Work continues.  Meetings h=
ave been set with Dr. Boyce to discuss his interest in the Guam project. =
=20
=20
China:  Unit 2 still scheduled to come back on line on 11/23.  Two likely c=
auses still under investigation (poor vaccum or material design flaw).  Wor=
k on capital reduction for Chengdu on hold until discussions are held with =
Houston to ensure consensus.  In the mean time, several parties have approa=
ched us with interest in Chengdu.  On Hainan, team is paying several visits=
 to the new SAFE representatives, first to work on the mid November repayme=
nt ($10 million).   Next step would be liquidation. =20
=20
Europe =20
=20
Gaza:  Waiting to hear from CCC (partner) on conceptual proposal: ENE to pr=
ovide limited technical support and financial services support to help put =
in place cost over-run facility and to help with remaining construction act=
ivities and CCC to take our equity (at no cost) and any remaining obligatio=
ns.  Aim is to eliminate the potential exposure on ENE's $9 million of guar=
antees. =20
=20
Trakya:  During meetings in London, OPIC informed us that they had had good=
 meetings with the Ministry of Finance and Ministry of Energy.  Government =
stated they would "clean up" arrears but could not do so before January 200=
2 (presumably there are no budget funds left).  Government committed to wor=
k with OPIC on resolving the forex dispute issue but acknowledged that the =
legal opinion they had sought and received didn't address the issue properl=
y and thus needed additional work to provide the Government with the backin=
g it needed to give the issue resolution.  OPIC agreed to send the Governme=
nt "terms of reference" on their conceptual agreements.  On our question of=
 change in frequency in the distribution of dividends OPIC stated they woul=
d expeditiously move to review our proposal, indicating no pre-disposed pos=
ition against it. =20
=20
Sarlux:  team continues to prepare to submit response to EPC contractor's c=
laim, as well as our own counter-claim, all scheduled to be submitted on No=
vember 30th.   Team continues to work on sorting out technical issues at th=
e plant, including meetings with senior Texaco officials. =20
=20
ENS:  local team and Adam Overfield worked to resolve remaining issue over =
final completion certificate.  Issue was related to CO2 emmissions on GT12 =
vs the EPC contract parameters.  Team has convinced the lender's engineer t=
hat issue is of no relevance.  Team is now moving to secure lender approval=
.  This releases $1.95 million of contingent support by ENE. =20
=20
Europe Sales Prospects:  IPower submitted preliminary proposals for ENS and=
 Trakya, both well below expectations.
=20
Other:  Team is working closely with RAC to come up with updated fair marke=
t valuations, cashflow projections by month for the quarter ended Dec. 31, =
and revised/updated transfer restriction information.
=20
Thanks, Mariella
=20
Isabel: please distribute to team as customary.
=20
=20
=20
=20

I willnot be able to attend.

Where do you want to meet to go over there?  Is it far?

We're on the way.

Probably can handle monday pm.  Will get with you wednesday but feel free to schedule anything after 12:00.

Not yet.   There are still some remaining issues to be sorted out.

Got it.

No, at least not to my knowledge.

FYI
Rod -

In planning office space for the EGS legal group, please hold a space for Paulette Obrecht.  She has served in a number of roles in the legal department over the years but would be invaluable in keeping us, er, me, organized.  She is presently on the Corp. payroll.  Let me know if you have any questions or need any other information.  Thanks.

Rob

I am moving to the 3AC2092 with Bruce Lundstrom's group but will keep my same phone extension. They will be moving to the "old" Azurix floors in another three weeks, and I plan to move with them. I hope this meets with your approval. They are literally taking the furniture apart on the 19th floor and dismantling the entire office. 

Paulette 

If you need asignature fax it to the hotel.

Do you know anything?
Has your group been asked (by your BU or by anyone else) to identify those possible candidates for personnel reductions?  Please let me know.

Wes Colwell has been working on a "10%" list per request from his BU, and Rick is going to ask Bob Butts to start working on it tomorrow (after 10Q is filed).

If you have not been asked, you may want to start thinking about it.  Rick said that there may be a request coming to complete the list this week (and to notify people as early as next week), although he has not as yet received that request.

Thanks!

Fyi
Greg:

I do not have any access to information regarding PGE retained earnings. 

As we discussed this morning, distributions of cash in the form of dividends will be subject to a tax of approximately 7%.  This tax can be avoided completely if the distributions of cash take the form of intercompany loans which are settled at the close of the sale of PGE. Significant tax research and intercompany briefings took place on this very topic in July and August of this year.  The procedures for settlement of the loans are already baked into the PGE purchase and sale agreement. It is my understanding that some loans of cash have already been made under this procedure, but I am the wrong person to talk to about PGE issues or that sort.  Rod Hayslett would have more information. 
 
Jim Ginty is the appropriate tax department contact for PGE Purchase and Sale Agreement issues. 

Regards, 

Alicia Goodrow

Alicia,

Do we know / can we quantify the amount of undistributed/retained earnings as of Sepetmber 30th, and what the tax impact would be of distributing that amount.

Thanks again.

Greg Adams
713-853-3887

I had heard something similar.  We should probably get alicia to quantify exactly how much the leakage would be {in dollars} and how the mechanics would work.  Please tell alicia that we understand that this would be a whalley, mcmahon, causey decision.  We are only trying to identify options and quantify breakage and leakage.

Thanks very much for the update keep me posted.
William W. Brown

As you can see not everybody is always on board.
In Stan's staff meeting this morning he asked we let you know of any vacancies that are being filled.  I have two that are currently in process: 
*	Director, Financial Planning -recruiting internally and externally on a concurrent basis due primarily to Omaha location,  preference given to internal candidates.
*	Financial Planning Analyst (Ben Humann's vacancy) - recruiting internally only.

For either of these positions I think Enron should be willing to pay relocation if necessary (to avoid severance costs).  From the standpoint of the partnerships I don't think NBP should pay this cost since there are plenty of local candidates from which to choose.

I intend to distribute something this week

Should be fine

Can you send me an invitation for the 2 meetings on monday in outlook?   I ca then accept and get it on my calendar in the office

Fyi
From a valuation standpoint I assume Case 1 would give us the highest multiple.  The issue is is it doable?  We have achieved $600 million last year.  Also, before we go further with Project Armstrong I would like to get Whalley and Dynegy to agree that if the discussions are successful we would do the deal.  Let's suspend these discussions for the time being.

Stan

What is your choice?
Rod,
Attached are three cases for Project Armstrong.  I know you're out of the office until Wednesday but I thought if you could respond by Blackberry or phone as to which case we should send to TCPL, I would get that to them before the holiday so they could work on it Thursday and Friday.

*	Case 1 is an 8% distribution growth case (starting with the plan and increasing acquisition activity to deliver 8% growth).  To achieve that our total capex for NBP goes up to an average of just over $400 million per year.
*	Case 2 tracks with our budget case and involves about $200 million in capex per year and results in 2 years of 8% growth and then a flat distribution level for the remaining 3 years.
*	Case 3 utilizes the budget case but eliminates all acquisitions (capex is about $30 - $40 million average per year for maintenance and asset development) and assumes NBPL recontracting occurs at 85% of max rates.  The result is distributions increase to $3.30 in 2002 and stay at that level throughout the 5 year period.

Obviously Case 1 is the most aggressive in terms of valuation among the three.  Please let me know if that is ok to send or do you have something else in mind.  Also I could fax hard copies if you would like...

 <<Valuation Cases11-18.zip>> 

I think Kathy has a new one out for the 7th.

Rod, I put this on my calendar a week or so ago -at your/Kathy's request, but noticed you do NOT have same...
no mtg??

 << Message: EGS Acctg/Finance issues mtg >> 

The issue is that in order to sell the units there is a public disclosure of the units being in rawhide which may have some more issues.  A 13d filing is required.  If we want to sell then we need to file and wait.

I'm on my way back there to do so.

Love

Your welcome

I would think that if they pay in advance it should not be a problem,

Great job

What will happen to this project.  Alaska?

Talked to Morgan.  The ETS cost estimate is just the Level A cost estimate =
done by Bryan Reinecke in his Group.  He added that the R.O.W. cost is one =
of the items has high uncertainty.  Jerry Martin's Group has been not been =
asked to look at the project.

Suggest asking Mike Smith also.  To me looks like the capex inflation and O=
&M inflation are backasswards.

You should get these 2 experts in pipeline modelling and estimating involve=
d into the discussion.   They have years of experience in inflation and imp=
acts on pipeline economics.

The model review meeting on Thursday went well, and the consensus was that =
there are many changes to be made to the current Foothills economic model. =
Many assumptions in the current model were challenged by the participant co=
mpanies. Foothills agreed to reflect the suggested changes to the model (An=
dy is supposed to send out a summary of the discussion) and provided an ele=
ctronic copy of the model for withdrawn partners' review. Withdrawn partner=
s agreed to give their comments/feedback on the model to Foothills until 11=
/27/01 and another meeting to reach an agreement on economic model/toll was=
 scheduled for 12/03/01 or 12/04/01. The data from economic/toll model will=
 be used in commercial proposal/presentation to the ANS producers which ANN=
GTC intends to have by 12/20/01. Tim and I will review Foothills' cash flow=
 and COS model and prepare comments.

Overall, the participants though that the current Foothills model ($0.43/MM=
Btu toll for Alaska section) has very aggressive assumptions in many ways, =
and it is very likely that the toll will be increased significantly after a=
ll the appropriate revisions are made. The following are the main discussio=
n points of the meeting. Item 1 and 2 are expected to have a very large imp=
act on the toll.

1) Capex and Opex need to have annual/monthly escalation (current model has=
 0% escalation). For example, Foothills sensitivity analysis shows that 2.5=
% Capex escalation would increase the toll by $0.20. Numbers such as 1.5% f=
or Capex and 2.5% for Opex were thrown during the meeting, but more reviews=
 need to be done regarding appropriate escalation rates. Do you have any op=
inion on this, Bryan?

2) Foothills is using Flowthrough method (using cash taxes in COS calculati=
on) to calculate income taxes that go into the Cost of Service and might be=
 underestimating Cost of Service. Tim thought that the Flowthrough method w=
ill not fly because of previous cases in which that method was not allowed =
by IRS and FERC. Foothills said that they can still have same toll under No=
rmalized tax method by changing the depreciation number, but Tim was concer=
ned that it might force the partnership to record negative depreciation. Fo=
othills declined our request to share their Cost of Service model and insis=
ted that we calculate the toll ourselves based on the information in the ca=
sh flow model. They agreed to provide a hard copy of their Cost of Service =
model in the end, but Tim and I were under impression that Foothills was tr=
ying to lower the toll as much as they can. Tim was also concerned about le=
velized toll approach because of FERC might lower allowed return in the lat=
er rate cases and more analysis needs to done regradign this. Please correc=
t me if I am wrong here, Tim.

3) OM & A is currently estimated to be 1% of Capex but this might be too lo=
w (OM&A in more latest cost estimate by Foothills is approx. 1.5% of total =
Capex).

4) The Withdrawn Partners' historical contributions ($228 million) will be =
added to the Rate Base, but this might be dropped if necessary. Success fee=
 of $40 million should be included in the project budget.

5) Working Capital will be added to the project cost. The Line Pack cost (1=
4.5 Bcf for the whole section) was assumed to be borne by ANS producers but=
 some participants highly doubted that that would be the case. The Line Pac=
k gas might have to be bought by the Partnership or the Producers will at l=
east demand certain return on their gas sitting in the pipeline for 25 year=
s.

6) For Return on Capital and AFUDC, 14% ROE and 8% Interest on Debt assumin=
g 30/70 capital structure is likely to be kept. However, the current drawdo=
wn schedule assumes construction financing available from the very beginnin=
g, which will not be true. Certain assumptions should be made on the financ=
ial close date and commercial agreement/preliminary determination date to c=
alculate AFUDC more accurately.

7) Current financing assumption in the model is a 25 year bank loan with ba=
lloon amortization and DSCR of 1.6. In reality, the initial bank loans will=
 be of shorter maturity (5-15 years) and certain roll-over financing will b=
e unavoidable. It is also likely that the loans will have multiple tranches=
 with different terms, interest rate, seniority etc.=20

8) There is significant currency risk associated with Canadian section of t=
he ANGTS considering that some sources of capital, revenues and part of ope=
rating expenses will be in Canadian dollars. A mechanis to mitigate currenc=
y risk should be in place and there might be some costs associated with it.

9) Property taxes of 2% in Alaska seems high, but Property taxes during con=
struction period should be added.=20

Lastly, there is about $300 million difference ($4,336-$4035) between ETS c=
urrent cost estimates and the cost estimate in the Foothills model, excludi=
ng IDC and AFUDC. Another engineering estimate might have to be dome for la=
rger pipe size (46 or 48 inch) as noted in Bryan's email. =20

Thanks,=20

JB=20

Jebong Lee=20
713-853-9722 office=20
713-306-8658 cell

What is going on?

Anything exciting going on today?  We are proceeding witha great reception so far.  We did 4 meetings yesterday and have 4 more today and one more by phone tomorrow.  Going well here.

In the covenants of the debt agreements.     If it's not a test in the lenders package, then it is not in the deal.

Is there a definition of Consolidated Minimumu Tangible Net Worth to work from?

These would be in the debt tests performed for the lenders.    Do you know the answers?

Rod - do you know the answer to the question below?

Drew,

Can you confirm that Transwestern has a Consolidated Minimum Tangible Net Worth of $250 million and that Northern Natural does not have a Minimum TNW covenant?

Thanks,

David

Yes I will be back tonight

Thanks.  What is the mood?

Things are ok.   Have a Happy Thansgiving

I'll try

Probably willbe working

Ok I'm fine

However you would have to agree that we have some level of control over the GP.

No, he is in fact commercial doing deals negotiating transactions of significant size, 2.5 B this year alone.

Go for the dollars

It is not necessary.    Other than Tracy, he would be the only one of the accounting and finance people there and Stan is trying to limit the attendance to the group necessary for the discussions.

Rod and Kathy:

I just spoke with our travel agent, and we can make Jerry's flight reservations tomorrow (Tuesday).  Please let me know - sometime on Tuesday - if Jerry needs to attend the Plan Review with Mr. Lay on November 8.

Thanks!

Dee

Hi, Rod:

Sorry to be such a pain about this, but we're trying to finalize Jerry's flights so he can obtain the discount fare.  (Needs to be ticketed today.)

Please advise asap.

Thanks, Rod.

Dee

Rod:

We initially asked Mr. Cordes about this.  His reply was that Jerry should check with you.  Sounds like Mr. Cordes is seeking your insight.  Based upon this, please let us know your final thoughts.

Thanks again.

Dee

Not needed unless Bill Cordes has asked him to attend.   In which case let me know, because we are monitoring the attendance list closely.  

Good morning, Rod:

As you know, there is a Plan Presentation with Mr. Lay on Thursday, November 8.  FYI, Jerry Peters will be in Houston for other meetings on Thursday morning, and we are trying to determine if Jerry is expected to attend the Plan Review.  If so, I will schedule Jerry for a later flight departure from Houston that day.

Please let us know your thoughts at your earliest convenience.

Thanks, Rod.

Dee

Need to get you 2 talking to LORI,    I don't see much of a problem in going along with the EOTT valuation.   It's their asset now.

Rod, Tom, 
Roger's question/concern is serious, and the approach I've seen in documentation
does not help our position

We are proposing (or are) to argue that Fair Value is substantially less than $41.9mm.
If that is the case, we will have to go back and impair the MTBE facility, and re-do the
financials. We have asserted that the fair value for book purposes approximates a higher value than our tac position. Normally this variance is no big deal, but because of the "sale", this book tax variation is problematic. This will result in a substantial loss, and cause EOTT's SEC filings to be in jeopardy.

Is Enron disputing the fair value of $41.9 million already disclosed as
agreed to with HCAD?  And if so what value is the company asserting?

Attached is a red line version and "clean" version of proposed EGP Fuels
responses to the EOTT SEC request.

Bob - I assume you will also review this w Mr Causey
Tom - Item # 18 on affiliated revenues requires additional data, that I
believe you have on file.
All - Item #17 on Morgan's Point tax valuation should be reviewed
closely.

>
>
>
>  <<SEC Data Responses.doc>>       <<SEC Data Responses Redline.doc>>
>
>

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

Ok I asked gary to have you decide on Michael.  I think he is utility player that can fil several roles, but if your tEam won't need help, I'm not sure if I need him.

I wasanswering Janet's comment

GP is general partner in NB

Any news

I agree.   I told Gary you could make the call.

I'm on plane.   If you need me to call tonight leave me an email or phpne mail and I will call when I get in.

Hi

Please fix.

i did NOT receive invite

thanks

I think Kathy has a new one out for the 7th.

Rod, I put this on my calendar a week or so ago -at your/Kathy's request, but noticed you do NOT have same...
no mtg??

 << Message: EGS Acctg/Finance issues mtg >> 

FYI

	Please see the attached memo, summarizing the various covenants contained in merger and loan documents that have 
	been executed in the last two weeks.  These covenants are important, as they relate to ETSC's, TW's, and NNG's ongoing 
	operations. 

	--Dot

	 

	

did you get mine?

Rep letter signed...thanks all.

Attached is the accepted version (needs page break adjustments).
Andersen has requested that an ENE mgmt. rep letter be signed before this response is filed.  
I am routing that rep. letter "as we speak", and will notify you when I get all signatures (Causey, Hayslett, Saunders, Soldano).

 << File: SEC Data Responses2.doc >> 

Let me, as well as others, know the outcome.

FYI -

Bechtel has requested that the agenda for the DPC board meeting next week include a vote to issue the Phase II shares.  Once the shares are issued, Enron will have 65% voting rights and will be able to control the matters which require majority consents (the memo attached below contains a summary of such matters).

Mary Cilia and I had worked with Mike Jones (AA) on this a few months ago and he had agreed that we could avoid consolidation of DPC by entering into a legally binding side letter with GE and Bechtel waiving our majority consent rights and agreeing to vote as a block with them on such matters.  AA's concurrence is subject to their review the side letter and confirmation that it is legally binding.

Jeff Sommers and I are scheduling a meeting with Mike Jones for tomorrow to ensure that the previously reached conclusion still stands.
To All -

Attached is the memo documenting our conclusion on the continued deconsolidation of Dabhol if Dabhol Power Company were to issue the Phase II shares that the investors are currently entitled to.  Such an issuance would increase Enron's interest in the company to approximately 65%.  In short, as long as Enron waives its majority consent abilities in a legally binding side letter with GE and Bechtel, we would not have to consolidate Dabhol.  If you have any questions, please don't hesitate to respond.  Thanks.

Mary

 << File: Dabhol Participating Rights Memo.doc >> 

Since we are no longer using Maverix, that guarantee can be done away with.    Are the rest all really with Enron?    In the underlying deals do we have any ability to ask for better than a guarantee if enron is downgraded?    

In reference to recent developments and financings, attached for your review is a consolidated listing by business entity of the Enron Corp. credit support that is held or in process. Also, I have included the unsecured trading positions.

If there are any questions or additional information is needed, please advise.

Regards.

 << File: Enron Corp EXPOSURE.xls >> 

FYI

All:

	Please let me know if you have any questions regarding the utilization of the PAA Program at this point.  

	As noted, the remaining balance is now "pooled", but any requests should be submitted as soon as possible, and no later than 30 November.

Brian

As discussed in our staff meeting yesterday, the 2001 PAA Program will end effective December 3, 2001.  Any and all PAA/American Gift Check requests must be received on or before November 30 to allow time for processing.  

In addition, the total remaining balance may now be shared by all division heads.  The current balance as of the 11/13/2001is $126,950.00.  

Outside of normal business lines is outside of the pipelines and therefore is not subject to being an issue here.

Lisa, you might want to also review this w Vince and John

For Project Analysis Data - the write-up appears correct for non-budgeted projects > $5 million. However, it does not disclose the requirement for transactions outside of the normal business line which are > $2.5 million. Cheryl, have the rules changed?

I would confirm Jerry's comments.

Regards.

I have the following comments:
Credit Data
I believe the write-up is accurate, but I have cc'd Paul on this memo to confirm.

Financial Trading Risk Data
We provide aggregate position data for ETS not aggregate VAR, e.g.  ETS is long 10 MMCFD natural gas at Ventura for January 2002, etc. vs. ETS has $1.5 million total VAR.  This is necessary for two reasons: 1.) Enron's VAR does not necessarily equal the sum of its subsidiaries VAR since there may be offsetting positions  throughout the business units.  2.)  Our trading books software (Caminus) does not have the capability to compute VAR in accordance with the specific methodology required (Monte Carlo simulation) in the Enron policy.

Project Analysis Data
I think this write-up is accurate, but I have cc'd Lisa and Cheryl to confirm.
What do you think of this?

Rod and Joe,

Here is a proposed write up of the procedures we use to protect the data that we send to RAC.
Please take a look and give me your comments.
Thanks!

Frazier

 << File: PROCEDURES FOR CREDIT AND RISK DATA.doc >> 

This would be an Enron deal.    And we just have to get over the hurdles here.

The 10Q describes Rawhide - although it does not list investments, it does reference domestic and international assets.  I assume we can use the same disclosure as is shown in the Q.  When you get back, we can talk more about it.  Any time constraint on this (other than the obvious need for cash)? I hope Jerry hasn't mandated anyone just yet (especially Citi/Solly).

The issue is that in order to sell the units there is a public disclosure of the units being in rawhide which may have some more issues.  A 13d filing is required.  If we want to sell then we need to file and wait.

Before we can sell the units need to be registered.

I mentioned to Stan and Rod that we go forward with this.  I agree, cash is cash.

No update yet

We expect to hear something on tues in regard to the extension of 2 weeks but will probably not know about the final fix until the 2nd week of dec

Why would we not sell the units even if the proceeds are trapped in rawhide as it would allow us to pay down debt ?

I agree that we do not want to announce anything publically until we understand where we are as it could hurt our bargaining position
George Mckean

FYI

I would confirm Jerry's comments.

Regards.

I have the following comments:
Credit Data
I believe the write-up is accurate, but I have cc'd Paul on this memo to confirm.

Financial Trading Risk Data
We provide aggregate position data for ETS not aggregate VAR, e.g.  ETS is long 10 MMCFD natural gas at Ventura for January 2002, etc. vs. ETS has $1.5 million total VAR.  This is necessary for two reasons: 1.) Enron's VAR does not necessarily equal the sum of its subsidiaries VAR since there may be offsetting positions  throughout the business units.  2.)  Our trading books software (Caminus) does not have the capability to compute VAR in accordance with the specific methodology required (Monte Carlo simulation) in the Enron policy.

Project Analysis Data
I think this write-up is accurate, but I have cc'd Lisa and Cheryl to confirm.
What do you think of this?

Rod and Joe,

Here is a proposed write up of the procedures we use to protect the data that we send to RAC.
Please take a look and give me your comments.
Thanks!

Frazier

 << File: PROCEDURES FOR CREDIT AND RISK DATA.doc >> 

Can you help us out here from what you know?     I do not believe you can loan money to Enron.     Have you filed to be able to make the special dividend?

Greg:

I do not have any access to information regarding PGE retained earnings. 

As we discussed this morning, distributions of cash in the form of dividends will be subject to a tax of approximately 7%.  This tax can be avoided completely if the distributions of cash take the form of intercompany loans which are settled at the close of the sale of PGE. Significant tax research and intercompany briefings took place on this very topic in July and August of this year.  The procedures for settlement of the loans are already baked into the PGE purchase and sale agreement. It is my understanding that some loans of cash have already been made under this procedure, but I am the wrong person to talk to about PGE issues or that sort.  Rod Hayslett would have more information. 
 
Jim Ginty is the appropriate tax department contact for PGE Purchase and Sale Agreement issues. 

Regards, 

Alicia Goodrow

Alicia,

Do we know / can we quantify the amount of undistributed/retained earnings as of Sepetmber 30th, and what the tax impact would be of distributing that amount.

Thanks again.

Greg Adams
713-853-3887

I had heard something similar.  We should probably get alicia to quantify exactly how much the leakage would be {in dollars} and how the mechanics would work.  Please tell alicia that we understand that this would be a whalley, mcmahon, causey decision.  We are only trying to identify options and quantify breakage and leakage.

Thanks very much for the update keep me posted.
William W. Brown

Great start.

Our payment system summarizes tax liability by county for each pipeline com=
pany. It also summarizes the taxable value by county. However, this number =
includes real and personal property. We currently have the 2000 totals in o=
ur system and are putting in the 2001 numbers. We have yet to finalize 2001=
 assessments in the state of Iowa.=20
Is this what you need!!!!!!

Gavin
We have done it before, in fact it was the way all of the pipes were origin=
ally built, but not for short term stuff.    Gavin Russo can probably help =
us with his property tax background.   Lou, please try to get hold of Gavin=
 or whomever he believes should take part in the discussion.=20

Here's a little more detail on the voice mail I left you earlier.  The bank=
s want more than just secured debt.  They want a mortgage on all of TW and =
NNG's real property.  That's right, they want a filing with every county co=
urthouse where NNG and TW own assets.  I want to talk to you tomorrow befor=
e Stan's meeting about why that is just a terrible idea.  In short, at the =
same time we are doing this big loan and cash infusion into ENA to "calm th=
e market" we will simultaneously have dozens of right of way guys and local=
 real estate lawyers crawling all over the place doing something I don't th=
ink any pipeline has done before (at least not in my memory).  Nevertheless=
, I want to be able to move forward if there is no alternative.  For us to =
prepare mortgage documents we need (I think) to have approximate property v=
alues by county.  Do we have this info somewhere?  Are ad valorem tax value=
s kept by county?  I don't think our FERC books will be much help on this. =
 Lou is getting Johnny McGee and some folks together after Stan's meeting t=
o talk to me and the Vinson and Elkins folks about how we can do this proje=
ct if we have to.  It will be a challenge, particularly in the 2 week timet=
able they are talking about.       Talk to you tomorrow.  DF   

Just forget about it, the company will not be reimbursing for attendance this year.

I wonder if the person you spoke with is aware of the previous arrangements.  Do you get the funny feeling they are trying to distance themselves from us ???  Here is the excerpt from the original Enron invitation.  I have been attending these since the early nineties, and Enron has always been discounted 50%.  Even the full price they quoted you contradicts the October 12th memo that quotes a full price of $950:

Once again, due to the level of Enron 's attendance, we have arranged to
facilitate you or your group's registration.  If you would like to register
or would like more information, please contact Sabrina Whaley at 646-6340
by November 5, 2001.  A copy of the Symposium agenda has been attached for
your review.  The registration fee is $950 per person; however we offer all
Enron personnel wanting to attend a 50% discount.  All billing arrangements
will be made through Bob Butts.

For $1,200, I will cancel my reservations.

Thanks for checking.

After Rod's staff mtg. on Friday, we followed up w Andersen on attendance discounts related to the above annual meeting (12/4 and 5).
Andersen indicated no discount...interested attendees would have to pay full amount, $1200.

You need to begin thinking about what we could do here if we were asked to reduce staffing to save money?

These phone moves are for positions we asked for approval for last week.

Thanks,

Morris

LeShawn Edwards, currently a contractor in Elaine Concklin's accounting group, has accepted a position with Barney Brasher to fill the position vacated by Vera Jones, and Elaine has hired another contractor to backfill the position LeShawn is leaving.

I need your approval to switch the telephones:

LeShawn's phone from 3AC3321 to her new location at 3AC3336
Vera Jones' old phone from 3AC3336 to 3AC3321 & reassign to new contractor

If you approve, please forward to Rod Hayslett for his approval as well.

Thank you.

Ruthann
x66538

I do not intend to approve reimbursement by the company for attendance. 

After Rod's staff mtg. on Friday, we followed up w Andersen on attendance discounts related to the above annual meeting (12/4 and 5).
Andersen indicated no discount...interested attendees would have to pay full amount, $1200.

If we have already signed up and can,t get the money back then spread the word that is ok

I agree with Morris

I agree with Morris.  Little value to the pipes
Rod, Stan is/was reviewing selected "corp." services, and one of those selected was GSS. I requested that Morris provide some persepective on GSS.   Please review and forward to Stan, if appropriate. 

Here are my thoughts on the value the GSS (Global Strategic Sourcing) brings to ETS:

I believe totally in the concept of strategically sourcing our materials and services for ETS, which is the concept that GSS was founded under, while still within the ETS organization.  Basically the value that GSS has brought to the bottom line during the last year has been minimal to ETS.   The reasons for that statement, in my opinion, are:

*	The materials and services that ETS purchase are basic and routine.
*	Most of those materials and service providers were identified and sourced during 1999 and 2000.
*	ETS is reaching the point where we need fewer providers, not more.
*	New items identified are normally rolled into one of our already sourced NPA's.
*	Almost all large dollar items are bid out (three bids and a buy).
*	GSS's involvement and commitment to the deal ends with the contract signing.
*	ETS P&SM organization and our Contracts services group deals with the actual execution and the ringing of the cash register.

If the GSS organization went away tomorrow, we would need the following expertise brought over from their group: (currently this group is close to 75 people.)(and very highly paid individuals)

*	Two (2) negotiators - Contract Managers
*	Two (2) analysts
*	Two (2) contract administrators

The administration of the following services would need to be shifted to the ISC:

*	iBuyit System
*	Catalog system (part of iBuyit)
*	iPayit system

We would need to re-assess the value of the contract with SourceNet and whether we continue down that path or implement our own A/P department.   This would take very few staff adds to make that happen.

Let me know if you need any further detail.

Morris 

(713) 503-1409

Not very good.  There will besome better news later today

Call Bob Butts

Is there any way to just reduce the expenses for now

The first problem is finding the time and money to do something and given everything else that is going on,  right now is not the best time to be spending some money.   To get the outside contractor taken care of we would have to let GSS find us a party to do the work, so you might want to be thinking of other parties who might be qualified to do the work.

Rod,

The Measurement Services Group would prefer to utilize UTSI as the external consultant for this review process due to their knowledge and experience in SCADA systems.  Internally, we need to include representatives from Gas Control, Gas Logistics, Measurement Desk, Gas Measurement Services and Field Measurement Services.

If you are in agreement, how should we proceed from here?

Charlie

       

If we do this, we need to have both an internal group and an external group.

Rod, Charlie if we are looking for someone internally to do a review process, Sarabeth possibly can provide this function.  Your thoughts?

Do you have a candidate?    I would argue that we are looking at a process review, so anyone who can do a process review could do this.

Rod,

I agree with Kenneth Cessac's response.  We should evaluate our current process for collecting, validating and distributing measurement data and consider new ideas and alternatives to improve the process.  Assistance from a consulting firm that specializes in this area would probably be better than using Rutherford.

Charlie      

This question has been raised several times over the past 10+ years, should we combine GMS, Field Operations, and some of the Gas Control functions to create a single source for measurement data.  I do not feel that changing a reporting relationship would correct any problems.  

I feel the time and effort can e better spent improving our current data collect process and data flow between SCADA and PGAS.  While this process is working I feel that it requires to much manual intervention and handling.  The IT department, Measurement Technology, Gas Control Hot Seat, and the Data Analysis are all involved in keeping the data flowing between SCADA and PGAS.  We should step back and re look and the current process and see what improvements can be made to better control and maintain this process.

 A second area that should be looked at is the data validation process.  Currently Field Operations, Data Analysis, and GMS all  manually review measurement data.  With all of the computer and software technology available I feel that we could easily automate most of the current manual data validation.

I have limited experience with the Rutherford company and what they could provide towards improving these items.  I feel that a company that specializes in SCADA and such as UTSI would be a better option.  

Charlie, Ken, I would like to meet with you this afternoon if possible (2:00 pm) so you can bring me up to speed on PGAS and Sullivan's concern so we can respond to Rod by early next week.

Thanks,

Don

I'm going to defer this to the experts.  Please convey your thoughts to Rod.

Would you agree that something needs to be done?

The PGAS reporting project recently completed requirements gathering meetings with data users in gas measurement technology, gas control, gms, gas accounting, and gas logistics.  We think, those discussions have pointed to a need to assess inefficiencies that appear to exist related to data integrity as data moves between systems and users that span the entire gas volume/quality collection, transformation and delivery process.  In other words there seem to be too many questions and reconcilliations that people have to address along the process as data changes hands and is used for different internal and external purposes.  There also appears to be a lack of a single point of responsibility in the organization for gas volume data from start to finish.
The PGAS reporting project proposed to assess this at a high level and make some recommendations.  But as important as the issue appears to be, you might want to consider using Rutherford to help ETS do a more thorough job of this.
This effort would extend outside FA&A.
Please advise.

Mike, Ellis and I are in agreement that the need for the Rutherford Consulting group is complete.  Rutherford achieved what their goal was; to provide structure and format for the PGAS issues to be addressed in an efficient manner.  The procedures for listing new issues are in place and are being followed by the team.  The meetings are efficient in that only status updates and priorities are reviewed and discussed. There is now only one list for all issues that are being addressed or need to be addressed and they are prioritized.   The monthly meetings are now only needed twice a month.  What is the procedure for notifying Rutherford that their services are no longer needed on this project as they have completed what was asked of them?   cvb

Can you do the gallup contracts as well

Need to watch closely

I'm back

Let's make sure we have all bases covered and telephone tree in place.   I need your home cell or whatever

coryswim  
 
 http://resources.hewitt.com/enron/

FYI

home = 281 550 5093
cell = 281 224 5093

i will be in houston all weekend  

Let's make sure we have all bases covered and telephone tree in place.   I need your home cell or whatever

Great job!

MN is finally accepting our money.  While pushing this issue a method was worked out with the Lender's counsel (both local and BP) to make simpler filings now as well as in the future.  All nine counties should be filed by the end of today.  

Yes for sure.

okay to provide early afternoon release to staff?

The same to you and yours.
Dear Mr. Hayslett: 
We wish you a safe and joyful Thanksgiving. 
From all of us at Zeus Development Corporation 

I have forwarded to Stan and agree with your perspective.    Could you begin to think about who those people might be if we decided to do something?

Rod, Stan is/was reviewing selected "corp." services, and one of those selected was GSS. I requested that Morris provide some persepective on GSS.   Please review and forward to Stan, if appropriate. 

Here are my thoughts on the value the GSS (Global Strategic Sourcing) brings to ETS:

I believe totally in the concept of strategically sourcing our materials and services for ETS, which is the concept that GSS was founded under, while still within the ETS organization.  Basically the value that GSS has brought to the bottom line during the last year has been minimal to ETS.   The reasons for that statement, in my opinion, are:

The materials and services that ETS purchase are basic and routine.
Most of those materials and service providers were identified and sourced during 1999 and 2000.
ETS is reaching the point where we need fewer providers, not more.
New items identified are normally rolled into one of our already sourced NPA's.
Almost all large dollar items are bid out (three bids and a buy).
GSS's involvement and commitment to the deal ends with the contract signing.
ETS P&SM organization and our Contracts services group deals with the actual execution and the ringing of the cash register.

If the GSS organization went away tomorrow, we would need the following expertise brought over from their group: (currently this group is close to 75 people.)(and very highly paid individuals)

Two (2) negotiators - Contract Managers
Two (2) analysts
Two (2) contract administrators

The administration of the following services would need to be shifted to the ISC:

iBuyit System
Catalog system (part of iBuyit)
iPayit system

We would need to re-assess the value of the contract with SourceNet and whether we continue down that path or implement our own A/P department.   This would take very few staff adds to make that happen.

Let me know if you need any further detail.

Morris 

(713) 503-1409

I guess I need some more definition.    If I am creating a new group and I have nobody in it, this doesn't make sense.    Can I get some definitions to go over this with Stan?   I am having some trouble with this concept, I guess, as it doesn't appear to make any sense.    Why wouldn't we give these groups 0 authority since we don't use them.   I also think we need to make some changes to the rest of the schedule.    Especially at the top. 

Rod,

HR has added 4 new job groups, none which are currently being used by ETS. We are proposing the following ibuyit spend and approve limits for future use of the new job groups in ETS and will need your approval and Stan's before submitting the information to the ISC.

Job Group	Description	Spend Limit	Approval Limit
  23		HR Asso.	$1,000		$0		Consistent with all non-managerial levels
  24		HR Analyst	$1,000		$0		Consistent with all non-managerial levels
  26		Exec VP	$2,500		Unlimited	Consistent with Director and above
  27		BU Head	$2,500		Unlimited	Consistent with Director and above

Please email approval for you and Stan.	
Lisa,

Attached is the Spend/Approvals amounts for the new HR job groups that have recently been created and the most recent HR structure file that I received from Lessa Hutcherson in HR.  I inserted in red the Spend/Approval amounts that we discussed for the new groups.  Currently we have no employees in any of these new groups.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Thanks

Jeff

 << File: iBuyIt Report Request 3.xls >>  << File: ETS Spend_Approval Limits by Job Group 10_29_01.xls >> 

Assume afudc as 100% debt at 6%
Just realized that Saunders had not sent this along to you.  I'll call about it on Monday when I'm back.
 
I haven't had the nerve to look at the stock price this AM.  At least the Chronicle article allowed that the world was not necessarily ending for Enron.
 
Have a Happy Thanksgiving if possible!!!
 

hayslett

And (from home - I'm working the polls this week) pray tell whom do I get the capital structure from.  

saunders will provide ovhd rate; professor rosenberg w provide afudc factor...we both need a direct cost estimate for the project

Can you give us the overhead rate and AFUDC rate for the Trans Pecos (Transwestern) estimate? 176 miles of 24" in west Texas, with one compressor station of 13,000HP.

George Davis 
Senior Project Estimator 
Phone:713-345-6199 
Fax:   713-646-7522 
George.C.Davis@enron.com 

Do you have this data?

Rod,

Per our conversations yesterday there is one other item that we would like to obtain: the current percentage ROE and return on rate base allowed by FERC.  If there is someone in your organization that I can contact please let me know.

Thank you for all of your help!  I hope that you get to relax and enjoy at least some of your holiday.

Regards,
Sarah

Thanks.

I have it - I will get it to her.

Do you have this data?

Rod,

Per our conversations yesterday there is one other item that we would like to obtain: the current percentage ROE and return on rate base allowed by FERC.  If there is someone in your organization that I can contact please let me know.

Thank you for all of your help!  I hope that you get to relax and enjoy at least some of your holiday.

Regards,
Sarah

The data is actually aggregated and netted, the specific deal data is not provided.   The detail he described might be the aggregate of 40 deals at that point none of which may directly relate to transportation deals.   See the bolded data below.   The example given basically says I am in a position of having more gas at Ventura in January 2002
than I have commitments to sell by 10 MMCF/d.     Did you understand that?    
Rod,

Hopefully, the firewall procedure would be enough for FERC on the trading data we provide.
However, it would be better if we could cut back on providing specific data.
Do you see any way to do this?

Frazier

FYI

I would confirm Jerry's comments.

Regards.

I have the following comments:
Credit Data
I believe the write-up is accurate, but I have cc'd Paul on this memo to confirm.

Financial Trading Risk Data
We provide aggregate position data for ETS not aggregate VAR, e.g.  ETS is long 10 MMCFD natural gas at Ventura for January 2002, etc. vs. ETS has $1.5 million total VAR.  This is necessary for two reasons: 1.) Enron's VAR does not necessarily equal the sum of its subsidiaries VAR since there may be offsetting positions  throughout the business units.  2.)  Our trading books software (Caminus) does not have the capability to compute VAR in accordance with the specific methodology required (Monte Carlo simulation) in the Enron policy.

Project Analysis Data
I think this write-up is accurate, but I have cc'd Lisa and Cheryl to confirm.
What do you think of this?

Rod and Joe,

Here is a proposed write up of the procedures we use to protect the data that we send to RAC.
Please take a look and give me your comments.
Thanks!

Frazier

 << File: PROCEDURES FOR CREDIT AND RISK DATA.doc >> 

I received these comments this afternoon from JPMorgan.     I need to have some help putting together a story to counteract the basics of this story from CERA.

Rod

Rod:

As we discussed here are the bulletts that summarize what we heard from our consultants.

Overall demand picture

Believe it will be 2006 before the California market will get back to 2000/2001 demand levels

          2002            demand down approximately 900 mmcf/d
          2003            demand will be flat
          2004            growth in demand will begin
          2005-2006   return to 2001 demand levels

Reasoning:
   2001 was a dry year - the lack of hydro generation created an additional 600 mmcf/d demand for gas in California
   Anticipated generation capacity overbuild in California - new more efficient power plants with better heat rates will displace older gas fired generation, reducing the amount of gas              required to generate a MW of electricity on the margin
   California electricity rate increases have curtailed demand for power and subsequently, gas

Gas transmission capacity into the state

Over the next two to three years there will be an additional 2.0 Bcf/d of transmission capacity into California
   800 mmcf/d in 2002
   900 mmcf/d in 2003 (Kern River expansion)
   300 mmcf/d               (El Paso conversion of All American oil line and power up)

San Juan basin gas

San Juan basin production is declining

   first half of 2001 vs. first half of 2000 production off by approximately 200 mmcf/d
   Rockies gas will not replace declining production in the San Juan San Juan gas will move closer to Permian pricing

The consultants believe that the combination of these factors will put decontracting pressure on existing transmission into the state of California, and especially the El Paso and Transwestern lines.

However, the "wild card" in their view is unforeseen California power demand growth.

As we discussed, JPMorgan would like to hear your views on the above issues.

Please give me a call when you have had sufficient time to digest and we can set up a conference call to make the most efficient use of your time.

Thanks Rod

Brent

Also, when you have had a chance to look at sales gas volume growth please
e-mail the volume numbers to me...thanks

Approved.

 

Remember this is for the equity piece and thery are looking at it for the longer term.
I will give it some thought.  My initial reaction is "so what" - TW is substantially contracted for through 2006/7 which would allow it to weather any storm during the interim period.  I think there would be more pressure on the proposed expansion projects more than anything.

I received these comments this afternoon from JPMorgan.     I need to have some help putting together a story to counteract the basics of this story from CERA.

Rod

Rod:

As we discussed here are the bulletts that summarize what we heard from our consultants.

Overall demand picture

Believe it will be 2006 before the California market will get back to 2000/2001 demand levels

          2002            demand down approximately 900 mmcf/d
          2003            demand will be flat
          2004            growth in demand will begin
          2005-2006   return to 2001 demand levels

Reasoning:
   2001 was a dry year - the lack of hydro generation created an additional 600 mmcf/d demand for gas in California
   Anticipated generation capacity overbuild in California - new more efficient power plants with better heat rates will displace older gas fired generation, reducing the amount of gas              required to generate a MW of electricity on the margin
   California electricity rate increases have curtailed demand for power and subsequently, gas

Gas transmission capacity into the state

Over the next two to three years there will be an additional 2.0 Bcf/d of transmission capacity into California
   800 mmcf/d in 2002
   900 mmcf/d in 2003 (Kern River expansion)
   300 mmcf/d               (El Paso conversion of All American oil line and power up)

San Juan basin gas

San Juan basin production is declining

   first half of 2001 vs. first half of 2000 production off by approximately 200 mmcf/d
   Rockies gas will not replace declining production in the San Juan San Juan gas will move closer to Permian pricing

The consultants believe that the combination of these factors will put decontracting pressure on existing transmission into the state of California, and especially the El Paso and Transwestern lines.

However, the "wild card" in their view is unforeseen California power demand growth.

As we discussed, JPMorgan would like to hear your views on the above issues.

Please give me a call when you have had sufficient time to digest and we can set up a conference call to make the most efficient use of your time.

Thanks Rod

Brent

Also, when you have had a chance to look at sales gas volume growth please
e-mail the volume numbers to me...thanks

This is very confidential at this point in time.   Do not forward.     Be prepared to discuss the job that each does and what we need to do to be able to transition early monday am if not before.    Call me.   This is what I am trying to reach you about.    The assumed time frame for this is next week.

My numbers are as follows:
try this one first:    936-597-3905
or my cell: 	713-201-6135

Happy Thanksgiving,

Rod

Here you go.  Call me if you have questions or changes.  We need to finalize this weekend if possible.

Immediate Term		Future Term	Comments			Retain		Comments

David Alencastro		Erin Copeland	Maternity leave			Keith Marlow	CFO for NEPCO(?)
Biff Brannon
Amanda Camacho
Ed Chavez
William Gehle
Joe Grajewski
Tushar Kadakia
Rocio Martinez
Bob Menefee
Norma Petry
Patricia Pomrenke
Barry Walker
Blake Walker

FYI    this is the list we are currently working on related to EEOS.

Here you go.  Call me if you have questions or changes.  We need to finalize this weekend if possible.

Immediate Term		Future Term	Comments			Retain		Comments

David Alencastro		Erin Copeland	Maternity leave			Keith Marlow	CFO for NEPCO(?)
Biff Brannon
Amanda Camacho
Ed Chavez
William Gehle
Joe Grajewski
Tushar Kadakia
Rocio Martinez
Bob Menefee
Norma Petry
Patricia Pomrenke
Barry Walker
Blake Walker

Probably a monday meeting of some of our marketing types to work on this one.

What is this about?     

	Meeting has been scheduled per Richard Lydecker
	Thursday, November 1, 2001
	9:00-10:00 am
	EB3305 - Wes's Office
	Subject: NEPCO Earnings
	Attendees: Richard Lydecker; Wes Colwell, Rod Hayslett, Keith Marlow (Pending Availability)

Red rock capacity is 107,000

Here is the message
Rod:

As per our phone conversation, the list of information we would like to
have follows:

1.  FERC Form 2s for the last three years
2.  Revenue breakdown:
   Assumptions made for the contracted period, as well as the time period
   beyond current contracts - firm/interruptible mix and volumes, tariffs
   for each type of transportation contract
   A build up from contracts to the revenues in the model would be ideal
3.  As before, compressor gas volumes and assumed sales prices for the
projected years
4.  As before, the story as it relates to CERA's view of the world
5.  Explicit calculation of rate base going forward
6.  Employee benefit plan information - funding status, return rates,
future liabilities

Thanks Rod.

When you have a time in mind for a call to discuss the above list please
contact:

Eric Fornell

Home: 516-626-9464

or myself

Home: 914-833-0234
Work:   212-270-6154
Cell:      646-232-5305

I haven't heard back from Steve at all.   Do you have anumber for him?

We will be doing a confernce call tomorrow am @ 10:00 our time with JP Morgan 877-382-9541 passcode 473270 to answer some of the questions, especially the CERA questions.

Rod:

As per our phone conversation, the list of information we would like to
have follows:

1.  FERC Form 2s for the last three years
2.  Revenue breakdown:
   Assumptions made for the contracted period, as well as the time period
   beyond current contracts - firm/interruptible mix and volumes, tariffs
   for each type of transportation contract
   A build up from contracts to the revenues in the model would be ideal
3.  As before, compressor gas volumes and assumed sales prices for the
projected years
4.  As before, the story as it relates to CERA's view of the world
5.  Explicit calculation of rate base going forward
6.  Employee benefit plan information - funding status, return rates,
future liabilities

Thanks Rod.

When you have a time in mind for a call to discuss the above list please
contact:

Eric Fornell

Home: 516-626-9464

or myself

Home: 914-833-0234
Work:   212-270-6154
Cell:      646-232-5305

We have the data

Ok with me.   

Is Kathy here?

I will not be available

Tell her to get my expense report done

FYI

I promise I will let you know if plans diviate....I am constantly trying to get this together over here.  

We are planning on your placing separate coverage by 12-31-01.  You have not been allocated any property premium for the period 1-1-02 to 3-31-02.  If you wish to remain in the Enron program for the period 1-01-02 to 3-31-02, we will allocate premium to EOTT and you should budget accordingly.  

For the Enron Property package renewal 04-01-02, we are not including EOTT assets which also means that,  the MTBE plant is also, not included.  If you decide to postpone marketing a separate program for EOTT,  we need to know as soon as possible in order to adjust our market plan.

We are holding property renewal strategy meetings today and tomorrow.

I have a tentative meeting next week with Wortham...to strategize on when to go to market.  I will let you know then.   I will take this out as soon as I can and it makes sense....I know you need to make decisions and I will do everything I can not to mess you around.  It seems these days those that they stars are controlling destinys more than we are....so I am leary about over committing.  (sighs)

Also FYI  I am talking with AIG about a tack on to the TEXNew MEx policy.  I know Rod and talked to you briefly about this and just wanted to let you know what I was doing.    

Susan, we would also like to know how your marketing of the property is progressing as we are not currently including your assets in our renewal activities.  Our policy does not renew until 04-01-01, however the renewal process starts next week.  Please advise.

Susan,
As you know, your 2002 property allocation does not include property insurance as your intention is to be out of the program by 12/31/01. Please advise when this occurs so we can notify the insurance underwriters accordingly.

Thanks for sending the attached.

Paul

Jim I can pull this together for you next week maybe...but I may need to fly to NYC.  I can readily send you premium dollars but unfortunately they also include what I pay you and therefore I would need to break out these costs so you don't double count them.  BUt maybe you can work with the spread sheet and get enough to get you what you need.  Please bear in mind I have not looked at this report closely ...so you are getting it "as is"  

 << File: Book2.xls >> 

We are trying to compile the total cost of risk or total insurance spend for all of Enron.  You participate in some of our programs and you are spending premium dollars in the market and therefore would be part of the "big picture".   For EOTT, an accurate report would include, in addition to actual premiums, the amounts spent, or Eott's out of pocket expense, within the deductibles

I thought this would be something that you would have readily available and could be provided on short notice.  

Please send to Paul's attention.  I am available if you wish to discuss.

This has been requested by Jim's boss, Per Seske, which does include EOTT. Please forward as soon as possible.
I thought I sent a copy via interoffice mail, I will send another copy.

Are am not clear on what you want this for...can you explain ?  Does this even apply to me?   

Also I never received the copy of that property policy and I need it.   Did you send it?  

We are attempting to determine the total cost of risk for Enron which necessitates gathering information from the Enron entities that place their own insurance. We need to have information broken down on your individual programs as well as for project specific programs which you place. We would like a complete schedule to include the following:

?	type of coverage,
?	limits,
?	deductibles / retentions,
?	premiums.

We assume that you have this information and can forward in short order. Unfortunately due to the short timeline, please forward no later than Wednesday, October 24.

Please call me at 713-853-7904 should you have any questions.

Regards,

Paul

What happened to the guy with the paper to sign?

She just came

FYI

Attached is the slide detailing expansions to California as of 11/7/2001.  Please review and forward as needed to JPMorgan.

 

Can you help us out here from what you know?     I do not believe you
can loan money to Enron.     Have you filed to be able to make the
special dividend?

Greg:

I do not have any access to information regarding PGE retained earnings.

As we discussed this morning, distributions of cash in the form of
dividends will be subject to a tax of approximately 7%.  This tax can be
avoided completely if the distributions of cash take the form of
intercompany loans which are settled at the close of the sale of PGE.
Significant tax research and intercompany briefings took place on this
very topic in July and August of this year.  The procedures for
settlement of the loans are already baked into the PGE purchase and sale
agreement. It is my understanding that some loans of cash have already
been made under this procedure, but I am the wrong person to talk to
about PGE issues or that sort.  Rod Hayslett would have more
information.=20
=20
Jim Ginty is the appropriate tax department contact for PGE Purchase and
Sale Agreement issues.=20

Regards,=20

Alicia Goodrow

Alicia,

Do we know / can we quantify the amount of undistributed/retained
earnings as of Sepetmber 30th, and what the tax impact would be of
distributing that amount.

Thanks again.

Greg Adams
713-853-3887

I had heard something similar.  We should probably get alicia to
quantify exactly how much the leakage would be {in dollars} and how the
mechanics would work.  Please tell alicia that we understand that this
would be a whalley, mcmahon, causey decision.  We are only trying to
identify options and quantify breakage and leakage.

Thanks very much for the update keep me posted.
William W. Brown

FYI

F.Y.I.

Title: The West Enters a Bust 	
URL(s):	

http://www.cera.com/eprofile?u=35&m=2810;

RADICAL SHIFT IN WESTERN MARKET DYNAMICS

The western power markets are entering a bust period as a result of the 24,000 
megawatts of power plant additions and demand decline brought on by last year's 
high prices and the current economic softness. This bust period is likely to 
last for several years. Western gas markets have also entered a bust with the 
delayed start to winter and full storage inventories exerting downward pressure 
on both North American prices and western basis differentials. Through the 
remainder of this year and into well into next, western regional gas and power 
markets will remain soft and possibly weaken further.

*  Power operating reserves should rise to above 15 percent by next summer in 
the Southwest and California, pushing power prices down and improving 
reliability.

*  Power demand is expected to shrink by 11 percent in the fourth quarter; 
market contractions will return demand in 2002 to levels experienced in 1998. 

*  Full gas storage inventories, huge declines in year-over-year demand, and 
the onset of significant pipeline capacity additions will keep a lid on West 
Coast differentials.

**end**

Follow above URL for complete Monthly Briefing (11 printed pages).

E-mail Category: Monthly Briefing                                  
CERA Knowledge Area(s): Western Energy

SPECIAL OFFER: Register on-line before November 30th, and a 2-Day Pass 
will be upgraded to a 4-Day Pass (maximum $1,800 value). 
Day 1: Global Oil/Refined Products;  
Day 2: Natural Gas/Global Energy;  
Day 3 & 4: Electric Power
To make changes to your cera.com profile go to:
http://www.cera.com/client/updateaccount

Forgot your username and password? Go to:
http://www.cera.com/client/forgot

This electronic message and attachments, if any, contain information 
from Cambridge Energy Research Associates, Inc. (CERA) which is 
confidential and may be privileged. Unauthorized disclosure, copying, 
distribution or use of the contents of this message or any attachments, 
in whole or in part, is strictly prohibited.
Terms of Use: http://www.cera.com/tos
Questions/Comments: webmaster@cera.com
Copyright 2001. Cambridge Energy Research Associates

FYYI
 
FYI.    This is my story for now, but I think it explains the volumes and the rates as well as the revenue projections.   Please note we have found a bust in 2002 revenue.   This yields a higher answer without any additional volumes being used.

<<Exisiting capacity projections w. Red Rock.xls>> 

	FYI

It looks like the number should be around $160,000,000.  We have sent 7 over already and the rest will be coming in the next 30 minutes.   

We will keep you posted on new additionas if they occur. 

CAn you give me something that can be used to estimate the fuel available for sale?

Analysis based on information from Facility Planning.

James

 << File: twfuelanal.xls >> 

Here is the basic info on the other projects discussed on the phone the other day.

Attached is the slide detailing expansions to California as of 11/7/2001.  Please review and forward as needed to JPMorgan.

 

Probably need Rob and Mary Kay by phone.

I spoke to John O'Shea today regarding Dynegy's continued due diligence for the pipelines.  We have scheduled an all day working session this Thursday beginning at 9:00 am (at Enron Building but room not confirmed). John will email to me tomorrow his due diligence requests.  In addition to commercial items, he would also like to cover operations and regulatory items.  Please make every effort to attend or designate a representative.  Drew, not sure who we need on the regulatory side?

Thanks,

Kevin

Peters and Saunders should probably be in attendance, but not required.

be right there.

Are you joining us for the 1:30 on drew's office?

Probably need to check with H R group providing services

What is the purpose of this?

What do you think about Tracy and Jim?

More TW info.

 
Per your request, historical California throughput data for TW and competitive pipelines.

Info on generating plants in cal and southwest

 

attached is the info for JP Morgan.  Let me know if you have questions.
kh

FYI

rumor has it that a press conference will take place at 4:00 - more money in, lower conversion rate.

I'm in Stan's office

What is in the plan?

Stan,s office

I will be attending.

Please let me know by COB today if you or Tracy will attend the below meeting, so that I can notify Whalley's office.

Thanks,
Cindy

This is to confirm the budget meeting scheduled for Tuesday, October 30 @ 11:00 a.m. in EB32C2.  Please advise me only if you are unable to attend.

Many Thanks,

Liz Taylor

Capital for red rock between 2001 and 2002

Canyou get me detail then on the capital for the 2 years?

Do you still need me to sign something

What would you like me to do?

James Richardson asked me to forward to you.  We are not sure Standard Charter can do these.  We also have around 20 amendment requests from EOTT on date extensions past the 12/31/01 drop dead date.

Please advise.

Thanks,
Jessie

					 << File: New LC Request Matador.doc >> 

Peter Chen
Credit Specialist
EOTT Energy Corp.
(713) 993-5223 - ph
(713) 402-2887 - fx

I think you got an old list and should have taken my name off.

The meeting has been scheduled in E111 from 11-11:30.  Please be prompt.
Thanks.

> Olin has asked for a meeting with himself, Bill and you to discuss the
> role of Assistant Deans.  Will from 11-11:30 or 11:30-12 on Tues., 11/27
> work?  Please reply by email asap.  Thanks.
> 
> 

Can this be moved, if not you will have to have it without me.  	

Can you attend this one for me?     They are working on the sale of our interest in the Trailblazer Pipeline.    Sounds like a reasonable deal to me.

 

FYI

Rod - fyi

Here's the bank accounts list.  I've asked the guys to re-verify the account numbers, but in the meantime, thought you could work with this.

 

Probably.   Please call Kathy Campos to get on my calendar.     the margins for 2001 and 2002 are not the same and I didn't think we had 2001 in the other model in detail.    Existing includes Gallup, and it will be nearly imposiible to identify it as separate because there have been some changes to the original contracts for Gallup.   You can try, but now you are talking about getting into parts of contracts.    You have to remember it was an expansion, not a separate system and therefore there is no way to track the flows after the fact.

Rod,

I am working on formatting the information you provided.  I have a couple of questions- first, using the margin numbers in the 2001 CE I get a lower number than we calculated for contracted volumes in the spreadsheet you created yesterday.  I also want to ask you some questions regarding the segregation of existing, Gallup, and Red Rock.   Do you have any time tomorrow to sit down and walk through the numbers?

Thanks
Sarah

This is a test for the blackberry.
Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

What do you have to backup the 2001 and 2002 revenue projectoions for NNG?

John O'Shea was looking for the revenue backup for NNG.

 << File: PLAN_FORECAST_DESIGN_MASTER_WITH_STRETCH_Rev_10_08.xls >>  << File: CE 3-2001.xls >> 

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

They took bids and I think have an offer of about $60 MM or so.

Michael: What do you know about this one?

yes, what is the deal that sounds reasonable?   

Can you attend this one for me?     They are working on the sale of our interest in the Trailblazer Pipeline.    Sounds like a reasonable deal to me.

 << Message: Trailblazer w/S.Horton, D.McCarty >> 

I have asked Kevin to sit in on this one for me.   Trailblazer on wednesday am.

Can you attend this one for me?     They are working on the sale of our interest in the Trailblazer Pipeline.    Sounds like a reasonable deal to me.

 

I am having trouble getting this to you.   So I am trying again.     Also do you have any inventory that could be sold that is not encumbered already.   Trying to think about what could be done to improve your cash in the short term.

Can you help us out here from what you know?     I do not believe you
can loan money to Enron.     Have you filed to be able to make the
special dividend?

Greg:

I do not have any access to information regarding PGE retained earnings.

As we discussed this morning, distributions of cash in the form of
dividends will be subject to a tax of approximately 7%.  This tax can be
avoided completely if the distributions of cash take the form of
intercompany loans which are settled at the close of the sale of PGE.
Significant tax research and intercompany briefings took place on this
very topic in July and August of this year.  The procedures for
settlement of the loans are already baked into the PGE purchase and sale
agreement. It is my understanding that some loans of cash have already
been made under this procedure, but I am the wrong person to talk to
about PGE issues or that sort.  Rod Hayslett would have more
information.=20
=20
Jim Ginty is the appropriate tax department contact for PGE Purchase and
Sale Agreement issues.=20

Regards,=20

Alicia Goodrow

Alicia,

Do we know / can we quantify the amount of undistributed/retained
earnings as of Sepetmber 30th, and what the tax impact would be of
distributing that amount.

Thanks again.

Greg Adams
713-853-3887

I had heard something similar.  We should probably get alicia to
quantify exactly how much the leakage would be {in dollars} and how the
mechanics would work.  Please tell alicia that we understand that this
would be a whalley, mcmahon, causey decision.  We are only trying to
identify options and quantify breakage and leakage.

Thanks very much for the update keep me posted.
William W. Brown

I have asked and will let you know the answer later today.    The bigger question is that they can not loan money to Enron and can only dividend, so if they can do something to raise the cash, they still can't get it out any more out than they can by dividending.    The other problem is that they are running into cash problems themselves since they were in the process of going to the bond markets when all of this occurred, and were advised to wait.   Their receivables from California are part of the problem.   More update later.

Hey! Just a reminder to check on the Portland General inventory.

Wes

Is the cost center in question allocated or direct charged?  The corporate Enron Corp Business Controls cost center.

Rod - What is our policy of accepting direct charges for corporate assistance?   Should this remain in corporate and be a part of the allocation?

Mike - Was any agreement made up front with Brindle to cover Kyle's expenses?   Was the request to travel made by Dave Odneal or yourself?

Morris A. Brassfield
Enron Transportation Services
Senior Director
Operations Support Services
Three Allen Center 3285
333 Clay Street
Houston, Texas 77002

713-646-7006  Business Phone
713-503-1409  Cell Phone

Morris, can you look at this for us.  I kinda think that the Corp Allocation is the right place for this expense.

I appreciate Kyle's expertise and work, but do we always pay the direct expenses for Corp assistance?  

Mike:  In regard to Sharon's note below, please confirm the entities responsible for the cost of Kyle's trip.

Thank you,

Kim

Kyle Norosky who works in Enron Corp Business Controls, recently flew to Minneapolis with regard to security issues.  He has told me that his trip is to be charged to ETS/Northern Pipeline cost center or project code.

Please can you let me know what company number and code to charge this to.  The total cost of his trip was $1603.28

Many thanks.

Sharon Killey
Assistant to John Brindle
Business Controls
Tel:  713-345-4999
Fax: 713-646-8838

You can use my office but I may not be here.

We are still on with Greg on Thursday, Nov. 29th, 8:00-10:00 am but since Greg will now be downtown he has agreed to meet in Rod's office.

Do you guys want to meet ahead of the meeting to review or discuss the package?

Why do our numbers look so high in the 4th quarter and then fall off so much?     We have to get a better handle on all of this and fast.

fyi

Tracy  -  
As discussed.
Steve

 << File: enron corp infomation request-cons.xls >> 

Rob Brown
Manager, Enron Corp.
Financial Accounting & Reporting
Off. 713.853.9702
Cell 713.303.4497
rob.brown@enron.com

I could probably do by phone and may be here.

how does this work for you? We are having the all day Dynegy due diligence session but could step out.  I didn't know if you planned on being here or not.  We could patch you in by phone.

How about Thursday Nov 29 at 2pm???

Regards,

Sue

________________________________

Sue Ford
Enron Corp.
Tel: 713-853-5176
Fax: 713-646-5930
sue.ford@enron.com

Rod needs to re-schedule this - what is the earliest date that we could do this?

I have been in discussions with them as well, and I don't think they have that flexibility.      Who has actually been working on the move for you?    I will have Pam Daily from my Admin Team contact you for specifics.

Rod,

Okay, we will plan to relocate them.  Property Service did come back and indicate they could wait until the end of November. We will see if they have any flexibility to accommodate early next year.

Keith

We won't have a permanent place until sometime after the end of December.

Rod,

This is a good opportunity to make the consolidation we discussed last week.  Property Services is indicting the move needs to be completed in two weeks.

Keith Dodson

Steve,

Enron Property Services may need us to move Accounting from the 9th to the 8th floor - this is due to the relocation of personnel from 21&22 to 9&10.  They are to get back to me today or early next week with more details.  Do we know already or would it be possible to expedite the answer to Accounting's long term home from an organizational standpoint?  Depending on the answer maybe it would be possible to move them to their 'final' home now (if it is outside of EEOS) instead of moving them twice.

Please advise,
Marilyn

test2

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Either Robert Guthrie or greek Rice.

As you can see in the attachment below, this is an extremely exhaustive list of questions/requests (for NNG only).  I would strongly suggest that we meet for one hour to go over this list and prepare for Thursday's meeting.
Rod: Who from tax should attend? I have asked Gary Smith and Jim Bouillion to attend as well.

Kevin

Kevin,

Attached is our detailed due diligence request list for Northern Natural.
The list is not 100% complete.  I am awaiting input from our operations
personnel, but I am forwarding it to you now in the interest of time.
Please call if you have any questions (713/767-4764).

Regards,

Kyle

(See attached file: DD Request List.doc)

The deal with the Banks is being held up by Paribas to get a cross-netting agreement with Enron.   I understand we have agreed and the documentation could be done as early as today.   Bill Bradford is working on this one.   So it's up to Enron to fix the problem at this point in time.   PAribas releases and we get the agreement in place and we can start moving these LC's.

Just wanted to see if these LC's were absolutely necessary at this time.  We just got another request today for two more LC's.  The total of all four LC's is now $11.98MM and all cash requests are now going through Bill Bradford to see which gets paid.

Is there any update on your negotiations with Standard Chartered?

Thanks,

JR
 

What would you like me to do?

James Richardson asked me to forward to you.  We are not sure Standard Charter can do these.  We also have around 20 amendment requests from EOTT on date extensions past the 12/31/01 drop dead date.

Please advise.

Thanks,
Jessie

					 << File: New LC Request Matador.doc >> 

Peter Chen
Credit Specialist
EOTT Energy Corp.
(713) 993-5223 - ph
(713) 402-2887 - fx

This position is truly needed in Omaha to provide support as Patty suggests.    I only wish there was a way to move someone from here to there.

I received a voicemail from Miranda while I was out of the office last week indicating that all vacancies require re-justification/authorization.

I had been interviewing for the open accountant position prior to leaving for vacation.  I have interviewed one internal and two external candidates.  I had indicated I would be notifying them this week of my hiring decision. The position needs to be filled for the following reasons:

Northern Border Partners has completed 3 major acquisitions this year and one at the end of third quarter last year.
We have been transitioning these companies to SAP this year resulting in significantly higher maintenance time for additional companies, all internal coding (Cost centers/FARorders), intercompany reconcilliations, account reconcilliations.
All companies are consolidated with Northern Border Partners requiring financial statement preparation
We will be bringing on Midwestern Gas Transmission Company effective January 1.  Their accounting in currently being done by El Paso through the end of the year.
We continue to be behind on certain routine activities, bank reconcilliations being the primary one.  With the additional companies, this has increased the level of activity in this area.
IPayit has created additional manual accounts payable processing due to issues with payment processing through the system.
All of the additional companies has resulted in additional wire transfer activity which is all entered manually in our department.
The acquisition of a Canadian operation has resulted in significant time required in working with the 3rd party that  is operating this facility as well as now requiring foreign currency translation.
New accounting requirements are requiring additional analysis and reporting requirements.

I am available to discuss any of the above issues at your convenience.  

What is the next step at this point in time?

As discussed these individuals will transfer to EGA

Biff Brannon
Tushar Kadakia
Bob Menefee
Blake Walker

In addition, the following would support the transition through the period stated below:

Joe Grajewski -  	12/31/01	- Transition issues to Sommers
William Gehle -   	 1/31/01		- Currently negotiating CIGSA settlement
Amanda Camacho-	 1/31/01		- Transition A/P to Corp outsourcing group

Discussions with Jeff indicate that he does not have the excess capacity to absorb the remaining issues confronting EEOS accounting.

		 

no

Any special requirements i.e. # of reviewers, peers, etc.?

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

We probably need to get this stuff in the hands of a few more people to make this work smoothly. 

Fyi. I will circle back with everyone later today.
Kevin,

Attached is our detailed due diligence request list for Northern Natural.
The list is not 100% complete.  I am awaiting input from our operations
personnel, but I am forwarding it to you now in the interest of time.
Please call if you have any questions (713/767-4764).

Regards,

Kyle

(See attached file: DD Request List.doc)

Do you have anyone from Accounting?   Saunders?

I have included Paul Cherry, Gary Smith, Jim Bouillion, Greek Rice, Phil Lowry and three from MKM's team. I went through the list and I think we should have everything covered.  We are meeting at 4 to go over the requests, timing and responsible parties.  I have also asked Kyle Kettler for some materiality threshold (if we hope to get this due diligence done by 2010).
All but Phil Lowry are confirmed.  

We probably need to get this stuff in the hands of a few more people to make this work smoothly. 

Fyi. I will circle back with everyone later today.
Kevin,

Attached is our detailed due diligence request list for Northern Natural.
The list is not 100% complete.  I am awaiting input from our operations
personnel, but I am forwarding it to you now in the interest of time.
Please call if you have any questions (713/767-4764).

Regards,

Kyle

(See attached file: DD Request List.doc)

55% TW and 45% NNG

Please provide a split of the $158,700 between Northern and Transwestern.

The 2 of you should probably listen in on this stuff to make sure you don't have some of the info needed 

There will be a meeting for discussion of questions/requests related to above today from 4-6 pm in EB 47C2.  Please make a note of the conference room change.  Participants from Omaha via telephone will be Steve Kirk, Tim Kissner, and Keith Petersen.

Terri Bachand  

Enron Global Services
(713)853-6528

OK

I think for December we should leave it as is while we see what the fallout is going to be. But, if we do not have plans to build by year-end, it probably should go to Corp vacant.  ROD, do you agree?

And by the way...do we want to keep it that way for EB 41 or do we want to switch to another category (Corp vacant) since you guys are not using that floor?  What do you think, Pam?
Deborah

You're right. Thanks.

Ruthann
x66538

Ruthann,

In October and November,  the billing for the entire 41st floor was taken to 0366/111718 per management's direction while under reconstruction.

To my knowledge, that is still the case.

Please contact, Deborah Bubenko regarding construction completion.

Thank you.

Jo Ann 

The October EPSC invoice showed the following floor space being billed incorrectly to 0366/111692:

Room #		Should be billed to		Sq. ft	
ECN 4106		0366/112476		547

ECN 4751		0366/112476		314

Also on their October invoice, there is an entry for rent correction for 1154 sq.ft. The ticket number is EBR10019310085, dated 10/17/01. I looked at all my rent corrections submitted, and it isn't one of mine. Could you please advise what rooms this correction covers?

Thanks for your help.

Ruthann
x66538

Thanks!
Rod Hayslett

You should plan on attending the meeting then tomorrow with Kevin.   It's 9-10 in Stan's Office.

We have done an evaluation that showed our interest to be worth the following:

10%		12.5%		15%
$84mm		$73mm		$64mm

If you want to see the model let me know.

Cheers.

They took bids and I think have an offer of about $60 MM or so.

Michael: What do you know about this one?

yes, what is the deal that sounds reasonable?   

Can you attend this one for me?     They are working on the sale of our interest in the Trailblazer Pipeline.    Sounds like a reasonable deal to me.

 << Message: Trailblazer w/S.Horton, D.McCarty >> 

 

Can not do a 1:00 unless we can get done before 1:25

 

YOu need to attend this one.	Kevin:   you may also want to attend.

A mandatory meeting requested by Ray Bowen has been scheduled for today at 2:00 PM in EB 2021 to discuss cash forecasting requirements.

We apologize for the short notice.

Thank you,

Betty Tauzier
Enron Corp Treasury
EB 2014
713-853-9817

they put it in the system as me, but I've told them it was you.

	 -----Original Message-----

How soon can you add things like payroll to the picture?.

FYI we sent this to treasury at their request.

Please find attached file. No major individual ($5.0 MM or greater) receipts or disbursements  anticipated over the last four days this month.

                           << File: NNG&TWDAY01.xls >> 

I believe at this point in time I can support this request.    I also believe that Jim does not have the capacity currently to absorb.

Attached is to do list supporting the remaining workload for Brannon,et al.
 

My initial conversation with Jim indicated that he likely does not have the capacity but he will have to investigate.  I hope to have an answer shortly.

Rod, I'm prepared to talk to Stan at anytime.

Can you answer his questions?

Did Keith also have discussions with Jim Saunders about picking up workload?  What will Brannon, Kadakia, Menefee and Walker be doing for EGA?

None of these seven individuals were on the retain/transfer list that Stan reviewed yesterday.  Rod, if you support this, I suggest that you and Keith review this with Stan to get his approval.

What is the next step at this point in time?

As discussed these individuals will transfer to EGA

Biff Brannon
Tushar Kadakia
Bob Menefee
Blake Walker

In addition, the following would support the transition through the period stated below:

Joe Grajewski -  	12/31/01	- Transition issues to Sommers
William Gehle -   	 1/31/01		- Currently negotiating CIGSA settlement
Amanda Camacho-	 1/31/01		- Transition A/P to Corp outsourcing group

Discussions with Jeff indicate that he does not have the excess capacity to absorb the remaining issues confronting EEOS accounting.

		 << File: Remaining EEOS Issues.ppt >> 

you may need to attend for continuity reasons.

I have not really been involved in the evaluation, but will be happy to attend.

You should plan on attending the meeting then tomorrow with Kevin.   It's 9-10 in Stan's Office.

We have done an evaluation that showed our interest to be worth the following:

10%		12.5%		15%
$84mm		$73mm		$64mm

If you want to see the model let me know.

Cheers.

They took bids and I think have an offer of about $60 MM or so.

Michael: What do you know about this one?

yes, what is the deal that sounds reasonable?   

Can you attend this one for me?     They are working on the sale of our interest in the Trailblazer Pipeline.    Sounds like a reasonable deal to me.

 << Message: Trailblazer w/S.Horton, D.McCarty >> 

I will need someone to cover EEOS, can you do that or should Keith?    what about Portland?

A mandatory meeting requested by Ray Bowen has been scheduled for today at 2:00 PM in EB 2021 to discuss cash forecasting requirements.

We apologize for the short notice.

Thank you,

Betty Tauzier
Enron Corp Treasury
EB 2014
713-853-9817

We are getting it.    It is in Omaha.

Steve:   Can we speed this up?

John O'Shea was still looking for the revenue back up to the 2002 plan numbers.  Do either one of you have this?

We will need a Unanimous Consent to make Kevin an Officer of the pipes, title should just be Vice President.    I think given the discussions over the weekend it would be good to do so effective last friday.

Thanks.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

I called him.     Dana is printing out from the data base, and it will probably take an interpreter

Steve Gilbert is working on this.  How soon do you need it?

Get with Dot

What enron entity owns the EOTT gp?

Sounds fine to me.

Check and find out forme?  Is that EOTT or the company that owns it?

For TW. Can you help me here?

Rod,

Would you please forward me the CAPEX numbers when Tracy e-mails them to you?  Jayshree indicated that she needs those numbers and it will be easier to send in soft form.

Also, to confirm the numbers in the information you gave me are 30.86 MM for 2001 (this does not include Red Rock) and $68.4 in 2002 (this includes $47 MM for Red Rock).  I am assuming that on page three of the 2001-2003 projections that really captures 2002-2004 the operations numbers are in 000s not millions as noted above.  If this is true you have 15 billion in operations CAPEX - which I don't believe is true.  Let me know.

Thanks
Sarah

I have not reviewed, but need you to get into this, please feel free to call Tracy 37372.

How does this look?

 

Also, I did change some numbers in the excel spreadsheet:

	The Ignacio to Blanco subscription levels were pulling from the row excluding ROFR capacity in the supporting sheet.  I changed it to be consistent with the other 	capacities (which include ROFR capacity).

	Shelley had made some assumptions about East of Thoreau capacity subscription, such as, the USGT 400,000/d contract would remain subscribed (it doesn't 	have ROFR) and she had included the extension of 2-3 other contracts that don't have ROFR.  These contracts were then dropped after 2005.  I continued the 	extensions through 2006.

	I changed the East of Thoreau capacity to 750,000/d from 850,000/d.

 

  
 
 https://www.clickathome.net/yahoo

If I needed to change the account that bills were to be paid into for this necxt billing cycle can it be done, for TW and NNG.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Is 4:00 in 47c2?

Next time ask Jim to call me.

I think that we are already well underway on TW's red rock and were not expexting to use external capital for.  No other major projects underway. That are impacted by enron's situation.

Fyi
I received a call from Jim Guest at the FERC OCA this afternoon concerning the Enron situation.  He had read the articles and heard the reports.  Wanted to know if bad accounting was the root of the problem.  I advised him that it was bad investments that was the real issue. He asked about the use of the pipeline assets to pull Enron thru the liquidity crisis.  I gave him a brief overview of the Dynegy cash infusion and the bank revolvers.  He said there was some concern at the FERC that projects we might be proposing may not be able to be funded due to the reduced ability of the pipelines to obtain outside financing due to the securitization of the all the assets.  I indicated that it was my opinion that good investments in pipeline facilities would probably be looked on favorably at Enron these days.

Thought you?d want a quick update.  I haven?t advised Drew or Greg Porter yet.  Thought you might want to cover with them.

Sent to 8

This is the crew.
Rod,

I just spoke with Jayshree.   Jeff has requested that we have a data room by tomorrow night and I was wondering who I should I should contact in legal to coordinate this effort.

Let me know

Thanks
Sarah

This is the crew.  Do we know what we need?
Rod,

I just spoke with Jayshree.   Jeff has requested that we have a data room by tomorrow night and I was wondering who I should I should contact in legal to coordinate this effort.

Let me know

Thanks
Sarah

We are also doing a due diligence all day thursday with dynegy on NNG

I think you need to coordinate with Kevin Howard and Drew Fossum.   I will be out of the office tomorrow.

Rod and crew,

In speaking with Jayshree, I think Mitch and Jeff would like to divide the information into categories i.e legal information (environmental disclosures, etc.) regulatory information, financial/accounting (I think we have a lot of this and I will try to get it organized), any relevant tax information, etc.  I know this is a lot but let me know what you think, who I should coordinated with, etc.

Thanks
Sarah 

This is the crew.  Do we know what we need?
Rod,

I just spoke with Jayshree.   Jeff has requested that we have a data room by tomorrow night and I was wondering who I should I should contact in legal to coordinate this effort.

Let me know

Thanks
Sarah

I have a DSL connection and sometimes it takes as long as 3-4 minutes to load the page.    Is there anything that can be done to improve the speed?

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Can't we identify the impacts of the non nng stuff in the financials?

Fyi
In case you need to get a hold of me quickly and I am in a meeting, please call me on my cell phone (402-490-0647).  If you need to reach me at home my number is 402-496-2344

Good to know that the FERC cares!

I received a call from Jim Guest at the FERC OCA this afternoon concerning the Enron situation.  He had read the articles and heard the reports.  Wanted to know if bad accounting was the root of the problem.  I advised him that it was bad investments that was the real issue. He asked about the use of the pipeline assets to pull Enron thru the liquidity crisis.  I gave him a brief overview of the Dynegy cash infusion and the bank revolvers.  He said there was some concern at the FERC that projects we might be proposing may not be able to be funded due to the reduced ability of the pipelines to obtain outside financing due to the securitization of the all the assets.  I indicated that it was my opinion that good investments in pipeline facilities would probably be looked on favorably at Enron these days.

Thought you?d want a quick update.  I haven?t advised Drew or Greg Porter yet.  Thought you might want to cover with them.

Explain vs redo.

Make sure you keep Dot and Drew in the loop on this stuff

I meant to try and explain, not to redo.  Only as a last resort<ould we wantto redo

For what reibursement

I guess. I will need to have my memory refreshed

Agreed.  Don't make it harder than it needs to be

Thanks.

I will be taking a day of vacation on Friday, November 2nd to attend teacher conferences for my daughter and to review a educational program for my son.   I will have my cell phone if you need to get a hold of me ( 402-490-0647.)

Itwas in a yellow interoffice envelope, real yellow, not the regular manila colored.

Just sitting around.

What is te stock price doing?  Has there been any announcements on the Dynegy deal?

I will likely not be available.  

Just make sure you work with Kevin he made need assistance 

Please send tomy direct reports.

While I am out of the officetoday please keep Kevin Howard up to speed on what you see and hear.  He is leading the effort in our areas during this time of stress/crisis for me.

I just told kathy to send an email tomy direct reports.  I will resend to you

Tell everyone to calm down and get their work done.  Then they should go home.  I know it doesn't help much, but I'm not sure what you can tell everyone at this point.

Not even in yet

Well I guess from what is taking place that dynegy has backed out of the deal.

What is the purpose of this meeting?

	Meeting has been scheduled per Richard Lydecker
	Thursday, November 1, 2001
	9:00-10:00 am
	EB3305 - Wes's Office
	Subject: NEPCO Earnings
	Attendees: Richard Lydecker; Wes Colwell, Rod Hayslett, Keith Marlow (Pending Availability)

If the reimbursement doesn't show up then there is no offset and the dollars spent should end up in rate base.   Isn't that about the way it could happen?

Are we still waitning on some info here?

Ralph, please get with Rod and provide what ever he needs in the way of Safety Stats.

Where can I get info on safety statistics for the pipes?

finalizing due diligence. do you have the ingaa/aga report you referenced in
our meetings?

If I could get something as simple as Lost Time, vehicle accidents, or such I would appreciate it.

Ralph, please get with Rod and provide what ever he needs in the way of Safety Stats.

Where can I get info on safety statistics for the pipes?

finalizing due diligence. do you have the ingaa/aga report you referenced in
our meetings?

I have asked Corporate where it will be reported in the 4th qtr, if it's not going to be reported as wholesale then there is no real reason to bother Wes.     

Given the deterioration in outlook for several of the Nepco projects--especially Kendall, Jenks, and Linden there are significant potential losses that may need to be recognized this quarter.  I wanted to make sure there was full understanding of the situation and discussion regarding our approach.

What is the purpose of this meeting?

	Meeting has been scheduled per Richard Lydecker
	Thursday, November 1, 2001
	9:00-10:00 am
	EB3305 - Wes's Office
	Subject: NEPCO Earnings
	Attendees: Richard Lydecker; Wes Colwell, Rod Hayslett, Keith Marlow (Pending Availability)

Cash?

Stan,

In October we had a plan to purchase 0.5 Bcf of gas that was projected to bring our operational storage level to 12 Bcf by the end of the month and were concerned about over-filling our storage fields from potential long gas by shippers.  In reality, prices have risen and shippers have shorted the system by 1.7 Bcf month-to-date.  Our original plan, based on a combination of physical requirements and regulatory strategy was as follows:

Ending October Balance		12 Bcf
Ending November Balance		13 Bcf
Ending December Balance		14 Bcf

To acheive this plan we are projecting a purchase in November of at least 2.5 Bcf (depending upon shipper short gas over the remainder of the month).  We also expect to receive 0.3 Bcf of SBA imbalance payback in November that should raise the operational storage levels to approximately 13 Bcf.  We are still at risk for over-filling our storage fields in November and do not wish to buy any volumes that might push us over the 13 Bcf operational storage level.  Therefore, we are targeting the purchase of 2.5 Bcf of gas (which may be adjusted based on the customer's imbalances over the next week) for November.

Kent

What is the purpose of this meeting?     I may not be able to make it.	

 

Attendees:

Wes Colwell
Brent Price
Kent Castleman
Beth Apollo

FYI

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Don't count on me.

Where do you intend to have that meeting?

Even though a number of us are swamped with work related to the issues Enron is currently facing, progress has been made in three of the priority areas.

The purpose of the first Steering Committee meeting was to review (1)team members and (2)plans for the first 30 days.  For those teams who have named a lead (Reporting, Communications, and Human Capital), George Wasaff and I propose that we continue with the status meeting originally scheduled for November 1 from 10-11:30 with those team leads who are able to participate (Jan Johnson, Carol Howes, and I) and any Steering Committee members who are available.  Documentation indicating team members and plans can be made available to those unable to attend.

The five priority areas were expected to move at different speeds, so we can initiate the other two teams once time permits.

Please let me know if you are able to participate, and/or if you have any problems with this proposed path forward.

Thanks!

Fyi

  
 
 http://www.skytel.com/

I am getting ready to announce that I am bringing Kevin Howard into EGS as Vice President of Finance and Transaction Support.    Thinking about the current organization, do think it appropriate to consider putting Ms Fischer in his organization?   The kind of things she is doing for you currently are similar to the kind of things we are going to have Kevin working with Corp on.   I will be putting into his organization the economic analytic talents and special projects people from the pipeline group as well as some others.    We will not be charging out these costs into the specific commercial units, but instead expect them to generate the ideas and value to pay for themselves.    His group will be providing services to all, but I am willing to carve out some priorities.

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Its fine

Moved to the 7th.

I will keep it on the calendar but cannot promise anything at this point in time.

Jim Prentice, Chairman of the Administrative Committee, has called a special meeting of the Committee.  The purpose of the meeting is to monitor Enron stock during the move from Northern Trust to Hewitt & Associates.  This is considered a critical meeting for your attendance.

Date:  Thursday, November 1st
Time:  2:00-5:00PM
Location:  EB30C2

A dial in teleconference number has been set up for those unable to attend:

   1-877-726-0141  
Access Code: 391296

First of all, why can't we do a deal with Northern Plain's, a wholly owned subsidiary?

Rod,

Can you give me some help here on the pricing confindentiality agreement?

vince
713.853.6701

I have twice emailed Sally Beck, the signatory on the last agreements signed by ENA, with NNG and TW, to see if she could give me a lead on whom to contact.  I also left her a voice mail.  She has not responded.   We cannot proceed with the Northern Border implementation without a confidentiality agreement between ENA and NBP.  

Caminus is still looking to set up a meeting for gathering requirements for both NBP and possibly the Risk Analytics package.

Any progress on this?

Sally,

Thanks

Vince Strohmeyer
713.853.6701

fyi.

If it would help to have move time to interview and find the right person for the EGS CIO position, I would be willing to run the organization as Steve tries to leave for his new position.  I do not have an interest in the position but know I am capable of handling the job on a temporary basis if it would help.   I do not want us to rush just to fill the position if you and Stan do not have a strong feeling for any of the current candidates.  I think we need a strong person to carry us forward and deal with Networks.   cvb

Will Keith Marlowe be in attendance?

Wes did think he could add some background and is ready to participate.  There is no question that he no longer has direct responsibility for NEPCO.  At this point Wes will be there unless you prefer not.

Not as far as I know.

	Rod,

	Is there a problem with this request?  PAAs were submitted for 3 employees and 2 have been distributed.  Has it been a conscience decision to withhold
	Sally's PAA?

	Tom

	Rod,

	This appears to have been lost in the shuffle.  Please approve the attached PAA and forward to Leesa Hutcherson.

	Thanks,
		Tom   713-993-5604

 << File: PAAForm.doc >> 

Don't know.

We don't need you yet, but I'll page you when we do.  Thanks.  By the way, do you know what the "emergency meeting" is about that I've been invited to at 3:00 by Lance Schuler?  DF

FYI

Rod, I am very concerned about the statement that Enron cannot get any added LCs' issued.  This may be a disclosue event for us.  I think we need this retracted and for Enron to affirm there ability to perform under our facility.  Your thoughts?
We have the following new requests for L/Cs to cover our lease purchases.  They are requesting L/Cs because of the Enron situation.  I've spoken with some of them and they just won't budge.  

1.  Newfield Exploration		$3MM   	to cover Oct & Nov
2.  J. Cleo Thompson		$1.8MM to cover Oct & Nov 
3.  Apache Corp.		$700K     to cover Nov
4.  W. C. Miller			$175K     to cover Nov 

I've already spoken to Jesse Mata at Enron and she is telling me she cannot get any L/Cs issued - their banks are not allowing it.   I've got a call into Jack Insigna at Standard Chartered to see if they would be willing to EOTT's L/Cs.  He's checking.  

We could prepay Apache - they are obviously not a credit risk.  the others i'm not sure about - we're checking their credit.  

let me know about how much you're willing to with Enron.  thanks.  jc 

Looks like there may have been a little confusion here, but it appears that the deal is still working as before. 

Rod, I am very concerned about the statement that Enron cannot get any added LCs' issued.  This may be a disclosue event for us.  I think we need this retracted and for Enron to affirm there ability to perform under our facility.  Your thoughts?
We have the following new requests for L/Cs to cover our lease purchases.  They are requesting L/Cs because of the Enron situation.  I've spoken with some of them and they just won't budge.  

1.  Newfield Exploration		$3MM   	to cover Oct & Nov
2.  J. Cleo Thompson		$1.8MM to cover Oct & Nov 
3.  Apache Corp.		$700K     to cover Nov
4.  W. C. Miller			$175K     to cover Nov 

I've already spoken to Jesse Mata at Enron and she is telling me she cannot get any L/Cs issued - their banks are not allowing it.   I've got a call into Jack Insigna at Standard Chartered to see if they would be willing to EOTT's L/Cs.  He's checking.  

We could prepay Apache - they are obviously not a credit risk.  the others i'm not sure about - we're checking their credit.  

let me know about how much you're willing to with Enron.  thanks.  jc 

Not at this time.   I think as long as Enron is performing, I'm not sure why there is all of this noise.

I have already approved and forwarded.

Yes and yes, but it will take me another day or so for the announcement

We got invited to Don Hawkins bi-weekly EAMR update on their projects on November 1.

Do you have any outstanding issues on EAMR third party transactions which we need to follow up?  Not that I am aware of

Are you satisfied with the information provided by Don/Sarahbeth on how they go about to provide services for third parties?    Generally yes.

Is the new $500,000 (vs. the $250,000) cash commitment for ETS RAC review policy in effect now?   Ask Cheryl

Sally: 
Where do I go inside Enron to get straight what it is that I need to do in order to be able to use the curves I am told that we need to be using?	

Rod Hayslett
EB4054
713-853-6178

Rod,

Can you give me some help here on the pricing confindentiality agreement?

vince
713.853.6701

I have twice emailed Sally Beck, the signatory on the last agreements signed by ENA, with NNG and TW, to see if she could give me a lead on whom to contact.  I also left her a voice mail.  She has not responded.   We cannot proceed with the Northern Border implementation without a confidentiality agreement between ENA and NBP.  

Caminus is still looking to set up a meeting for gathering requirements for both NBP and possibly the Risk Analytics package.

Any progress on this?

Sally,

Thanks

Vince Strohmeyer
713.853.6701

I think the biggest problem is that where are we going to get the funds for that?

When I was in Calgary, Keith Petersen and I were talking about rates and certificates and he mentioned some seminars that the Omaha people do.  Additionally, we discussed some sites that would provide a variety of things to see.  Below is a possible schedule he sent me. 

What we would provide is a Certificates 101 training and answer questions (1 1/2 Hours), Steve Kirk's group would provide a rates and tariff 101 session that would take a full 2 hours or maybe more, and Tim Kissner would provide a cost of service presentation (how he arrives at a cost of service).  Tim's presentation takes another 1 1/2 hours.  This would take up one day.  Then I could provide the names or help you set up tours of the Redfield Underground storage, a tour of the Ogden compressor station, A tour of the Garner LNG, and possibly a tour of the Farmington Compressor station.  The Ogden station does not have turbine horsepower or electric driven units, but is a major compressor station on our system.  This would take most of two days to cover.  

I mentioned this idea to Eric and Steve and they are both very interested.  Also, Tony Pryor was there and he said Drew would be interested, and I got an e-mail from Nancy Bagot in the DC office wanting to participate.  I realize this could become a lot of people, but it could be a good opportunity for some practical experience and team building.  What do you think?

Cheers,

Michael

FYI

Portland General's investment bankers have advised them to delay their plans to issue $250 million of new long-term bonds.  I just wanted to make sure you were aware of this.  Should you have any concerns please let me know.

Let's forward to the ETS Officer's for review/comments to be discussed monday am.

Rod, I think we have a "clean" ETS approval authorization (umbrella) policy for both commitments and fulfullments/execution.
Now what? Send out under your name as final? Send to the BUCs/others a review? Any preference?

 

Please see the attached with the changes we discussed with Rod - (the Commitment and Fulfillment version) and other changes you suggested.

Note, they are under separate tabs.

 << File: Ets approval matrix version2.xls >> 

I think the real problem right now is that until the current crisis is over we need to reduce all calls for cash of any type to only those necessary to make cash today.

I was afraid of that.  However, our cost center would only incur the costs for four people.  Would we have the funds for that?  I assume each cost center, i.e. legal, DC and commercial, would cover their own costs.  I am not sure what the overall costs would be, but I can do a budget if you want.

I think the biggest problem is that where are we going to get the funds for that?

When I was in Calgary, Keith Petersen and I were talking about rates and certificates and he mentioned some seminars that the Omaha people do.  Additionally, we discussed some sites that would provide a variety of things to see.  Below is a possible schedule he sent me. 

What we would provide is a Certificates 101 training and answer questions (1 1/2 Hours), Steve Kirk's group would provide a rates and tariff 101 session that would take a full 2 hours or maybe more, and Tim Kissner would provide a cost of service presentation (how he arrives at a cost of service).  Tim's presentation takes another 1 1/2 hours.  This would take up one day.  Then I could provide the names or help you set up tours of the Redfield Underground storage, a tour of the Ogden compressor station, A tour of the Garner LNG, and possibly a tour of the Farmington Compressor station.  The Ogden station does not have turbine horsepower or electric driven units, but is a major compressor station on our system.  This would take most of two days to cover.  

I mentioned this idea to Eric and Steve and they are both very interested.  Also, Tony Pryor was there and he said Drew would be interested, and I got an e-mail from Nancy Bagot in the DC office wanting to participate.  I realize this could become a lot of people, but it could be a good opportunity for some practical experience and team building.  What do you think?

Cheers,

Michael

And we will give you something stating or reaffirming our deal, if that is deemed to be necessary.     It will be worth the paper it is written on at the moment it is written, but means nothing 1 second later, and that's the problem with these kind of things.     I guess my concern is what good will it do anyone?    I don't think it's a problem to get, however I do believe we would want to get V&E's opinion at the time we wanted it, that it was necessary/required.    

Based upon our conversation, I agree that we s/not need to have any immediate disclosure over Enron's ability to perform - OK, Main Issue Done! 

However, I do feel that we should address/consider, before issuing the 10-Q, whether we need a written confirmation from Enron of their intention to meet EOTT's LC needs estimated to be in a range of $200-$400mm.

Do you think we need for Enron to acknowledge, in writing, their ability and/or intention to perform under our facility?

Looks like there may have been a little confusion here, but it appears that the deal is still working as before. 

Rod, I am very concerned about the statement that Enron cannot get any added LCs' issued.  This may be a disclosue event for us.  I think we need this retracted and for Enron to affirm there ability to perform under our facility.  Your thoughts?
We have the following new requests for L/Cs to cover our lease purchases.  They are requesting L/Cs because of the Enron situation.  I've spoken with some of them and they just won't budge.  

1.  Newfield Exploration		$3MM   	to cover Oct & Nov
2.  J. Cleo Thompson		$1.8MM to cover Oct & Nov 
3.  Apache Corp.		$700K     to cover Nov
4.  W. C. Miller			$175K     to cover Nov 

I've already spoken to Jesse Mata at Enron and she is telling me she cannot get any L/Cs issued - their banks are not allowing it.   I've got a call into Jack Insigna at Standard Chartered to see if they would be willing to EOTT's L/Cs.  He's checking.  

We could prepay Apache - they are obviously not a credit risk.  the others i'm not sure about - we're checking their credit.  

let me know about how much you're willing to with Enron.  thanks.  jc 

Probably need additional review by someone now, given the current situation.  What do you think?

Drew and Rod,
I thought that I would give you a heads-up that a Unanimous Consent is being circulated for your signature. Northern Plains and NBP Services Corp are the sponsors of the Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. We have been working with the benefits group and Pat Mackin and have now prepared an Amended and Restated Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. The Consent authorizes the adoption and execution of that Plan. I have initialed the Consent for your execution. Should you need any further explanation, please let me know. Thanks.  Janet

Agreed.     By the way we are very close to a deal and therefore a press release shortly thereafter.

I am not very comfortable with that at all.  I think with the filing of the proxy that we would have a disclosure issue..  It could also call into question whether or not Enron plans to perform under the MTBE deal. I do not think we need a letter though.  A letter agreement already exists between the two companies.  Another alternative would be for EOTT to go get there own LC,s and have Enron pick-up the cost.  That would keep EOTT's unitholders indifferent.

I have told Lawrence that if it is necessary we can get a letter affirming the deal.    However, how comfortable might you be in telling them to do business differently to avoid calling on the LC's.     Not suggesting we should just thinking we should probably be prepared if asked.
Based upon our conversation, I agree that we s/not need to have any immediate disclosure over Enron's ability to perform - OK, Main Issue Done! 

However, I do feel that we should address/consider, before issuing the 10-Q, whether we need a written confirmation from Enron of their intention to meet EOTT's LC needs estimated to be in a range of $200-$400mm.

Do you think we need for Enron to acknowledge, in writing, their ability and/or intention to perform under our facility?

Looks like there may have been a little confusion here, but it appears that the deal is still working as before. 

Rod, I am very concerned about the statement that Enron cannot get any added LCs' issued.  This may be a disclosue event for us.  I think we need this retracted and for Enron to affirm there ability to perform under our facility.  Your thoughts?
We have the following new requests for L/Cs to cover our lease purchases.  They are requesting L/Cs because of the Enron situation.  I've spoken with some of them and they just won't budge.  

1.  Newfield Exploration		$3MM   	to cover Oct & Nov
2.  J. Cleo Thompson		$1.8MM to cover Oct & Nov 
3.  Apache Corp.		$700K     to cover Nov
4.  W. C. Miller			$175K     to cover Nov 

I've already spoken to Jesse Mata at Enron and she is telling me she cannot get any L/Cs issued - their banks are not allowing it.   I've got a call into Jack Insigna at Standard Chartered to see if they would be willing to EOTT's L/Cs.  He's checking.  

We could prepay Apache - they are obviously not a credit risk.  the others i'm not sure about - we're checking their credit.  

let me know about how much you're willing to with Enron.  thanks.  jc 

	 Can you please get with Roger and make sure we understand what needs to be done? 

Just in case you have not seen this.  Thanks for your help and let me know of any issues.  Thanks again

	
FYI, 

Andersen has agreed that they will be able to issue review reports on the pipelines based on the following terms:

1.  The review opinions must be restricted to the lenders only.
2.  There must be a substantial footnote on the "overhang" issues (i.e., SEC investigation, potential bankruptcy, asset carryvalues in certain situations, etc.)
3.  The review opinion will contain an emphasis of matter paragraph related to the above footnote.
4.  ENE management rep and O/S legal must rep that nothing they are working on (related to investigation) affects the pipelines or its management.
5.  Pipelines must represent that it is not involved in any of the matters under investigation.

In addition to the above, AA  believes that they must expand their review work in order to satisfy themselves related to the issues and reps required above.

In connection with all of this, the banks need these reviews completed by the closing date which is currently expected to be November 9.

I believe that the following are our immediate to do's in order to get Andersen started:

1.  Ene to provide full quarterly statements of Northern and Transwestern to Andersen ASAP.
2.  Discuss w/ Willard/Duncan the level of detail/analysis that they will need to perform review.
3.  Provide necessary PBC schedules, etc.
4.  Draft the footnote discussed in 2. above and get approved by Rick and Legal
5.  Get Andersen to draft the language they would like to see in rep letters.  Get approved by Rick/ Legal.

As to each of the above to do's, 

Gary  - can you contact the pipeline group as soon as you get in this morning and see if the financial statements for the 3Q have already been put together.  If they have not, we need to get them produced ASAP.  They have already been put on notice that these statements will be a priority.  Also, lets see what type of support they typically provide to AA for their quarterly financial reveiws.   I assume the scopes will now be much lower since the reviews are on stand alone pipes instead of ENE Consol.

Bob - can you call Saunders and fill him in?  Once I get in I want to talk to Duncan and Willard about #2, #4 and #5 above. You are welcome to be a part of those discussions.  Also we should discuss what we believe the appropriate scopes to be.

Rick - Any thoughts on the above Andersen requirements?  Other thoughts?

If I have missed any critical steps that you can think of, please let me know.

It is now 4:00 a.m.  I plan to be in by around 10:00 a.m.  If you need me for any reason call me at home (832-593-8065).  Thanks.

I am trying to get a decision, but I think we need to maintain flexibility, if at all possible.

Still want to try and get it done this year. Per Stan this am. Cash is king for now and we need thepricing to get the rest of the cash.   If it has to be pushed to next year, that works, but if it can be done it needs to be.

I understand now.     Thanks.

At mid year, Rodney and Wes went through a fair amount of discussion about whether the transaction accounting folks should be specialized technical or commercial support.  Same for some tax jobs.  It was probably my mistake to not recognize that London's not sticking to the same categorization created a problem.  In the end I think Fernley saw the problem, too.  So if there is a "message", it's to Fernley to do what the rest of the Global Accounting group is doing (and that message is pretty explicit below, I think).

I didn't realize there was a choice.

Noooo....  What is your question or concern?

Is there some secret measage here?    

I don't believe that there will be any change at year end in the use of Peer Groups (Commercial, Technical, Specialized technical, Commercial Support).  Do we want to go with the same usage of these Peer Groups as we did at mid year?  The one thing I would suggest, if possible, is that London go with the same usage as the rest of the BUs.

Please let me know your opinion on this.  Thanks!

Ok

FYI. 
				Rod I do not have Kelly Boots e-mail address and am traveling today without a phone directory... but I wanted to share or at least ask that we treat Standard Chartered real nice as we go through this crisis.  These guys are stepping up for us in every way....they (along with ING) are 100% behind us and are putting their money on it.  Also BNP Pays Bas is having an awful time with their credit committee...the business people have approved this and do not feel that Enron's problem effects us but the credit committee is not so forgiving.  If Kelly or anyone can do anything to help Paysbas in this situation it would be greatly appreciated.   My account executive there is Lincoln Payton and Marci Weiss...

				Would you be so kind as to pass this along to Kelly or anyone else that you feel appropriate?
				----- Forwarded by Susan Ralph/Houston/Eott on 12/01/01 11:19 AM -----

	Josie Castrejana
			10/31/01 11:04 AM
					
				Jack Insigna just called me and he has gotten approval from his credit officer to do:

						Apache 
						J. Cleo Thompson
						Newfield Exlporation
						W.C. Miller 

				jc 

				Josie Castrejana
				Director - Credit/Finance
				Ph.: 713/993--5285
				Fax: 713/402-2886

I have forwarded to kelly

I will handle this afternoon

Understood

tHANKS.

The dropdown of ENA prepay came up in a big group mtg with banks.  Kevin turned me loose to make our point that prepay must beconverted to debt prior to dropdown.  Term sheet is vague on this but banks understand and are OK with it.  

What can we do about getting this done?

If you want to have a "snowball" chance of getting this done this year, we need sign-off on the acctg comments.

Still want to try and get it done this year. Per Stan this am. Cash is king for now and we need thepricing to get the rest of the cash.   If it has to be pushed to next year, that works, but if it can be done it needs to be.

FYI

Rod I do not have Kelly Boots e-mail address and am traveling today without a phone directory... but I wanted to share or at least ask that we treat Standard Chartered real nice as we go through this crisis.  These guys are stepping up for us in every way....they (along with ING) are 100% behind us and are putting their money on it.  Also BNP Pays Bas is having an awful time with their credit committee...the business people have approved this and do not feel that Enron's problem effects us but the credit committee is not so forgiving.  If Kelly or anyone can do anything to help Paysbas in this situation it would be greatly appreciated.   My account executive there is Lincoln Payton and Marci Weiss...

Would you be so kind as to pass this along to Kelly or anyone else that you feel appropriate?
Jack Insigna just called me and he has gotten approval from his credit officer to do:

		Apache 
		J. Cleo Thompson
		Newfield Exlporation
		W.C. Miller 

jc 

Josie Castrejana
Director - Credit/Finance
Ph.: 713/993--5285
Fax: 713/402-2886

I am not sure, I just am being a little overly cautious about making changes that someone at corporate may not be aware of.

I agree, but I'm not sure who--is it someone in Rex Rogers' group that handles the propriety of employee benefit plans, etc? Let me know if you have a name, otherwise I'll call Rex.  Thanks. DF 

Probably need additional review by someone now, given the current situation.  What do you think?

Drew and Rod,
I thought that I would give you a heads-up that a Unanimous Consent is being circulated for your signature. Northern Plains and NBP Services Corp are the sponsors of the Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. We have been working with the benefits group and Pat Mackin and have now prepared an Amended and Restated Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. The Consent authorizes the adoption and execution of that Plan. I have initialed the Consent for your execution. Should you need any further explanation, please let me know. Thanks.  Janet

Can someone send us a synopsis of the changes in the plan and what the expected impact on NP and NBP services comapny is? 

Drew and Rod,
I thought that I would give you a heads-up that a Unanimous Consent is being circulated for your signature. Northern Plains and NBP Services Corp are the sponsors of the Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. We have been working with the benefits group and Pat Mackin and have now prepared an Amended and Restated Northern Border Phantom Unit Plan. The Consent authorizes the adoption and execution of that Plan. I have initialed the Consent for your execution. Should you need any further explanation, please let me know. Thanks.  Janet

Pursuant to Sara Shackleton's request, I am attaching a memo that I prepared 
in April, 2000 regarding procedures for opening brokerage accounts.

Please do not hesitate to contact either Sara at x35620 or me with any 
questions.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
    

Hi, Bianca!

Francisco Pinto Leite has asked me to give him a list of all outstanding 
ISDAs and Deemed ISDAs with Mexican counterparties.  Can you send me a list 
of the Deemed ISDAs that are still outstanding (either comments received or 
counterparty has not returned signed copy).

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Boy, I'm REALLY mad at you!  Just kidding!  I thought you were just going to initial the signature pages and then we would get Kevin to sign it here.  Since you're in town, I can run the originals down to you (if you'll tell me where you are) so that you can initial and then I can ask Kevin to sign.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

Don't be mad.  I have not gotten it signed.  When I was ready to do so, Belden was unreachable.  Then I suddenly forgot prior to rushing down to H-town.  What do you want me to do now?  Get Kevin this week?  or Get Tim on Tues. after Labor Day?  Are you really mad?  I'm sorry.  Please advise on how I can try and do damage control.

Tracy

Hi, Tracy!

I have never received the signature pages for the Allegheny ISDA.  Have you sent them?

Mare

Here are my exceptions:

8/17 - vacation
8/20 - sick
8/31 - vacation

Thanks!

Just a reminder... timesheets will be due tomorrow, Friday, August 31, 2001.  Please let me know your exception time for pay period August 16-31.

Thanks!

Holly Keiser
Enron Wholesale Services
Legal Department
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Veronica:

Here's the Coastal States Trading, Inc.'s ISDA.

Marie
Hello Marie, per our conversation this morning, please find attached Coastal
States Trading, Inc.'s standard schedules, along with a copy of our guaranty
format.  We prefer to make proposed changes directly on the electronic
version(as opposed to hard copy).  Please red-line the schedule on the PC,
put a draft date in the upper right hand corner of the first page of both
schedules, then email the schedules back to John Shuttee for review.  John
will handle all negotiations for this ISDA.  He can be reached at
713/420-3548 or john.shuttee@elpaso.com.

Thanks for attention to this matter.

CKC

 <<Coastal Guaranty Format (update).doc>>  <<ISDA CST CSA Schedule 2.doc>>
<<ISDA CST Master Schedule 3 - .doc>>

******************************************************************
This email and any files transmitted with it from the ElPaso
Corporation are confidential and intended solely for the
use of the individual or entity to whom they are addressed.
If you have received this email in error please notify the
sender.
******************************************************************

 - Coastal Guaranty Format (update).doc 
 - ISDA CST CSA Schedule 2.doc 
 - ISDA CST Master Schedule 3 - .doc 

Carol:

Attached are the ENA/Enron Corp. certificates.  I was just going to work off these forms when (or if) EBS ever executed an ISDA.

		   

	

Do we know a counterparty name or do I have to look at all our files?

MH-

I am trying to lay my hands on an Enron Corp. multi-commodity gty dated May 1, 1996 and amended on May 12, 1997, September 22, 1997 and again on July 20, 1999.  Would you have a copy???  (I hope!!!).

Thanks,
GF

I can't help this time.  The only Enron Corp. guaranty we have was issued in connection with financial transactions only.

Sorry. 

Sorry, I thought maybe you were a mind reader!!!  God, knows "some" people in your group think they are!!!  Coral Power please!!!

THANK YOU!!!!

Do we know a counterparty name or do I have to look at all our files?

MH-

I am trying to lay my hands on an Enron Corp. multi-commodity gty dated May 1, 1996 and amended on May 12, 1997, September 22, 1997 and again on July 20, 1999.  Would you have a copy???  (I hope!!!).

Thanks,
GF

Kim:

Attached are the forms I mentioned.  Let me know if they have any questions.

Marie

	 	 

Roeline:

Here is the tax i.d. number for ENA Upstream Company LLC:  76-0318139.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

Attached is Annex B to be attached to the confirms for Deal Nos. Y49003.1 and Y49036.1.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

I believe all deals going forward.  Am I right, Max?

Those deals only, are is this to be used for deals going forward with Amer.Assur. ?

Diane

Attached is Annex B to be attached to the confirms for Deal Nos. Y49003.1 and Y49036.1.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 << File: 024conf(american assurance).doc >> 

Martha:

Thanks for getting the changes to the form of guaranty approved.  Will you please have the guaranty dated effective as of January 1, 2001?  Also, who will be the party signing the guaranty, and when can we expect to receive the signed guaranty?  In addition, when  the guaranty has been signed on your part, will you please fax a copy to me at (713) 646-3490?

Again, thank you for your assistance on this.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Marie:

Our Corporate Lawyers just agreed to your suggested addition to the
Recitals Section.  In order to be able to execute the Guaranty we need
the final blessing of Hacienda, which should be no problem and is
already in process.  Carlos Riveroll contacting you to reach an
agreement regarding the Amendment to the MSA to incorporate the
Guaranty. In the mean time we will prepare the execution copyes be
ready to sign it.

Best regards,

Martha Navarro

Ms. Navarro:

Thank you for sending your comments to the guaranty.  Please note our
comments below.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-mnavarro+40gas+2Epemex+2Ecom+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Friday, September 21, 2001 10:50 AM
   Lucy:

   Following please find our Corporate Lawyers comments to the changes
you
   requested to the Guaranty we are working on:

   1.      Recitals.  We do not see why it would be necessary to add
that
   "The Guarantor will directly or indirectly benefit from the
   Transactions between the Beneficiary and PMI".  Please explain.
[Heard,
   Marie]    Because (i) it is a correct statement and (ii) it clarifies
   the element of consideration which is essential for purposes of
   enforceability.

   2.      Section 1.  Considering that Pemex normally needs 5 business
   days to request funds in foreing currencies to the Central Bank, we
   need to change the payment date to be 5 Business Days after receipt
of
   the Payment Demand instead of 3 days. [Heard, Marie]    We are okay
with
   this change.

   3.      Section 6. Jurisdiction.  We think that New York
Jurisdiction is
   a good option and probably the most experienced in terms of
derivatives
   trading, and therefore we prefer to keep the "exclusive" jurisdiction
   of any federal court sitting in the Borough of Manhattan. [Heard,
Marie]
      We are okay with the "exclusive" jurisdiction.

   The rest of your comments are acceptable to us.  Carlos Riveroll will
   be sending you PMI?s comments to the amendment to the MSA, so we can
   finalize this as soon as posible.

   Best regards,

   Martha Navarro

    - WINMAIL.DAT << File: WINMAIL.DAT >>

 - WINMAIL.DAT << File: WINMAIL.DAT >> 

Martha:

Thanks for getting the changes to the form of guaranty approved.  Will you please have the guaranty dated effective as of January 1, 2001?  Also, who will be the party signing the guaranty, and when can we expect to receive the signed guaranty?  In addition, when  the guaranty has been signed on your part, will you please fax a copy to me at (713) 646-3490?

Again, thank you for your assistance on this.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Marie:

Our Corporate Lawyers just agreed to your suggested addition to the
Recitals Section.  In order to be able to execute the Guaranty we need
the final blessing of Hacienda, which should be no problem and is
already in process.  Carlos Riveroll contacting you to reach an
agreement regarding the Amendment to the MSA to incorporate the
Guaranty. In the mean time we will prepare the execution copyes be
ready to sign it.

Best regards,

Martha Navarro

Ms. Navarro:

Thank you for sending your comments to the guaranty.  Please note our
comments below.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-mnavarro+40gas+2Epemex+2Ecom+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Friday, September 21, 2001 10:50 AM
   Lucy:

   Following please find our Corporate Lawyers comments to the changes
you
   requested to the Guaranty we are working on:

   1.      Recitals.  We do not see why it would be necessary to add
that
   "The Guarantor will directly or indirectly benefit from the
   Transactions between the Beneficiary and PMI".  Please explain.
[Heard,
   Marie]    Because (i) it is a correct statement and (ii) it clarifies
   the element of consideration which is essential for purposes of
   enforceability.

   2.      Section 1.  Considering that Pemex normally needs 5 business
   days to request funds in foreing currencies to the Central Bank, we
   need to change the payment date to be 5 Business Days after receipt
of
   the Payment Demand instead of 3 days. [Heard, Marie]    We are okay
with
   this change.

   3.      Section 6. Jurisdiction.  We think that New York
Jurisdiction is
   a good option and probably the most experienced in terms of
derivatives
   trading, and therefore we prefer to keep the "exclusive" jurisdiction
   of any federal court sitting in the Borough of Manhattan. [Heard,
Marie]
      We are okay with the "exclusive" jurisdiction.

   The rest of your comments are acceptable to us.  Carlos Riveroll will
   be sending you PMI?s comments to the amendment to the MSA, so we can
   finalize this as soon as posible.

   Best regards,

   Martha Navarro

    - WINMAIL.DAT << File: WINMAIL.DAT >>

 - WINMAIL.DAT << File: WINMAIL.DAT >> 

Tracy:

Can you prepare this guaranty for Pat Leahy?  The EBS entity will be Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd.  As you can see from the e-mails below, they need this guaranty today.

Thanks!

Marie
I am fine providing this guaranty - $5MM as I understand it.

 Call if you have any questions - 

Thanks - 

John

Thanks Marie,

I'll have John email you as soon as he gets in, but Optus is rated A- and is about to be taken over by SingTel, which is AAA.

Pat

Is John Suttle okay with our providing this guaranty and in this amount?  Also, are you signing a master agreement or a short form confirmation?  I don't know if we can get this guaranty on such short notice, but we'll try.

Marie

I forgot to mention that the legal name of the company is:

Optus Networks Pty Limited 
101 Miller Street
North Sydney
NSW 2060
ACN 008 570 330

Thanks!

Pat

marie, I suspect that would it probably cause problems to put a provision to review the value of the guaranty in the actual guaranty document. It would be fine to stick with the standard guaranty wording. We will sort something out with them here regarding a process to review of the value of the guaranty.             

Marie,

We're down to the last item on signing a contract with Optus which would allow us to buy capacity from them in order to fill the circuit we sold to Uecomm (associated w/ the MSA).  They've requested a US$5 million parent guarantee from Enron Corp.  I don't know if this is standard, but they would like us to include some language that says we could review the amount in the future if needed.  But don't worry about this if it would slow things down.

Could you please arrange for a guarantee from Enron Corp?  How long does it take?  would it be possible to do it today (Wednesday)?  If we can get the guarantee and the contract executed by Thursday, Optus will have the circuit ready on Friday -- which is when our Customer needs it.

If you need any clarification, please feel free to call David Minns or me at any time.  My home number is 011-61-2-9360-1920.

Thanks

Pat

Patrick M. Leahy
Enron Broadband Services
Global Wholesale Services - Asia Pacific
tel:  02-9229-2314
fax: 02-9229-2350

FYI
Marie:

Pemex will by signing the guaranty, that will be either Juan Jos?
Suarez (CFO) or Jorge Lanz (Managing Director of Finance).  They will
be able to sign it once we get the final blessing from the Ministry of
Finance, they have to confirm that the guaranty does not represent
contingent public debt and therefore it does not require registration
with Hacienda.  We are checking everyday to make this happen as soon as
possible.
The guaranty cannot be dated as of January 1, 2001 as we got the
authorization from the Board in July this year, and we also need this
confirmatin from Hacienda to be prior to it?s execution.
As soon as we have it signed I will send you a fax, and the hard copy
will follow.

I will keep you posted,
Martha

>  -----Original Message-----
 - WINMAIL.DAT 

Hi, Veronica!

I'm trying to clean some files off my desk and one of them is Bayer.  Are you still going to revise the credit?

Thanks!

Marie

	Copies will be distributed.

No exceptions.

Thanks

Timesheets are due tomorrow (Friday 9/28) for pay period September 16-30.  Please let me know your exception time.

Thank you,

Holly Keiser
Enron Wholesale Services
Legal Department
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Marie / Kimberly,

Thankyou for the documentation you have provided in relation to ECT
Investments. We now have sufficient information to meet our regulatory
requirements and open an account in the name of ECT Investments.

I have advised our sales-desk of this and requested that they arrange for
the account to be opened. We may need to obtain / re-confirm settlement and
confirmation details. This will be done via usual business contacts.

Please do not hesitate to call me with any questions

Thanks & Regards

Rob Daborn
Legal & Compliance
CREDIT | FIRST
SUISSE | BOSTON

Tel: 44(0) 207 883 8359
Fax: 44(0) 207 888 4883
E Mail: Robert.Daborn@CSFB.com

Mr. Daborn:

Would you please send me your delivery address so that I can send you
the documentation requested in connection with the opening of ECT
Investments' account with CSFB Europe?

Thank you!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute,
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

I think I received this e-mail in error.  I am in the Legal-financial trading group.

Marie

guys,

I know that Nick is working on something like this.

Please, could you provide your view on whether we are expected to provide sign offs for the methodology.

many thanks,

Slava

Coralie/Slava

We had a meeting with Matt Kernot on Friday, about SMBP, SMSP, RCRC curves for UK power.
These are due to go live in the near term (if they haven't already)

The team is using various scalars to create HH curve if needed.

I was wondering if anyone in Risk or Research had looked at the validity of the curves and scalars and if Risk/Research is expected to sign off on these?

Diane:

We just sent drafts to Torch as they needed to send them to UOM, Dynegy and Sempra for review.  When we get them signed, I'll distribute copies.

Marie

Hey Marie,

Got the Torch assignments you sent down.  Thanks.  Question for you:  Did someone from ENA sign all the Assignment and Assumption Agreements before you sent them to Torch? (the copies I have aren't signed) Or do we sign them when they come back executed by Torch?  

Thanks,
Diane

Mark:

I would like to schedule this Friday, 10/5 as a vacation day.  Please let me know if this presents a problem.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Georgi:
 
We have an entry in our database that states that Energy West Incorporated did not change its name to Mercator Energy Incorporated.  There are two companies with the same name and this one is not the one that changed its name.  Our Energy West Incorporated is a Montana corporation.  The one that changed its name is a Colorado corporation.
 
Let me know if this is confusing.
 
Marie
Please check your records and let me know if you have any kind of documentation evidencing a merger indicating that Mercator Energy Incorporated merged with and into Energy West Incorporated?
 
I am unable to find anything to substantiate this information.
 
Thanks for your help.
 
 
Georgi Landau
Enron Net Works
(Ph) 713/345-4435
(Fx)  713/646-2495
 

Hi, Diane:

In your spare time (HA! HA!) will you check and let me know the earliest outstanding trade dates for the following counterparties:

	Catequil Overseas Partners, Ltd.
	Catequil Partners, L.P.

They are ready to sign the ISDAs.

Thanks!

Marie

You barely escaped our wrath this time, but there's always the next!

Marie & Frank -

 << File: General Electric ISDA 08212001.xls >> 

Here it is, at long last.  Please don't beat me!!!!

JRW

Hi, Todd:

Believe it or not, I am working on our comments to the ISDA and hope to have them to you this week.  If I see we won't get them to you this week, I'll let you know.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Brian:

The ISDA is being faxed to you now.

Marie

Marie, - I would appreciate you sending me a copy of the Master ISDA
Agreement and associated Credit Support Annex between Enron and TXU.  The
Agreement is dated October 19, 1995 between Enron and Enserch.  TXU
acquired Enserch approximately 1-2 yrs. ago.  If you have any questions,
please call me at 214-875-9603.

If you could fax me a copy of it at 214-875-9063 I would appreciate it.

Thanks again for your assistance.

Cindy:

Attached are forms of Enron Corp. guaranties and related certificates to be issued in connection with ISDA Master Agreements between ENA and Catequil Partners, L.P. and ENA and Catequil Overseas Partners Ltd.

Please let me know when the attached documents are ready and I'll arrange for pick up.

Thanks!

Marie

		 	 

Correct.  I just left you a voice mail re the termination.

So, is it true that the underlying new deals do not become effective until the assignments are signed? 

Diane:

We just sent drafts to Torch as they needed to send them to UOM, Dynegy and Sempra for review.  When we get them signed, I'll distribute copies.

Marie

Hey Marie,

Got the Torch assignments you sent down.  Thanks.  Question for you:  Did someone from ENA sign all the Assignment and Assumption Agreements before you sent them to Torch? (the copies I have aren't signed) Or do we sign them when they come back executed by Torch?  

Thanks,
Diane

Do you want me to take a first stab at these two agreements?

Please print and I need a file "ECI/CSFB brokerage agreement"

This is the primebroker agreement that we need to fill out for CSFB.  They are holding two trades hostage so this is a priority for us.  Please let me know if you require any further information.

Tom

>  -----Original Message-----
This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain 
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No 
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute, 
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended 
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state 
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is 
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to 
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as 
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

Attached is a copy of the transmittal letter forwarding the draft ISDA Master Agreement to Southern States.

Marie

		 

Rotation, please.

Marie,

We need a CA (for financial statements and information) sent as soon as possible to the above mentioned company.

Please note the following address:
Bull Moose Tube Company
1819 Clarkson Road, suite 100
Chesterfield, Missouri  63017
tel: 636-537-2600
fax: 636-537-5848

To the attention of Steve Birk, VP of Finance.  If we could fax this over today it would be greatly appreciated.

Regards,

Carol North

Mr. Guinn:

Pursuant to Sara Shackleton's request, I am attaching for your review a proposed Second Amendment to ISDA Master Agreement amending the existing amendment to change the Part 4 section references.  Please advise if the attached document is acceptable, and I will have two copies signed and forward to you for execution by Bank of America.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Diane, Tanya and Jay:

We have been requested in connection with an SEC subpoena to produce documents related to the referenced counterparties (including their parents, successors, subsidiaries, related corporations, partnerships or professional associations, affiliates, principals, officers, directors, general or limited partners, associates, employees, agents, and independent contractors).  We have checked our Lotus Notes database and don't have a record for either of these entities.

Will you let me know if your groups have had any dealings with these two entities or know of a business person who has done business with either of these entities?  We MUST respond to Enron Corp. Legal by noon Thursday (10/4).

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Russell:

Attached for review is the draft of the proposed fee letter in connection with the Torch deals.  Let me know if you have any questions or comments.

Thanks!

Marie

		  

We've had the lynch mob organized for some time now.  We're just trying to use the "kinder and gentler" approach for now.  But, if that doesn't work, look out!

Given the pace with which I'm getting things done these days, I'm surprised you haven't organized a lynch mob to come beat me senseless.

JRW

You barely escaped our wrath this time, but there's always the next!

Marie & Frank -

 << File: General Electric ISDA 08212001.xls >> 

Here it is, at long last.  Please don't beat me!!!!

JRW

Do you want to send it to Roeline or do you want me to?

Thanks Marie,  I have no issues with this letter.

Thanks,
Russell

Hi, Russell:

Attached for review is the draft of the proposed fee letter in connection with the Torch deals.  Let me know if you have any questions or comments.

Thanks!

Marie

		 << File: 060ltr (torch).doc >>  

Thanks, Diane!

Marie,  

I do not see anything on the Financial side for either of these entities, however, I may have seen some Physical Texon deals and have forwarded your email to the attention of Ellen Wallumrod so she can look into it further and reply to you.  

Diane

Diane, Tanya and Jay:

We have been requested in connection with an SEC subpoena to produce documents related to the referenced counterparties (including their parents, successors, subsidiaries, related corporations, partnerships or professional associations, affiliates, principals, officers, directors, general or limited partners, associates, employees, agents, and independent contractors).  We have checked our Lotus Notes database and don't have a record for either of these entities.

Will you let me know if your groups have had any dealings with these two entities or know of a business person who has done business with either of these entities?  We MUST respond to Enron Corp. Legal by noon Thursday (10/4).

Thanks!

Marie

Okay with me!

I am planning to take Monday, October 15th and the week of December 3rd thru 7th for vacation.  I have checked and Temps are available.  By cc of this email I am asking  Margaret Doucette to schedule a Temp and notifying my backup - Theresa Zucha - that I will be out.

Joanne Rozycki
Senior Administrative Assistant

Hi, Roeline!

Attached for your review is a draft of the proposed fee letter in connection with the assignments and terminations.  Please let me know if you have any comments.

Our Confirmation Desk is in the process of revising the termination of ENA Deal No. NL0619.1 to delete the fee reference, and I will forward it to you when ready.

Please let me know when you have signoff on the other documents and I will finalize and have executed by ENA and forward to you.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Gordon:

Attached is the Deemed ISDA and fax cover page for Deal No. Y61166.1 between ENA and the referenced counterparty.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

	 	 

FYI

Marie,  

I do not see anything on the Financial side for either of these entities, however, I may have seen some Physical Texon deals and have forwarded your email to the attention of Ellen Wallumrod so she can look into it further and reply to you.  

Diane

Diane, Tanya and Jay:

We have been requested in connection with an SEC subpoena to produce documents related to the referenced counterparties (including their parents, successors, subsidiaries, related corporations, partnerships or professional associations, affiliates, principals, officers, directors, general or limited partners, associates, employees, agents, and independent contractors).  We have checked our Lotus Notes database and don't have a record for either of these entities.

Will you let me know if your groups have had any dealings with these two entities or know of a business person who has done business with either of these entities?  We MUST respond to Enron Corp. Legal by noon Thursday (10/4).

Thanks!

Marie

Linda:

Will you follow-up with Tanya in Credit as to exactly what type of documents you need copies of, or arrange for someone to go and look through her files?  Tanya's phone # is 33263.

Thanks!

Marie
Texon, L.P. looks like a liquids customer.  we do have a file. Marie, what type of "documents" are we supposed to be providing? Corp legal needs to be more specific or they can send someone down to copy our file. I do not show that we have a file for Lonestar.

Diane, Tanya and Jay:

We have been requested in connection with an SEC subpoena to produce documents related to the referenced counterparties (including their parents, successors, subsidiaries, related corporations, partnerships or professional associations, affiliates, principals, officers, directors, general or limited partners, associates, employees, agents, and independent contractors).  We have checked our Lotus Notes database and don't have a record for either of these entities.

Will you let me know if your groups have had any dealings with these two entities or know of a business person who has done business with either of these entities?  We MUST respond to Enron Corp. Legal by noon Thursday (10/4).

Thanks!

Marie

She was going to revise the termination and bring it to me, but I haven't gotten it yet.

Marie

Hey Marie,

Did you ever get a revised confirm from Diane, Derek and I talked to her yesterday after I talked to you.  She said she would revise the confirm.

Thanks,
Russell

Hi, Roeline!

Attached for your review is a draft of the proposed fee letter in connection with the assignments and terminations.  Please let me know if you have any comments.

Our Confirmation Desk is in the process of revising the termination of ENA Deal No. NL0619.1 to delete the fee reference, and I will forward it to you when ready.

Please let me know when you have signoff on the other documents and I will finalize and have executed by ENA and forward to you.

Thanks!

Marie

		 << File: 060ltr (torch).doc >> 

FYI
Texon Energy Corporation located in Stamford, CT appears to have no relation to Texon Corporation and/or its successor Texon L.P. which are both located here in Houston.  We have traded liquids in the past with Texon Corporation and Texon L.P. ; primarily crude oil.

Regards,
tm

Texon, L.P. looks like a liquids customer.  we do have a file. Marie, what type of "documents" are we supposed to be providing? Corp legal needs to be more specific or they can send someone down to copy our file. I do not show that we have a file for Lonestar.

Diane, Tanya and Jay:

We have been requested in connection with an SEC subpoena to produce documents related to the referenced counterparties (including their parents, successors, subsidiaries, related corporations, partnerships or professional associations, affiliates, principals, officers, directors, general or limited partners, associates, employees, agents, and independent contractors).  We have checked our Lotus Notes database and don't have a record for either of these entities.

Will you let me know if your groups have had any dealings with these two entities or know of a business person who has done business with either of these entities?  We MUST respond to Enron Corp. Legal by noon Thursday (10/4).

Thanks!

Marie

Hi Marie,

The fee letter looks good - and I have all of the paperwork here, except of
course the Termination letter for ENA Deal #0619, which you indicated the
Confirmation Desk was workin on.  So things look good to go.

I have the paperwork back from both Dynegy and Sempra, but United Oil's
letters is being reviewed by its lawyer today.  He was away for the past two
days.  As soon as I have everything together I will courier the complete
package to you - one detail that I forgot to mention - right now I have fax
copies only, and I hope it will suffice until I can get original signatures.
If it does not, then we are in real trouble!!  So say it is okay - and I
will work on the originals after the deal is completed.

Thanks for all your help, Marie.

Roeline

Where were you yesterday?  You didn't stop by to initial Allegheny.  Are you going to initial this before you go to London?

Tom:

You can only see the master agreement database.  The brokerage agreement database is separate and cannot be viewed by anyone outside Legal.  The Bear Stearns agreement you see listed is there in error.  It should be in the brokerage agreement database.  We do have listings for Morgan and Goldman.  Sara wasn't aware that you couldn't see this database when you spoke,

Marie

I have gone through the database and have only been able to find the Bear Prime Broker agreement under ECI.  I know I have a Morgan ECI account and should have a Goldman pending.  I am looking for Enron Co=Enron Credit Inc. is that not correct?

Please advise.

Thanks,

Tom 

You need to send an email to Donna Lowry, Cassandra Schultz, William S. Bradford

Sara Shackleton
Enron Wholesale Services
1400 Smith Street, EB3801a
Houston, TX  77002
Ph:  (713) 853-5620
Fax: (713) 646-3490

You should have received a fax from me by now.  Have you not received it?

Not a problem at all.  I guess I will wait for your group to produce a list.

Thanks,

Tom

Tom:

You can only see the master agreement database.  The brokerage agreement database is separate and cannot be viewed by anyone outside Legal.  The Bear Stearns agreement you see listed is there in error.  It should be in the brokerage agreement database.  We do have listings for Morgan and Goldman.  Sara wasn't aware that you couldn't see this database when you spoke,

Marie

I have gone through the database and have only been able to find the Bear Prime Broker agreement under ECI.  I know I have a Morgan ECI account and should have a Goldman pending.  I am looking for Enron Co=Enron Credit Inc. is that not correct?

Please advise.

Thanks,

Tom 

You need to send an email to Donna Lowry, Cassandra Schultz, William S. Bradford

Sara Shackleton
Enron Wholesale Services
1400 Smith Street, EB3801a
Houston, TX  77002
Ph:  (713) 853-5620
Fax: (713) 646-3490

Yes.

Uhhh, do fax copies suffice?

Hi Marie,

The fee letter looks good - and I have all of the paperwork here, except of
course the Termination letter for ENA Deal #0619, which you indicated the
Confirmation Desk was workin on.  So things look good to go.

I have the paperwork back from both Dynegy and Sempra, but United Oil's
letters is being reviewed by its lawyer today.  He was away for the past two
days.  As soon as I have everything together I will courier the complete
package to you - one detail that I forgot to mention - right now I have fax
copies only, and I hope it will suffice until I can get original signatures.
If it does not, then we are in real trouble!!  So say it is okay - and I
will work on the originals after the deal is completed.

Thanks for all your help, Marie.

Roeline

Hi, Roeline!

I'm sending the original revised Termination Agreement over to you this afternoon.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Hi Marie,

The fee letter looks good - and I have all of the paperwork here, except of
course the Termination letter for ENA Deal #0619, which you indicated the
Confirmation Desk was workin on.  So things look good to go.

I have the paperwork back from both Dynegy and Sempra, but United Oil's
letters is being reviewed by its lawyer today.  He was away for the past two
days.  As soon as I have everything together I will courier the complete
package to you - one detail that I forgot to mention - right now I have fax
copies only, and I hope it will suffice until I can get original signatures.
If it does not, then we are in real trouble!!  So say it is okay - and I
will work on the originals after the deal is completed.

Thanks for all your help, Marie.

Roeline

Yea, and it needs to stop right now!

Marie,
	We're pumping out worksheets down here today, aren't we.  Enclosed is the Bayer Corp. worksheet.  

Gracias,

Max

 << File: Bayer Corporation.xls >> 

Legal has been asked to review and approve all confirmation templates currently being used.  We would like to schedule a meeting to discuss the materials we will need for this review.

Will you advise me of your availability in the next few days so that we can schedule a meeting?  (Diane, I realize we will have to work around the one hour time difference between Houston and Calgary.)

Thanks!

Marie    

Hi, Roeline:

We would prefer to sign the fee letter at the same time we sign the assignments.  Yes, we will sign enough originals of all documents so that all parties can have an original.

Hopefully we can get this wrapped up tomorrow, as I will be out of the office Friday.

Marie

Marie -

One more question - I received some of these in duplicate, and some of them
were original only.  Like the Termination Agreement that you just couriered
over to me - I only got one original from you, and there are two signatures.
We would like to have an original signature as well - so are we going to do
this after the fact?  That would be okay by me, because I want to have them
all signed and off my desk - so just let me know how you think we should do
this.

Thanks, Marie -
Roeline

Barbara and Anne:

Below is an e-mail I sent to schedule a meeting with the confirm desks to discuss the materials we will need in order to start the review of the confirm templates.  Do you want to attend?  If so, I will notify you once I hear from everyone else as to their availability so that we can schedule a meeting that we all can attend.

Thanks!

Marie

Legal has been asked to review and approve all confirmation templates currently being used.  We would like to schedule a meeting to discuss the materials we will need for this review.

Will you advise me of your availability in the next few days so that we can schedule a meeting?  (Diane, I realize we will have to work around the one hour time difference between Houston and Calgary.)

Thanks!

Marie    

Okay.  Why don't you let me know on Monday your availability for next week.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie, My plea is for it to be next week.  I'm totally swamped and understaffed this week.  

Diane

Legal has been asked to review and approve all confirmation templates currently being used.  We would like to schedule a meeting to discuss the materials we will need for this review.

Will you advise me of your availability in the next few days so that we can schedule a meeting?  (Diane, I realize we will have to work around the one hour time difference between Houston and Calgary.)

Thanks!

Marie    

Hi, Dianne:

Thanks for responding so quickly.  It seems that we will be scheduling the meeting for next week.  Are you available then?

Marie

Marie,

I am available anytime tomorrow afternoon or Friday afternoon.  If morning works best for everyone in Houston, just give me a call (6762) and I will try to rearrange my schedule.

Dianne

Legal has been asked to review and approve all confirmation templates currently being used.  We would like to schedule a meeting to discuss the materials we will need for this review.

Will you advise me of your availability in the next few days so that we can schedule a meeting?  (Diane, I realize we will have to work around the one hour time difference between Houston and Calgary.)

Thanks!

Marie    

Joe:

Attached are the Deemed ISDAs for the two deals that were done yesterday with the referenced counterparties.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

	 	 

Attached is the Annex B for the referenced counterparty.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

This is an easy one.  1400 Smith, EB3803B.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi -

You didn't think you would away today without another e-mail from me, did
you???? (just joking)

When I courier these documents over to you tomorrow I will send them to 1400
Smith Street, but don't I have to put in a building number or room number
for you in order that it will get to you for sure?  Let me know what that is
-

Thanks,
Until tomorrow,
Roeline

Diane:

I hate to bother you since you're busy, but will you sign one more original of each of the two Torch termination agreements for me?  Torch wants a copy with original signatures for their file, so in order for us to have an original with their signature, we need to have two originals signed.  When they're ready, if you'll call me, I'll send a clerk down to get them.

Thanks!

Marie

What about next week?  Diane asked if we could schedule for next week as she is swamped and short-handed this week.

Marie

So far I am open for the next few days.

Legal has been asked to review and approve all confirmation templates currently being used.  We would like to schedule a meeting to discuss the materials we will need for this review.

Will you advise me of your availability in the next few days so that we can schedule a meeting?  (Diane, I realize we will have to work around the one hour time difference between Houston and Calgary.)

Thanks!

Marie    

You're the best!

Thanks!

I've got them all ready - if I'm gone by the time the clerk gets here (ha!), they'll be just sitting on my chair.  EB 2106d.

Diane

Diane:

I hate to bother you since you're busy, but will you sign one more original of each of the two Torch termination agreements for me?  Torch wants a copy with original signatures for their file, so in order for us to have an original with their signature, we need to have two originals signed.  When they're ready, if you'll call me, I'll send a clerk down to get them.

Thanks!

Marie

FYI.  We received this worksheet from Aparna for a trade with Interstate Resources, Inc. and Subsidiaries?
Please find attached the credit worksheet for an Omnibus Agreement to be drafted for a confirm to be generated for a trade with Interstate Resources, Inc. and Subsidiaries. The trade will be executed today. Please call me if you have any questions. Thanks.

 
Aparna Rajaram
Ph: (713) 345-4563
Fax: (713) 853-9476
Aparna.Rajaram@enron.com

Roeline:

Do you have a fax/phone number for Eric Twombly?

Thanks!

Marie

 <<ERIC TWOMBLY>>

Mr. Smith:

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Sara:  

I do not see a copy of an opinion in the file nor have we received one since I sent the execution copies of the ISDA to Steve Lins.

Marie

Kim:  Can you obtain the name of Glendale's bond counsel (lawyer's name, phone number, email, etc.)?  Thanks.  SS

Sara,

Believe it or not, we are very close getting our signed ISDA from the City of Glendale.  Steve Lins, the City attorney had a couple of questions which I will attempt to relay without having a copy of the documents.

1)  I am assuming that he obtained a for legal opinion letter or document of some sort.  This document references a confirmation and we are not sure what this references.  Typically, it references a transaction, which in this case, there are no transactions yet.  He feels this reference should be deleted.  What is your opinion regarding this? [Shackleton, Sara]    If we have no transaction on the books, then he can delete the reference.  Marie:  Have we received an opinion from Glendale? 

2)  We sent him a couple of form documents to facilitate the documents required under the ISDA.  One form ws a form resolution.  They have already received City Council approval to enter into financial tranactions and to enter into an ISDA with us.  Steve is going to get a certified copy of this Resolution.  Will this suffice? [Shackleton, Sara]    I'll review their resolution again.  If it references our ISDA and all transactions, it should be fine.  (This is part of the reason why we need a legal opinion) 

When you return, I may try to do one last conference call to alleviate any unanswered questions.  I think we will have an executed ISDA with the City of Glendale by the end of next week.  I am going to be out there meeting with them on Wednesday.

Thanks for your help,

Kim

Yes.  I do have a meeting at 10 this morning, but should be out around 11.  Just let me know.

  Marie,

  I have your fruit - we probably need to meet somewhere to do the transfer.  There are too many boxes to carry.  I gave Jane her fruit last Friday and we met in the parking lot on Dallas - across from the Allen Center Met Parking Garage.  I'll send you an invoice.

  I am not sure if the decorative center is open today - if so, do you want to go?

We have received an executed financial Master Agreement.

Type of Contract:	Master Agreement (Industrial)

Effective Date:		August 2, 2001

Enron Entity:		Enron Canada Corp.

Counterparty:		Albchem Industries Ltd.

Transactions Covered:	Approved for natural gas and crude oil products.  Not approved for pulp and paper, weather, foreign 				exchange, steel, interest rate and currency or forward rate.

Confirming Entity:	Enron Canada Corp.

Governing Law:		Province of Alberta  

I did the comparison and gave it to Mary to review.  Credit is deciding what to do in light of the problems with the airlines.

Any idea where this stands?

Has anything happened on this? Has credit ever responded to you?

Rich Friedman
Enron Global Markets LLC
richard.friedman@enron.com
713-853-5137

Matt:

Attached for your further handling is the form of guaranty to be issued by Commercial Metals Co. in favor of ENA, guaranteeing obligations of SMI.  Please note that Commercial Metals needs to complete SMI's correct legal name.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

This has sound to it.

http://www.fieler.com/terror/

We would like to schedule a meeting for Wednesday, October 10 from 2:00 to 3:00 in EB38C2 to discuss the materials Legal will need in connection with its review and approval of all confirmation templates currently being used.

Please let me know if you will be able to attend.

Thanks!

Marie

Dianne S.  We will conference you in.

We have a scheduling conflict with our conference rooms.  Is everyone available from 9:00-10:00 Wednesday, October 10?  Same conference room.

Sorry!

Marie

So what was her beef if the copies were for our people?  

I had my first know down drag out with our friend CLH.  We closed a Qwest deal last week (Monday 7:00 am, of course she was here all weekend working on it).  Anyway, everyone was needing copies of the closing documents and they were all over me for them.  So on Wednesday mid morning I went into her office and had Tim make copies.  She came back from a meeting and as she was passing by I mentioned it to her and she lost it - Big Time! Everyone wanted to hide, I motioned for her to go into her office because she was making a scene and I shut the door.  She kept going on and on and said that I should have went and got her out of her meeting (yeah right) instead of taking them off of her desk and to never ever take anything off of her desk again. What a piece of work!

Robin L. Hill
Legal Specialist
Enron Broadband Services, Inc.
1400 Smith St., Suite 4550b
Houston, Texas 77002
713-853-3255
713-646-8537 fax

Oh, please!  The exhibits should have been organized and conformed prior to execution.

She hadn't organized and conformed the exhibits to her specifications. 

Robin L. Hill
Legal Specialist
Enron Broadband Services, Inc.
1400 Smith St., Suite 4550b
Houston, Texas 77002
713-853-3255
713-646-8537 fax

So what was her beef if the copies were for our people?  

I had my first know down drag out with our friend CLH.  We closed a Qwest deal last week (Monday 7:00 am, of course she was here all weekend working on it).  Anyway, everyone was needing copies of the closing documents and they were all over me for them.  So on Wednesday mid morning I went into her office and had Tim make copies.  She came back from a meeting and as she was passing by I mentioned it to her and she lost it - Big Time! Everyone wanted to hide, I motioned for her to go into her office because she was making a scene and I shut the door.  She kept going on and on and said that I should have went and got her out of her meeting (yeah right) instead of taking them off of her desk and to never ever take anything off of her desk again. What a piece of work!

Robin L. Hill
Legal Specialist
Enron Broadband Services, Inc.
1400 Smith St., Suite 4550b
Houston, Texas 77002
713-853-3255
713-646-8537 fax

Hi, Derek!

Any word on where we stand on this master agreement?

Hope all is well.

Marie

Another follow-up message re status of execution of master agreement.  Please advise.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Mr. Boytinck:

I am sending this e-mail to check on the status of the Master Agreement for Garden City Plaza Ltd. that was forwarded to you for execution.  It would be appreciated if you would let me know the status.

Thank you!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Hi, Tracy!

Where do we stand on Allegheny?  We really would like to finalize this master ASAP.

Thanks!

Marie

No, you can do power.

Marie,=20

Although not mentioned below as a commodity covered, this was put in place =
as a Power contract. I hope there has not been any confusion.=20

Yours

Michael Law=20

We have received an executed financial Master Agreement.

Type of Contract:=09Master Agreement (Industrial)

Effective Date:=09=09August 2, 2001

Enron Entity:=09=09Enron Canada Corp.

Counterparty:=09=09Albchem Industries Ltd.

Transactions Covered:=09Approved for natural gas and crude oil products.  N=
ot approved for pulp and paper, weather, foreign =09=09=09=09exchange, stee=
l, interest rate and currency or forward rate.

Confirming Entity:=09Enron Canada Corp.

Governing Law:=09=09Province of Alberta 

Donna:

I checked the corporate database and Rick is a Vice President of RAC.  Do we want to prepare new board resolutions authorizing him as a second signatory on the brokerage agreements for ENA, ECT Investments and Enron Credit Inc.?

Marie

We don't have to wait until the board meeting.  We do a unanimous written consent and circulate among the directors for signature.

Do we have to wait for Board resolutions (December BOD mtg) to have Rick start signing, or can they be retroactive ie. ratifying what he's signed if he starts immediately.  I'd think we could do the latter, as that's what you had to do for me.  

Cassandra.

I think so.  It makes sense for Rick to sign on these accounts.  I will be talking to Tom Doukas in the next day to get him focused on his accounts that need to be updated for Enron Credit Inc.  Thanks .Donna

Donna:

I checked the corporate database and Rick is a Vice President of RAC.  Do we want to prepare new board resolutions authorizing him as a second signatory on the brokerage agreements for ENA, ECT Investments and Enron Credit Inc.?

Marie

I never received a response to my 9/17 e-mail to you re this amalgamation.  Are there any credit issues with respect to this amalgamation?

Thanks!

Marie
It is my understanding that the companies mentioned above have been amalgamated, with Norske Skog Canada Limited retaining the name.  Are you aware that this occurred?  Norske Skog is wanting me to bill Pacifica Paper's swaps under Norske Skog's name going forward.

Please let me know!

Thanks,
Gordon

The meeting is scheduled for tomorrow from 9-10 in EB38C2.

Ere you successful in scheduling a meeting on this/  If so, when and where will it be.  Thanks

Ms. Lemont:

It is our understanding that in connection with the opening of the referenced account, Bear Stearns has agreed to allow ECT Europe to sign the same form of Institutional Account Agreement that Enron Credit Inc. signed in April, 2001.  Please forward execution copies of such agreement to us and we will obtain execution on behalf of ECT Europe.  Additionally, we are in the process of adopting resolutions on behalf of ECT Europe allowing for the opening of brokerage accounts.  Will Bear Stearns be able to open the ECT Europe account prior to receiving the corporate documentation? 

We have been advised by Mary Kay Lemont that Bear Stearns will not open this new account until they have all corporate documentation in place.  ECT Europe Finance, Inc. does not have resolutions authorizing the opening of brokerage accounts, so we are currently preparing corporate resolutions to circulate for signature.

Will the authorized traders in this account be those authorized to trade on Enron Credit's behalf?  If so, will you provide me with a current list?

Additionally, is this the only position that will be in this account?

Thanks!

Marie

Arthur has surfaced!  But why he's plodding through it is beyond me.  He said he was ready to sign so that's why we sent execution copies.  Obviously he hadn't even reviewed the draft.  Go figure!

Marie

This document is very complicated and contains so much fine print that I am
procratinating in my efforts to plod through the document.

Another follow-up message re status of execution of master agreement.
Please advise.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
>  -----Original Message-----

Sooner than January?  I'll let you know if I hear of anything.  I'm sure Mark H. is planning on you just integrating into ENA's legal group.

Marie,

  I really think that EBS is closing up soon and that I better pound the pavement.  Let me know if you hear of anything!  Thanks

Susan:

Jorge Garcia on the interest rate and currency desk forwarded this e-mail to me requesting certain RMT masters.

Thanks!

Marie

Good Afternoon Marie,

Here is a list of inner company counterparties that require ISDA Master Agreements. I checked the Financial Trading Agreements listing in Lotus Notes to make sure an ISDA Master Agreement didn't already exist. Please double check your version in the event a counterparty was deleted as a result of the historical problem that we previously discussed regarding missing counterparty ISDA Master references.

Counterparty Name				Original Trade Date
Compagnie de Papiers Stadacona Ltee		04/04/01
ECT Europe Accounting				03/29/01
ECTRIC Crude					06/15/01
ECTRIC Softs					06/15/01
ECTRIC Spain					03/12/01
ENA Merchant Assets				02/04/00
Enron Broadband Investments Corporation	08/27/01
Enron Broadband Services Marketing Ltd.	03/26/01
Enron Corporation				11/04/98
Enron Holdings 1 S.L.				08/29/01
Enron Industrial Markets LLC			07/13/01
Enron International Inc.				08/07/98
Enron Metals Commody Ltd.			03/20/01
Enron Metals Recycling GmbH & Co. KG		02/19/01 (Financial Trading Agreements states "Sent for execution")		
Enron Power Holdings				12/17/99
Enron Power Operations Ltd.			01/27/99
Enron Power Marketing Inc.			12/29/97
Enron South America LLC			04/20/00
EnSerCo, LLC					09/25/98
Enron Wind Corporation				07/17/01

Please advise should you require any additional information.

Regards,

Jorge A. Garcia
Manager- Risk Management
Enron Global Markets LLC
713/853-5596	

Susan:

I think this is yours.

Thanks!

Marie,

We've done our first FX trade with Enron Japan Corp.  Can we put a master agreement in place with them asap?  

Thanks!  First trade date:  October 11, 2001

Please call if you have any questions!

Yes

Hi Marie,
Can you confirm that this would cover Power transactions?
Sarah :)

We have received an executed financial Master Agreement.

Type of Contract:=09Master Agreement (Industrial)

Effective Date:=09=09August 2, 2001

Enron Entity:=09=09Enron Canada Corp.

Counterparty:=09=09Albchem Industries Ltd.

Transactions Covered:=09Approved for natural gas and crude oil products.  N=
ot approved for pulp and paper, weather, foreign =09=09=09=09exchange, stee=
l, interest rate and currency or forward rate.

Confirming Entity:=09Enron Canada Corp.

Governing Law:=09=09Province of Alberta 

Mr. Guinn:

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Jeff:

I have the documents ready to be signed in connection with opening the referenced account.  Can you assist me in getting them signed?  The officers who can sign are:

Any one of:

Mark Frevert
Ben Glisan
John Sherriff

together with any one of:

Rick Buy
Rick Carson

Since we don't know the ins and outs as to why we are opening this account for this entity, Sara suggested that you or someone in your shop contact one of the officers from each group to explain the account and ask them to sign the documents.

Once you have determined who will sign, let me know and I'll take care of routing them for signature and getting them to Bear Stearns.

Thanks for your help!

Marie  

Mary Kay:

I am routing the documents for signature now.  Will fax them to you when si=
gned.

Marie

Marie, we processed a transaction today in this new ECT Europe Finance Inc.
acct.  I was wondering if you have any forms that you could fax us.
Thanks,
MK Lemont

Ms. Lemont:

It is our understanding that in connection with the opening of the
referenced account, Bear Stearns has agreed to allow ECT Europe to sign
the same form of Institutional Account Agreement that Enron Credit Inc.
signed in April, 2001.  Please forward execution copies of such
agreement to us and we will obtain execution on behalf of ECT Europe.
Additionally, we are in the process of adopting resolutions on behalf of
ECT Europe allowing for the opening of brokerage accounts.  Will Bear
Stearns be able to open the ECT Europe account prior to receiving the
corporate documentation?

=03****************************************************************
Bear Stearns is not responsible for any recommendation, solicitation,
offer or agreement or any information about any transaction, customer
account or account activity contained in this communication.

Gordon:

Attached is the Deemed ISDA for the referenced transaction, together with a fax cover page.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 	 

Mary Kay:

I am faxing to you this morning those documents that we have signed so far.=
  Will you send me your physical delivery address so that I can send the or=
iginals to you?

Thanks!

Marie

Marie, we processed a transaction today in this new ECT Europe Finance Inc.
acct.  I was wondering if you have any forms that you could fax us.
Thanks,
MK Lemont

Ms. Lemont:

It is our understanding that in connection with the opening of the
referenced account, Bear Stearns has agreed to allow ECT Europe to sign
the same form of Institutional Account Agreement that Enron Credit Inc.
signed in April, 2001.  Please forward execution copies of such
agreement to us and we will obtain execution on behalf of ECT Europe.
Additionally, we are in the process of adopting resolutions on behalf of
ECT Europe allowing for the opening of brokerage accounts.  Will Bear
Stearns be able to open the ECT Europe account prior to receiving the
corporate documentation?

=03****************************************************************
Bear Stearns is not responsible for any recommendation, solicitation,
offer or agreement or any information about any transaction, customer
account or account activity contained in this communication.

Mary Kay:

I am faxing to you this morning those documents that we have signed so far.=
  Will you send me your physical delivery address so that I can send the or=
iginals to you?

Thanks!

Marie

Marie, we processed a transaction today in this new ECT Europe Finance Inc.
acct.  I was wondering if you have any forms that you could fax us.
Thanks,
MK Lemont

Ms. Lemont:

It is our understanding that in connection with the opening of the
referenced account, Bear Stearns has agreed to allow ECT Europe to sign
the same form of Institutional Account Agreement that Enron Credit Inc.
signed in April, 2001.  Please forward execution copies of such
agreement to us and we will obtain execution on behalf of ECT Europe.
Additionally, we are in the process of adopting resolutions on behalf of
ECT Europe allowing for the opening of brokerage accounts.  Will Bear
Stearns be able to open the ECT Europe account prior to receiving the
corporate documentation?

=03****************************************************************
Bear Stearns is not responsible for any recommendation, solicitation,
offer or agreement or any information about any transaction, customer
account or account activity contained in this communication.

Exceptions:  Vacation Day - 10/5.

Thanks!

Just a reminder, timesheets are due on Monday, October 15.

Thank you!

Holly Keiser
Enron Wholesale Services
Legal Department
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Yes.  They are sending their originals to us so that we can put them all together and distribute.

Did you get in touch with Peter Meir at PGE to coordinate trading third amendment documents.

Cordially,
Mary Cook

Tanya:

Will you provide me with a definition of "Capital Reserves" which you used in the CSFB (Europe) worksheet?

Thanks!

Marie

Donna,

This is a list of companies we have executed trades with in the last year and may potentially trade with again.  I need to go through the list of negotiated agreements legal sent me and determine which ones are already open and executed.  The starred ones are the most used.

ABN Amro
Bear Stearns
Sanford C. Bernstein
BNP 
*Chase/JP Morgan
*Credit Suisse First Boston
*Deutsche Bank
Dresdner
Frankel
Frost Securities
First Union National Bank
Garban Securities Ltd. London
*Goldman Sachs & Co
*Jeffries 
Lehman
Merrill Lynch
Banque Paribas
Petrie
POSI
Raymond James
*Royal Bank of Canada Dominion
Swiss Re
*UBS

If you are still in Houston tomorrow and get the urge to initial the ISDA, please call Samantha Boyd at 39188 and she will be happy to either show you where they are or send them to you (wherever you may be).

Thanks!

Marie

Rebecca:

Attached is the Annex B for Deal No. YA2985.1.  Please attach Annex A, Annex B and the Canadian Annex, since this is a cross border transaction.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

I had no interaction with her, so can't comment.

Your comments are needed for Janet Dougherty who sat in for Joanne Rozycki.  Please return as soon as possible.
Thank you!-Becky

Ratings: Excellent = 5 Above Average = 4 Average = 3 Below Average = 2 Poor = 1

Initiative:		_________
Cooperation:	_________
Punctuality:	_________
Attendance:		_________
Quality of Work:	_________

Rate the worker's skill level in relation to the job :_________

Would you request this person again? (Y/N) :_________

Comments:

YUK!

Or.....should I say "Thank you for the reply."

Signed,
Louie the Lizard

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

I had no interaction with her, so can't comment.

Your comments are needed for Janet Dougherty who sat in for Joanne Rozycki.  Please return as soon as possible.
Thank you!-Becky

Ratings: Excellent = 5 Above Average = 4 Average = 3 Below Average = 2 Poor = 1

Initiative:		_________
Cooperation:	_________
Punctuality:	_________
Attendance:		_________
Quality of Work:	_________

Rate the worker's skill level in relation to the job :_________

Would you request this person again? (Y/N) :_________

Comments:

 

Please remember to get your work report updates to me by the end of the day.

Mark Taylor
Vice President and General Counsel
Enron Wholesale Services
1400 Smith Street - EB3892
Houston, Texas 77008
(713)853-7459
(713)646-3490 (fax)

Cindy:

Attached is a form of Enron Corp. guaranty that we are required to deliver in connection with a confirmation.  Please process this guaranty by the end of day tomorrow, as I must overnight it to the counterparty.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Cindy:

Mary Perkins executed an amendment to the Enron Corp. Guaranty in favor of Bear Stearns, et al on May 15, 2001.  The original guaranty guaranteed obligations of Enron Credit Inc. under a brokerage arrangement.  Bear Stearns has requested a certificate of incumbency with Mary's specimen signature.

I have prepared and am attaching such certificate.  If acceptable, please have Mary sign and Kate (or another asst. secretary) certify.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Laurel and Jorge:

Attached is the form of confirmation for Credit Suisse First Boston London Branch.  ENA is the confirming party and calculation agent.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

			 

I am finalizing the documentation for Jeff's signature now.  The resolution (Jeff does not sign) will have to follow.

Please provide me with the contact information so that I can forward the documents to CSFB (phone, fax and courier delivery address).

Marie

Sara,

Jeff Kinneman has suggested that perhaps legal could scan the executed document and edit the signature pages as opposed to recreate it since CSFB cannot provide the word document we requested.

However we decide to pursue this is still a priority as we are now shut off from trading.

Please advise as to what time frame we can expect the document to be completed.

Thanks,

Tom

I am having it looked at and will

Has this been completed and forwarded to confirms?  
Enclosed is an omnibus worksheet for Moriah Properties, Ltd.  You will see that additional performance assurance has been issued by Moriah to cover all current and future trading up to 10/01/2002.  Please prepare the confirm and forward to the financial confirms group, with a copy to me.  

Thanks,
Max

 << File: Moriah Properties Y43075.xls >> 

I am having it looked at and will send it down this afternoon.

Has this been completed and forwarded to confirms?  
Enclosed is an omnibus worksheet for Moriah Properties, Ltd.  You will see that additional performance assurance has been issued by Moriah to cover all current and future trading up to 10/01/2002.  Please prepare the confirm and forward to the financial confirms group, with a copy to me.  

Thanks,
Max

 << File: Moriah Properties Y43075.xls >> 

Tomorrow is fine.

Well, I'll be on the legal floor tomorrow.  Do you want me to just drop by your office then?  Or do you need it now?

Boy, I'm REALLY mad at you!  Just kidding!  I thought you were just going to initial the signature pages and then we would get Kevin to sign it here.  Since you're in town, I can run the originals down to you (if you'll tell me where you are) so that you can initial and then I can ask Kevin to sign.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

Don't be mad.  I have not gotten it signed.  When I was ready to do so, Belden was unreachable.  Then I suddenly forgot prior to rushing down to H-town.  What do you want me to do now?  Get Kevin this week?  or Get Tim on Tues. after Labor Day?  Are you really mad?  I'm sorry.  Please advise on how I can try and do damage control.

Tracy

Hi, Tracy!

I have never received the signature pages for the Allegheny ISDA.  Have you sent them?

Mare

Yes.

Will we be confirming Power Financial deals under this Master Agreement als=
o? =20

We have received an executed financial Master Agreement.

Type of Contract:=09Master Agreement (Industrial)

Effective Date:=09=09August 2, 2001

Enron Entity:=09=09Enron Canada Corp.

Counterparty:=09=09Albchem Industries Ltd.

Transactions Covered:=09Approved for natural gas and crude oil products.  N=
ot approved for pulp and paper, weather, foreign =09=09=09=09exchange, stee=
l, interest rate and currency or forward rate.

Confirming Entity:=09Enron Canada Corp.

Governing Law:=09=09Province of Alberta 

Attached for your further handling is Annex B for the referenced counterparty.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

			 

Gordon:

Here is the revised Deemed ISDA.  Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

		 
Marie, the counterparty states that the Coverage Ratio should be 2.5, rather than 3.5. Will you please confirm that 2.5 is the correct amount?  If it is, I'll need to correct the original and send the counterparty a revised confirmation.

"Material Adverse Change" means (a) with respect to Counterparty, it shall have any of the following occur at any time:  (i) the ratio of its Total Debt to Net Worth is more than 1.5 to 1, or (ii) its Net Worth falls below U.S. $70,000,000, or (iii) its EBITDA Coverage Ratio shall be less than 3.5 to 1; or (b) with respect to ENA, its Credit Support Provider's Credit Rating is below "BBB-" by S&P.

Thanks for your assistance!

Gordon

Hi, Robbi!

How are things going?  Any more news?

We have finally decided on our fabric and the amount of yardage.  What's the next step?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Roeline!

Just checking on the status of the original assignments I forwarded to you for execution.  Have you received them back from UOM, Dynegy and Sempra?  If so, will you send me an original of each for my files?

Hope all is going well and that you have a great weekend.

Marie

Hi, Sheila!

Can you verify for us the account numbers at both Goldman Sachs and Morgan Stanley that we need to assign back into?

Thanks!

Marie

We have received the following executed assignments:

1.	Assignment and Assumption Agreement dated as of September 28, 2001 among Johns Manville Corporation and Johns Manville International, Inc. and ENA, whereby Johns Manville Corporation assigned Deal No. VH0047.1 to Johns Manville International, Inc.

2.	Assignment and Assumption Agreement dated as of September 28, 2001 among Johns Manville International Group, Inc. and Johns Manville International, Inc. and ENA, whereby Johns Manville International Group, Inc. assigned Deal No. QP0373.1 to Johns Manville International, Inc.

Copies will be distributed.

Okay, here goes!

Robert Allen

Pattern:  Bearnson
Color:  Aged Gold
Price:  $65.90
Yardage:  17 yards 

Pattern:  Scholtes
Color:  Cinnabar
Price:  $80.50
Yardage:  18 yards

Pattern:  McGeary
Color:  Citron
Price:  $59.50
Yardage:  3-1/2 yards

Pattern:  Jungle Rhythm - we saw this at Expo and didn't know if we could order it here
Color:  Cinnabar
Price:  $77.50 (at Expo)
Yardage:  1 yard

Schumacher

Pattern:  184180
Name:  Dior Toile
Color:  Onyx
Price:  $50.00
Yardage:  4 yards

Kravet

Pattern:  17392 - Shown Railroaded
Color:  30
Price:  $69.80 (at Expo)
Yardage:  8-1/2 yards

The shipping address would be:	8027 Oakwood Trace
				Houston, Texas  77002
				(713) 896-1673 - home #

Will there be a problem ordering this much fabric?  Also, will you know the amount of shipping, etc. charges so that we can pay for it up front?  I'll have to have my accountant (Anne) write a check or whatever method is needed.

Again, thanks so much for your help.  We really appreciate it!

Marie

Marie,

  It's been slow - but I think its going to pick up.  Send me a list of what you want to purchase and from where - as well as the address where you want it shipped.  I will then firnd out pricing for you.  It may take a little longer with the Robert Allen stuff since I have to open an account there.  I do not anticipate any problems getting the account open.  Maybe we can have lunch early next week.  Let me know what day is good for you,

Hi, Robbi!

How are things going?  Any more news?

We have finally decided on our fabric and the amount of yardage.  What's the next step?

Thanks!

Marie

Oops, forgot about lunch.  I'm available Monday or Tuesday.  Just let me know if either works for you.

Marie

Marie,

  It's been slow - but I think its going to pick up.  Send me a list of what you want to purchase and from where - as well as the address where you want it shipped.  I will then firnd out pricing for you.  It may take a little longer with the Robert Allen stuff since I have to open an account there.  I do not anticipate any problems getting the account open.  Maybe we can have lunch early next week.  Let me know what day is good for you,

Hi, Robbi!

How are things going?  Any more news?

We have finally decided on our fabric and the amount of yardage.  What's the next step?

Thanks!

Marie

Ed:

Attached are AES's comments to our draft ISDA.  Please respond to those which are credit related.

Thanks!

Marie
 <<ISDA Schedule: AES Eastern.clean>>    <<ISDA Schedule: AES Eastern.red>> 
 <<ISDA CSA P13: AES Eastern.clean>>    <<ISDA CSA P13: AES Eastern.red>> 
Marie - 
I am an attorney with Troutman Sanders LLP in Washington, DC; in conjunction with Michael Sweeney (TS-DC) and John Varholy (TS-London) I am assisting Tom Spencer and Cathy Barron at AES Eastern in reviewing applicable ISDA documentation they are currently negotiating with Enron.  Attached for your review, please find AES Eastern's mark-up of the ISDA master schedule and ISDA CSA paragraph 13 as originally proposed by Enron.  If you have any questions or concerns, please direct those to Tom Spencer.
Best Regards, 
Eric 
Eric K. Weingarten, Esq. 
Troutman Sanders LLP 
401 9th Street, NW 
Suite 1000 
Washington, DC 20004-2134 
202.274.2845 
eric.weingarten@troutmansanders.com 
The above message may be protected by attorney/client privilege.  If you believe that it has been sent to you in error, do not read it.  Please reply to the sender that you have received the message in error.  Then delete it.  Thank you.

 - ISDA Schedules to Master  Enron and AES Eastern.DOC 
 - ISDA Schedules to Master  Enron and AES Eastern.DOC 
 - ISDA CSA Schedule  Enron with AES Eastern.DOC 
 - ISDA CSA Schedule  Enron with AES Eastern.DOC 

No, you can send them all together.  I was just trying to clean some stacks of paper off my desk and realized that I hadn't received the originals.  Thanks for your further assistance on this.

Marie

Marie -

I was gone to a seminar both Thursday and Friday - now back to work.  I only
received United Oil's assignments back - and on Wednesday I left a message
for both Sempra and Dynegy.  I will chase those today.

Do you want for me to send UOM 's paperwork before I get the others?  I can
do that if that's your preference.  Let me know please.

Regards,
Roeline

I thought you were going to come by and initial the master agreement.  I can't get it signed until you initial.  Will you please initial the two pages I faxed to you on 8/13 and fax back to me ASAP so that I can have the agreement signed here in Houston?

Thanks.

No, you can send them all together.  I was just trying to clean some stacks of paper off my desk and realized that I hadn't received the originals.  Thanks for your further assistance on this.

Marie

Marie -

I was gone to a seminar both Thursday and Friday - now back to work.  I only
received United Oil's assignments back - and on Wednesday I left a message
for both Sempra and Dynegy.  I will chase those today.

Do you want for me to send UOM 's paperwork before I get the others?  I can
do that if that's your preference.  Let me know please.

Regards,
Roeline

Richard:

Credit is not throwing you off.  They did send a revised worksheet.  I turned around comments and they have been reviewed by a lawyer.  I am working on finalizing our comments to send back to AA today.

Marie

Marie - can you please check on this and let Richard know where we stand.  Thanks!

According to credit, the AA ISDA worksheet was sent back to legal last week. Have you seen it or are they throwing me off?

Rich Friedman
Enron Global Markets LLC
richard.friedman@enron.com
713-853-5137

Todd:

At last, I am attaching our response to your comments of 7/19/01, together with a clean and blacklined draft of the ISDA Master Agreement for Georgia Power Company.  Please note that these same comments will apply for Savannah Electric and Mississippi Power with the exceptions set forth in our response.

Please let us know if you have any questions or additional comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 	 

Richard:

As you can see below, I just replied to Mark instead of forwarding to you.  Credit is not throwing you off.  They did send a revised worksheet.  I have turned around comments and they have been reviewed by a lawyer.  I have completed finalizing the comments, but since AA sent their agreement in pdf (which cannot be edited), I have had to turn around a hard copy of our comments.  Can you give me a physical address where I can overnight our comments?

Thanks!

Marie

Richard:

Credit is not throwing you off.  They did send a revised worksheet.  I turned around comments and they have been reviewed by a lawyer.  I am working on finalizing our comments to send back to AA today.

Marie

Marie - can you please check on this and let Richard know where we stand.  Thanks!

According to credit, the AA ISDA worksheet was sent back to legal last week. Have you seen it or are they throwing me off?

Rich Friedman
Enron Global Markets LLC
richard.friedman@enron.com
713-853-5137

Richard:

Thanks for the info.  I'll send it overnight to her and will copy you on my correspondence (with a copy of our comments).

Marie

Contact for the ISDA with AA is Geraldine Lim. The address:

PO Box 619616
Mail Drop 5662
DFW Airport, TX  75261-9616

Express Delivery:

4333 Amon Carter Blvd
MNail Drop 5662
Ft. Worth, TX 76155

Phone 817-967-9209
Fax  817-967-4318

Sounds great. Thanks for the update - while we are on credit watch, at least we can get these type of items taken care of.

Richard:

As you can see below, I just replied to Mark instead of forwarding to you.  Credit is not throwing you off.  They did send a revised worksheet.  I have turned around comments and they have been reviewed by a lawyer.  I have completed finalizing the comments, but since AA sent their agreement in pdf (which cannot be edited), I have had to turn around a hard copy of our comments.  Can you give me a physical address where I can overnight our comments?

Thanks!

Marie

Richard:

Credit is not throwing you off.  They did send a revised worksheet.  I turned around comments and they have been reviewed by a lawyer.  I am working on finalizing our comments to send back to AA today.

Marie

Marie - can you please check on this and let Richard know where we stand.  Thanks!

According to credit, the AA ISDA worksheet was sent back to legal last week. Have you seen it or are they throwing me off?

Rich Friedman
Enron Global Markets LLC
richard.friedman@enron.com
713-853-5137

Patrick and Rebecca:

Attached are the Deemed ISDAs for the referenced counterparties.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 	 

I don't know.  Which entity did the weather trade?

Marie,

Which Deemed ISDA is for me to use on W1597.1 for weather?

Thanks,
Becca

Patrick and Rebecca:

Attached are the Deemed ISDAs for the referenced counterparties.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 << File: 032conf(aig comm arb. fund ltd.).doc >> 	 << File: 033conf(aig comm arb. fund lp).doc >> 

Sounds great!  Sorry we won't be able to help move, unpack, babysit (or should I say "queensit") but unfortunately we'll be celebrating Anne's birthday (no, not her 34th!) the same day!  Hopefully we'll make it up your way next year to visit and most importantly, meet "The Queen".

Love,

Marie 

Hi gang!
Hope all is well with you all.  Just thought I'd give you all an update on
our new home, that is if all the inspections go smoothly.  It's in Browns
Pt., 4602 41st St. to be exact, it's described as a super clean rambler, new
carpet, vaulted ceilings with fireplace in living room, kitchen has
nook,island, family rm, big fenced backyard which seems well landscaped to
my standards anyway.  It has 3 bedrooms, 2 baths, 2 car garage w/ opener!
We'll be closer to family, friends,Steve's work & hopefully have a better
sense of community for Queen Isabel.  We're excited to say that we're just
outside Tuscany, which is where a beautiful community lies with $300k & up
homes.  Can't wait to have you all over to unpack, clean, paint, babysit &
mow the lawn, so mark your calendars for Nov. 30th! This is also Steve's
34th birthday, hmmmm I think I'll buy him a house, don't ruin the surprise.
Take care,
Jennifer

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

Attached is a new link for employees unable to attend the all-employee meeting today at 10 a.m. (CDT) at the Hyatt Regency Houston, Imperial Ballroom. If you are located in London, Calgary, Toronto, Omaha, New York, Portland (ENA) or Houston, you can access the live event at http://home.enron.com/employeemeeting.

Mr. Ellis:

Pursuant to your request, I am attaching for your review the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Please contact me with any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 

Here is the executed masters list.  We will try to get you guys on the distribution list, but if we can't we'll just forward the e-mail to you.  Is there anyone else in your group we should add to the list?

Marie

 

That's fine.  They probably want the original.

Marie

Sheila now says that Morgan Stanley may require the original because of the signatures.  I will let you know.

Thanks,
Kelly Templeton
Administrative Assistant
Financial Trading Risk Management
Ph:   713-853-9945
Fax:  713-646-2196

I don't know who Debbie Nicholls is either.

Individuals who have attained the level Vice President (or above) are authorized by the company bylaws to sign any contracts.  Thus Greg Hermans, Ray Bowen and Bob Crane would not need special authorization.  Brenda Herod and Lisa McClendon were authorized but have left the group so you might see some old confirms with their signatures.  I don't know anything about Debbie Nicholls.  

Marie, do you have any info on Debbie Nicholls?  Deb

Deb and Marie,
     Each of you provided me with a list of authorized confirmation
signatories earlier this month.  However, while reviewing the confirmation
documentation requested in conjunction with the paper and steel process
audit we notice that the individuals listed below were not identified on
the lists of authorized confirmation signatories we received.  Could you
please verify that the individuals listed below were authorized as
confirmation signatories during the period January 1, 2001 through August
31, 2001.  We would greatly appreciate it if we could receive this
documentation as soon as possible as we are attempting to complete the
process audit  by Monday, October 29, 2001.  If you have questions please
contact me at X56955.

1.  Greg Hermans
2.  Raymond M. Bowen
3.  Debbie Nicholls
4.  Robert Crane
5.  Brenda Herod
6.  Lisa McClendon

Thank you for your time and consideration.

Mike D.
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.

I did and she did.

I can't remember who worked on this.  Did Diane get a copy?

Hey Brent.  

When you finalize and send out the Torch assignment, can you send a copy down to me? 

Thanks.
Diane
3.0443

Hi, Roeline!

Eric faxed me a copy of the assignment and new confirmation signed by Sempra but I have not seen the originals.

Marie

Hi Marie -

I now have executed assignments from UOM and Dynegy.  I called Eric Twombly
at Sempra and he said that they may have sent it directly to Enron (you??).
I want to call Eric again today, but wanted to make sure first that he
indeed had not send the originals directly back to you - which is not what I
requested.

Please let me know - and thanks,
Roeline

We have received a certificate of amalgamation evidencing the merger of Pacifica Papers Inc. with and into Norske Skog Canada Limited, with Norske Skog Canada Limited being the surviving entity.  I have received verification from Credit that they are okay with this amalgamation.  I will forward a copy of the documentation to Global Counterparty.

Marie

Marie, the counterparty just called and they are interested in closing their old bank accounts, but are concerned that we will continue to send it the the old bank account being that we have not moved the Pacifica Papers deals to Norske Skog.

Please let me know if you have heard from anyone.

Thanks,
Gordon

I never received a response to my 9/17 e-mail to you re this amalgamation.  Are there any credit issues with respect to this amalgamation?

Thanks!

Marie
It is my understanding that the companies mentioned above have been amalgamated, with Norske Skog Canada Limited retaining the name.  Are you aware that this occurred?  Norske Skog is wanting me to bill Pacifica Paper's swaps under Norske Skog's name going forward.

Please let me know!

Thanks,
Gordon

Cheryl:

We have received a certificate of amalgamation evidencing the amalgamation of Pacifica Papers Inc. with and into Norske Skog Canada Limited with Norske Skog Canada Limited being the surviving entity.  Credit is aware of this and has no problems.  I will forward copies of the documentation to you.  Let me know if you have any questions.

Marie

I wish I could, but I have a paralegal lunch today.

Marie,

  Jane and I are going to lunch at 11:30.  Can you join us?

Cindy:

Attached are a form of Enron Corp. guaranty and certificate of incumbency to be executed in connection with an ISDA Master Agreement with Pursue Energy Corporation.

Please call me when the guaranty is ready and I'll arrange for pickup.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

This is cute.
 
drop  
> us (parachuted, preferably) across the  landscape of Afghanistan, and let 

us  
> do what comes naturally. 
> 
> Think about  it. Our anger quotient alone, even when doing standard stuff 
> like grocery shopping and paying bills, is formidable enough to  make 
> evenarmed men in turbans tremble.  
> 
> We've had our children, we would gladly suffer  or die to protect them and 
> their  future. We'd like to get away from our husbands, if  they haven't 

left  
> already. And for those of us who are  single, the prospect of finding a 

good  
> man with whom to share life is about as  likely as being struck by 

lightning.  
> We have nothing to lose. 
> 
> We've survived the water diet, the protein  diet, the carbohydrate diet, 

and  
> the grapefruit diet in gyms and saunas  across America and never lost a 
> pound. We  can easily survive months in the hostile terrain of Afghanistan  
> with no food at all! 
> 
> We've spent years tracking down our husbands  or lovers in bars, hardware 
> stores, or  sporting events...finding bin Laden in some cave will be no 
> problem. 
> 
> Uniting all  the warring tribes of Afghanistan in a new government? Oh, 
> please ... we've planned the  seating arrangements for in-laws and extended 
> families at Thanksgiving dinners for years ... we understand  tribal warfar 

e.  
> 
> Between us, we've divorced  enough husbands to know every trick there is 

for  
> how they hide, launder, or cover up bank  accounts and money sources. We 

know  
> how to find that money and we know how to  seize it ... with or without the 
> government's help!  
> 
> Let us go and fight. The Taliban hates women. Imagine their  terror as we 
>  crawl like ants with hot-flashes over  their godforsaken terrain. 
> 
> I'm going to write my Congresswoman. You  should, too! 
>  
> 
> 

Hi, Robbi!

Hope you are enjoying your time off.  I know I certainly enjoyed Friday and Tuesday and hated to come back today.

Anne and I went to the Decorative Center yesterday, and tried to check out some samples at Beacon Hill (Robert Allen Fabrics) and they couldn't find your account.  Do you have an account there, or was I mistaken?

Anyway, I thought I'd e-mail you since I don't have your home number in case you were going to the Decorative Center later this week to see if you could check out some samples for us if you had time.

At Beacon Hill  (Robert Allen):

Pattern:  Bearnson
Color:  Aged Gold

Pattern:  Scholtes
Color:  Cinnabar

Pattern:  McGeary
Color:  Citron

At Brunschwig & Fils (Gaston y Daniela):

Pattern No.:  82315-198
Name:  Chevron Woven Texture
Color:  Teja

Pattern No.:  82315 - 401
Name:  Chevron Woven Texture
Color:  Verde Agua

At Schumacher & Co. (Greeff)

Pattern No.:  3185017
Name:  Ephemera
Color:  Grass

Pattern No.:  3185046
Name:  Ephemera
Color:  Bittersweet

Pattern No.:  3112096
Name:  Alpine
Color:  Pumpkin

If you don't go back to DC or have already gone, we can maybe find the Robert Allen samples at Expo. They sell his fabrics there.

Thanks!  We really appreciate your help.

Marie

Yes, please.  Also, please add taxes.  We certainly don't want to do anything that will mess his records up since you all are so kind to do this.  Do you want us to pay in advance?  That won't be a problem either.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

  I am working this noon time on your orders.  I received pricing from Schumacher and Kravet and it is half of what you were quoted.  Both are in stock.  The purchase price will be a little more because of freight.  Also, my husband may want me to add taxes - because I am using his tax resale certificate.  I am checking with him and will let you know.  Do you want me to go ahead and place the orders?

  I have filled out the application for Robert Allen, but need to get banking information from my husband before I can send it in.  My goal is to have it done by Friday.  It's just been very busy here!  Sorry for the delay!

  

Well, I guess that's why they get to have such nice, pretty stores.  What's Eric doing up here meeting with the attorneys?  Also, Jane said that Mary Nell and Peter were given packages?  Is this true?

Kravet will COD me and Schumacher will be charged to my credit card.  Once I place the orders I'll know the exact amount, including freight.  So I'll let you know.

Isn't it a big scam that these stores have!  The mark up is always between 40 and 50%, depending on the manufacturer.  

Yes, please.  Also, please add taxes.  We certainly don't want to do anything that will mess his records up since you all are so kind to do this.  Do you want us to pay in advance?  That won't be a problem either.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

  I am working this noon time on your orders.  I received pricing from Schumacher and Kravet and it is half of what you were quoted.  Both are in stock.  The purchase price will be a little more because of freight.  Also, my husband may want me to add taxes - because I am using his tax resale certificate.  I am checking with him and will let you know.  Do you want me to go ahead and place the orders?

  I have filled out the application for Robert Allen, but need to get banking information from my husband before I can send it in.  My goal is to have it done by Friday.  It's just been very busy here!  Sorry for the delay!

  

Do we have a conflict?  The CA will be to obtain financials.

Thanks!

Marie

Could you please together a confidentiality agreement for the following company:

Metron Steel, a dba of Primary Steel, Inc.

Please let me know if you need anything else. 
Thanks,
r

Glad you enjoyed them!

Thanks for the cookies - I broke down and had a second!!

Jane Wilhite
ext. 35063

I bet Mary Nell was made that they wouldn't let her come back to Houston.  I haven't heard anything.  I know that several of our lawyers and Carol have been meeting to finalize a Master Netting agreement.  There are some issues with the master netting agreement and some of the big financing transactions.  Maybe that's what they are working on.  If I hear anything, I'll let you know.

Yes - and Mary Nell asked to come back to Houston and was told no (according to my source).  Things are very bleak!  Carol and Lance are on some emergency project.  Lance worked all night.  I think we are in big trouble!  Do you hear any scoop?

Well, I guess that's why they get to have such nice, pretty stores.  What's Eric doing up here meeting with the attorneys?  Also, Jane said that Mary Nell and Peter were given packages?  Is this true?

Kravet will COD me and Schumacher will be charged to my credit card.  Once I place the orders I'll know the exact amount, including freight.  So I'll let you know.

Isn't it a big scam that these stores have!  The mark up is always between 40 and 50%, depending on the manufacturer.  

Yes, please.  Also, please add taxes.  We certainly don't want to do anything that will mess his records up since you all are so kind to do this.  Do you want us to pay in advance?  That won't be a problem either.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

  I am working this noon time on your orders.  I received pricing from Schumacher and Kravet and it is half of what you were quoted.  Both are in stock.  The purchase price will be a little more because of freight.  Also, my husband may want me to add taxes - because I am using his tax resale certificate.  I am checking with him and will let you know.  Do you want me to go ahead and place the orders?

  I have filled out the application for Robert Allen, but need to get banking information from my husband before I can send it in.  My goal is to have it done by Friday.  It's just been very busy here!  Sorry for the delay!

  

That makes sense since we have that SEC inquiry going on.

I think Lance is working on some of the law suits.  He has some securities law reporters in his office.  He left his secretary a voice message at 1:45 am - so its something very urgent.

I bet Mary Nell was made that they wouldn't let her come back to Houston.  I haven't heard anything.  I know that several of our lawyers and Carol have been meeting to finalize a Master Netting agreement.  There are some issues with the master netting agreement and some of the big financing transactions.  Maybe that's what they are working on.  If I hear anything, I'll let you know.

Yes - and Mary Nell asked to come back to Houston and was told no (according to my source).  Things are very bleak!  Carol and Lance are on some emergency project.  Lance worked all night.  I think we are in big trouble!  Do you hear any scoop?

Well, I guess that's why they get to have such nice, pretty stores.  What's Eric doing up here meeting with the attorneys?  Also, Jane said that Mary Nell and Peter were given packages?  Is this true?

Kravet will COD me and Schumacher will be charged to my credit card.  Once I place the orders I'll know the exact amount, including freight.  So I'll let you know.

Isn't it a big scam that these stores have!  The mark up is always between 40 and 50%, depending on the manufacturer.  

Yes, please.  Also, please add taxes.  We certainly don't want to do anything that will mess his records up since you all are so kind to do this.  Do you want us to pay in advance?  That won't be a problem either.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

  I am working this noon time on your orders.  I received pricing from Schumacher and Kravet and it is half of what you were quoted.  Both are in stock.  The purchase price will be a little more because of freight.  Also, my husband may want me to add taxes - because I am using his tax resale certificate.  I am checking with him and will let you know.  Do you want me to go ahead and place the orders?

  I have filled out the application for Robert Allen, but need to get banking information from my husband before I can send it in.  My goal is to have it done by Friday.  It's just been very busy here!  Sorry for the delay!

  

My sentiments exactly!
We appreciate all Credit does for us!
Thanks for the treat this afternoon.  We appreciate it!

Did I send this to you already?

Thanks for the cookies - I broke down and had a second!!

Jane Wilhite
ext. 35063

Gordon:

Attached is the Deemed ISDA for the referenced deal, together with a fax cover sheet.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 	 

Mr. Marovich:

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Mike:

We are still waiting on a credit worksheet from Credit.  We can't proceed without a worksheet.

Marie

Marie:
Could you check on the status of this for us.
Thanks very much,
Mike

Mark Taylor is out through the 16th - do you know of any progress on this?

Rich Friedman
Enron Global Markets LLC
richard.friedman@enron.com
713-853-5137

Mr. Arens:

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Oh, my gosh!  Thanks.  I'll resend it.

Marie,
	FYI.  Your memo references Morgan.  The email is going out to Goldman.

Thanks,
TB

Mr. Arens:

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 << File: 014assign(goldman sachs).doc >> 

Mr. Arens:

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Charlie:

Attached for your further handling are drafts of the First Amendment to Master Agreement, together with a First Amendment to Guaranty in connection with the ENA/3TEC master agreement.  Please note that in addition to amending certain credit provisions, we are also amending the current setoff provision and also adding a provision regarding "severability".  If the attached drafts are acceptable, please let me know  and I'll process for execution.

Marie
x33907

		 	 

Please be advised that Sara has approved and Bill Bradford as signed, on behalf of ENA, the following documentation:

1.	Fourth Amendment to Master Energy Price Swap Agreement between ENA and Morgan Stanley Capital Group, Inc.;

2.	Amendment Agreement between ENA and The Chase Manhattan Bank; and

3.	Derivatives Novation Letter among Deutsche Bank AG, Bankers Trust Company and ENA.

Originals of the above documents have been forwarded to the respective counterparties for execution.

Tom:

We have our own form of corporate resolutions.  It was being circulated for signature by the directors and I just received it back today.  I told Kelly Keneally when I sent the documentation to her that we were in the process of routing this for signature and that I would send her a certificate certifying these resolutions when completed.

Marie

Apparently CSFB neglected to ask us to complete the attached corporate resolution when we executed the broker agreement.  If we could fill out and forward on that would be great.

Tom

>  -----Original Message-----
This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain 
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No 
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute, 
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended 
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state 
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is 
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to 
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as 
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

Hi, Matt!

How's the new job going?  Things are so crazy here, it's unbelievable!  My e-mail where you forwarded the proposed resolutions to me was automatically deleted.  Can you send it to me again, or tell me where I can find the documents?

Thanks!

Marie

Mary:

Pursuant to Sara's request, I am attaching a list of the brokerage agreements and other documentation we either currently have in place or are negotiating with Goldman, Sachs et al.  

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

Mary Cook has requested that you attend a meeting tomorrow morning (Tuesday, October 30) from 10:00 to 11:00 in EB38C2  to discuss master netting agreements.  The directive Mary has presently been given is that we will be preparing various master netting agreements and she would like to solicit as much additional help as she can.  If the directive changes before the meeting tomorrow, we will advise everyone.

Please review the below attachments prior to the meeting if your schedule allows.

Thanks!

Marie

	 	 	 	 

I have a previous meeting but am willing to help after a briefing.

Angela D. Davis
Mary Cook has requested that you attend a meeting tomorrow morning (Tuesday, October 30) from 10:00 to 11:00 in EB38C2  to discuss master netting agreements.  The directive Mary has presently been given is that we will be preparing various master netting agreements and she would like to solicit as much additional help as she can.  If the directive changes before the meeting tomorrow, we will advise everyone.

Please review the below attachments prior to the meeting if your schedule allows.

Thanks!

Marie

	 << File: Master Netting & Security Agmnt g.doc >> 	 << File: Master Netting Agreement Credit Support Annex c.doc >> 	 << File: master netting issue list.doc >> 	 << File: cwt.doc >> 

Sara:

Attached are copies of the confirms.  I put a copy in each of the Citibank and Delta files.  I don't remember there being a project name.

Marie

	 	 

Here are the guidelines for an ECP.  Hope this helps.  If not, let me know.  Is there supposed to be bad news coming?

		 

Marie,

   What is the threshold for an eligible contract participant for an entity?  Is it $5MM?  I have a New Zealand counterparty who would like to delete the eligible contract participant rep. 

  All here is pretty spooky - we are just waiting for the hammer to drop!

Cindy:

This is the guaranty I spoke with Clement about.  It MUST be signed either this afternoon or first thing tomorrow morning.  It is our standard guaranty except that it is multiparty/multiproduct.

Please call me when it's ready and I'll send someone to pick it up.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Pursuant to Sara Shackleton's request, I am attaching a memo that I prepared in April, 2000 regarding procedures for opening brokerage accounts.

Please do not hesitate to contact either Sara at x35620 or me with any questions.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Hi, Bianca!

Francisco Pinto Leite has asked me to give him a list of all outstanding ISDAs and Deemed ISDAs with Mexican counterparties.  Can you send me a list of the Deemed ISDAs that are still outstanding (either comments received or counterparty has not returned signed copy).

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

fhdftghfht

Esmeralda:

I'm available.

Thanks!

Marie

Good morning ladies:

Mary asked that I coordinate a meeting with you regarding Training and Files.  Please let me know if you are available to meet with Mary tomorrow, Thursday, June 21, 2001 @ 9:30 a.m. for approximately 30 minutes.  Thanks.

Esmeralda Gonzalez

I'm just now going through my e-mails from last week as I was out cleaning up after the flood.  I had given Cynthia the omnibus forms before I left, so I don't know what they are doing/not doing up there.

Marie

At what point was this discussed? I thought we were handling just like ENA.  Did you ever discuss with Cynthia or Molly?

I was looking for an Omnibus type doc which incorporates the same credit terms as the ISDA we draft we sent; why are we incorporating a document that has not been signed? I'd like to be consistent with how we manage financial transactions across the company.  Let's discuss. Thanks.

Michael - based on the new version of the deal ticket changing the volume and price slightly, I have added these changes to the form of confirmation that Cynthia had marked up last.  Please everyone review as Michael would like to send an executable copy tomorrow morning to RM.  Please advise.  Thanks!

 << File: RM confirm draft v3060801.doc >> 

Molly LaFuze
Enron Broadband Services
Phone:  713.853.3005
Fax:       713.646.8103
Cel:        713.503.9760
Molly.LaFuze@enron.net 

Enron ranks #7 in Fortune's 500
- Fortune Magazine, April 16, 2001
I've updated the price and the volume.  Please send Imad and me the updated confirmation for execution tomorrow.

Please note that the confirm should contain the new language that Cynthia has added (Imad said that you were aware of this).  Please contact Imad if you have any additional questions.  Thanks.

 << File: RM DRAM Deal Ticket draft 4 swap.xls >> 

Michael Simmons

Enron Global Semiconductor Services
Phone:  713-853-7842
Mobile:  713-825-6803
Fax:  713-853-7342

WHAT????????  How can this be?  Who allowed this to happen?  What are we going to do?  There is no one worthy to take your place as favorite credit person.  Those structuring people can't possibly be nicer than us.  I guess I wish you well, although it's going to be bad for us.  Oh, as far as the HUGE Happy Hour, I hope you aren't getting your hopes up too high.  Remember, it's Bill!

Seriously, we will miss you and I wish you all the best.

Marie

Hey my favorite legal people,

Just wanted to let you folks know that I have accepted a position in the Nat Gas Structuring group beginning full time July 16th ( I will be part-timing between the two groups beginning July 2nd).  This change comes as I have interviewed for the Associate Program and will start my first rotation in the Structuring group. 

OF COURSE, I am going to MISS working with you guys, but will likely still be involved from a deal perspective.-BAD NEWS :(  

Russell

PS- Hopefully Bill will throw me a huge HAPPY HOUR -Good News :)  

Hi, Bernice!

I don't think Legal needs to review your correspondence requesting this information, but we will still need to receive copies of the name changes, mergers, etc.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi Marie,

GCP at times sends correspondence to customers requesting documentation (Sec of State) that is needed for name changes, mergers, etc.  Does anyone in Legal need to review this format before we continue with our process.

Please advise.

Bernice C. Rodriguez 
Enron Net Works - Global Counterparty
713-853-7972

Susan:

Attached are Frank's hedge fund forms.  The first one is a blackline and the second one is the actual form.

  

I have received the executed certificates from Enron Corp. and will send to=
 you via overnight courier.  I will also include the Termination of the Gua=
ranty.

Marie:

Please let me know if there is anything I can do to expedite the process. I
will be happy to locate and forward to you copies of the certificates sent
to me by
Clement Arbams pertaining to the original guarantee.

Regards,

Anna

=03****************************************************************
Bear Stearns is not responsible for any recommendation, solicitation,
offer or agreement or any information about any transaction, customer
account or account activity contained in this communication.

Aparna:

Below are Tidewater's comments to the omnibus confirmation.  Please let me know what changes are acceptable.

Thanks!

Marie
Marie,

Per my phone message, please review requests 1, 3, and 4.  Please let me know if you need additional info or a contact at Tidewater.

Thanks,

Tiffany
Tidewater Fibre has requested some changes on the contract.  They are as follows:

1) Under Terms and Conditions, want to provide financial statements annually vs. monthly.

2) Alternative Floating Price Structure:  We have included RISI as the back-up index should the OBM become discontinued.  Because their is a basis difference between RISI and OBM, we need to adjust the alternative floating price as RISI - $18.  RISI - $18 would replace DLK East - $10.  Thus there is an $8 difference between the two indices.

3) Under Annex B1, the would like for it to read "either party (ENA or Tidewater Fibre) faces default situation" instead of Tidwater Fibre Corporation

4) Under the collateral provision, instead of counterparty they would like "Tidewater Fibre and ENA"

If you would like to speak directly with the counterparty, I can arrange that.

Thanks

Erik

Tracy:

Will you handle this?

Thanks!

Marie

Howdy Marie,

I don't believe that we met when I was in Houston in February, but my name is Jim Weisser, and I'm with EBS Japan. I'm working on a couple of different counterparties to get a basic understanding of the master, and how it will operate, and I was wondering if you could help me out.

Could I please receive a copy of the current master, broken up a similar fashion as before? We previously had the credit support annex, the confirm and the master as three separate documents. Also, if it's possible to get it in word form (for me to make comments on, but not to distribute--little stuff mainly) as well as PDF, that would be fantastic.

Regards,

Jim Weisser
Enron Broadband Services Japan
vox: 03-5219-4754/+81-3-5219-4754
fax: 03-5219-4510/+81-3-5219-4510

Tiffany:

Attached is the revised Annex B for the omnibus confirmation.

We have addressed the counterparty's concerns as follows:

1.	Annual vs. monthly financial statements - the annex provides for delivery of annual audited financial statements and quarterly unaudited financial statements.  It does not require delivery of monthly financial statements.

2.	We have revised Annex B to be 2- way, meaning that the provisions apply to both the counterparty and ENA.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

 

Fred:

I am passing this e-mail along to Tracy Cooper.  I am no longer with EBS and Tracy is the paralegal who took my place, so she will be assisting you on preparing master agreements.

Hope all is well!

Marie
In order to pick a path and move this deal forward, I would like to progress this deal with EBS Asia Pacific (a Singapore company) selling services to Enron Networks (a US company?).  Enron Networks can then charge back all the appropriate companies for the cost as it does with all the other services it provides.  Since we do not have a master agreement between EBS A/P and Enron Networks, I propose that we proceed along the following path:

1.  Michelle - can you please contact the appropriate Enron Networks attorney and see if he/she will execute a Master Agreement of the same form with EBS A/P
2.  Marie - if he/she will execute a new Master with EBS A/P, will you please draft, otherwise will you please submit the new short form GTCs and we will paper the deals with the GTCs

Once we have confirmed the entities and the form of document, we can quickly issue firm pricing offers, get approval from Barry on the price and issue deal tickets and start the approval process

Molly - since EBS has already transacted with Enron Networks, are we required to go thru the entire CAF process or is there a shorter process?

Our customer (Barry) has a great sense of urgency in this order and we still have significant lead times on ordering local loops so we need to resolve all issues so we can get loops on order.

Thanx for your help

Fred

Fred Cohagan
Director, Global Wholesale Services, Asia
Enron Broadband Services
Singapore Phone:  +65 838-9022
e-mail: fred_cohagan@enron.net

Gentlemen:

Pursuant to Jarrod Cyprow's request, I am attaching a clean and blacklined version of your form Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex, which reflect our comments to such forms.

Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	 

Tracy:

Look in the closing binder (the BMC binders) were on your file cabinets.  The side letter should be in there.

Marie

HI Marie

Can you help me out for a minute?  

I found the BMC executed MSA but the "sideletter" that she is talking about I don't have that in the file -- do you remember this at all?

thanks for any help you can give me!

tracy
Jane/Tanya/Tracy,

I found out last night that I have to be in LA on Monday and Tuesday.  I have left Tracy a voice mail asking her to fax me the executed BMC doc., together with the BMC sideletter, so that we can at least get the 2nd master agreement to BMC.  Maybe we could schedule the Master Netting Agreement meeting for Wednesday with a view to getting that document out Wednesday or Thursday.  Does that work for you???  Let me know.

Cynthia

Sounds good to me.

Hi Tanya and Jane

How does 1:30 p.m. work?

(Got your voice mail message Tanya -- thanks)

Just let me know

Tracy

Mike:

Pursuant to Sara Shackleton's request, I am attaching a draft form of Collateral and Exposure Provisions (two way cash only) for the Citibank transactions.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Hi, Holly!

If you update the July calendar, I have jury duty (yuk!) on July 20th.

Thanks!

Marie

 << File: SWAP_Calendar.pub >> 

Holly Keiser
ENA - Legal
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Mike:

Pending resolution of the credit annex issue, attached are drafts of the Delta Energy/ENA and Citibank/ENA confirmations.  Please contact Sara with any questions or comments.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Joe:

Attached for your further handling is Annex B for the referenced transaction.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

		

Steve:
 
I have sent the amendment to the Agency Agreement to Gary Hickerson for signature on behalf of ECT Investments, Inc.  When executed, I will fax you a copy.  How do you want to handle obtaining Michael Brown's signature?  Do you want me to send the original to you and you will coordinate getting his signature, or do you want me to send it to Michael directly?  I know Michael, so I don't have a problem with sending it directly to him, or I can certainly send it to someone in Legal in London to coordinate getting his signature.  Please let me know how you want to handle this.
 
In addition, I made a few minor changes to the amendment.  ECT Investments' name is ECT Investments, Inc. with a comma between "Investments" and "Inc.".  Also, Gary Hickerson is President of ECT Investments rather than Managing Director, and I also added his and Michael's middle initials.
 
Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.
 
Marie
 
Marie Heard 
Senior Legal Specialist 
Marie:  Please handle.  Thanks.
[Shackleton, Sara] 
Sara,
 
Could you fax me a copy of the signed amendment to the Agency Agreement.
 
Thanks,
Steve
FAX: 44 207 783 2356
 
I have attached the proposed amendment to the Agency Agreement for your review.  
 
Sara, subject to comments, I would appreciate it if you could also coordinate signatures.
 
Note that I will be out of the office until 13 August.  Please contact Janine if you have any questions/comments.
 
Kind regards,
Steve
 
Janine and Sara,
The attached memo supports the proprosal to amend the Agency Agreement to July 1st, 2001 for compensation purposes.  
Please advise.
Sheila

Joe:

A mere technicality!  Here is the revised Annex B.  Thanks for catching!

Marie

			 

Marie/Brant,

The deal in question is booked to the legal name of Inergy Partners, LLC, not Inergy Partners, LTD.  Further, per Global Counterparty, there is no entity of Inergy Partners, LTD.  Can you amend the Annex B to reflect this name?

Thanks,
Joe

Joe:

Attached for your further handling is Annex B for the referenced transaction.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 << File: 008conf(inergy).doc >> 

		

Attached for your review are the confirmations for Citibank/ENA and Delta/ENA.  Please contact Sara with any questions or comments.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Ed:

Attached are the following:

1.	ConEd's form of Schedule and Paragraph 13 and

2.	Our comparison of the above documents.

Please review the following credit related items and let me know if you are okay with ConEd's language or if you would prefer our revision:

1.	Part 1(c) - "Cross Default" - ConEd has left in the provision re cross acceleration, which we usually take out, but leave in if our counterparty is a financial institution.

2.	Part 1(d) - "Credit Event Upon Merger" - will you agree to ConEd's language?

Also, I know you said that we were just going to comment on ConEd's version without credit, but Sara wanted to know if you want to include cross-default thresholds and the same matrix we are using in the two specific transactions.

Please let me have your response to the above as soon as possible so that we can send our comments to ConEd, as they are getting pretty agitated that we are taking so long.

Thanks!

Marie

			 	 

Hi, Jay:

It's your friendly pest AGAIN!!!!!!!!

Do you have an address for me for Southern California and have you found out anything about "Petro-Hunt L.L.C." and "Petro-Hunt Corporation being the same entity?

Thanks!

Marie

Attached for your review are the revised Citibank/ENA and Delta/ENA confirmations.  I am attaching only clean copies as the compare documents note all changes, not just the ones made today.

Thanks!

Marie

			 	 

Pretty impressive!

This is quite an honor for these guys!  Thought you might be interested.

>  -----Original Message-----

Here are the revised confirms.

Thanks!

Marie

			 	 

Oops!  I was supposed to tell you that Sara is working on the Enron Corp. guaranty so we should have them to you shortly.
Here are the revised confirms.

Thanks!

Marie

			 	 

Mr. Bicker:

Pursuant to Frank Sayre's request, I am attaching a clean and blacklined copy of the draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with the draft Paragraph 13 to the Credit Support Annex, which drafts incorporate the latest comments and revisions.

Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

Thank you!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

 - HomeAlone.jpg 

Hi, Steve:
 
What is your exact location so that hopefully, the document will reach you and not float around Enron House?
 
Thanks!
 
Marie
Thanks Marie.
 
If you send the original to me (in the London tax department), I will handle getting legal to initial and Michael to sign.
 
Kind regards,
Steve
 
Steve:
 
I have sent the amendment to the Agency Agreement to Gary Hickerson for signature on behalf of ECT Investments, Inc.  When executed, I will fax you a copy.  How do you want to handle obtaining Michael Brown's signature?  Do you want me to send the original to you and you will coordinate getting his signature, or do you want me to send it to Michael directly?  I know Michael, so I don't have a problem with sending it directly to him, or I can certainly send it to someone in Legal in London to coordinate getting his signature.  Please let me know how you want to handle this.
 
In addition, I made a few minor changes to the amendment.  ECT Investments' name is ECT Investments, Inc. with a comma between "Investments" and "Inc.".  Also, Gary Hickerson is President of ECT Investments rather than Managing Director, and I also added his and Michael's middle initials.
 
Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.
 
Marie
 
Marie Heard 
Senior Legal Specialist 
Could you fax me a copy of the signed amendment to the Agency Agreement.
 
Thanks,
Steve
FAX: 44 207 783 2356
 
I have attached the proposed amendment to the Agency Agreement for your review.  
 
Sara, subject to comments, I would appreciate it if you could also coordinate signatures.
 
Note that I will be out of the office until 13 August.  Please contact Janine if you have any questions/comments.
 
Kind regards,
Steve
 
Janine and Sara,
The attached memo supports the proprosal to amend the Agency Agreement to July 1st, 2001 for compensation purposes.  
Please advise.
Sheila

Sounds great to me!  Thanks!

Attached are the revised draft confirms.

Marie

		 	 

Pursuant to Jason Williams' request, I am attaching our draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with a draft Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Craig:

Jay Williams sent a credit worksheet for Petro-Hunt, L.L.C. on 6/24.  There was a question regarding this entity, which Jay had answered by Petro-Hunt on 6/27.  I have drafted the master and once it has been reviewed by a lawyer, I will send it on to Liz Luthans.

Marie
Craig,

We are awaiting a credit worksheet on Pursue.

However, you may contact Marie Heard @ x33907, to inquire as to the status of her preparation of the Petro-Hunt ISDA draft.

 << Message: Liz Luthans >> 
Liz Luthans with Petro-Hunt said that she still has not seen the ISDA for the above referenced companies.  It has been about a month or more since we started the process. She is out of the office July 3 thru 16 and has requested that she receive both masters before she leaves on vacation so that she can review and pass on to her legal.  I'm assuming that we have everything that we need from them, since we have not requested any information for them.

Could we please finish these two up and send them on to her.

Thank you very much for your help.

Craig Breslau

Hi, Holly!

The only exceptions I have were Monday and Tuesday, June 18 and 19 were vacation days.

Thanks!

Marie

It's that time again... Time sheets will be due on Friday, June 29.  Please reply to me with your exception time for time period June 16-30, 2001.

Thank you!

Holly Keiser
ENA - Legal
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Michael:

Here they are!  I will send you copies of the pre-printed ISDA Credit Support Annex to attach to the hard copies.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

			 	 

Kristina:

As I stated, our credit department is verifying the transactions being assigned so once I receive information from them, we will contact you with any questions or comments.

Please do not hesitate to call if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Kristina:

My CompareRite feature is not working right now, but I can point out the changes we made.  The changes we made were to the final revised form that Carol St. Clair prepared, so for the most part, the changes are the same as hers with these exceptions:

2.	First "WHEREAS" paragraph - "WHEREAS, ....identified on Exhibits A and B hereto (whether one or more referred to herein collectively as the "Transactions"), under the ISDA Master Agreement dated May 14, 1998...;".

3.	Second "WHEREAS" paragraph - changed "a" to "an" before "Assignment Agreement dagted April 25, 2001".

4.	Paragraph 3 - changed "Consent and Assignment" to "Consent to Assignment".

5.	Paragraph 8 - "As of...that certain ISDA Master Agreement, dated as of June 16, 1992...".

7.	Added Exhibit A (Natural Gas Transactions) and Exhibit B (Basis Swaps).

If my CompareRite starts working, I'll try to send you a blacklined copy.

Marie 

Marie,

Could you provide me with a red-lined version of your proposed changes?  The
document you attached does not clearly point out Enron's request for
language revisions.

Thanks,

Kristina M. Drew
Contract Administrator
Merchant Energy Group of the Americas, Inc.
410.295.1708

I spoke with Frank about your proposed changes and he was okay with your first change, however,  the definition of "Investment Policy" does appear in Section 5(c)(i).  What documentation sets forth your investment objectives, restrictions, etc.?

Also, do you have any comments to the forms of guaranty agreements attached to the ISDA?

Finally, we are awaiting copies of Quark's documents, those of its Manager and those of any other relevant entities so that we can review them and verify that there are no issues that would require delivery of a legal opinion.

Thank you for your assistance.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Marie,

Thank you very much for the drafts. I believe we are almost there.
Please chack with Frank and see if the following changes are acceptable:

1. Part 5(b)(g)Eligibility.  Remove the second rep. for eligible commercial
entity.

2. Part 5(p) Additional Definitions.  Quark does not have a prospectus.  In
any
case I don't think we need this definition.

I think that may be it.

Dan

Mr. Bicker:

Pursuant to Frank Sayre's request, I am attaching a clean and blacklined
copy of the draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with
the draft Paragraph 13 to the Credit Support Annex, which drafts
incorporate the latest comments and revisions.

Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

Thank you!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 <<061Ectr (Quark Power LLC - Hedge
Fund).doc>> 	 <<061ECTR (QUARK POWER LLC - HEDGE FUND).RED.DOC>> 

Anthony:

There's not a form of assignment attached.  The attachment is your Overseas Securities Lending Agreement.

Marie

Marie:

Attached is an assignment for the OSLA signed in 1997, they may work.
Please review and let me know if you have any comments.

Anthony

 - Enron - ECT Invest OPT.doc << File: Enron - ECT Invest OPT.doc >> 

Okay.  Do you want me to just walk down to your office?

Molly, Sandy and I went to City Hall & Library at lunch.  They're so cute!
I see Enron has some.  Wanna go after work?

http://houston.cowparade.net/

Ms. Luthans:

Attached are drafts of the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  I will forward a hard copy of the complete ISDA Master Agreement to you via overnight courier.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

I guess it would help if I attached the documents.  Sorry!  Here they are.

		 

Thank you for your email; however, there were no attachments. Would you try
again. Thanks, Liz Luthans

Ms. Luthans:

Attached are drafts of the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement,
together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  I will
forward a hard copy of the complete ISDA Master Agreement to you via
overnight courier.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any
questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Hi, Jaime:

Attached for your further handling is the draft ISDA Master Agreement between ENA and the referenced counterparty.  Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

				 

Becky:

I didn't have anything for her, so I can't complete the review form.

Marie

Your comments are needed for Norma Gundersen who sat in for Rae Meadows.  Please return as soon as possible.  Thank you!-Becky
		
	Excellent = 5       Above Average = 4      Average = 3            Below Average = 2            Poor = 1

	Initiative

	Cooperation

	Punctuality

	Attendance

	Quality of Work

Would you request this person again Y/N?

Comments:

Francisco:

Here is the CA for Procter & Gamble Manufactura.

Marie

			 

Enrique:

Pursuant to Francisco's request, I am attaching for your further handling a draft Confidentiality Agreement between ENA and the referenced counterparty.  Please let us know if you have any questions or comments or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Joe:

Please update the attached list and forward to Jay Williams and me.

Thanks!

Marie
Sara/Jay,

The deals on this attachment are not listed in the schedules on the Documents.

Thanks,
Joe

 

Dan:

Attached are clean and blackline drafts of the ISDA Master Agreement noting your changes to Parts 5(b)(g)-"Eligibility" and 5(p)-"Additional Definitions".  If the attached revisions are acceptable, we should be in a position to finalize execution documents.

Did your lawyer have any comments to the guaranty forms?

Thanks!

Marie

		 	 

Marie,

I think it's OK to just refer to the LLC Agreement. But you will see there
really aren't any restrictions in Quark's case.  The investment guidelines
are outlined in the LLC Agreement (Section 1.2 "Purposes").

Let me know what you think is best.

Dan

I spoke with Frank about your proposed changes and he was okay with your
first change, however,  the definition of "Investment Policy" does appear
in Section 5(c)(i).  What documentation sets forth your investment
objectives, restrictions, etc.?

Also, do you have any comments to the forms of guaranty agreements attached
to the ISDA?

Finally, we are awaiting copies of Quark's documents, those of its Manager
and those of any other relevant entities so that we can review them and
verify that there are no issues that would require delivery of a legal
opinion.

Thank you for your assistance.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Dan+20Bicker+20+3CDBicker+40paloma+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON
.com]

   Sent:   Friday, June 29, 2001 12:06 PM
   Marie,

   Thank you very much for the drafts. I believe we are almost there.
   Please chack with Frank and see if the following changes are acceptable:

   1. Part 5(b)(g)Eligibility.  Remove the second rep. for eligible
   commercial
   entity.

   2. Part 5(p) Additional Definitions.  Quark does not have a prospectus.
   In
   any
   case I don't think we need this definition.

   I think that may be it.

   Dan

   -----Original Message-----
   Mr. Bicker:

   Pursuant to Frank Sayre's request, I am attaching a clean and blacklined
   copy of the draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with
   the draft Paragraph 13 to the Credit Support Annex, which drafts
   incorporate the latest comments and revisions.

   Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

   Thank you!

   Marie Heard
   Senior Legal Specialist
                      <<061Ectr (Quark Power LLC - Hedge
   Fund).doc>>        <<061ECTR (QUARK POWER LLC - HEDGE FUND).RED.DOC>>

Anthony:

Attached for your review are clean and blacklined copies of your form of assignment, which note our comments.  Please let me know if the attached changes are acceptable.

The only outstanding issue on our executing the new OSLA in favor of Morgan Stanley Securities Limited is our review of the Borrower's warranties which were not a part of the OSLA we executed with Morgan Stanley & Co. International Limited.

Thanks!

Marie

		   

Marie:

Attached is an assignment for the OSLA signed in 1997, they may work.
Please review and let me know if you have any comments.

Anthony

 - Enron - ECT Invest OPT.doc << File: Enron - ECT Invest OPT.doc >> 

Samantha:

Can you let Banu know the status of the CA?

Thanks!

Marie
Did you speak with Banu yesterday?  If not can you call her with an update?  
Thanks, Brent

Hi Brent-

I will be out of the office in the next two weeks and will not have access to e-mail.. Could you please let Joana Ryan or Larry Marcus know about the progress with the AEGIS Confidentiality Agreement in my absence.. We are waiting for the agreement to be signed to progress with our work with them..

Thank you,
Banu Ozcan

I have not received any response as of yet.
hi Brent-
Did we hear back from them? Is is still being negotiated? Please let me know..

I am attaching a revised Confidentiality Agreement modifying the agreement to cover both parties.  I have also attempted to incorporate language addressing the issues you raised below.  Please review my draft and contact me with any questions or comments.  

 << File: AEGISCA06-26-01.doc >> 

Regards,
Brent Hendry

 
I have been assisting Ron Bertrand in reviewing the proposed Confidentiality Agreement between Enron and AEGIS.  The original proposal was for a confidentiality agreement running to the benefit of AEGIS.  A subsequent comment from Sara Shackelton, however indicates that a two-way agreement is necessary.  As such there are several issues clauses that must be included to address issues unique to underwriting insurance.  Specifically (a) confidential information supplied in order to induce AEGIS to underwrite an insurance policy must be warranted (as in any insurance application), (b) AEGIS needs the right to share such information with reinsurers (who can be held to a confidentiality agreement), and (c) if a policy is purchased AEGIS need to retain the information in case there are any enforcement disputes that might turn on the application information.  The AEGIS standard confidentiality agreement used in underwriting situations is attached.
With regard to the revised draft of June 22nd. I note, in addition to the issues mentioned above, that the governing law provision is somewhat contradictory to the arbitration provisions and that the assumption in section 7 that confidentiality provisions will be incorporated in to the definitive agreement is usually not true for insurance policies.
Please feel free to contact me directly (201-521-4691) to conclude this matter. 
 <<underwriting.DOC>> 

 - underwriting.DOC

I'll be ready and waiting!

I'm scared to go up near your desk.  I'll wear protective gear.  Thanks for your understanding.  I will not tell you my temp number either for I fear much!

Tomorrow is fine.

Well, I'll be on the legal floor tomorrow.  Do you want me to just drop by your office then?  Or do you need it now?

Boy, I'm REALLY mad at you!  Just kidding!  I thought you were just going to initial the signature pages and then we would get Kevin to sign it here.  Since you're in town, I can run the originals down to you (if you'll tell me where you are) so that you can initial and then I can ask Kevin to sign.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

Don't be mad.  I have not gotten it signed.  When I was ready to do so, Belden was unreachable.  Then I suddenly forgot prior to rushing down to H-town.  What do you want me to do now?  Get Kevin this week?  or Get Tim on Tues. after Labor Day?  Are you really mad?  I'm sorry.  Please advise on how I can try and do damage control.

Tracy

Hi, Tracy!

I have never received the signature pages for the Allegheny ISDA.  Have you sent them?

Mare

My heart skipped a beat when I read "Today is my last day...".  I thought you were leaving Enron.  Thank goodness you are only moving to a different group.  Congratulations and look forward to working with you in your new job!

Marie

	Today is my last day in the Deal Compliance group (six years, if you can believe that!).  As of Monday, I will be in the CommodityLogic group and will ultimately be hounding all of you from a different angle.  Thanks to all for your help over the years.
	
	Joe Hunter will also be leaving the group as of next Friday, so here are the future contacts:

	Financial Trades				Diane Anderson
						Phone:  X30443

	Physical Nat Gas			Ellen Wallumrod
						Phone:  X54099

	Director					Kim Theriot
						Phone:  X31771

Hi, George:

Attached for your review are our comments to your form of Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.

I am also attaching for your review, a proposed amendment to the Confirmation for Deal No. 514094.01.

I will be out of the office from Thursday, July 5 through Monday, July 9.  If you have any questions during this time, please do not hesitate to contact Sara Shackleton at (713) 853-5620.

We look forward to hearing your comments.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	 

Hi, Jaime:

Attached are the revised draft ISDA Schedule and Paragraph 13, reflecting the counterparty's collateral threshold to be "$7,000,000" rather than "$5,000,000".  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

			 

Janelle:

As a condition to ENA entering into any new transactions with ConEd, Credit is requiring that ConEd execute the Amendment to Confirmation for Deal No. 514094.01 (to make sure both deals have identical credit).

Should you enter into a transaction with ConEd, and they haven't signed the amendment to the existing transaction, the new transaction may have to be unwound.

Please let us know if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Aparna!

Please copy me on e-mails forwarding credit worksheets as I am responsible for assigning them to the paralegals.

Thanks!

Marie
For the rotation.

Jim,

I have reviewed the financials of Rand-Whitney and a revised ISDA worksheet was sent out to Legal on 5/22/2001. The credit provisions did not change except for the fact that the credit threshold was increased to $1.0 million. 

Stepanie,

Could you please have an ISDA drafted for Rand-Whitney based on the attached spreadsheet ? Thanks.

 
Aparna Rajaram
Ph: (713) 345-4563
Fax: (713) 853-9476
Aparna.Rajaram@enron.com

CONGRATULATIONS!!!!!!!  We've been asking everyday if anyone had heard if the "Babies Elliott" had arrived.  Glad to hear that they are all healthy and were a good size, and that Mom is doing well.  Look forward to seeing pictures of the little ones.  I know you all are going to have so much fun with them.  Hope you've been storing up sleep, cause it looks like you won't be getting much for a while.

Again, congratulations.  These three little ones don't realize how lucky they are to have such a nice Dad, but I'm sure they'll find out soon.

Take care

Marie

Ladies and gentlemen,

This is just to let you know that Emma gave birth at week 34 on Friday, 6th July, to our triplets:

Benjamin James - at 12.45 pm - 3 lbs 4 ozs

Toby William - 12.46 pm - 4 lbs

Hannah May - 12.48 pm - 3 lbs 15 ozs.

Although small, they are all "fully functioning" and very well - they are in the lowest level of special care (and they will probably be in there for another two to four weeks) until they can feed properly and maintain their weights.  Emma is fine, too - very well!!

All the best and kind regards

Mark   

Hi, Cindy!

Attached is a memo requesting the referenced Enron Corp. guaranty.  Also attached are forms of certificates to be signed by Kate Cole.  Please note that one of the certificates requires the inclusion of articles of incorporation and bylaws.

Please call me when the documents are ready and I'll have someone pick them up.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

		 	 

Our group is going out for lunch today.  I'm free tomorrow and maybe Friday.

  Marie,

  Are you available to have lunch with Jane and I today?  If not, we can try again later in the week.

Carol:

Please copy me on e-mails forwarding credit worksheets to Legal.  It's now my turn to assign the worksheets among the paralegals.

Thanks!

Marie
For the rotation.  We sent draft to these two at the end of last year and will need to do new drafts now.

Please find attached new ISPAt Inland and ISPAT Mexicana ISDA worksheets.

Please call me with any questions.

Regards,

Carol North

  

Thursday works for me!

How about Thursday - I have a feeling there will be a great deal to discuss.

Jane Wilhite
ext. 35063

Either day works for me - how about you Jane?

Our group is going out for lunch today.  I'm free tomorrow and maybe Friday.

  Marie,

  Are you available to have lunch with Jane and I today?  If not, we can try again later in the week.

I'll see y'all at 11:30 unless I hear otherwise.

11:30?

Thursday works for me!

How about Thursday - I have a feeling there will be a great deal to discuss.

Jane Wilhite
ext. 35063

Either day works for me - how about you Jane?

Our group is going out for lunch today.  I'm free tomorrow and maybe Friday.

  Marie,

  Are you available to have lunch with Jane and I today?  If not, we can try again later in the week.

We have received an executed financial Master Agreement:

Type of Contract:		ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:			May 30, 2001

Counterparty:			Petro-Hunt, L.L.C.

Transactions Covered:		Approved for all products with the exception of:  Foreign Exchange

Governing Law:			Texas

Special Handling Requirements:	No special handling requirements

Copies will be distributed.

I sure did!  thanks!

Marie,
	Just making sure you received my fax of the guarantee for ConAgra.

Max

Jarrod:

I have checked our database and here is what I found:

Clorox - nothing has happened since you contacted them in May and they said they would send it in a few weeks.

Nestle - nothing since we sent them a revised draft in July, 1998.

Let us know if you want us to follow up with them.

Marie

We sent an ISDA to Clorox and Nestle USA and I was wondering if we have received anything from them.

Thanks,

Jarrod Cyprow
Enron Forest Products
1400 Smith
Houston, TX 77002
(713) 853-5700
jcyprow@enron.com

I did locate our comments to Nestle's form of schedule originally drafted for Nestle Holdings, Inc., which they revised to reflect Nestle USA, Inc.  These comments were delivered to Ed Quinn on 5/21/99 to deliver to Nestle.  To our knowledge, nothing has happened since.

O.K. Thanks,

I thought we had sent nestle USA another draft recently?

Jarrod:

I have checked our database and here is what I found:

Clorox - nothing has happened since you contacted them in May and they said they would send it in a few weeks.

Nestle - nothing since we sent them a revised draft in July, 1998.

Let us know if you want us to follow up with them.

Marie

We sent an ISDA to Clorox and Nestle USA and I was wondering if we have received anything from them.

Thanks,

Jarrod Cyprow
Enron Forest Products
1400 Smith
Houston, TX 77002
(713) 853-5700
jcyprow@enron.com

Mr. Perkins:

Pursuant to Veronica Espinoza's request, I am attaching the following for your review:

2.	Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex between ENA and Georgia Power Company.

3.	Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex between ENA and Mississippi Power Company.

Please do not hesitate to contact either Brent Hendry, Senior Counsel at (713) 853-7124 (brent.hendry@enron.com) or me should you have any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 	 

Mr. Perkins:

Pursuant to Veronica Espinoza's request, I am attaching the following for your review:

2.	Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex between ENA and Georgia Power Company.

3.	Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex between ENA and Mississippi Power Company.

Please do not hesitate to contact either Brent Hendry, Senior Counsel at (713) 853-7124 (brent.hendry@enron.com) or me should you have any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 	 

I received a voice mail from George Diskin today and he would like to schedule a conference call on either August 6 or August 7 at either 12:00 or 1:00 (Houston time).

Will you let me know what will work for each of you so that I can coordinate with George.

Thanks!

Marie

Holly:

I had vacation time on July 5, 6 and 9.

Thanks!

Marie

Timesheets will be due this pay period on Friday, July 13.  Please let me know your exception time for July 1-15, 2001.

Thank you!

Holly Keiser
ENA - Legal
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Hi, Cindy!

Attached are a memo requesting the referenced Enron Corp. guaranty, together with a form of Certificate of Incumbency.  Please let me know when the documents are ready and I'll send someone to pick them up.

Thanks!

Marie

		 	 

Hope this reaches you this time.

Marie
Mr. Perkins:

Pursuant to Veronica Espinoza's request, I am attaching the following for your review:

2.	Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex between ENA and Georgia Power Company.

3.	Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex between ENA and Mississippi Power Company.

Please do not hesitate to contact either Brent Hendry, Senior Counsel at (713) 853-7124 (brent.hendry@enron.com) or me should you have any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 	 

That's fine.  I'll direct the comments to the appropriate individuals.

Marie

I got it.  Should I send our comments back to you?

Thanks,
Todd Perkins
Southern Company
404-506-0655

Veronica:

There shouldn't be a legal reason why we can't do this, however, we will need copies of all the Enron Corp. guaranties (and any amendments thereto), together with details of all contracts that will be covered.  Also, has Oneok Energy Marketing and Trading Company, L.P. provided any incoming guaranties and, if so, do we want to consolidate those?

Marie

Legal Team--

ONEOK Energy Marketing and Trading Company, L.P. would like to replace the current Gty's that Enron has issued to them and receive one overall gty to cover the financial and physical business with ENA, ECC, ENA Upstream Company, LLC, EPMI, EES and EGLI.  This would include the trading executed under the ISDA, GISB, and GTC's.  In executing this new gty, we would simultaneously cancel the existing outgoing Gty's that we have out to them already.  The cap amount on this new Gty would be $75MM.

Can you please advise whether this is acceptable or not so that I can tell the counterparty--we're currently avoiding posting cash on a Margin call as ONEOK will accept a higher Gty amount to cover their exposure.

Thanks,

Veronica

Francisco has requested that anytime we email a Deemed ISDA for a Mexican counterparty to the Confirm Desk, we ask them to return a copy, signed by the counterparty, to us as soon as they receive it back.  When we receive the signed copy, we should give it to Francisco.

Thanks!

Marie

We have received the following executed financial Master Agreement:

Type of Contract:		ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:			July 10, 2001

Counterparty:			Quark Power LLC

Transactions Covered:		Approved for all products with the exception of:  Foreign Exchange

Choice of Law:			New York

Copies will be distributed.

It's hard to say "Quark".  I want to call it "Quack".

what a strange name for a company...but I shouldn't talk!!!

We have received the following executed financial Master Agreement:

Type of Contract:=09=09ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:=09=09=09July 10, 2001

Counterparty:=09=09=09Quark Power LLC

Transactions Covered:=09=09Approved for all products with the exception of:=
  Foreign Exchange

Choice of Law:=09=09=09New York

Copies will be distributed.

(A)  "Independent Amount" means with respect to a party, the amount specified as such for that party in each Confirmation, or if no amount is specified, zero.

[(A)  "Independent Amount" means with respect to Party A, the amount specified as such for Party A in each Confirmation, or if no amount is specified, zero and means with respect to Party B, the amount calculated as follows: on any Business Day, Party A shall have the right to adjust the Independent Amount due from Party B due to changes in the volatility of relevant markets or of Party B's portfolio of transactions with Party A ("Party B's Portfolio").  Party A will calculate such Independent Amount based on its internal Value at Risk ("VAR") calculation for up to ten (10) days of VAR with respect to Party B's Portfolio, provided, however, that in no event shall Party B's Independent Amount be less than $250,000 if there are any outstanding transactions.]

Bianca:

Attached for your further handling are the Deemed ISDA for Total International Limited, together with a fax cover page.  Please let us know when you receive the signed Deemed ISDA back and whether or not the counterparty returns the documentation requested in the fax cover page.  If you have any questions, please give me a call.

Thanks!

Marie

			 	 

The conference call with Consolidated Edison has been scheduled for Monday, August 6 at 1:00 in Sara's office (EB3801A).  Please let me know if something comes up that you will not be able to attend so that I can inform George Diskin at ConEd.

Thanks!

Marie

Well, it's about time!

Please prepare and e-mail a draft ISDA per terms of the attached credit worksheet.

thanks
brant

 << File: Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority.xls >> 

I just spoke to Anne and we decided that we would suffer and go eat supper with you and Mama tomorrow night, so we guess we'll just see y'all at Mass and then decide where to go.

Me

 
Good morning!  Maw and I are taking Poupee to PetSmart
tomorrow afternoon (2:00) to be groomed and will go to
Mama's half-price bookstore out on Frye Road, and
we'll be going to Mass at St. Cecilia's.  Will y'all
be there, too, and we can go eat supper after and
visit for a while?  Let me know if you can and if so,
we'll see y'all manana.      Me

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get personalized email addresses from Yahoo! Mail
http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/
  - att1.eml << File: att1.eml >> 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Aparna:

Regarding your e-mail asking us to prepare a confidentiality agreement, below is an e-mail from Tana Jones forwarding two forms of CAs to Credit so that you all can prepare your CAs requesting financials without having to ask Legal to prepare it.  The CA must be initialed by a lawyer prior to signing by either Bill or Rick, and a copy of the fully executed CA must be sent to Kay Young in Legal.  Let us know if you have any questions.

Marie
At the request of Credit, we have developed a form of Confidentiality Agreement for Credit to use when a Confidentiality Agreement is being prepared to obtain financial statements from a counterparty.  Credit should be able to send this form directly to a counterparty without having to go through Legal to draft the agreement.  We ask that Credit ensure following procedures are complied with.

1.  We are providing two forms.  One form is for all US and Canadian counterparties.  Mexican counterparties need a special form which is also attached below.
2.  The only change that should be made to the form is inserting the counterparty's name and address.  Please make sure you have the correct legal name of the counterparty.  NO OTHER CHANGES SHOULD BE MADE TO THE FORM.
3.  Pursuant to company policy, the agreements must be initialed by a lawyer before they can be executed.
4.  Bill Bradford or Rick Buy can execute the agreement.
5.  A copy of the fully executed agreement MUST BE PROVIDED TO KAY YOUNG IN LEGAL.  THIS IS CRITICAL!!!

If you have any questions please do not hesitate to call me a x33399.

 

 

Joe:

Attached is the Annex B for each of Wexford Spectrum Investors LLC and Solitair Corp.  As I stated in my voicemail, please do not send these out until you get the okay from either Frank Sayre or me.  We are waiting to receive the underlying documentation from Caroline Abramo re eligibility, etc.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		  

That's okay.  I'll call you before I leave.

If you want to.  There are a couple of cows around your building, but we
could drive there after we see the ones at City Hall.  What do you think?
Me

Okay.  Do you want me to just walk down to your office?

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Heard+2C+20Anne+22+20+3CAnne+5FHeard+40RyderScott+2Eco
m+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Friday, September 07, 2001 2:29 PM
   Molly, Sandy and I went to City Hall & Library at lunch.  They're so
   cute!
   I see Enron has some.  Wanna go after work?

   http://houston.cowparade.net/

Tony:

Attached are forms of resolutions authorizing the opening of brokerage agreements, together with a form of authorized traders list.  I don't know if Sara told you or not, but we typically require two signatories to open brokerage accounts.  Presently, our resolutions reflect Cassandra Schultz, Vice President of Risk Assessment and Control Group, a Division of Enron Corp. as being authorized, however, we have just learned that she hasn't been officially elected to this office, so in the interim, we will have Rick Buy be our second signature.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

	 		 

Jim:

Attached is the form of confidentiality agreement that Sara made reference to in her voice mail.

Thanks!

Marie
At the request of Credit, we have developed a form of Confidentiality Agreement for Credit to use when a Confidentiality Agreement is being prepared to obtain financial statements from a counterparty.  Credit should be able to send this form directly to a counterparty without having to go through Legal to draft the agreement.  We ask that Credit ensure following procedures are complied with.

1.  We are providing two forms.  One form is for all US and Canadian counterparties.  Mexican counterparties need a special form which is also attached below.
2.  The only change that should be made to the form is inserting the counterparty's name and address.  Please make sure you have the correct legal name of the counterparty.  NO OTHER CHANGES SHOULD BE MADE TO THE FORM.
3.  Pursuant to company policy, the agreements must be initialed by a lawyer before they can be executed.
4.  Bill Bradford or Rick Buy can execute the agreement.
5.  A copy of the fully executed agreement MUST BE PROVIDED TO KAY YOUNG IN LEGAL.  THIS IS CRITICAL!!!

If you have any questions please do not hesitate to call me a x33399.

 

 

I hope to have the signed guaranty today.  All the Enron Corp. officers authorized to sign guaranties were out the latter part of last week, so the Legal Department was going to have to find someone today to sign the guaranties.  As soon as I receive it, I will fax it to you and send the original, together with the other documents to you by overnight courier.

Marie

Marie,

Can you give me an update? Let me know if the Guaranty was executed and if
on the way.

Dan Bicker
Paloma Partners Mgmt. Co.
(203) 861-8432

Hi, Tanya!

Jay said that he has passed AK Steel along to you to look at.  I told him that I thought things were passed down the chain, not up and he said that when you are as good as he his, they are passed up the chain.  You may have something different to say about this.

Anyway, Chris Motley at AK is calling checking on the status of the ISDA.  We originally were going to have it signed, but when Samantha called Jay about initialling, he said Credit wanted to revisit the credit, so can you let me know the status so that I can tell Chris?

Thanks!

Marie

I was wondering who Miguel was and now I know.

Miguel aka Francisco......

Francisco Pinto-Leite
Enron Americas
1400 Smith Street, EB 3888 
Houston, TX 77002-7361

Tel: 713-345-7942
Fax:713-646-3490
fleite@enron.com

Per my conversation with Miguel, we will leave only the Unilateral Mac trigger in the ISDA, and hold of on the specific MAC triggers.

Regards,

Carol

In connection with Tana Jones' e-mail of July 12, 2001, I am attaching revised forms of the Credit Confidentiality Agreements for use in requesting financial statements from a counterparty.  Please begin using the attached forms when preparing confidentiality agreements and please refer to Tana's e-mail regarding procedures for preparing and signing the agreements.

If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to call me at x33907.

 

  

Hi, Gordon!

Will you send us a copy of the termination when it is sent to Grupo MINSA?

Thanks!

Marie

A deal was closed yesterday, 7/17/01 with Grupo MINSA (deal #VG5833.3).  Please prepare a termination agreement (to replace the Deemed ISDA usually sent out as the confirm).

Thanks again--Veronica

Legal Team--

Attached below is a credit worksheet for deal #VG5833.1, trade date 6/12/01, executed with Grupo MINSA, SA de CV.  Please prepare a Deemed ISDA confirmation.

Thanks,

Veronica Espinoza

 

Hi, Diane!

I just sent Gordon this e-mail asking him to send us a copy of the termination when sent to Grupo MINSA and received his "out of office" reply.  Will you or whoever prepares the termination send a copy to me?

Thanks!

Marie
Hi, Gordon!

Will you send us a copy of the termination when it is sent to Grupo MINSA?

Thanks!

Marie

A deal was closed yesterday, 7/17/01 with Grupo MINSA (deal #VG5833.3).  Please prepare a termination agreement (to replace the Deemed ISDA usually sent out as the confirm).

Thanks again--Veronica

Legal Team--

Attached below is a credit worksheet for deal #VG5833.1, trade date 6/12/01, executed with Grupo MINSA, SA de CV.  Please prepare a Deemed ISDA confirmation.

Thanks,

Veronica Espinoza

 

Just cc: us on the copy.

Thanks!

Certainly.  Do you mean that you want to see it before it goes out, or just to cc: you a copy?  It's all ready to go on my side,
I'm just waiting for them to book the annuity payment in the system.  

Diane

Hi, Diane!

I just sent Gordon this e-mail asking him to send us a copy of the termination when sent to Grupo MINSA and received his "out of office" reply.  Will you or whoever prepares the termination send a copy to me?

Thanks!

Marie
Hi, Gordon!

Will you send us a copy of the termination when it is sent to Grupo MINSA?

Thanks!

Marie

A deal was closed yesterday, 7/17/01 with Grupo MINSA (deal #VG5833.3).  Please prepare a termination agreement (to replace the Deemed ISDA usually sent out as the confirm).

Thanks again--Veronica

Legal Team--

Attached below is a credit worksheet for deal #VG5833.1, trade date 6/12/01, executed with Grupo MINSA, SA de CV.  Please prepare a Deemed ISDA confirmation.

Thanks,

Veronica Espinoza

 << File: Grupo MINSA Deemed ISDA.xls >> 

My location is EB3803B, company number is 0413, and cost center is 105657.

Could you please verify your location, company number, and cost center? This information is needed to update our database for Facilities Planning. Your help in this matter will be greatly appreciated.

Thanks,

Joel Johnson
EPSC
713-345-7778
joel.daniel.johnson@enron.com

Sure, but we'll need the same info for them.

Marie--

I will get all of the copies pulled for you.  Also, I would like to have it reciprocated (so can I have a draft so that I can forward to ONEOK?).

Thanks--Veronica

Veronica:

There shouldn't be a legal reason why we can't do this, however, we will need copies of all the Enron Corp. guaranties (and any amendments thereto), together with details of all contracts that will be covered.  Also, has Oneok Energy Marketing and Trading Company, L.P. provided any incoming guaranties and, if so, do we want to consolidate those?

Marie

Legal Team--

ONEOK Energy Marketing and Trading Company, L.P. would like to replace the current Gty's that Enron has issued to them and receive one overall gty to cover the financial and physical business with ENA, ECC, ENA Upstream Company, LLC, EPMI, EES and EGLI.  This would include the trading executed under the ISDA, GISB, and GTC's.  In executing this new gty, we would simultaneously cancel the existing outgoing Gty's that we have out to them already.  The cap amount on this new Gty would be $75MM.

Can you please advise whether this is acceptable or not so that I can tell the counterparty--we're currently avoiding posting cash on a Margin call as ONEOK will accept a higher Gty amount to cover their exposure.

Thanks,

Veronica

Holly:

I don't remember if I told you the specific date that my jury duty has been rescheduled to, but if not, it's now scheduled for Friday, September 28.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Candace:

Yes, I have received the document and will do my best to get it signed today and returned to you by fax.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

Just a quick note to let you know that I have faxed to you at 11.27 GMT to fax number; 001 713 646 3490.

Please let me know if you have not received the 4 paged document.

Yours sincerely,

Candace Hurdle
Compliance Department

020 7716 8025
020 7294 0224

Investments in futures, options and foreign exchange can fluctuate in value, investors should therefore be aware that they may not realise the initial amount invested, and indeed may incur additional liabilities. Investments in futures, options and foreign exchange entail above average risk, investors should therefore carefully consider whether their financial circumstances permit them to invest and, if necessary, seek the advice of an independent financial advisor.  Some services described are not available to private inexperienced investors.  Services may also not be available to certain customers due to regulatory constraints either in the United Kingdom or elsewhere.

The contents of this electronic mail may have been changed without the knowledge of the sender.

ADM Investor Services International Limited does not, and will not, consider itself legally bound by the contents of any electronic mail which appears to have originated from within the Company.

If you believe you have been sent an e-mail from ADM Investor Services International Limited which is inappropriate, please contact the Compliance Department on 44 (0) 20 7716 8024.

ADM Investor Services International Limited is regulated by Securities and Futures Authority Limited.

ADM Investor Services International Limited is a member of The London Stock Exchange.

Max:

I will get the amendment to you today.

Marie

Good Morning,
	For the below request, I have just received the amended guarantee from Cindy Richardson.  If you have the amended ISDA, I'd like to forward this to Russell Martinson.  
	Also, for Kona oil and gas properties draft ISDA, they want a draft ASAP for their legal to review.  If you can send the draft to me today I'll forward to the apporpriate party.  

Thanks,
Max

All,
	Per Jay Williams approval, Russell Martinson of ConAgra Energy Services has requested an increase in Enron's outgoing guarantee of ENA to $30million from $20million.  In return, Enron has requested amendment to the ISDA giving ENA a credit threshold of $25million, up from $12.5million.  There will be no change in ConAgra credit.  Please prepare the appropriate amendments of the guarantee and ISDA to forward to Russell.  I am working on getting the mailing address to forward these documents, and will send it to you all once I receive it.  Please coordinate so both amendments can be sent at the same time.  
	If you have any questions, don't hesitate to call either Jay or myself.  

Thanks,

Max Sonnonstine
x 58261

Credit has been instructed that either Rick Buy or Bill can sign the CA's.  Since these were strictly for financials (and signed by Enron Corp.), we weren't going to enter them into our database, but Kay Young is going to keep a copy in her files.  Do you have any suggestions or comments otherwise?

Does credit know a VP must sign?  I guess none of these are recorded in legal's C.A. database, right?

In connection with Tana Jones' e-mail of July 12, 2001, I am attaching revised forms of the Credit Confidentiality Agreements for use in requesting financial statements from a counterparty.  Please begin using the attached forms when preparing confidentiality agreements and please refer to Tana's e-mail regarding procedures for preparing and signing the agreements.

If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to call me at x33907.

 << File: Credit Department Confidentiality Agmt (counterparty protected party 07-18-01).doc >> 

 << File: Credit Department Confidentiality Agmt (Mexico) (counterparty protected party 07-18-01).doc >>  

Max:

Per our conversation, attached is the draft First Amendment to Master Agreement.  If these changes are acceptable to the counterparty, they can either sign two originals and send to us for signature or, we can sign first and then forward to them.  If they have any questions, they can call either Frank Sayre (x57894) or me (x33907).

Thanks!

Marie

	 

Agustin:

Per Francisco's request, I am attaching the clean and blacklined draft of the ISDA Master Agreement for Fersinsa.  Let us know if you need anything else.

Marie

	 	  

Joe:

Attached for your further handling is a "sample" confirm.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

 

Here are the appropriate tax reps.

U.S. WITHHOLDING TAX

Part 3.=09Agreement to Deliver Documents.
[Insert the following module in its entirety for what appears in Part 3 of =
the Schedule where it states: "Insert appropriate Tax Forms Module"]
=20
Party B=09United States Internal Revenue Service FormW--8BEN, or any succes=
sor form =09(i) At execution of this Master Agreement and as otherwise prov=
ided in this Part 3, (ii) before the first Scheduled Payment Date under thi=
s Master Agreement, (ii) before the first Scheduled Payment Date in each th=
ird successive calendar year, (iii) promptly upon reasonable demand by Part=
y A, and (iv) promptly upon learning that any such form previously provided=
 by Party B has become obsolete or incorrect =09Yes=09

Hi Marie

I'm doing an ISDA for a Netherlands company and have a question.  Under the=
 Schedule Section to the ISDA in Part 3 --the "Agreement to Deliver Documen=
ts" section-- specifically the "Form/Document/Certificate" portion of the s=
ection --  Party A EGSS will be provide a U.S. Internal Revenue Service For=
m W-9 -- what is the documentation  that a foreign company would be providi=
ng to us ?

Cynthia and I called Beth Wapner from tax and she didn't know the answer --=
 Cynthia suggested I try you --=20

thanks for your help

tracy

 
Dear MARIE,
____________________________________________________________

             T  I  C  K  E  T  M  A  S  T  E  R

     E  X  C  L  U  S  I  V  E     P  R  E  S  A  L  E
____________________________________________________________

This fall, join Neil Diamond on his upcoming tour and make
some beautiful noise. Neil Diamond has been a mainstay of
American popular music for nearly forty years. See him live!

Visit Ticketmaster on July 17 and register for our exclusive
pre-sale. This is your chance to get tickets before the
general public. You'll get a code allowing you to purchase
pre-sale tickets starting July 22.
http://clicks.u0u0.net/v/u/0718tmh5/marie_heard@enron.net

His hits are sung by millions old and young. Pre-order Neil
Diamond's latest work, Three Chord Opera purchase from J&R
Music World.
http://clicks.u0u0.net/v/u/0718jnr5/marie_heard@enron.net

Sign on to AOL and check out Neil Diamond on the Welcome
screen. Not a member? Join now.
http://clicks.u0u0.net/v/u/0718aol5/marie_heard@enron.net

____________________________________________________________

             H  E  L  P  F  U  L     H  I  N  T
____________________________________________________________

If you haven't already, we HIGHLY recommend you register
your billing info online with Express Ordering. It's the
fastest way to order tickets, and only takes a few minutes
to create your account. To sign up now for Express Ordering
click below:
http://clicks.u0u0.net/v/u/0718tmt5/marie_heard@enron.net

____________________________________________________________

         T  O     U  N  S  U  B  S  C  R  I  B  E
____________________________________________________________

This mail is never sent unsolicited. Your Email Address:
marie_heard@enron.net is in our mailing list.
This is a Ticketmaster mailing. If you would prefer to not
be included in future mailings, simply hit reply and type
UNSUBSCRIBE in the subject line and you will be removed
from this mailing list.

************************************************************
Ticketmaster makes every effort to include updated and
accurate information in this email.  Unfortunately, changes,
cancellations and/or postponements might occur after the
email is distributed. We apologize for any inconvenience.
Supplies are limited.  Orders will be filled on a first come
first served basis.  Prices do not include facility fees,
handling charges, shipping or Ticketmaster charges.
PLEASE DO NOT REPLY TO THIS EMAIL. YOU WILL NOT RECEIVE A
RESPONSE. IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS OR COMMENTS, CONTACT US:
http://clicks.u0u0.net/v/u/0718tmc5/marie_heard@enron.net
************************************************************

  - att1.htm 
  - att2.eml 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Mr. Yaish:

At Sara Shackleton's request, I am attaching a blacklined draft of the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex, which reflect changes made to the 3/30/01 draft.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 

			
 

If you're scheduled for 9/4, you've missed it, but I guess you really mean 9/11.  Don't you just love a smart aleck?

Joanne Rozycki
Senior Administrative Assistant

I'll take care of this.  Sara and I were expecting these documents.

Thanks!

Marie

(See attached file: Euroclear Single Pledgor Pledged Acct Agrmnt.pdf)(See
attached file: Euroclear Collateral Addendum to GCCA rev. Sep 7, 2000.doc)
(See attached file: Chase NY Law Clearance Agrmnt  June 12, 2001.doc)(See
attached file: GTA_LEG AGREEMENT.doc)
 - Euroclear Single Pledgor Pledged Acct Agrmnt.pdf << File: Euroclear Single Pledgor Pledged Acct Agrmnt.pdf >> 
 - Euroclear Collateral Addendum to GCCA rev. Sep 7, 2000.doc << File: Euroclear Collateral Addendum to GCCA rev. Sep 7, 2000.doc >> 
 - Chase NY Law Clearance Agrmnt  June 12, 2001.doc << File: Chase NY Law Clearance Agrmnt  June 12, 2001.doc >> 
 - GTA_LEG AGREEMENT.doc << File: GTA_LEG AGREEMENT.doc >> 

Ms. Marquez:

Attached are an original and blacklined copy of your form of guaranty, which reflect our comments.  Please do not hesitate to contact either Francisco Pinto-Leite, Senior Counsel (713/345-7942; francisco.pinto.leite@enron.com) or me with any questions or comments.  Thank you for your assistance.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Mr. Boytinck:

Pursuant to Jason Biever's request, I am attaching, for your review, a draft Master Agreement between Garden City Plaza Ltd. and Enron Canada Corp.  Please do not hesitate to contact either Anne Koehler, Senior Counsel (713/853-3448; anne.koehler@enron.com) or me with any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
	 

Aneela:

The ADM/Carr Futures Give-Up has been signed by fax and the ADM/Goldman Sachs & Co. Give-Up has also been signed by fax.  The ADM/Goldman Sachs International Give-Up won't be signed until the GSI agreement that Sara is working on has been signed.

Marie 

Marie,

Do you know the status on this agreement?

Sara is unexpected out of the office, probably the rest of the week due to a family emergency.  If you need info, can Marie Heard assist you?

Sara,

Has the ADM Executing Broker Agreement been fully executed?

Thanks,
Aneela
:-)

Jim:

Per Francisco's request, attached are the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
	 

Brant:

Richard Friedman in Bill Berkeland's group would like to send a draft ISDA to Citgo Petroleum Corporation.  According to Lotus Notes, we sent them a draft in July, 1997.  Will you prepare a worksheet and send to us so that we can send Citgo a current draft?

If you aren't the right credit contact, will you pass this e-mail along?

Thanks!

Marie

Richard:

When I open your attachment, all that's there are characters that I can't decipher.  Can you resend me the contact information for Citgo?

Thanks!

Marie

 - winmail.dat << File: winmail.dat >> 

Hi, Gennaro!

I'm trying to pull all these documents together so that we can have them re-executed and I noticed that the Euroclear single Pledgor Pledge Agreement attached is not the same version we signed.  The version we signed in RG500b(Pledgee's Representative version - 1998 Edition).  Do you have this version that you can send to me?

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
(See attached file: Euroclear Single Pledgor Pledged Acct Agrmnt.pdf)(See
attached file: Euroclear Collateral Addendum to GCCA rev. Sep 7, 2000.doc)
(See attached file: Chase NY Law Clearance Agrmnt  June 12, 2001.doc)(See
attached file: GTA_LEG AGREEMENT.doc)
 - Euroclear Single Pledgor Pledged Acct Agrmnt.pdf 
 - Euroclear Collateral Addendum to GCCA rev. Sep 7, 2000.doc 
 - Chase NY Law Clearance Agrmnt  June 12, 2001.doc 
 - GTA_LEG AGREEMENT.doc 

Laurel:

Can you help me respond to Susan's e-mail?  I think her question is did the below transaction remain on ECT's US books or was it back to backed with the UK?  I think there is a tax question.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

I obtained the details from our London Tax Dept. this morning regarding the credit derivatives transaction entered into by Enron US in 2000 for its US operations.  The details are as follows:

Enron party:  ECT Investments Inc.
Counterparty:  Deutschebank
Buyer of protection:  Enron
Company for which protection is sought:  Loaise Corp. [spelling???]
Notional principal amount:  $4 MM
Commencement date:  July 19, 2000
Termination date:  July 19, 2005

Can you confirm that this transaction took place and remained on the books of our US operations?  I really appreciate your help with this.

Best regards,
Susan

No, I haven't heard anything and yes, I will let you know when I do.

Just checkin'.

Would you please let me know if you hear anything?

Many thanks,

~L

P.S.
I'm so glad you're working on this...

Annabel:

We have been waiting on you as per the attached e-mail from June 1, 2001.  Please call Sara when you have reviewed the attached e-mail once again.

Thanks!

Marie
Goldman Sachs International Arranged Financing Documentation

 <<GS&Co Arranged Documentation.TIF>>

Hopefully this will look somewhat familiar. Feel free to contact me with any
questions.

I will hopefully get your previously executed copies from our London Office
on Monday.

Have a great weekend.

Kind regards,
Annabel

Annabel R. Houx
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
One New York Plaza
48th Floor
New York, NY 10004
Tel. (212) 357-0375
Fax (212) 493-0085

 - GS&Co Arranged Documentation.TIF << File: GS&Co Arranged Documentation.TIF >> 

Okey dokey.

Do you want to leave early to go to Ninfa's at maybe like 11:20?

  
 
 http://home.enron.com/

Sheila:
 
We prepared resolutions regarding the opening of brokerage agreements (the ones dated 11/30/2000), which authorized Cassandra to be a second signatory, however, the problem arose when we tried to get Kate Cole in the Corporate Secretary's office to certify a certificate of incumbency for Cassandra.  Cassandra has never officially been elected to the office of Vice President of Risk Assessment and Control, a division of Enron Corp., so as far as the corporate records are concerned, she is not officially a Vice President.  This will be resolved at the Enron Corp. Board Meeting in August and her appointment will be retroactive to November 1, 2000.  Until such time as this has occurred, she cannot be a second signature on our brokerage documents.
 
Marie

Marie,
Just for clarification...
Last week you had said that Cassandra did not have authority to sign executing broker agreements.  Per the corporate datasheet, this authority was granted 11/30/2000.
thanks. sheila
 
11/30/2000 - Cassandra R. Schultz, VP of Risk Assessment and Control Group, a divsion of Enron Corp., appointed as authorized signatory for opening of
 brokerage accounts.

Hi, Wendi!

Attached is a form of multiparty/multiproduct guaranty that we would like for a counterparty to provide to us.  I checked with Tana and she said that this is the form we would use whether EOL or verbal transactions.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

It's Rob Cass.

Hi Marie

Hope all is well.  I'm sure you've heard of all the changes going on down here.  Looks like you made a good decision moving to where you are.  

I have a question about EOL -- Cynthia said you had corresponded with someone named Bob (she thought this was his name) and were able to get up to date product descriptions with respect to EOL from this person.  Does any of this sound familiar?  I need to get Bob's name -- if this is the right person.

Let me know.

thanks

Tracy

Is this madness or what?

 - Bus dodger_1.mpeg 

I'll take a look at it and run it by one of the other lawyers.

Sara and Ellen,

Attached below is a draft of the second amendment that we propose make to
the ISDA Master Agreement dated as of February 1, 1994 between General Re
Please review the draft and revert to me with any comments that you might
have.  I can be reached at any time at Telephone: (212) 541-2561 /
Facsimile: (212) 541-2549 or via return e-mail.

Thanks a lot,
Rene

(See attached file: Amd1214(II).DOC)
 - Amd1214(II).DOC << File: Amd1214(II).DOC >> 

I checked and Sara sent a message to Credit on 3/26/01 but obviously has had no response.  You may want to respond to Mr. Martin and let him know that Sara did receive his message and that we were waiting on our Credit Department to respond and we will send them (Credit) another reminder that we are waiting to hear from them.

Sara: I have not heard any response since by March 26th note (below).  Please confirm that you received it and will be responding.  If you can give me a time estimate that would be even better.  Thanks, -Serge

>>> Serge Martin 03/26/01 01:33PM >>>
Sara: The second FPL entity is "FPL Energy Power Marketing Inc."  It is the FPL entity that handles all trades for the non-regulated business units of FPL.    We completed the ISDA agreements between Florida Power & Light Co. (the regulated utility) and ENA in early January and I then sent you on January 9th a red-line of the FPL Energy Power Marketing Inc./ENA drafts vs. the final executed Florida Power & Light Co./ENA agreements for ease of review, since the agreements were near twins though you may also recall that we had added a guaranty of FPL Group Capital Inc  (FPL Energy Power Marketing Inc. debt is unrated, FPL Group Capital Inc debt is single A).  I appreciate you assistance in helping to move this along.  Regards, -Serge

Serge G. Martin
smartin@steelhector.com
Steel Hector & Davis LLP
200 South Biscayne Blvd.
Miami, Florida 33131-2398
(305) 577-7097 phone
(305) 577-7001 fax

>>> <Sara.Shackleton@enron.com> 03/26/01 12:46PM >>>
Serge:

Sorry to take so long to respond.  A few things:

(1)  What is the correct legal name of the entity you are inquiring about?
Is it the unregulated marketing arm of the regulated utility?

(2)  There has not been a commercial push from the ENA perspective to set
up a new agreement with FPL which explains why I cannot get our credit
goup to react.  I'll broach the topic again when  I hear from you.

Please let me know if you have any other questions.

Sara Shackleton

Tanya:

Sara received a request from FPL's outside counsel in March asking to execute an ISDA for the entity that trades for the non-regulated business units of the regulated entity, Florida Power & Light Co.  He is offering the guaranty of FPL Group Capital Inc.  Sara sent a copy of her Lotus Notes entry to you all asking someone to respond.  Today, she received another e-mail re status?  Russell worked on the Florida Power & Light Co. master.  Do you know who is or will be working on this, assuming it is something we want to do?

Thanks!

Marie

Kim:

I have been asked by our corporate paralegal to assist him in cleaning up the ENA corporate database as those individuals who have been appointed agent and attorney-in-fact to sign confirmations in connection with financial transactions.  Mary Cook has a copy of an e-mail in the file to Brenda Herod setting forth the procedures and telling her that you verify the requests and notify Legal of any changes.  In this e-mail, apparently Brenda asked that Mike Moscoso's and Kristen Hanson's appointments be revoked and that Lisa McClendon be added.

Will you let me know of any changes that should be made at this time?

Thanks!

Marie

Okay.  I thought you already had an account with them.  My mistake.  Also, do you have an account with Kravet?  We found a piece of their fabric that we really liked.

How was your vacation?  I'm sure you're glad to be back!

Marie

Marie,

  I will be going some time this week and will try and get them for you.  I am just now opening an account with them.  

Hi, Robbi!

Hope you are enjoying your time off.  I know I certainly enjoyed Friday and Tuesday and hated to come back today.

Anne and I went to the Decorative Center yesterday, and tried to check out some samples at Beacon Hill (Robert Allen Fabrics) and they couldn't find your account.  Do you have an account there, or was I mistaken?

Anyway, I thought I'd e-mail you since I don't have your home number in case you were going to the Decorative Center later this week to see if you could check out some samples for us if you had time.

At Beacon Hill  (Robert Allen):

Pattern:  Bearnson
Color:  Aged Gold

Pattern:  Scholtes
Color:  Cinnabar

Pattern:  McGeary
Color:  Citron

At Brunschwig & Fils (Gaston y Daniela):

Pattern No.:  82315-198
Name:  Chevron Woven Texture
Color:  Teja

Pattern No.:  82315 - 401
Name:  Chevron Woven Texture
Color:  Verde Agua

At Schumacher & Co. (Greeff)

Pattern No.:  3185017
Name:  Ephemera
Color:  Grass

Pattern No.:  3185046
Name:  Ephemera
Color:  Bittersweet

Pattern No.:  3112096
Name:  Alpine
Color:  Pumpkin

If you don't go back to DC or have already gone, we can maybe find the Robert Allen samples at Expo. They sell his fabrics there.

Thanks!  We really appreciate your help.

Marie

I already did.

Are you sending an inquiry to Credit on the status of this?

I checked and Sara sent a message to Credit on 3/26/01 but obviously has had no response.  You may want to respond to Mr. Martin and let him know that Sara did receive his message and that we were waiting on our Credit Department to respond and we will send them (Credit) another reminder that we are waiting to hear from them.

Sara: I have not heard any response since by March 26th note (below).  Please confirm that you received it and will be responding.  If you can give me a time estimate that would be even better.  Thanks, -Serge

>>> Serge Martin 03/26/01 01:33PM >>>
Sara: The second FPL entity is "FPL Energy Power Marketing Inc."  It is the FPL entity that handles all trades for the non-regulated business units of FPL.    We completed the ISDA agreements between Florida Power & Light Co. (the regulated utility) and ENA in early January and I then sent you on January 9th a red-line of the FPL Energy Power Marketing Inc./ENA drafts vs. the final executed Florida Power & Light Co./ENA agreements for ease of review, since the agreements were near twins though you may also recall that we had added a guaranty of FPL Group Capital Inc  (FPL Energy Power Marketing Inc. debt is unrated, FPL Group Capital Inc debt is single A).  I appreciate you assistance in helping to move this along.  Regards, -Serge

Serge G. Martin
smartin@steelhector.com
Steel Hector & Davis LLP
200 South Biscayne Blvd.
Miami, Florida 33131-2398
(305) 577-7097 phone
(305) 577-7001 fax

>>> <Sara.Shackleton@enron.com> 03/26/01 12:46PM >>>
Serge:

Sorry to take so long to respond.  A few things:

(1)  What is the correct legal name of the entity you are inquiring about?
Is it the unregulated marketing arm of the regulated utility?

(2)  There has not been a commercial push from the ENA perspective to set
up a new agreement with FPL which explains why I cannot get our credit
goup to react.  I'll broach the topic again when  I hear from you.

Please let me know if you have any other questions.

Sara Shackleton

Thanks!

Marie,
I will send you the official update memo.  There are a few changes that need to be made for EIM's business.

Kim

Kim:

I have been asked by our corporate paralegal to assist him in cleaning up the ENA corporate database as those individuals who have been appointed agent and attorney-in-fact to sign confirmations in connection with financial transactions.  Mary Cook has a copy of an e-mail in the file to Brenda Herod setting forth the procedures and telling her that you verify the requests and notify Legal of any changes.  In this e-mail, apparently Brenda asked that Mike Moscoso's and Kristen Hanson's appointments be revoked and that Lisa McClendon be added.

Will you let me know of any changes that should be made at this time?

Thanks!

Marie

YES!!!!!  I have to get money.

Do you want to go to Mandola's for hamburgers?

No problem.  I'll get them to you shortly.

Marie,
 
Could I get 2 copies of the 1998 FX and Currency Option definitions, and 4 copies of the 2000 ISDA definitions?  
 
I want to make sure that my people have no excuse for not looking things up!  If you need to charge our RC we are140143.  
 
Thanks very much!
 
 

Kim:

We are in the process of cleaning this mess up. Sally Beck and Rogers Herndon are both given power of attorney to sign confirmations and they are both officers of ENA, so they can already sign documents.  Go figure!  If it's not too much trouble for you to verify those who should be removed then I can double check against my list.  I don't want to remove someone who should be left, nor do I want to leave someone on who should be removed.

Thanks for your help.

P.S.  For timing purposes, we are shooting for Monday to finalize documentation.

Marie,
I am also looking at the corporate workbook for ENA and who they list as Agent and Attorney-in-Fact.  I am not sure how accurate that info. is.  I see Jeff Harbert's name on there and we asked that he be removed earlier in the year.  I also see Mary Gosnell who is no longer with the company and also other people that used to be in the confirm group a long time ago but have moved on to other jobs.  Can you ask the person from corporate about this?

If need be, I can go through that list and submit a formal request to have those individuals rights removed.  Let  me know how we should proceed.  Thanks!

Kim

Thanks!

Marie,
I will send you the official update memo.  There are a few changes that need to be made for EIM's business.

Kim

Kim:

I have been asked by our corporate paralegal to assist him in cleaning up the ENA corporate database as those individuals who have been appointed agent and attorney-in-fact to sign confirmations in connection with financial transactions.  Mary Cook has a copy of an e-mail in the file to Brenda Herod setting forth the procedures and telling her that you verify the requests and notify Legal of any changes.  In this e-mail, apparently Brenda asked that Mike Moscoso's and Kristen Hanson's appointments be revoked and that Lisa McClendon be added.

Will you let me know of any changes that should be made at this time?

Thanks!

Marie

Gordon:

Attached for your further handling is a form of Deemed ISDA to be used in connection with Deal Nos. VC0552.1, VC0552.5, VD7864.3, VG2227.3, VM0077.1 and VM5200.2.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

	 

I just got a call from Rob Wheeler, one of our power dealmakers, quizzing me about 15 counterparties he was interested in the status of the masters/guaranties our group is working on.  What I found out was in situations where we are reviewing counterparty guaranties unassociated with a master or an confirmation, there is no record in Lotus Notes to tell us who is working on the guaranty so I was unable to tell him whether we had it, who was working on it or what the status was.  It didn't made us look very good.

I would suggest that in the future that we open an entry in Lotus Notes when we are reviewing counterparty incoming guaranties so we have a record of them.

As a note, the three guaranties Rob is VERY interested in are:  NYSEG Solutions (already being worked on in Legal per Credit), Energetix and Keyspan Corp. (Credit is not sure).

Thanks for your kind consideration!

 

Cindy:

Attached are the certificates to be issued in connection with the Enron Corp. Guaranties in favor of Inland Paperboard and Packaging and Quark Power LLC.  Both of these guaranties were signed by Mary Perkins on July 13, 2001.  Please process the attached certificates as soon as possible, as we have already forwarded our documentation to the counterparties and the only remaining items to be delivered are the attached certificates.

Thanks!

Marie

		 	 

		

Mr. Boytinck:

In connection with the execution of the referenced Master Agreement, I am attaching a form of certificate of incumbency to be completed and returned to us when the Master Agreement is signed.

Thank you for your assistance and, please do not hesitate to contact me should you have any questions.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Ladies:
Hear is the final form of Schedules for Inland.  Please coordinate with Jack Falconi to have this executed (214)360-4892.  I have asked him if we can do it by fax since the traders have already done some replacement trades effective July 10, 2001.  Please keep me posted so I can let Tiffany Williams and others know when this and the Guarantees have been executed.  I will leave clement Abrams a voice mail message about the Enron Guaranty.

 

Carol St. Clair
EB 3889
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-3393 (fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Karen:

I will fax you a copy of the ISDA Master Agreement and First Amendment.

Marie

 
Marie,

Good afternoon.  I am trying to locate a copy of our current ISDA agreement
with Enron.  Could you please fax me a copy of this document.  It would be
styled as either Coast Energy Group, a division of Cornerstone Propane, LP
or simply Cornerstone Propane, LP.  Thanks so much for assistance.

Karen Bleil
Supervisor, Risk Management

Coast Energy Group
Ph:  281-274-7560
Fax: 281-494-8046
karen-bleil@coastenergy.com

  - att1.eml << File: att1.eml >> 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>
<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Hi, Veronica!

Attached are comments from Todd Perkins to the Georgia Power, Mississippi Power and Savannah Electric ISDA's.  Once you have reviewed the credit comments, please let us have your responses.

Thanks!

Marie
Here are the ISDA Schedules for Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and
Savannah Electric with our comments.  Please let me know when you are ready
to discuss.

Todd Perkins
Southern Company
404-506-0655

 <<Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Mississippi ISDA
Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc>>

 - Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc 
 - Enron - Mississippi ISDA Schedule.doc 
 - Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc 

Kimberly:

Attached is a blacklined draft of the confirmation marked to show the proposed changes that Frank Sayre and Mark Taylor made.  If you have any questions, please call Frank at 57894.

Marie

	 

Please find attached a confirmation for this deal ("sampledoc").  I have changed the floating price language to reflect an Asian option (which I have never confirmed before), as opposed to our standard European options.  The standard floating price language for European Options is as follows:

The average of the hourly day-ahead prices as published by the New York Independent System Operator (the "NYISO") on the last day of the month that includes the applicable Determination Period on the NYISO's official web site currently located at http://mis.nyiso.com/public/index.html, or any successor thereto, under the headings "Day Ahead Market LBMP - Zonal; Zonal Prices; West (61757) (Zone F)" for electricity during the applicable Determination Period.

Please review the "Floating Price" section of this confirmation letter.

 << File: sampledoc.doc >> 
Please let me know if this confirmation correctly reflects an Asian option.  The trader would like for this confirmation to go out no later than today.  Please call me if you have any questions.
Thank You,
Kimberly Hundl (x31647)

Erin:

Pursuant to your request, attached are the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Please let me know if you need anything else.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Cindy:

Attached is a memo requesting the referenced Enron Corp. Guaranty.  Please call me when ready and I'll send someone to pick the documentation up.

Thanks!

Marie

		 	 

Ms. Bolton:

Pursuant to Derek Davies' request, I am attaching a draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  A full copy of the ISDA Master Agreement (preprinted forms and the below attachments) was sent by Federal Express to Ms. Marla Van Gelder on July 27.  Please let me know if you would like me to forward the preprinted forms to you or if you will be able to obtain the copy sent to Ms. Van Gelder.

Thank you for your assistance and, please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 

Shane:

Attached for your further handling is our standard "sample" ISDA Master Agreement.  Please don't hesitate to contact either Sara (x35620) or me (x33907) with any questions or comments.

Marie

		 

Thanks, Linda!

Marie,

Further to your memo of July 26, 2001, I have forwarded the signed documents to Garden City Plaza by overnight courier which they should receive tomorrow morning.  I have also forwarded copies to your attention which you should also receive tomorrow.

thanks
Linda

Jim:

In connection with the upcoming Enron Corp. Board Meeting, we have prepared, and attach for your review, resolutions authorizing the opening of brokerage accounts on behalf of Enron Corp.  The current resolutions are outdated because certain of the offices no longer exist or have changed.  In addition, the interest rate and currency desk typically goes to Andy Fastow when documents need to be signed or written or oral instructions need to be given to brokers.  Andy's title has changed and he has also asked that Ben Glisan and Tim DeSpain be authorized to sign documents and to give instructions in connection with these brokerage accounts.

The attached resolutions are substantially like the ones ENA has adopted in connection with the opening of brokerage accounts.  ENA also requires two officers to sign documents to open brokerage accounts, but allows only one officer to sign subsequent documentation and to give instructions to the brokers.

Would you please review the attached resolutions and advise if they are acceptable so that we can submit them to Rebecca Carter  by tomorrow, August 1.

Thanks for your assistance and, please let us know if you have any questions.

Marie
x33907

			  

Gil:

Attached is the form of Prime Broker Margin Account Agreement that Morgan Stanley has prepared for Enron's use.  I am also attaching a form of authorized traders list for your use.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

	 	 

Jay:

Here are the comments for Georgia Power, Mississippi Power and Savannah Electric that I forwarded to Veronica.  Brent Hendry is the lawyer working on these files.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Here are the ISDA Schedules for Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and
Savannah Electric with our comments.  Please let me know when you are ready
to discuss.

Todd Perkins
Southern Company
404-506-0655

 <<Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Mississippi ISDA
Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc>>

 - Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc 
 - Enron - Mississippi ISDA Schedule.doc 
 - Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc 

Attached are a clean and blacklined version of P.M.I.'s Amendment Agreement with our changes noted.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

	 	 

Jay:

Here is the e-mail I received from SoCal.  I haven't looked at their form, as I don't think we want to play the forms game with them.  If you want me to, I'll touch base with her to see how she is coming with commenting on our form.

Let me know.

Marie
Hi Marie, 
Per your e-mail to Brent Mishler, we will be reviewing Enron's draft Schedules.  For your review, I have attached SoCalGas' proposed Schedule
to the ISDA Master Agreement and proposed Paragraph 13 to the Credit Support Annex along with our form parental guaranty.   I look forward to working with you to finalize these documents.  If you have any questions, please call me.
Angie Garfio Ishikawa 
Contract Management Advisor 
Southern California Gas Company 
Voice: (213) 244-3862 
Email: aishikawa@socalgas.com 
 - SoCal ISDA Schedule.doc 
 - SoCal CSA P-13.doc 
 - SoCalGas Parental Gty062801(v2).DOC 

Mr. Kohler:

Michael Law has asked us to finalize execution copies of the Master Agreement between Enron Canada Corp. and Albchem, Industries Ltd.  In order to complete the documentation, we will need the following information:

1.	Exhibit A - Notice -- please provide me with the name and fax number for the individual or group who should receive notices under the Master Agreement.

2.	Page 2 of the Enron Corp. Guaranty - please provide me with the name and fax number for the individual or group who should receive notices under the guaranty.

Once I have this information, I will finalize execution copies of the documents and forward them to our office in Calgary for execution.  In addition, I will request the original Enron Corp. guaranty and related certificates.

Thank you for your assistance and, should you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact me.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Joe Hunter said he sent an interoffice envelope sometime last week (he doesn't remember who he sent it to) containing copies of a confirm on the J Aron website, together with a copy of a Service Agreement.  He needs to make a copy of the documents.  Has anyone seen these documents?  If so, please let either Joe (x33316) or me know.

Thanks!

Marie

Rebecca:

In connection with the upcoming Enron Corp. Board Meeting, we have prepared proposed resolutions authorizing the opening of brokerage accounts on behalf of Enron Corp.  The current resolutions are outdated because certain of the offices no longer exist or have changed.  In addition, Gary Hickerson's group typically goes to Andy Fastow when documents need to be signed or written or oral instructions need to be given to brokers to authorize the transfer of funds from Enron Corp.'s brokerage account(s), in particular the account at Morgan Stanley.  Andy's title has changed and he has also asked that Ben Glisan and Tim DeSpain be authorized to sign documents and to give instructions in connection with these brokerage accounts.

The attached resolutions have been drafted using the December 13, 1994 resolutions authorizing the opening of brokerage accounts, with the exception of the deletion of non-existing offices, change in officer titles and the addition of Ben Glisan and Tim DeSpain.  I am attaching a copy of the certificate we sent to Morgan Stanley in connection with the opening of the account for Enron Corp. certifying the December 13, 1994 resolutions. 

Thanks for your assistance and, please let us know if you have any questions or need any additional documentation.

Marie
x33907

			 	 

Cindy:

Attached is an amendment to the Enron Corp. guaranty dated January 20, 1994 in favor of Williams Energy Marketing and Trading Company, which guaranty has been amended from time to time.

The attached amendment (i) adds Williams Energy Canada, Inc. as a beneficiary and increases the amount from $75MM to $100MM.  I prepared this form off the April 17, 2001 amendment form.

Please process this amendment ASAP as a deal has been entered into that is conditioned upon us delivering this amendment.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Marie

			 

Cindy:

Attached are a form of Enron Corp. guaranty in favor of Albchem Industries Ltd., together with a form of Certificate of Incumbency.  Please process the attached document as soon as possible and call me at x33907 for pickup.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Mary:

Attached is the status of my Canadian files:

1.	Albchem Industries Ltd. - sending for execution

2.	Garden City Plaza Ltd. - send to counterparty for execution on 7/26/01

3.	Canadian Hunter Resources - draft sent to counterparty on 7/27.

Marie

Don't we have our paralegal lunch today?

Do you want to go to the Taqueria today so we can got to the Chocolate Bar afterwards?

Attached is the Annex B for Deal No. VM4903.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

Did you hear me ask and the response?  We are having the lunch today.

I don't have it on my calendar, do we?

Don't we have our paralegal lunch today?

Do you want to go to the Taqueria today so we can got to the Chocolate Bar afterwards?

Attached is the draft Deemed ISDA for the referenced counterparty.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

Gordon:

Attached are (i) Deemed ISDA for Nylon de Mexico, S.A. de C.V. - Deal No. V13764.3 and (ii) Deemed ISDA for Polykron, S.A. de C.V. - Deal No. V13764.4.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

	 	 

Hi, Robbi!

Can you give me a call?  853-3907.

thanks!

Marie

Carol:

Here is the latest EBS telecom master.

Marie

 

Hi, Dan!

Just checking on the status of the documents I forwarded to you for execution.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Cindy:

Attached for your further handling are the form of Enron Corp. Guaranty in favor of Petro-Hunt LLC, together with the appropriate certificates required to be delivered in connection with the Guaranty.

Please contact me at x33907 when the documentation is ready and I will arrange to have them picked up.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Have a great weekend!  Does this mean you won't be sending us anymore worksheets today?

Ladies,
	Enclosed is a worksheet for Ineos Acrylics.  Ineos is an English company which has a majority of its operations in the US.  Note that the credit thresholds are in US$, but the MACS are designated in British Pounds.  Please send the draft to Troy Black and he will forward to the CP.  Please deliver a copy to me as well.  

Have a great weekend.  

Max

 << File: Ineos.xls >> 

Robbi:

I left you a voice mail on Friday.  I looked at the UEComm Master and had some comments--such as our name is wrong, the cross default threshold for us should be US $ and not AUD, and there were a few other questions I had.

Marie

Hi,

Attached are Uecomm's final comments to the Master Agreement.  John Suttle has OK'd Anthony's latest request w/r.t. the CSA.

Could you please send an executable version of the contract to Fred, David, John and me tomorrow?

If they're OK with it, we'd like to execute it as soon as possible unless there are any objections.

Thanks

Pat

Pat,

Please find attached the Enron Master Agreement. I have inserted the company
details of Uecomm as requested.

I have also amended the timeframes in the Credit Support Annex to 10 days
instead of 2 days. (Clauses 2 & 3). I have tracked all changes for ease of
reference.

If these amendmnets are agreeable to you can you please print and arrange
for execution.

If you have any questions please do not hesitate to give me a call.

Regards,

Anthony Sill
Legal Counsel
Uecomm Limited
126 Trenerry Crescent
Abbotsford, VIC 3067.
Ph. (03) 9221 4101
Fax.(03) 9221 4193
Mob. 0417 575 920

 <<Enron - UC Master Agreement - 0308.doc>> 

 
 
 
 
Turn up your sound a bit. 

Reminder:

Conference Call with ConEd at 1:00 today in Sara's office - EB3801A.

Nick:

Attached for your further handling is the draft form Deemed ISDA between ENA and Ispat Mexicana S.A. de C.V.  Please note that the economic provisions have been omitted.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

Tana:

Here's info on the Elliotts.

Marie

CONGRATULATIONS!!!!!!!  We've been asking everyday if anyone had heard if the "Babies Elliott" had arrived.  Glad to hear that they are all healthy and were a good size, and that Mom is doing well.  Look forward to seeing pictures of the little ones.  I know you all are going to have so much fun with them.  Hope you've been storing up sleep, cause it looks like you won't be getting much for a while.

Again, congratulations.  These three little ones don't realize how lucky they are to have such a nice Dad, but I'm sure they'll find out soon.

Take care

Marie

Ladies and gentlemen,

This is just to let you know that Emma gave birth at week 34 on Friday, 6th July, to our triplets:

Benjamin James - at 12.45 pm - 3 lbs 4 ozs

Toby William - 12.46 pm - 4 lbs

Hannah May - 12.48 pm - 3 lbs 15 ozs.

Although small, they are all "fully functioning" and very well - they are in the lowest level of special care (and they will probably be in there for another two to four weeks) until they can feed properly and maintain their weights.  Emma is fine, too - very well!!

All the best and kind regards

Mark   

OOPS!  Attached are the fax cover pages for each of the Nylon and Polykron Deemed ISDAs I just sent you.

Marie

	 	 

Rebecca:

I am attaching a clean and blacklined version of the proposed resolutions authorizing the opening of brokerage accounts.  I have attempted to revise them to make them clearer.  Perhaps Jim Armogida can assist in revising them as I am sure he is more familiar with the way Enron Corp. likes their resolutions drafted than we are.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

	 	  

 
 
 
 
 
Turn up your sound a bit. 

Hi, Liz:

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Ms. Marquez:

I am following up regarding the status of our comments to the form of guaranty for Pemex that you provided to Lucy Ortiz.  Please do not hesitate to contact either Francisco Pinto-Leite or me with any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Ms. Marquez:

Attached are an original and blacklined copy of your form of guaranty, which reflect our comments.  Please do not hesitate to contact either Francisco Pinto-Leite, Senior Counsel (713/345-7942; francisco.pinto.leite@enron.com) or me with any questions or comments.  Thank you for your assistance.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Tanya:

I received this draft from Niagara Mohawk Marketing, Inc. for our review.  Will you pass along to the appropriate person?

Thanks!

Marie
Marie - per our conversation yesterday afternoon, attached are proposed drafts
of the Schedule and the Para. 13 relative to the above.  Having spoken with
Dennis Goldmann, I am advised that there are currently 2 Guaranties in place in
the sum of $8M each:  one by Niagara Mohawk Holdings Inc f/b/o Enron, and one by
Enron Inc. f/b/o Niagara Mohawk Energy Marketing.  I am told that our respective
credit departments want to raise the credit lines to $10M for each party, but to
effect that we will have to modify the existing Guaranties accordingly.  Let me
know if this is your understanding, as well.

After you have had the chance to review the attached, please send me a marked-up
draft and we can discuss our concerns from there.

Should you have any questions, feel free to call me.  I can be reached at
315-460-3344.  Any credit concerns can be discussed with Dennis Goldmann, who
can be reached at 315-460-3349.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Patty Snyder

(See attached file: ENRON - SCHEDULE(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc)(See attached file:
ENRON - Para13(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc)

 - ENRON - SCHEDULE(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc 
 - ENRON - Para13(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc 

 

Hi Marie

Did you get a chance to find those GTC's for ENA that you can forward this way?  Thanks, I know you are busy.

Tracy

Jeff:

Attached are the draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  I am putting the credit worksheet on the fax machine to you as soon as I send this message.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

Yolanda:

In connection with the execution of the ISDA Master Agreement with GAF Refining LLC, Section 3 requires that they provide the following documentation:

1.	IRS Form W-9 (Request for Taxpayer Identification Number)

2.	Certificate of Incumbency certifying (i) a true and correct copy of the certificate of organization or formation and operating agreement and (ii) the incumbency and specimen signature of the officer executing the ISDA on behalf of the sole member/manager of GAF Refining.

3.	Certificate of the Secretary/Assistant Secretary of GAF Refining certifying resolutions authorizing (i) the execution of the ISDA Master Agreement and (ii) the execution of energy price swap and option transactions.

I am attaching forms of the certificates listed as items 2 and 3 above.  If GAF needs the IRS W-9, they can go to their website at www.irs.gov and download a copy.

ENA will be providing a Certificate of Incumbency, certifying its articles of incorporation and bylaws and the incumbency and specimen signature of the officer executing the ISDA on behalf of ENA, together with a Certificate certifying resolutions as to its authority to enter into financial transactions and an IRS W-9.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 	 

I finally remembered to send this to you. 
 
 
 
 
Turn up your sound a bit. 

Molly:

You might want to check with Robin Hill, since I don't know who is still there at EBS and who has left.

Marie - Tracy is out today and I need to know who has signing authority for Enron Global Semiconductor Services, L.P.
Thanks!

Molly LaFuze
Enron Broadband Services, L.P.
713.853.3005 ph
713.646.8103 fax
713.503.9760 cell

Hi, Paul!

I am attaching clean and blacklined drafts of the Master Agreements for each of Catequil Partners, L.P. and Catequil Overseas Partners, Ltd.  Please review and let us know of any changes we should make before sending them to Catequil.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

	    

Pat:

Attached for your further handling are a clean and blacklined draft of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.  I blacklined my draft against the draft that David prepared since I didn't have a clean copy of Uecomm's comments.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Pat:

Attached for your further handling is the revised Master Agreement deleting the "eligible contract participant" rep.

Marie

		  
Pat:

Attached for your further handling are a clean and blacklined draft of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.  I blacklined my draft against the draft that David prepared since I didn't have a clean copy of Uecomm's comments.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Tanya:

I don't remember if I forwarded this on or not.  When we receive counterparties' paper, should we forward on to you or would you prefer we send them to Jay or someone else?

Marie

Hello Marie, per our conversation this morning, please find attached Coastal
States Trading, Inc.'s standard schedules, along with a copy of our guaranty
format.  We prefer to make proposed changes directly on the electronic
version(as opposed to hard copy).  Please red-line the schedule on the PC,
put a draft date in the upper right hand corner of the first page of both
schedules, then email the schedules back to John Shuttee for review.  John
will handle all negotiations for this ISDA.  He can be reached at
713/420-3548 or john.shuttee@elpaso.com.

Thanks for attention to this matter.

CKC

 <<Coastal Guaranty Format (update).doc>>  <<ISDA CST CSA Schedule 2.doc>>
<<ISDA CST Master Schedule 3 - .doc>>

******************************************************************
This email and any files transmitted with it from the ElPaso
Corporation are confidential and intended solely for the
use of the individual or entity to whom they are addressed.
If you have received this email in error please notify the
sender.
******************************************************************

 - Coastal Guaranty Format (update).doc 
 - ISDA CST CSA Schedule 2.doc 
 - ISDA CST Master Schedule 3 - .doc 

I think it will be okay for them to sign.  They will need to print and sign two originals and return both copies to you.  Both David and John will need to initial before the agreements can be signed by an authorized officer.  Additionally, our notice information will need to be completed.  Once signed by Uecomm and returned to you, please let me know so that we can process the Enron Corp. guaranty or will David process it from your end?  Also, I don't know if you will keep the original in Australia or if it will come back to Houston.  Robbi, do you know?  We can cross that bridge once it is fully executed.

Hope this isn't too confusing!

Marie 

Thanks Marie,

I forgot to ask you this on the phone:    Assuming they don't have any comments, what's the procedure going forward?  Do you have to send them an executable version? or could they sign this one?

Pat

Pat:

Attached for your further handling is the revised Master Agreement deleting the "eligible contract participant" rep.

Marie

		 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >>  << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 
Pat:

Attached for your further handling are a clean and blacklined draft of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.  I blacklined my draft against the draft that David prepared since I didn't have a clean copy of Uecomm's comments.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >> 	 << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 

Tracy:

Can you send the latest long haul SLAs to Pat since I don't have access to them.  If you're not sure which ones to send, check with Robbi.

Thanks!

Marie
Hi Marie,

Do you think you could forward me our most recent SLA's for Long Haul capacity?  David and I will work on modifying the Optus SLA's to fit into our Confirm.

Thanks

Pat

Okay.

Marie,

  I think we should do the guaranty and keep the original - at least until David learns the ropes.

I think it will be okay for them to sign.  They will need to print and sign two originals and return both copies to you.  Both David and John will need to initial before the agreements can be signed by an authorized officer.  Additionally, our notice information will need to be completed.  Once signed by Uecomm and returned to you, please let me know so that we can process the Enron Corp. guaranty or will David process it from your end?  Also, I don't know if you will keep the original in Australia or if it will come back to Houston.  Robbi, do you know?  We can cross that bridge once it is fully executed.

Hope this isn't too confusing!

Marie 

Thanks Marie,

I forgot to ask you this on the phone:    Assuming they don't have any comments, what's the procedure going forward?  Do you have to send them an executable version? or could they sign this one?

Pat

Pat:

Attached for your further handling is the revised Master Agreement deleting the "eligible contract participant" rep.

Marie

		 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >>  << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 
Pat:

Attached for your further handling are a clean and blacklined draft of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.  I blacklined my draft against the draft that David prepared since I didn't have a clean copy of Uecomm's comments.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >> 	 << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 

I don't blame you.  Obviously she's not dependable and her heart isn't in it, not to mention the fact that she doesn't know what she's doing and I don't think she wants to learn.  That was pretty obvious when I was training her--she never seemed to be interested in the job, otherwise she would have tried to learn all she could and would have at least taken some pride in her work.

Tracy made it in today - by 9:00.  What a surprise.  To tell you the truth, Marie, I'm not sure I want her doing any more of my stuff!

Pat:

Attached for your further handling is the revised Master Agreement deleting the "eligible contract participant" rep.

Marie

		 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >>  << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 
Pat:

Attached for your further handling are a clean and blacklined draft of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.  I blacklined my draft against the draft that David prepared since I didn't have a clean copy of Uecomm's comments.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >> 	 << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 

Celeste:

I guess there's no credit?

Marie

Who is responsible for paper/pulp issues?  Paper desk needs a draft confirmation to go out to the above counterparty.  It's an international deal...so we need it to be on a Deemed ISDA, however, we've always done our paper/pulp deals on an omnibus.  Can I get a Deemed ISDA template from one of you? Thanks.

I'm working on the guarantees now, so I should have the draft to a lawyer today.

Marie,

I think  you were working on this ISDA, right?  Got a call from the marketer today and wanted to know the status. I informed him that legal was working on it but I can't remember where we left off.  I even looked in the Lotus Notes Database but couldn't find it listed.  Sorry to bug you with this!

Wendy

Sorry to hear about Dirk.  I will certainly let you know if I hear of anything.  We don't need any samples at Kravet--we have found a piece of their fabric that we are pretty sure we want to get.  The contractor is starting work on our house Monday, so our fun will be beginning.  Talk to you later.

Marie

Marie,

  I just got a call from Dirk at Universal Access.  He was laid off - I thought he was a nice guy and a good lawyer.  Let me know if you hear about any openings.  Maybe we can make it to the decorative center next week.  If you want to go earlier, the number for Kravet is 4079171-B.  I will probably need to do Robert Allen in person since it is new.  Thanks

Here it is.

	 

Marie,

  Could you please send me your new template for nonverbal trades?  I need to double check Level 3 - I don't think Tracy did it correctly.  Thanks

I don't blame you.  Obviously she's not dependable and her heart isn't in it, not to mention the fact that she doesn't know what she's doing and I don't think she wants to learn.  That was pretty obvious when I was training her--she never seemed to be interested in the job, otherwise she would have tried to learn all she could and would have at least taken some pride in her work.

Tracy made it in today - by 9:00.  What a surprise.  To tell you the truth, Marie, I'm not sure I want her doing any more of my stuff!

Pat:

Attached for your further handling is the revised Master Agreement deleting the "eligible contract participant" rep.

Marie

		 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >>  << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 
Pat:

Attached for your further handling are a clean and blacklined draft of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.  I blacklined my draft against the draft that David prepared since I didn't have a clean copy of Uecomm's comments.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 << File: 001ctr(uecomm).doc >> 	 << File: 001CTR(UECOMM).RED.DOC >> 

Hi, Ken!

I just received a call from Chris Croom who wants to send an updated ISDA draft to Avery Dennison Corp.  Can we use the same credit, or do you want to revise it?  He said he was going to meet with the counterparty on Tuesday, so I'm sure he either wants them to get the draft before then or he will take it with him.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

I don't know off the top of my head where they are?  Is there a blue file?  Do I have a memo in my memo directory where I sent them to Contract Admin?

Hi Marie

Any idea where I can find the final docs for this deal?  Cynthia said she gave them to you -- I've looked in the regular places -- where else can I check?

thanks

Tracy
 << File: Annex A Financial GTC (Credit)EBC020401.doc >>  << File: Annex A Financial GTC (Credit)Into020401.doc >>  << File: Annex B Financial GTC (Credit)Into020401.doc >>  << File: MBDAssignmentAgt020401.doc >>  << File: SoftwareonDemandMarketingAgreement.doc >>  << File: Swap Transaction Into020401.doc >>  << File: Swap TransactionElbo020401.doc >> 

Wayne:

I went to Tracy's office to help Cynthia look for the documents and Cynthia found them, so you should be getting copies shortly.

Marie

This is kind of scary (and not just because I need the documents).

just fYI

still trying to find the docs

I don't know off the top of my head where they are?  Is there a blue file?  Do I have a memo in my memo directory where I sent them to Contract Admin?

Hi Marie

Any idea where I can find the final docs for this deal?  Cynthia said she gave them to you -- I've looked in the regular places -- where else can I check?

thanks

Tracy
 << File: Annex A Financial GTC (Credit)EBC020401.doc >>  << File: Annex A Financial GTC (Credit)Into020401.doc >>  << File: Annex B Financial GTC (Credit)Into020401.doc >>  << File: MBDAssignmentAgt020401.doc >>  << File: SoftwareonDemandMarketingAgreement.doc >>  << File: Swap Transaction Into020401.doc >>  << File: Swap TransactionElbo020401.doc >> 

Hi, Anna!

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Tracy:

Can you get Wayne copies of the Into Networks confirm and GTC?  They are in the blue Into file in your bottom file drawer.

Thanks!

Marie, I'm still missing the Into Networks confirm and GTC, which is the other leg of the back to back financial swap in the Elbo transaction.

Wayne:

I went to Tracy's office to help Cynthia look for the documents and Cynthia found them, so you should be getting copies shortly.

Marie

This is kind of scary (and not just because I need the documents).

just fYI

still trying to find the docs

I don't know off the top of my head where they are?  Is there a blue file?  Do I have a memo in my memo directory where I sent them to Contract Admin?

Hi Marie

Any idea where I can find the final docs for this deal?  Cynthia said she gave them to you -- I've looked in the regular places -- where else can I check?

thanks

Tracy
 << File: Annex A Financial GTC (Credit)EBC020401.doc >>  << File: Annex A Financial GTC (Credit)Into020401.doc >>  << File: Annex B Financial GTC (Credit)Into020401.doc >>  << File: MBDAssignmentAgt020401.doc >>  << File: SoftwareonDemandMarketingAgreement.doc >>  << File: Swap Transaction Into020401.doc >>  << File: Swap TransactionElbo020401.doc >> 

Mr. Giordano:

Attached for your review are clean and blacklined drafts of each of the following:

Please provide us with the following information needed to complete Parts 5(p)(b) and 5(p)(d) of each Schedule:

1.	Date of each limited partnership agreement; and

2.	Date of each investment management agreement.

In addition, please verify that Catequil Associates LLC is the correct party to sign both agreements as general partner of each of the limited partnerships.

Please do not hesitate to contact Frank Sayre (713/345-7894; frank.sayre@enron.com) or me with any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
		 	 	 	 

Mr. Lopez-Velarde:

Pursuant to our conversation attached is the form of guaranty that one of our business groups would like to send to a Mexican counterparty.  Francisco has asked if you would please revise the guaranty to provide for agent for service of process, submission to governing law in Texas and submission to jurisdiction in U.S. courts in Texas.  It appears that the form includes submission to jurisdiction in Texas and I have included a provision regarding agent for service of process.

As I stated, we would like to have these revisions as soon as possible this afternoon.

Thank you for your assistance.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

As discussed
Francisco Pinto-Leite
Enron Americas
1400 Smith Street, EB 3888 
Houston, TX 77002-7361

Tel: 713-345-7942
Fax:713-646-3490
fleite@enron.com

Hello,

I work in the Credit Dept. and I'm trying to get a guaranty from a Mexican company. The deal is for physical methanol.  Currently Credit is using the attached format.

 

I talked to Alan Aronowitz, and he said to check with you about any specific clauses you may have on guaranties in order to make them enforceable in Texas as well as in Mexico. Please let me know as soon as possible.

Thanks,  

Nidia A. Mendoza
Credit Staff
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith St.,  Suite 2837 A
Houston, TX  77002
Tel:  713/853-4868
Fax:  713/853-9476
e-mail: nidia.mendoza@enron.com

Ms. Sternberg:

Attached for your review are revised drafts of the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Please do not hesitate to contact either Sara Shackleton or me with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

I have provided everyone with a copy of the self study guide "From Edison to Enron - an Evolution".

Celeste:

We are reviewing ISDA opinions to verify if a Hong Kong entity can enter into derivative transactions.  Once we confirm that they can, we will send the form Deemed ISDA to you.

Marie

I'm assuming at this point no...they just want to see a draft.  

Celeste:

I guess there's no credit?

Marie

Who is responsible for paper/pulp issues?  Paper desk needs a draft confirmation to go out to the above counterparty.  It's an international deal...so we need it to be on a Deemed ISDA, however, we've always done our paper/pulp deals on an omnibus.  Can I get a Deemed ISDA template from one of you? Thanks.

Hi, Jay!

Just received a call from Adam at XTO Energy and he is going to be sending an e-mail with their comments to the ISDA.  He said there were just a handful, but we'll see.  I'll forward his e-mail to you when I receive it.

Have a good weekend!

Marie

Here are XTO's comments. Please respond to those that are credit related, which appear to be most of them.  Lucky you!

Thanks!

Marie
Ms. Heard,

As we discussed, the following are our comments to the ISDA Master Agreement
that you sent to Terry Schultz on May 30, 2001:

General:
1.   Our name has changed from Cross Timbers Oil Company to XTO Energy Inc. (a
Delaware corporation)

Schedule to the Master Agreement
1.   Part 3.   We would incorporate the same language for Party B as applies to
Party A with regard to the delivery of financial statements.  Our website
address   is www.xtoenergy.com.  Propose that for both parties, strike the time
requirement for sending financials in the event not available online (i.e. "in
no event  later than X days after the end of the X days following X period..."
2.   Part 5(g).  We like to strike "or otherwise" from line 4 and line 6

Credit Support Annex
1.   "Threshold" needs to be updated for Party B to $60 million.  This is
consistent with the threshold levels indicated in a letter from Jason Williams
dated     January 5, 2001.
2.   "Material Adverse Change" for Party B we would suggest that the definition
be rewritten so that if our credit rating with S&P falls below B+ that would be
a    MAC (a two notch downgrade, and consistent with the change for Party A).
In connection with this change we would propose striking the financial covenant
tests (i) & (ii).  This would also apply under the "Eligibility to Hold Posted
Collateral" section.  As a matter of form, this would permit us to strike the
definitions    of "EBITDA" and "EBITDA Coverage Ratio".
3.   We'd like to remove Schedule 1 showing the form of letter of credit.  This
is not consistent with our currently issued letter of credit, the terms of which
have      been accepted by Enron.
4.   We'd like to propose that the limit on the Enron guaranty to XTO Energy be
increased from $25 mm to $50 mm to give us a little more flexibility for future
deals.

Questions/Clarifications:
1.   Could you comment as to why under Part 1 (e) of the Schedule to the Master
Lease you have selected to use the "Loss" as opposed to the "Market
Quotation" method?  We have no other ISDAs with this calculation method.
2.   Under the Schedule to the Master Lease, what is the rationale for Part 4
(f) Netting of Payments?  We found this a little murky.

Please call me at 817-885-2260 if you have any questions about this comments.

Thanks very much.

Regards,
Adam Auten
Assistant Treasurer
XTO Energy Inc.

Hi, Joe:

Tana said I should forward this e-mail to you and that you guys would prepare the assignment and send to us for review.  Let me know if this is not the case.  Please note that all of the deals, with the exception of the first one, are EOL deals.

Thanks for your help.

Marie

Legal Team,

Per the recent change in Company structure for Sequent Energy Management, LLC there are a number of financial deals that must be assigned over to the correct entity--Sequent Energy Management, LP.  Please prepare trade assignment documentation for the following deals (please note that all of these deals, except for the first one, were executed on EOL):

VT2401.1
VM7262.1
VM7369.1
VM7677.1
VM8690.1
VM8778.1
VN2395.1
VN3448.1
VN4598.1
VN4726.1
VP3529.1
VP3704.1
VQ0698.1
VR2661.1
VR2666.1
VU0121.1
VU1540.1

Also, ENA does not have an ISDA in place with the counterparty--all deals were confirmed under GTC's.  Please give me a call if you need any other info.

Thanks again,

Veronica Espinoza
x6-6002

Attached for your further handling is the Annex B for the related transaction.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

	 

I'm preparing the Master Agreement for execution between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd. and the referenced counterparty.  Please let me know the date of the earliest outstanding trade (if any) so that I can date my master agreement.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Mr. Sill

Pursuant to your request, attached is the execution copy of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte. Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.

Please print two (2) copies of the document and have an authorized officer sign both copies on Page 6 of the agreement.

When executed, please forward both original signed copies by overnight courier to Mr. David Minns at Level 21, 9 Castlereagh St., Sydney, NSW  2000, Australia, Telephone No. (612) 9229 2310

I will process the Enron Corp. Guaranty and will forward it to you when completed.

Thank you for your assistance and, should you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact me.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 

Hi, David:

As you can see, I have forwarded the master agreement to Mr. Sill for execution.  When you receive the executed copies, please complete the notice information on the Schedule.  I'm sure Pat can assist in the technical contacts if you aren't familiar with them.  In addition, please initial both copies and have John Suttle initial both copies before they are signed by EBS Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd.  Upon execution, please forward one fully signed copy to Mr. Sill and forward the other original copy to me in Houston.

I am processing the original Enron Corp. guaranty and will forward it to Uecomm when I receive it back from Enron Corp. and receive confirmation from you that you have the master agreement as signed by Uecomm.

Thanks for your help and let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Mr. Sill

Pursuant to your request, attached is the execution copy of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte. Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.

Please print two (2) copies of the document and have an authorized officer sign both copies on Page 6 of the agreement.

When executed, please forward both original signed copies by overnight courier to Mr. David Minns at Level 21, 9 Castlereagh St., Sydney, NSW  2000, Australia, Telephone No. (612) 9229 2310

I will process the Enron Corp. Guaranty and will forward it to you when completed.

Thank you for your assistance and, should you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact me.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 

Will you e-mail me your form guaranty?

Thanks!

Thanks Marie.

Tracy

Hi, David:

As you can see, I have forwarded the master agreement to Mr. Sill for execution.  When you receive the executed copies, please complete the notice information on the Schedule.  I'm sure Pat can assist in the technical contacts if you aren't familiar with them.  In addition, please initial both copies and have John Suttle initial both copies before they are signed by EBS Asia/Pacific Pte Ltd.  Upon execution, please forward one fully signed copy to Mr. Sill and forward the other original copy to me in Houston.

I am processing the original Enron Corp. guaranty and will forward it to Uecomm when I receive it back from Enron Corp. and receive confirmation from you that you have the master agreement as signed by Uecomm.

Thanks for your help and let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Mr. Sill

Pursuant to your request, attached is the execution copy of the Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services Asia/Pacific Pte. Ltd. and Uecomm Operations Pty Limited.

Please print two (2) copies of the document and have an authorized officer sign both copies on Page 6 of the agreement.

When executed, please forward both original signed copies by overnight courier to Mr. David Minns at Level 21, 9 Castlereagh St., Sydney, NSW  2000, Australia, Telephone No. (612) 9229 2310

I will process the Enron Corp. Guaranty and will forward it to you when completed.

Thank you for your assistance and, should you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact me.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 << File: 001actr(uecomm).doc >> 

Hi, Cindy:

I'm assisting EBS in some of their trading work for awhile, so this is why I am sending you the attached memo requesting an Enron Corp. Guaranty.

Please let me know when the guaranty is ready and I'll arrange for pick-up.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

		 

Becky:

I left early yesterday (as did everyone else) so I have no comments.

Your comments are needed for Mary Ann Perez who sat in for Joanne Rozycki on September 11th.  Please return as soon as possible.  Thank you!-Becky

Ratings: Excellent = 5 Above Average = 4 Average = 3 Below Average = 2 Poor = 1

Initiative:		_________
Cooperation:	_________
Punctuality:	_________
Attendance:		_________
Quality of Work:	_________

Rate the worker's skill level in relation to the job :_________

Would you request this person again? (Y/N) :_________

Comments:

Hi, Nidia!

Per my voice mail, attached is the revised form of guaranty to add "Process Agent" section.  Please send this revised form to the counterparty asking that they use this form rather than the form of guaranty you sent them on Friday.

Let us know if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Samantha:

Here is an e-mail from Chris Croom forwarding a counterparty's form of Confidentiality Agreement.  He is leaving town this afternoon to go meet with them, so he needs the CA ASAP.

I think I would first check with Kay Young to see if we have a CA with them, and if so, is it still active.  Maybe we can just work off that form since the counterparty has signed it before.

Let me know if you have questions or need help.

Thanks!

Marie
 
Left you a voicemail concerning this.

Thanks,
Chris

Chris Croom
Director
Enron Industrial Markets
1400 Smith St.
Houston, TX 77002
Ph:  713-853-1899
Fax::  713-646-3253
email:  chris.croom@enron.com

Hi, Gordon:

We have received the draft ISDA Master Agreement back from Nemak, S.A. which they have executed.  It appears to be in order, so I am in the process of preparing it for execution by us.  The effective date on the agreement is July 30, 2001.  We can confirm transactions with them under this Master Agreement.  Once ENA has executed the document, I will send the general e-mail to everyone as usual.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Thanks, that's nice to hear!

You can't begin to imagine how happy I am to have you back!

Thank you.

Chris Croom
Director
Enron Industrial Markets
1400 Smith St.
Houston, TX 77002
Ph:  713-853-1899
Fx:  713-646-3253
email:  chris.croom@enron.com

Samantha:

Here is an e-mail from Chris Croom forwarding a counterparty's form of Confidentiality Agreement.  He is leaving town this afternoon to go meet with them, so he needs the CA ASAP.

I think I would first check with Kay Young to see if we have a CA with them, and if so, is it still active.  Maybe we can just work off that form since the counterparty has signed it before.

Let me know if you have questions or need help.

Thanks!

Marie
 << File: Enron NDA Agreement (01_08_14)2.doc >> 
Left you a voicemail concerning this.

Thanks,
Chris

Chris Croom
Director
Enron Industrial Markets
1400 Smith St.
Houston, TX 77002
Ph:  713-853-1899
Fax::  713-646-3253
email:  chris.croom@enron.com

Hi, Tracy!

I couldn't remember if I was supposed to send you the final copy of the Schedule and Paragraph 13 or not, so what the heck, here they are!

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Frank,

I was under the impression that this ISDA was done and ready to be signed
over a month ago.  The NAV information hads been discussed and provided
before ( I have outlined it again below).  Are there any other issues that
Enron believes are open or is this it?  Please let me know immediately if
there are any other issues, if not please forward the final version for
signatures.

	NAV:		Beginning Capital balance
	plus		Additions
	minus		Withdrawls
	plus/minus	net income
	equals	Ending Capital balance
	divided by 	number os shares owned
	equals	Unit Net Asset Value

Regards,

Jim

Jim, what we really need (which we have discussed before) is a
description of how you calculate Net Asset Value.  Thanks.  Frank

>  -----Original Message-----

Hi, Veronica!

Have you had a chance to review their comments?

Marie

Mark:

I am attaching a revised list.  I forgot to show EBS, not that is has created a significant amount of work.
Thanks!

Marie

		 

Did you get this?

NYMEX and Rice will be offering a course in Risk Management this Fall
for the energy industry.  There will also be two other courses in which
NYMEX personnel will participate.  Please see the attached brochure for
information and registration.  If you have any questions, please feel
free to call the NYMEX Houston office at 713-658-9292.

Thanks,
Deniese Palmer-Huggins

 - energy courses.pdf

I will be out this Friday, August 17.

Mr. Cooper:

Pursuant to Darren Vanek's request, I am forwarding a form of multi-product/multi-affiliate guaranty.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

KINDLY FIND?  There's nothing "Kindly" about 4 credit worksheets.  In fact, we kindly reject them.

Attached kindly find credit worksheets for the above mentioned counterparties.  Kindly prepare draft Isdas and forward to the listed contact.

 << File: Peoples Energy Production.xls >>  << File: Peoples Energy Services Corp..xls >>  << File: Peoples Gas Light & Coke Company.xls >>  << File: North Shore Gas Company.xls >> 

Thanks
Rudwell. 

Will you gladly look at these four too?

Attached kindly find credit worksheets for the above mentioned counterparties.  Kindly prepare draft Isdas and forward to the listed contact.

    

Thanks
Rudwell. 

Per Legal/Credit meeting.

Attached kindly find credit worksheets for the above mentioned counterparties.  Kindly prepare draft Isdas and forward to the listed contact.

    

Thanks
Rudwell. 

I thought you would enjoy these!
fyi
The kitty picture is adorable.

These are just too precious!!!  Please excuse the typo of giraffe...I didn't create these!  The hot-dog is too much!!!

 - giraff.jpg 
 - mommycat.jpg 
 - hotdog.jpg 

Ed:

I just received these from Niagra Mohawk.  I don't know if they are the same as the ones I sent to Tanya last week that she said she forwarded on to you to assign.

Marie

Marie - per our conversation last week, attached are the proposed Schedule and
Credit Annex Paragraph 13 for your review.  Please call me after you have had
the chance to take a look at it.  I can be reached at 315-460-3344.

Patty Snyder

(See attached file: ENRON - Para13(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc)(See attached file: ENRON
- SCHEDULE(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc)

 - ENRON - Para13(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc 
 - ENRON - SCHEDULE(nmemdrft8-7-01).doc 

Hi, Joe!

Per my voicemail, will you send me the two confirms for AIG Commodity Arbitrage Fund LP and AIG Commodity Arbitrage Fund Ltd.  I need to make some changes to them.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Angie!

I am just writing to check on the status of your review of the draft ISDA Master Agreement I forwarded to you.  Will you please let me know when you anticipate sending your comments?

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

I don't have any exceptions.

Thanks!

Timesheets are due today.  Please respond to me with your exception time if you have not already done so.

Thanks!

Holly Keiser
ENA - Legal
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Thanks for your voicemail regarding CT Corporation.  My fax number is (713) 646-3490.  When I receive the information, I will insert in into the ISDA Master Agreement and will return a fully executed copy to you.

Again, thank you for your assistance and attention to this matter.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Bob:

Mark Taylor said I should forward this to you for review.  If this is not the case, please let me know.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Legal, can you please have a lawyer review the attached draft?  This is the first financial diesel swap we have done.  The trader's term sheet is also attached.  Let us know of any adjustments.  Thanks.

 

 

Hi, Max!

Francisco Pinto-Leite asked me to forward this draft to you to review the additional credit terms.  Please review the definition of "Independent Amount" on page 2 of Annex A and the definitions of "Base Volume" and "Incremental Volume" on pages 6 and 7 of Annex A and let us know if this is what you want, or please revise as you would like.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Joe:

Attached are the revised confirms for AIG Commodity Arbitrage Fund L.P. (V41967.5) and AIG Commodity Arbitrage Fund Ltd. (V41967.4).

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 	 

Alan:

Francisco asked me to send you the revised guaranty form.

Marie

Hi, Nidia!

Per my voice mail, attached is the revised form of guaranty to add "Process Agent" section.  Please send this revised form to the counterparty asking that they use this form rather than the form of guaranty you sent them on Friday.

Let us know if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

The old priest asked the new priest to sit in on his sessions. The new
priest hears a couple
confessions,
then the old priest asks him to step out of the confessional for a few
suggestions.
The old priest suggests, "Cross you arms over your chest and rub your
chin with one hand." The new priest tries this. The old priest suggests,
"Try saying things like, 'I see', 'yes', 'go on', 'I understand', and 'how
did
you feel about that?'"
The new priest says those things, trying them out.
The old priest says, "Now, don't you think that's a little better than
slapping your knee and saying 'No shit! What happened next?'"

Hi, Maribel:

I don't know if you were copied on Tana Jones's e-mail, but Legal is preparing all confidentiality agreements once again, so instead of you having to prepare the agreement, if you will just provide us with the counterparty info (name, address, contact, etc.) we will prepare the CA, have initialled and forward to you for signature.

Thanks!

Marie

Please find the attached CA on The Sutta Company, Inc. If you have any questions, please call me at 3-9048.

 << File: Confidentiality Agmt to The Sutta Company.doc >> 

Thanks,
Maribel M Monterrey 
Sr. Credit Analyst
Office: (713) 853-9048
Fax: (713) 853-9476
Maribel.Monterrey@enron.com

Wendi:

You don't believe everything Tana tells you, do you?  Haven't you realized she's just trying to get out of work?  At least now you know who really does the work in the Swap Group.

We will prepare your CA for you (since Tana won't).  Will you send Poli-Twine's address and fax number?

Thanks!

Marie

Through my conversations with Tana, I understand that there is a change in the Confidentiality Agreement.  Thus, I am sending this information to all of you.  I have another potential EOL customer that needs to have a CA executed prior to delivering financial statements.  Would one of you please help me out with this one.  Following are the details:

Mr. Dave Beazer
CFO
Poli-Twine Canada Ltd.

He would like to have the CA sent via facsimile to dbeazer@politwine.com <mailto:dbeazer@politwine.com>.  I can forward it to him once I have a draft that is acceptable with Legal..  Thanks for your help.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need additional information.

Regards,

Wendi LeBrocq
3-3835

Not a thing!

Have you heard anything new regarding the Guarantry from Pemex.

Wendi:

Attached for your further handling is the referenced CA.  When you receive the signed document from Poli-Twine, please have it initialled by a lawyer before having Bill sign.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

At the request of Ross Mesquita, I am attaching our proposed form of Non-Disclosure Agreement.  If the enclosed meets with your approval, please execute the agreement and return it to me via fax no. (713) 646-3490.  I will then have it executed by Enron.  If you have any comments or questions, please call Anne Koehler, Senior Counsel, at (713) 853-3448 or me at (713) 853-3907.  We look forward to hearing from you.

 

At the request of Ross Mesquita, I am attaching our proposed form of Non-Disclosure Agreement.  If the enclosed meets with your approval, please execute the agreement and return it to me via fax no. (713) 646-3490.  I will then have it executed by Enron.  If you have any comments or questions, please call Anne Koehler, Senior Counsel, at (713) 853-3448 or me at (713) 853-3907.  We look forward to hearing from you.

 

FYI

This is fine.  Thanks.  

Attached for your review are clean and blacklined drafts of each of the following:

We have revised the definition of "Net Asset Value" set forth in Part 5(p)(b) of each agreement and feel this will take care of the issues.

Please provide us with the date of the investment management agreement for each fund.

In addition, please verify that Catequil Associates LLC is the correct party to sign both agreements as general partner of each of the limited partnerships.

Please do not hesitate to contact Frank Sayre (713/345-7894; frank.sayre@enron.com) or me with any questions or comments.  We look forward to hearing your comments.

	  	  

I'm okay.

Ladies,

I would like to take the following days as Vacation:

September 19, 20 & 21.

Please advise if there would be any conflicts.

Thanks.

Cordially, 
Susan S. Bailey

Hallelujah!  Maybe now we won't go through as much paper as before.    

Hey gals:
I just want you to know that I have started putting the printer up here to good use!
Carol St. Clair
EB 3889
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-3393 (office fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Matt:

Here is the proposed language re appointing agents and attorneys-in-fact to sign confirmations.  We may need to run these by Mark Taylor for approval, as he approves the trading resolutions.  We need to make the appointments effective as of 5/1/01.  Also, Bryan Burnett, Edward Ondarza and Stewart Seeligson are with EBS, so I don't know if they are still officers of ENA.  Didn't Max Yzaguirre leave Enron altogether?

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie

	 

Joe:

Attached are a clean and blacklined copy of the Partial Termination.  We have revised it to reflect a "new" transaction rather than a "replacement" transaction, since the existing transaction is still in place.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

	  

Tanya/Jay:

Have you looked into the 4 Peoples-related worksheets that Rudwell sent us to verify if we want to go ahead and draft ISDAs to send to them?

Please let us know if we should go ahead and draft or not.

Thanks!

Marie

Attached kindly find credit worksheets for the above mentioned counterparties.  Kindly prepare draft Isdas and forward to the listed contact.

    

Thanks
Rudwell. 

Thanks!  If anyone should apologize for not responding in a timely fashion it should be me.  I'll work on preparing these documents and should have something to you soon.

Marie

	Dear Marie:

	I apologies for not responding in a timely fashion- I was out out of
the office for a few days last week

	I attach a sample form of corporate resolutions which Bear Stearns
typically requires in connection with accepting a guarantee of an account.
You may also want to talk to Clement Abrams of your office who provided
similar documentation in connection with an original guarantee.  I would
appreciate it if you could draft a notice of termination of the original
guarantee and I will get it signed for you.

 	Thanks and regards,

      Anna Meytina

 <<CorpRes.doc>>

 - CorpRes.doc << File: CorpRes.doc >> 

Thank you for all your hard work.  This is something that has needed to be done, but no one would take the initiative.  Let's just hope all your hard work makes it to the datasheet.

Thanks!

Marie

I hoping to get the documents initialed today revoking the old and appointing the new.

Once executed and the data entry is complete, the database will accurately reflect reality for the first time that anyone can remember.

Sincerely,

Mx

Carol:

The only one I found in our database is SMBC Capital Markets.  Sara was working on this back in 1998 for Enron Corp.  Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

Marie:
Does ENA have ISDA's in place with any of these counterparties?

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Hi Carol:

Here is the list of ISDA's we have -- these are all drafts that we have sent out - the only executed ISDA is with Research Machines.

1.  Apple Computer, Inc.
2.  Compaq Computer Corp.
3.  Dell Computer Corp.
4.  Fujitsu Siemens Company
5.  Hewlett Packard
6.  Mosel Vitelic
7.  Research Machines - executed
8.  SMBC Capital Markets
9.  Sun Micro Systems, Inc.  

Did you need any additional info on these counterparties?  Let me know if you need help with anything else.

Thanks

Tracy

Adam:

I have passed your comments along to our Credit Department and am waiting for a response.  I will touch base with them.  Hopefully we can wrap this up soon.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Marie,

Just wondering if you could give me an update regarding the status of our
comments to the ISDA?  We have no place to get insistent, given the amount of
time it took us to compile our remarks.  Still, I'm sure everyone is eager to
get the issues resolved and the documents in place.

Thanks.

Adam Auten

Exception:  9/5 - Vacation

thanks!

Timesheets are due tomorrow, Friday, September 14.  Please send me your exception time for pay period September 1-15, 2001.

Thanks!

Holly Keiser
Enron Wholesale Services
Legal Department
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Jay:

I responded to Adam and told him that our Credit Department was reviewing the comments and that I would check on the status.

Marie

Marie,

Just wondering if you could give me an update regarding the status of our
comments to the ISDA?  We have no place to get insistent, given the amount of
time it took us to compile our remarks.  Still, I'm sure everyone is eager to
get the issues resolved and the documents in place.

Thanks.

Adam Auten

Ms. Rosenthal:

Sara Shackleton just left for vacation until after Labor Day, but asked me to respond to your e-mail regarding sending us your completed ISDA schedule.  Our Credit Department has said that Enron Corp. will provide a parent guaranty for ECT Investments, Inc., however, they would like for CSFB to also provide a guaranty since CSFB (Europe) is not a rated entity, or provide independent financial statements for CSFB (Europe).  Our Credit Department did not provide us with a cap for the Enron Corp. guaranty.

You can send your ISDA Schedule to my attention and we will proceed with reviewing same.

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Hi, Jaime:

Attached for your further handling are the draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Please attach the pre-printed form ISDA Master Agreement and the pre-printed form Credit Support Annex to the attached drafts before sending to the counterparty.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Hi, Patrick:

Can you provide me with the date for Deal No. VT2401.1?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Robbi!

Thought I'd e-mail you rather than call and interrupt you.  How are things going now that Lance and Carol are there?  Hopefully, better.  Mark gave me my review Thursday and I kept a copy of it to show you.  Kristina managed to get her digs in, but, fortunately, Mark  saw right through them.

Our contractor is going to start work on our house the week of Labor Day, so we are having to pack as much as we can to move upstairs.  We thought it would be perfect if we could find fabric to recover our furniture so that maybe we could send it out while the construction is going on.  If your offer's still good, we would like your assistance in looking for fabric.  We were hoping to take a day off to look for fabric but didn't know how that would fit into your plans.  Would you let me know?

Also, we need to schedule a lunch with Erica and Jane.  What is best for you?

Talk to you later.

Mare

Hi, Greg!

Wendy Conwell in Credit here in Houston forwarded this worksheet to us to prepare an omnibus confirmation for a deal between ECC and Atco Electric.  Since you guys are preparing confirms up there, I am forwarding the worksheet to you to prepare.  Francisco Pinto-Leite is marking up the counterparty form of guaranty and will forward it to you also.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Please find attached the credit worksheet with credit terms to be incorporated into the financial Omnibus confirmation for financial deals done between ECC and Atco Electric.  Please note, these deals were done today pending credit and the confirmations are waiting to go out to the counterparty.  I have already spoken to Francisco about it so please forward the necessary documentation to him AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.
 

Thanks so much for all your help!

As always, I greatly appreciate it!
Wendy 

Hi, Mark!

Francisco asked me to forward this e-mail to you in Greg's absence.  Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Hi, Greg!

Wendy Conwell in Credit here in Houston forwarded this worksheet to us to prepare an omnibus confirmation for a deal between ECC and Atco Electric.  Since you guys are preparing confirms up there, I am forwarding the worksheet to you to prepare.  Francisco Pinto-Leite is marking up the counterparty form of guaranty and will forward it to you also.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Please find attached the credit worksheet with credit terms to be incorporated into the financial Omnibus confirmation for financial deals done between ECC and Atco Electric.  Please note, these deals were done today pending credit and the confirmations are waiting to go out to the counterparty.  I have already spoken to Francisco about it so please forward the necessary documentation to him AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.
 

Thanks so much for all your help!

As always, I greatly appreciate it!
Wendy 

Don't worry.  That's why we're here--to keep you on your toes.

Sorry I am such an AIRHEAD today!!!  I am just exhausted so I am messing things up.  Truly do apologize  and I promise I will try not to let it happen again.

Wendy

Hi, Greg!

Wendy Conwell in Credit here in Houston forwarded this worksheet to us to prepare an omnibus confirmation for a deal between ECC and Atco Electric.  Since you guys are preparing confirms up there, I am forwarding the worksheet to you to prepare.  Francisco Pinto-Leite is marking up the counterparty form of guaranty and will forward it to you also.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Please find attached the credit worksheet with credit terms to be incorporated into the financial Omnibus confirmation for financial deals done between ECC and Atco Electric.  Please note, these deals were done today pending credit and the confirmations are waiting to go out to the counterparty.  I have already spoken to Francisco about it so please forward the necessary documentation to him AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.
 << File: Atco Omnibus CW.xls >> 

Thanks so much for all your help!

As always, I greatly appreciate it!
Wendy 

[IMAGE] =09

=09home flights hotels cars packages cruises guides maps business =09=09

   [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]  [IMAGE]   =09=09

=20
      CONTENTS    [IMAGE]   Find a Flight    [IMAGE]   Take a Vacation     =
         [IMAGE]   Reserve A Room         [IMAGE]   Plan A Cruise         [=
IMAGE]   Rent A Car         [IMAGE]   See What's New                   [IMA=
GE]        [IMAGE]        =09[IMAGE]=09   Dear Marie,      [IMAGE] Our bran=
d-new Las Vegas store  is your one-stop source for all of the best deals in=
 Vegas. You'll find great prices on vacation packages, hotels, and flights,=
 as well as event calendars and news. Find out who's playing, then make you=
r reservation and jet off to the world's most exciting city!               =
  [IMAGE] A SPECIAL TIP FROM EXPEDIA.COM [IMAGE]     Manage your frequent t=
raveler benefits with MileageMiner  -- FREE!   Frequent traveler programs a=
re a great way to earn free and  discounted travel, but keeping up with all=
 your programs can be  time consuming. Why not try a free one-year membersh=
ip in  MileageMiner from MaxMiles?   MileageMiner manages your new or exist=
ing frequent traveler  programs, so you can maximize your benefits -- with =
minimal effort. Click here for more information, or to sign up now .       =
   [IMAGE] FIND A FLIGHT [IMAGE]       Sale: British Airways flights to Eur=
ope as low as $278 roundtrip  Book your ticket by August 30.    Big savings=
 -- up to 60% off -- with Expedia Bargain Fares  Fly with a Bargain Fare, a=
nd spend the savings your way.   Fare sales galore: Get the lowdown on how =
to save  Read all the news on the latest airline fare sales.             [I=
MAGE] TAKE A VACATION [IMAGE]     Puerto Vallarta vacation deal: Five-night=
 package from $492  Relax in luxury at the four-star Sheraton Buganvilias R=
esort.   Oahu: Five-night package from $503  Stay right on beautiful, excit=
ing Waikiki Beach.    Miami Beach: Three-night package from $263  Claim you=
r sunny spot on the Radisson Deauville's private beach.    See all our top =
vacation package values!     Package rates are per person (double occupancy=
), subject to availability, and vary by departure city.            [IMAGE] =
RESERVE A ROOM [IMAGE]        Las Vegas: Hotel deals from just $39  Get gre=
at prices in some of Sin City's finest hotels.    Wyndham/ESR hotels: Save =
25% off our already low rates  You always save with ESRs -- but now you sav=
e even more!   New York City getaways - Vacation Rentals from $169  All the=
 comforts of home, in three great city neighborhoods.    Pssst! See our bes=
t hotel deals!              [IMAGE] PLAN A CRUISE [IMAGE]     Three-day Bah=
amarama cruise (Miami roundtrip) from $263  Sail to Bahamian paradise: Nass=
au and Great Stirrup Cay.   Five-day southern Caribbean cruise (San Juan ro=
undtrip) from $379  Visit beautiful St. Kitts, St. Lucia, and Barbados.    =
Seven-day eastern Caribbean Disney Adventure Cruise from $799  Cruise with =
Mickey to St. Maarten, St. Thomas, and Castaway Cay.   See all our top crui=
se deals !           [IMAGE] RENT A CAR [IMAGE]     Save on your weekend or=
 weekly rental with Avis!  Offer good through September 30, 2001.          =
[IMAGE] SEE WHAT'S NEW ON EXPEDIA.COM [IMAGE]     Slide Show: Viva Las Vega=
s!  From campy glitz to high art to natural beauty, Vegas has it all.    Ex=
pedia Recommends: Marvelous Miami   Miami's best: Rock & roll legends, art =
deco confections, and more.   360? Tour: Chicago  The skyline, the lake, th=
e museums: See it all, right here.          [IMAGE]  Thank you for travelin=
g with Expedia.com.   Expedia.com Travel Team  Don't just travel. Travel Ri=
ght.TM   Expedia.com  [IMAGE]    Unless otherwise noted, all prices quoted =
are in U.S. dollars.   Prices subject to change without notice.   About thi=
s mailing: You are receiving this e-mail because you are a registered membe=
r of Expedia.com
.     Photo: Las Vegas Convention and Visitors Authority/Las Vegas News Bur=
eau   Questions about your privacy? Read our privacy statement .   If you h=
ave other questions, visit the Expedia.com Customer Support Center .     If=
 you do not wish to receive any further promotional e-mails from us, please=
 reply to this mail with "unsubscribe" in the subject line.   If you'd like=
 to give us feedback, click here .   ?2001 Expedia, Inc. Expedia, Expedia.c=
om, the Airplane logo, and "Don't just travel. Travel Right." are either re=
gistered trademarks or trademarks of Expedia, Inc. in the United States and=
/or other countries. All rights reserved. Other company and product names m=
entioned herein may be trademarks of their respective owners.    Expedia te=
rms of use .      =09

This email was sent to:  mheard@ect.enron.com

Susan:

Sara received this e-mail from First Union regarding the ISDA with Enron Corp.  Per Lotus Notes, you are working with Sara on this.  Is this something you can handle, or should it wait until Sara returns?

Thanks!

Marie
Marie, this looks like a response is necessary.

First Union Securities, Inc.

Sara,

Yes.  I explained your view on the CSA to our Credit department.  They're
still eager to put a bilateral CSA in place.  We believe it is mutually
beneficial as the credit lines would not be exhausted too soon if we could
set up a mark-to-market collateral arrangement between the parties.

Could you please reconsider.  Have you considered the removal of the
arbitration provision?

Vijay

	-----Original Message-----
	You were going to check with your credit group.  Do you have a
response
	(re: CSA)?  Sara

	    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Suchdev+2C+20Vijay+22+20+3CVijay+2ESuchdev+40funb+2Eco
m+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

	   Sent:   Wednesday, August 22, 2001 1:34 PM
	   First Union Securities, Inc.

	   Hi Sara,

	   I just wanted to follow up on our discussion of the draft ISDA
last
	   week.
	   When you're back in the office and you have a moment, could you
please
	   give
	   me a call.

	   Thanks and regards,

	   Vijay K. Suchdev
	   Vice President
	   Equity Derivatives
	   First Union Securities, Inc.
	   Telephone: (212) 909-0951
	   Facsimile: (212) 891-5042
	   email: vijay.suchdev@funb.com <mailto:vijay.suchdev@funb.com>

	   This is for your information only and is not an offer to sell, or
a
	   solicitation of an offer to buy, the securities or instruments
	   mentioned.  The information has been obtained or derived from
sources
	   believed by us to be reliable, but we do not represent that it is
	   accurate or complete.  Any opinions or estimates contained in
this
	   information constitute our judgement as of this date and are
subject to
	   change without notice.  First Union Securities, Inc. (FUSI), or
its
	   affiliates may provide advice or may from time to time acquire,
hold or
	   sell a position in the securities mentioned herein.  FUSI is a
	   subsidiary of First Union Corporation and is a member of the
NYSE, NASD
	   and SIPC.  FUSI is a separate and distinct entity from its
affiliated
	   banks and thrifts.

This is for your information only and is not an offer to sell, or a solicitation of an offer to buy, the securities or instruments mentioned.  The information has been obtained or derived from sources believed by us to be reliable, but we do not represent that it is accurate or complete.  Any opinions or estimates contained in this information constitute our judgement as of this date and are subject to change without notice.  First Union Securities, Inc. (FUSI), or its affiliates may provide advice or may from time to time acquire, hold or sell a position in the securities mentioned herein.  FUSI is a
subsidiary of First Union Corporation and is a member of the NYSE, NASD and SIPC.  FUSI is a separate and distinct entity from its affiliated banks and thrifts.

Hi, Gordon!

This is a Chilean counterparty that Nidia Mendoza in Credit asked us to prepare a "sample" Deemed ISDA for.  This is all I know, which probably isn't much.

Marie

Hi Marie.  Is this a new counterparty?

Attached is the draft Deemed ISDA for the referenced counterparty.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 << File: 016conf(petroquim).doc >> 

Cindy:

Attached for your further handling are an Enron Corp. guaranty in favor of the The City of Glendale, together with related secretary's certificates.  Please let me know when the documents have been signed and I'll arrange for pickup.

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Celeste:

Are there deal terms that the lawyer can use to review the confirm?  If not, what are they specifically reviewing?

Thanks!

Marie

Hey there!  We created this draft for Andrew and are needing someone in legal to review.  Please advise. Thanks.  

Please be advised that we are also sending this to legal.  Although this is a draft, the final form that legal approves will probably be very different.

 << File: JP Morgan Draft 082201.doc >> 

Robbi:

Friday would be great for us, as long as it's not going to put you in a bind since you are trying to get out for vacation.  Also, yes, I would like to look at your catalog.  I'm so glad we're bosom buddies!

We will offer our painting services to you if you want to do a faux finish at your new home.

Marie

Marie,

  Are you free Thursday or Friday?  After Friday I am out for two weeks - yeah!  I would be happy to help you with your fabric needs.  I can tell you where I get discounts and you can look yourself - or, what may be better is if we go to the decorative center on our lunch hour (Friday would be best for me) and I could show you the stores and you could go back and look some more on your day off.  Your right that you do need a whole day - and the decorative center is only open Monday to Friday, 8 to 5.  Other places, like Calico Corners, do not give discounts to "decorators".  Let me know what you would like to do.  Also, I am ordering some fruit in jars for Jane and myself (like they have at the Energizer) I can get them a lot cheaper and have a catalog if your interested.  I offer my free services only to my bosom buddies!

Hi, Robbi!

Thought I'd e-mail you rather than call and interrupt you.  How are things going now that Lance and Carol are there?  Hopefully, better.  Mark gave me my review Thursday and I kept a copy of it to show you.  Kristina managed to get her digs in, but, fortunately, Mark  saw right through them.

Our contractor is going to start work on our house the week of Labor Day, so we are having to pack as much as we can to move upstairs.  We thought it would be perfect if we could find fabric to recover our furniture so that maybe we could send it out while the construction is going on.  If your offer's still good, we would like your assistance in looking for fabric.  We were hoping to take a day off to look for fabric but didn't know how that would fit into your plans.  Would you let me know?

Also, we need to schedule a lunch with Erica and Jane.  What is best for you?

Talk to you later.

Mare

I just received this e-mail from Todd Perkins at Southern Co.

We have been working on ISDA's with you for several of our subsidiaries
(Georgia Power Company, Mississippi Power Company, Gulf Power Company and
Savannah Electric and Power Company).  Up to this point, we have wanted to
execute an ISDA for each of these companies.  Due to the way in which we
operate our generation assets as a single system, we have decided that we
need to change the way in which we enter these ISDA's.  We would like to
execute a single ISDA with you that includes six of our subsidiaries.  This
is how we have entered some of our physical trading contracts.  In this
arrangement, the counterparty on Southern's side would be listed as,

"Southern Company Services, Inc. as agent for Alabama Power Company, Georgia
Power Company, Gulf Power Company, Mississippi Power Company, Savannah
Electric and Power Company, and Southern Power Company"

By using this approach, we have more flexibility in entering trades and it
provides even stronger credit protection for you since all six of these
companies are on the hook.  Probably the best way to proceed is for you to
forward your comments back to me from the last draft I sent to you.  I will
then make the changes to reflect this approach described above and send back
to you.  I look forward to receiving your comments back.  Please give me a
call if you have any questions.

Thanks,

Todd A. Perkins
taperkin@southernco.com
(404) 506-0655

Hi, Cindy:

Enron Corp. executed a guaranty dated as of March 29, 2001 in favor of The Bear Stearns Companies, et al, guaranteeing Enron Credit Inc.'s obligations under a Securities Loan Agreement and brokerage agreement that were originally executed by ENA and assigned to Enron Credit Inc.  Andy Fastow signed this guaranty.  Bear Stearns is now asking for certificates as to authority and incumbency, so I have prepared and attach them for processing.

In addition, Enron Corp. executed a guaranty dated as of February 20, 2001 in favor of The Bear Stearns Companies, et al, guaranteeing ENA's obligations under the Securities Loan Agreement and brokerage agreement that were subsequently assigned to Enron Credit Inc.  We asked Bear Stearns to return the original Enron Corp. guaranty and apparently they have lost it.  In this regard, I am attaching a form of termination for that guaranty.  If it is in order, please process it for signature.

Thanks for your help and if you have any questions or need anything else, please let me know.

Marie
x33907

		 	 

		

I don't think another e-mail would be rude.  It's rude that she hasn't responded to our other requests.  Do you want to send it or do you want me to.  I'll be happy to.

Marie

Anything at all?
Would another e-mail be rude?

I bet things get really hot here soon...
~L

FYI.  What's the big deal in CSFB not sending us their form of schedule until we send the form of Enron Corp. guaranty and said that ECT Investments will collateralize its trades?

Marie 
sorry if this is a repeat, I got an error message this first attempt

 - Lissa

Marie,

Thanks for getting back to me so quickly.  Providing financials for CSFB
Europe Ltd and CSFBi will not be a problem.  If we could get a copy of the
guarantee Enron Corp. will provide, my credit dept. will send out the ISDA
schedule.

One remaining question is will ECT collateralize their trades?  Thanks in
advance for your help.

Lissa

Lissa Rosenthal
Equity Derivatives & Convertible Unit
CREDIT | FIRST
SUISSE | BOSTON
11 Madison Avenue - 3rd Floor
New York, NY 10010
Email: lissa.rosenthal@csfb.com
TEL: (212) 325-7278
FAX: (212) 325-8180

Ms. Rosenthal:

Sara Shackleton just left for vacation until after Labor Day, but asked
me to respond to your e-mail regarding sending us your completed ISDA
schedule.  Our Credit Department has said that Enron Corp. will provide
a parent guaranty for ECT Investments, Inc., however, they would like
for CSFB to also provide a guaranty since CSFB (Europe) is not a rated
entity, or provide independent financial statements for CSFB (Europe).
Our Credit Department did not provide us with a cap for the Enron Corp.
guaranty.

You can send your ISDA Schedule to my attention and we will proceed with
reviewing same.

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute,
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

Tanya:

You'll love this.  ALCOA has sent us an amendment to the ISDA (that was signed 1/99) and wants to amend the "threshold amount" in Part 1 so that it corresponds to the current credit rating of the applicable party as indicated in Paragraph 13.  I think we are mixing apples and oranges!  Obviously they didn't understand the difference when they signed the ISDA in '99.  And it's the same lawyer sending the amendment who negotiated the master.

Marie

Mr. Giordano:

Attached are the final blacklined drafts of the ISDA Master Agreements for Catequil Overseas Partners Ltd. and Catequil Partners L.P., which incorporate your comments sent to us on 8/22.  With respect to "Valuation and Timing", we just inadvertently left that comment in, but have now deleted it.

Please let us know if the final comments are acceptable to you and, if so, we will finalize copies for execution.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Oops, sorry!

	 	 

Marie,

There are no attachments, please resend

Thanks

Jim

Mr. Giordano:

Attached are the final blacklined drafts of the ISDA Master Agreements
for Catequil Overseas Partners Ltd. and Catequil Partners L.P., which
incorporate your comments sent to us on 8/22.  With respect to
"Valuation and Timing", we just inadvertently left that comment in, but
have now deleted it.

Please let us know if the final comments are acceptable to you and, if
so, we will finalize copies for execution.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Thanks, Veronica.  Brent Hendry is going to call you about Todd Perkins' e-mail.  We don't want to enter into an ISDA with an agency arrangement as it poses problems as far as netting and other matters.  Brent will call Todd and tell him that we will either enter into 6 separate masters or one master with Southern and then they can internally back to back trades.  So, I would not do anything until Brent speaks with you and Todd.

Marie

Marie--

Finally--I'm getting back to you with comments on these ISDA's.  Although the counterparty is now proposing something different, I thought I would send you this for your files.  I'm attaching the document that I went through for Georgia Power.  The changes to the documents are the same for all three, with exception of the specified thresholds.  The only difference will be the thresholds as follows:

Savannah Electric and Power Company: 3rd Party debt for Party B changed to $10MM will be acceptable, Threshold of $10MM will be acceptable, and the minimum transfer amount should be $100M (not $500 as they requested).
Mississippi Power Company: 3rd Party debt for Party B being changed to $20MM will be acceptable, Threshold should be countered to $15MM, and min transfer countered at $100M.
Georgia Power Company: Threshold info, etc is located in the attached document.

I've highlighted all of my comments in yellow below.  Again, the same comments (except for the thresholds, etc. mentioned above) should resemble the other two documents.  Please give me a call if you have any questions.

Thanks again and I apologize for the delay.

Veronica

 << File: Georgia Power Company comments.doc >> 

Hi, Veronica!

Attached are comments from Todd Perkins to the Georgia Power, Mississippi Power and Savannah Electric ISDA's.  Once you have reviewed the credit comments, please let us have your responses.

Thanks!

Marie
Here are the ISDA Schedules for Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and
Savannah Electric with our comments.  Please let me know when you are ready
to discuss.

Todd Perkins
Southern Company
404-506-0655

 <<Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Mississippi ISDA
Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc>>

 - Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc << File: Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc >> 
 - Enron - Mississippi ISDA Schedule.doc << File: Enron - Mississippi ISDA Schedule.doc >> 
 - Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc << File: Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc >> 

I would like the Roasted Chicken Cobb Salad, with no eggs, if possible, and vinaigrette dressing.

Oh, and extra sugar cookies, please!

Thanks!

Marie

I was thinking about ordering you guys a salad for the next paralegal luncheon, please let me know which of the following salads you would like:

Classic Chef Salad (Mixed green topped with Smoked Turkey, Honey Baked Ham, Cheddar & Swiss Cheese.  Served with fresh tomato, sliced egg and your choice of dressing).
Jamaican Jerk Spiced Flank Steak (Thinly sliced Grilled Flank Steak served over Field Greens with Roasted Onions, Grilled Zucchini and Tomato.  Served with House-Baked Croutons and Garlic and Herb Vinaigrette).
Blackened Chicken Salad Sliced Blackened Chicken Breast served over Mixed Greens with Tomato, Cucumber, Jalape?o Jack Quesadillas and Fried Tortilla Strips).
Caesar Salad (Your choice of Grilled Chicken or Beef.  Served with Romaine Lettuce, Parmesan Cheese, Kalamata Olives and House-Baked Croutons).
Roasted Chicken Cobb Salad (Iceberg and Romaine Lettuce, Diced Tomatoes, Sliced Chicken, Bacon, Sliced Eggs and Crumbled Bleu Cheese.  Served with your choice of dressing.

Should you prefer to order a box lunch instead, please let me know.  Thanks.

Esmeralda Gonzalez

Oops, sorry!  Here they are!

Marie

	 	 

Lissa:

Attached is the proposed form of guaranty that Enron Corp. will provide.  ECT Investments would only collateralize above the threshold, since you would have a guaranty for the rest.  We look forward to receiving your form of schedule.

Marie

sorry if this is a repeat, I got an error message this first attempt

 - Lissa

Marie,

Thanks for getting back to me so quickly.  Providing financials for CSFB
Europe Ltd and CSFBi will not be a problem.  If we could get a copy of the
guarantee Enron Corp. will provide, my credit dept. will send out the ISDA
schedule.

One remaining question is will ECT collateralize their trades?  Thanks in
advance for your help.

Lissa

Lissa Rosenthal
Equity Derivatives & Convertible Unit
CREDIT | FIRST
SUISSE | BOSTON
11 Madison Avenue - 3rd Floor
New York, NY 10010
Email: lissa.rosenthal@csfb.com
TEL: (212) 325-7278
FAX: (212) 325-8180

Ms. Rosenthal:

Sara Shackleton just left for vacation until after Labor Day, but asked
me to respond to your e-mail regarding sending us your completed ISDA
schedule.  Our Credit Department has said that Enron Corp. will provide
a parent guaranty for ECT Investments, Inc., however, they would like
for CSFB to also provide a guaranty since CSFB (Europe) is not a rated
entity, or provide independent financial statements for CSFB (Europe).
Our Credit Department did not provide us with a cap for the Enron Corp.
guaranty.

You can send your ISDA Schedule to my attention and we will proceed with
reviewing same.

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute,
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

Lissa:

I must be having problems with my e-mail as I tried to reply to yours and was told it couldn't be delivered, so that's why I'm sending you a new one rather than a reply.

Attached is the proposed form of guaranty that Enron Corp. will provide.  ECT Investments would only collateralize above the threshold, since you would have a guaranty for the rest.

We look forward to receiving your schedule.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Great!  Hopefully, we will be able to sign them up soon.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

Looks fine,   I will forward to our attorney for one last look.

Thanks

Jim

Oops, sorry!

     (See attached file: 037BCTR(CATEQUIL OVERSEAS).RED.DOC)      (See
attached file: 039BCTR(CATEQUIL PARTNERS).RED.DOC)

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-James+20Giordano+20+3Cjgiordano+40catequil+2Ecom+3E+40ENR
ON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Thursday, August 23, 2001 3:04 PM
   Marie,

   There are no attachments, please resend

   Thanks

   Jim

   -----Original Message-----
   Mr. Giordano:

   Attached are the final blacklined drafts of the ISDA Master Agreements
   for Catequil Overseas Partners Ltd. and Catequil Partners L.P., which
   incorporate your comments sent to us on 8/22.  With respect to
   "Valuation and Timing", we just inadvertently left that comment in, but
   have now deleted it.

   Please let us know if the final comments are acceptable to you and, if
   so, we will finalize copies for execution.

   Thanks!

   Marie Heard
   Senior Legal Specialist
   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

We can look at your documents, however, we are unable to open the one you have sent previously.  Will you resend them?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi Marie, 
Our attorney has been on vacation most of this month, and unfortunately, we have not had the chance to review of your proposed ISDA documents.  Would it be possible for you to review our docs?  It will certainly help us out since we currently have a back log of unsigned ISDA contracts.  Please advise.
Thanks, Angie 

Great!  Hopefully we will be able to sign soon.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

Looks fine,   I will forward to our attorney for one last look.

Thanks

Jim

Oops, sorry!

     (See attached file: 037BCTR(CATEQUIL OVERSEAS).RED.DOC)      (See
attached file: 039BCTR(CATEQUIL PARTNERS).RED.DOC)

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-James+20Giordano+20+3Cjgiordano+40catequil+2Ecom+3E+40ENR
ON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Thursday, August 23, 2001 3:04 PM
   Marie,

   There are no attachments, please resend

   Thanks

   Jim

   -----Original Message-----
   Mr. Giordano:

   Attached are the final blacklined drafts of the ISDA Master Agreements
   for Catequil Overseas Partners Ltd. and Catequil Partners L.P., which
   incorporate your comments sent to us on 8/22.  With respect to
   "Valuation and Timing", we just inadvertently left that comment in, but
   have now deleted it.

   Please let us know if the final comments are acceptable to you and, if
   so, we will finalize copies for execution.

   Thanks!

   Marie Heard
   Senior Legal Specialist
   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

Yes--I would like to see the signed copy before I send the Enron Corp. guaranty.  My office location is EB3803B.

thanks!

Marie

Bianca:

We have a signed Master Agreement dated as of November 1, 1994 between ECT and Transammonia, Inc. acting through its division, Trammochem.  VX6259.1 can be confirmed under this master, therefore, you don't need anything from us.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Good Morning,

Could one of you prepare a deemed isda for Trammochem, A Division of Transammonia, Inc. (VX6259.1).  This deal has no additional credit.  
			
			The address-    9 Temasek Boulevard, Floor 19-03
					Suntec Tower 2
					Singpore

Thanks,

Bianca

Cindy:

Has this guaranty been processed?  We've received the original signed master agreement from the counterparty and need to deliver the original Enron Corp. Guaranty.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Cindy:

I'm assisting EBS in some of their trading work for awhile, so this is why I am sending you the attached memo requesting an Enron Corp. Guaranty.

Please let me know when the guaranty is ready and I'll arrange for pick-up.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

		 

Thanks!

This actually went out for signature yesterday afternoon.

Cindy:

Has this guaranty been processed?  We've received the original signed master agreement from the counterparty and need to deliver the original Enron Corp. Guaranty.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Cindy:

I'm assisting EBS in some of their trading work for awhile, so this is why I am sending you the attached memo requesting an Enron Corp. Guaranty.

Please let me know when the guaranty is ready and I'll arrange for pick-up.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

		 << File: 017memo.doc >> 

Ms. Tebbens:

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Lissa:

Enron Corp. does not give unlimited guaranties.  The amount will be determined by our Credit Department based upon the credit in your draft ISDA.

Marie

Marie,

One more quick question.  In line 1 (b) below in the guaranty, the cap
amount of the guarantee was left blank.  Is Enron willing to not cap the
guaranty amount, or does this term still need to be negotiated?  Thanks,

 - Lissa

"1 (b)  The aggregate amount covered by this Guaranty shall not exceed U.S.
$________."

Lissa:

I must be having problems with my e-mail as I tried to reply to yours
and was told it couldn't be delivered, so that's why I'm sending you a
new one rather than a reply.

Attached is the proposed form of guaranty that Enron Corp. will provide.
ECT Investments would only collateralize above the threshold, since you
would have a guaranty for the rest.

We look forward to receiving your schedule.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 <<csfbguar(ect inv.).doc>>

This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute,
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

Thanks.  I was able to open them.

Marie

Marie, attached are the files which were sent you previously.  Please let me know if you continue to have problems viewing these documents.
Thanks, Angie 
 - SoCal ISDA Schedule.doc << File: SoCal ISDA Schedule.doc >> 
 - SoCal CSA P-13.doc << File: SoCal CSA P-13.doc >> 
 - SoCalGas Parental Gty062801(v2).DOC << File: SoCalGas Parental Gty062801(v2).DOC >> 

I don't have it.

Does anyone have the executed master with Societe Generale?  Please give to Brent Hendry.  Thank you!

 

There is a company that will need to provide us with a guaranty prior to allowing access to trade on EOL.  The guaranty will cover physical NG and physical Power.  Through working with the financial legal team, a format has been discussed that covers multiple products for physical and financial business across multiple Enron entities.  Ideally, this is probably the best format to have a counterparty use.  Pursuant to instructions, I am not sending out a format to this company without having a member of the legal team give me the ok.  I was hoping that we could all coordinate on the multi-product, multi-entity format and possibly use it on a going forward basis.  Thanks for your help and please let me know if there are any questions.

Regards,

Wendi LeBrocq
3-3835

Veronica:

Will you look at the "Transfer" section on Page 11 of the Schedule and let me know if you are okay with their change?

Thanks!

Marie

Marie--

Finally--I'm getting back to you with comments on these ISDA's.  Although the counterparty is now proposing something different, I thought I would send you this for your files.  I'm attaching the document that I went through for Georgia Power.  The changes to the documents are the same for all three, with exception of the specified thresholds.  The only difference will be the thresholds as follows:

Savannah Electric and Power Company: 3rd Party debt for Party B changed to $10MM will be acceptable, Threshold of $10MM will be acceptable, and the minimum transfer amount should be $100M (not $500 as they requested).
Mississippi Power Company: 3rd Party debt for Party B being changed to $20MM will be acceptable, Threshold should be countered to $15MM, and min transfer countered at $100M.
Georgia Power Company: Threshold info, etc is located in the attached document.

I've highlighted all of my comments in yellow below.  Again, the same comments (except for the thresholds, etc. mentioned above) should resemble the other two documents.  Please give me a call if you have any questions.

Thanks again and I apologize for the delay.

Veronica

 << File: Georgia Power Company comments.doc >> 

Hi, Veronica!

Attached are comments from Todd Perkins to the Georgia Power, Mississippi Power and Savannah Electric ISDA's.  Once you have reviewed the credit comments, please let us have your responses.

Thanks!

Marie
Here are the ISDA Schedules for Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and
Savannah Electric with our comments.  Please let me know when you are ready
to discuss.

Todd Perkins
Southern Company
404-506-0655

 <<Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Mississippi ISDA
Schedule.doc>>  <<Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc>>

 - Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc << File: Enron - Georgia ISDA Schedule.doc >> 
 - Enron - Mississippi ISDA Schedule.doc << File: Enron - Mississippi ISDA Schedule.doc >> 
 - Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc << File: Enron - Savannah ISDA Schedule.doc >> 

No.  Thanks for asking.

Dear Representative of ENRON C&T USA.  There are new confirmations available for your review at: https://www.gs.com/ja/cos/docsearch

If you have any problems, questions or comments regarding this e-mail please contact Sal Gentile at Tel: 212 902 5918

You can go to the IRS website at www.irs.gov and download copies of the appropriate tax forms.  

HI Marie

I've received an executed ISDA back from Research Machines -- regarding all of the compliance items listed in the Schedule -- that we need to deliver -- do you have a contact person in tax, etc. where you get the documents?  For example, "duly executed tax forms, documents or certificates referenced " -- this is one of the items we need to deliver to counterparty.  Could you let me know how to handle this please?

I could work with Carol St. Clair on this if you prefer.

Thanks Marie.

Tracy

Mr. Flett:

I am close to finishing the review of your draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and was hoping to receive your Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex to review so that I can present them both to Sara Shackleton for final review upon her return from vacation on September 4.  If your Paragraph 13 is ready, please forward to me via e-mail at the address noted below.

Thank you for your assistance and, should you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact us.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Yes, I got the copy.  I will send you a copy of the guaranty when I receive it.

Marie

Did you get this copy?  Could I get a copy of the Enron Corp. guaranty so my files are complete - 
Thanks

Tracy

Yes--I would like to see the signed copy before I send the Enron Corp. guaranty.  My office location is EB3803B.

thanks!

Marie

David:

Your counterparty is being impossible.  Please see their latest message below.  They won't even send us their draft ISDA until we provide them with every little bit of info.  This is only a draft, not the final one.  It can and probably will be negotiated.

Thanks!

Marie
Marie:

Our legal department is reviewing the guarantee.  We would like to send you
out an ISDA schedule as quickly as possible, but in order to set appropriate
terms our credit department would like a bit more information on ECT
Investment.  Specifically the types, size and frequency of anticipated
trades.  Any color you could offer would be helpful. Thanks again.

Rgds,

Lissa

Lissa:

Enron Corp. does not give unlimited guaranties.  The amount will be
determined by our Credit Department based upon the credit in your draft
ISDA.

Marie

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Rosenthal+2C+20Lissa+22+20+3Clissa+2Erosenthal+40csfb+
2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Friday, August 24, 2001 10:10 AM
   Marie,

   One more quick question.  In line 1 (b) below in the guaranty, the cap
   amount of the guarantee was left blank.  Is Enron willing to not cap the
   guaranty amount, or does this term still need to be negotiated?  Thanks,

    - Lissa

   "1 (b)  The aggregate amount covered by this Guaranty shall not exceed
   U.S.
   $________."

   -----Original Message-----
   Lissa:

   I must be having problems with my e-mail as I tried to reply to yours
   and was told it couldn't be delivered, so that's why I'm sending you a
   new one rather than a reply.

   Attached is the proposed form of guaranty that Enron Corp. will provide.
   ECT Investments would only collateralize above the threshold, since you
   would have a guaranty for the rest.

   We look forward to receiving your schedule.

   Marie

   Marie Heard
   Senior Legal Specialist
                      <<csfbguar(ect inv.).doc>>

   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

   This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain
   confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No
   confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
   If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and
   all
   copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify
   the
   sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose,
   distribute,
   print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended
   recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
   the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.
   Any
   views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender,
   except
   where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state
   them to be the views of any such entity.
   Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message
   is
   indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer
   to
   deal at any price quoted.
   Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as
   preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute,
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

This is pretty eerie!

See the image in this picture.

 

 

Here it is!

	 

Kim:

Attached for your further handling are a clean and blacklined draft of the revised Schedule and Paragraph 13 for the City of Glendale.

We will try to verify the outside counsel to use in connection with rendering the legal opinion so that we can begin that process.  If we have any problems, it may have to wait until Sara Shackleton returns on 9/4 since she is more familiar with who we use and what the extent of the engagement will be.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

	 	 

Mr. Boytinck:

I am sending this e-mail to check on the status of the Master Agreement for Garden City Plaza Ltd. that was forwarded to you for execution.  It would be appreciated if you would let me know the status.

Thank you!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Hi, Tracy!

I've never received the signature pages to the Allegheny ISDA initialled by you.  Have you

Hi, Tracy!

I have never received the signature pages for the Allegheny ISDA.  Have you sent them?

Mare

Hi, Una:

Per my voice mail, we need a copy of a representative sample of whatever documentation BNP Paribas and Enron Metals Limited transact under (ISDA, general terms and conditions, etc.).  We are trying to finalize and sign a master netting agreement with them this morning and need to see this documentation as soon as possible.

My phone number is (713) 853-3907 and my fax is (713) 646-3490.

Thanks for your help!!!!!!!!!

Marie

THANKS!!!!!!

Marie,

I have checked livelink and cannot find anything pertaining to BNP/EML.  Ed doesn't think there would be anything and I have a call out to Will Morley to check with him.

I will carry on searching.

Una

Hi, Una:

Per my voice mail, we need a copy of a representative sample of whatever documentation BNP Paribas and Enron Metals Limited transact under (ISDA, general terms and conditions, etc.).  We are trying to finalize and sign a master netting agreement with them this morning and need to see this documentation as soon as possible.

My phone number is (713) 853-3907 and my fax is (713) 646-3490.

Thanks for your help!!!!!!!!!

Marie

Thanks, it's a pleasure working with you too.  I just wish it had been under better circumstances.

Greetings!

We wanted to let you know that Genia FitzGerald created a Hallmark.com e-card for you.  To see your card, click the link below, or copy and paste this link into your Web browser's address line:
http://ecardview.hallmark.com/hmk/Website/greeting.jsp?id=EG3154-244761-4598035

If you have trouble using the link we provided, please follow these steps:

1. Click this link to go to our homepage, or copy and paste it into your browser's address line:
   http://www.hallmark.com
2. Click on the "e-cards and cards" link.
3. Click on the "browse free e-cards" link in the e-cards section of the page.
4. Click on the link on the upper left hand side of the page that says "pick up a greeting."
5. Enter your email address and this retrieval number: EG354447598035.  This e-card will be available for 90 days.
6. If you'd like to send an e-card yourself, use the "send your own greeting" button beside the e-card.
Enjoy!

While you're visiting Hallmark.com, be sure to explore our other products.  We offer paper cards, great gifts, beautiful flowers and more.  And our e-cards are fast, fun, and free.  You're sure to find something you like at Hallmark.com.

With best wishes,

Jody Ellis
Hallmark.com

P.S.  Your privacy is our priority.  To see our online Privacy and Security statement, please use this link:
http://www.hallmark.com/hmk/Website/goto.jsp?CONTENT_KEY=FOOTER_PRIVLEGL&CONTENT_TYPE=ARTICLE

Matt:

You can ignore the voice mail I left you a few minutes ago.  William Morley is going to send me copies of the documentation.

Marie

Unless by trading group they meant the actual traders--we're just the lawyers and staff.

I'll send you an e-mail tonight when I can talk--if you get my drift.

So since they said they wanted to keep their trading group intact, I would assume that means you should still have a place to go for the foreseeable future.

Tell them you need the job and make some of the big dog's give back some of their millions!

Jay

Thanks for sending this.  I just spoke with Randy Miller and told him that we probably wouldn't get it to him today, but we would certainly send it over on Monday morning.  Samantha is working on it.

Marie -

Per your earlier voicemail.  Please send an executable copy per the attached at your earliest convenience.

Thanks,

JRW

 << File: Texla Energy Mgmt ISDA 09142001.xls >> 

Kim:

Can you pull a representative financial confirm for each of the following:

Peoples Gas Light & Coke Company
State Street Bank and Trust Company
Huntco Steel, Inc.
Sodra Skogsagarna Ek For

This is for Elizabeth's project.

Thanks!  Marie

THANKS!!!!!!!

Joanne Rozycki
Senior Administrative Assistant

Hi, Robbi!

I've been meaning to call you, but as you can imagine, it's been extremely busy here.  Hope you're okay and I'll try to talk with you soon.  No, we still haven't received anything from Robert Allen to return our fabric.  I was hoping they would send something last week, because we shipped our gifts to Washington and we could have sent it at the same time.  Let me know what you hear from them.

Let's try to get together after the 1st.  I know it's going to be too busy this week and next, so why don't we shoot for after the new year.

If I don't talk to you soon have a Merry Christmas and Happy New Year!

Marie

Marie,
 
  Did they ever pick up your material?   If not, let me know and I will call them again.
 
  Hope all is well with you.  Let's get  together soon!

Hi, Sheila:

What's your office location so that I can send copies of the Bear Stearns documents?

Thanks!

Marie

Carol:

Do you know if this agreement has been signed and, if so, who would have the original or a copy?

Thanks!

Marie

Please handle.

Ladies

Did an English lawyer work on this?  If such a global netting agreement exists, could I trouble you for a copy?

Many thanks and Season's Greetings.

Paul

Paul,

I've heard a rumour that there's a Global Netting Agreement for Duke.  Is there any way you can find this out?  They owe us, the gas guys and the continental guys money, but we apparently owe them loads in the states.

Neil.

Hi, Paul:

Duke was one of the master netting agreements we were working on.  After checking with the lawyers who were assigned to work on the Duke master netting agreement, it appears that the agreement was never executed.

Let me know if you have any additional questions or need anything else.

Marie

 

 - snowman.pps 

Hi, Mari:

I have prepared the separate phone list for each bidder room and am going to place five copies of each on the tables by the boxes in each room.

Let either Genia FitzGerald (x36389) or me (x33907) know if you need anything.  We will have our assistants bring coffee, etc., so if you will let us know when the groups arrive at the data room, we will take care of that.

Thanks!

Marie

I don't think we'll have anything for you today.  I know you'll be so upset that you aren't needed today.  Thanks for asking.

Marie

Joanne Rozycki
Senior Administrative Assistant

Thanks, Happy New Year to you too!

Yes, I'm crushed!  I'll be here Monday, but if I don't see you or any of your group, have a happy New Year!

Susan

I don't think we'll have anything for you today.  I know you'll be so upset that you aren't needed today.  Thanks for asking.

Marie

Joanne Rozycki
Senior Administrative Assistant

Dear Dog Loving Friends,

We hope this letter finds its way to you - and to your hearts. Like the rest
of the nation, we've watched the events unfolding in NYC and Washington, DC
with disbelief, with horror, with sorrow.

Unfortunately, so often during a crisis, our loved pets can be forgotten or
unintentionally left to fend for themselves. Can you help us help them?

We are getting supplies of food, treats and dog boots for the rescue dogs
who need nourishment and protection for their paws while they work. The
rubble and steel can destroy and infect the pads of a dog's paw, rendering
them useless in their rescue work. The search dogs are working so hard to
locate and save human lives that they are wearing through their boots at a
rapid pace. We want to be sure they are protected.

Supplies of food and treats will also be donated to displaced dogs and other
pets whose owners cannot be there to care for them.

Please help. Mail your checks to:

The Gracie Foundation
1627 Main St., 7th Fl.
Kansas City, MO 64108

Or donate by credit card by calling 1-888-535-DOGS (3647) or 1-800-4-TREATS
(487-3287) Monday thru Friday, 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. CST.

Thank you in advance for any help whatsoever. No gift is too small. God
bless you and God bless our great country.

Dan and Mark
Founders of Three Dog Bakery

This e-mail was sent to: Molly_espey@ryderscott.com

PS: If you're having second thoughts, you can turn tail and unsubscribe to
The Tummy Rub Club e-mails at
http://www.threedog.com/_lists/sub.asp?x=TDBB_622903_75907&y=U But, we sure
hope you'll stay!

The one from Tana is a picture, but if you scroll down further, I think it is the Bin Laden song, so there is sound with that one.  I also sent it home in case you can't open it or want to listen at home.
That General Patton knew what he was talking about, see John's email!
Check this out

 

Francisco Pinto-Leite
Enron Americas
1400 Smith Street, EB 3888 
Houston, TX 77002-7361

Tel: 713-345-7942
Fax:713-646-3490
fleite@enron.com <mailto:fleite@enron.com>

That was good but this tops it.

Clearly the best one so far.

Enjoy!

<http://www.gotlaughs.com/funpages/bin2.cfm>

________________________________
Derek M. Stoldt
Registered Foreign Lawyer
Kaye Scholer LLP
10th Floor
88 Wood Street
London EC2V 7RS
(T) 011-44-(0)-20-8528-1407
(F) 011-44-(0)-20-8528-1206
or 212-836-6532 (direct to computer)
THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHED FILES ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY BE LEGALLY
PRIVILEGED.

If you are not the addressee, any disclosure, reproduction, copying,
distribution, or use of this communication is strictly prohibited.  If you
have received this transmission in error please notify the sender
immediately and then delete this email.

Email transmission cannot be guaranteed to be secure or error free as
information could be intercepted, corrupted, lost, destroyed, arrive late
or incomplete, or contain viruses.  The sender therefore does not accept
liability for any errors or omissions in the contents of this message which
arise as a result of email transmission.  If verification is required
please request a hard copy version.

Kaye Scholer LLP is a Delaware (USA) Limited Liability Partnership.

A list of the names of the partners and their professional qualifications
is open to inspection at the principal office 88 Wood Street London EC2V
7RS.  The partners are either solicitors or registered foreign lawyers.

That General Patton knew what he was talking about, see John's email!
Check this out

 

Francisco Pinto-Leite
Enron Americas
1400 Smith Street, EB 3888 
Houston, TX 77002-7361

Tel: 713-345-7942
Fax:713-646-3490
fleite@enron.com <mailto:fleite@enron.com>

That was good but this tops it.

Clearly the best one so far.

Enjoy!

<http://www.gotlaughs.com/funpages/bin2.cfm>

________________________________
Derek M. Stoldt
Registered Foreign Lawyer
Kaye Scholer LLP
10th Floor
88 Wood Street
London EC2V 7RS
(T) 011-44-(0)-20-8528-1407
(F) 011-44-(0)-20-8528-1206
or 212-836-6532 (direct to computer)
THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHED FILES ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY BE LEGALLY
PRIVILEGED.

If you are not the addressee, any disclosure, reproduction, copying,
distribution, or use of this communication is strictly prohibited.  If you
have received this transmission in error please notify the sender
immediately and then delete this email.

Email transmission cannot be guaranteed to be secure or error free as
information could be intercepted, corrupted, lost, destroyed, arrive late
or incomplete, or contain viruses.  The sender therefore does not accept
liability for any errors or omissions in the contents of this message which
arise as a result of email transmission.  If verification is required
please request a hard copy version.

Kaye Scholer LLP is a Delaware (USA) Limited Liability Partnership.

A list of the names of the partners and their professional qualifications
is open to inspection at the principal office 88 Wood Street London EC2V
7RS.  The partners are either solicitors or registered foreign lawyers.

Thanks!  I'll use this one and delete the disclaimer.

 << File: MasterAgreement081001.pdf >>    << File: MasterAgreement081001.doc >> 

The first one is a picture, but if you scroll down it should be the Bin Laden song, so there's sound.
That General Patton knew what he was talking about, see John's email!
Check this out

 

Francisco Pinto-Leite
Enron Americas
1400 Smith Street, EB 3888 
Houston, TX 77002-7361

Tel: 713-345-7942
Fax:713-646-3490
fleite@enron.com <mailto:fleite@enron.com>

That was good but this tops it.

Clearly the best one so far.

Enjoy!

<http://www.gotlaughs.com/funpages/bin2.cfm>

________________________________
Derek M. Stoldt
Registered Foreign Lawyer
Kaye Scholer LLP
10th Floor
88 Wood Street
London EC2V 7RS
(T) 011-44-(0)-20-8528-1407
(F) 011-44-(0)-20-8528-1206
or 212-836-6532 (direct to computer)
THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHED FILES ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY BE LEGALLY
PRIVILEGED.

If you are not the addressee, any disclosure, reproduction, copying,
distribution, or use of this communication is strictly prohibited.  If you
have received this transmission in error please notify the sender
immediately and then delete this email.

Email transmission cannot be guaranteed to be secure or error free as
information could be intercepted, corrupted, lost, destroyed, arrive late
or incomplete, or contain viruses.  The sender therefore does not accept
liability for any errors or omissions in the contents of this message which
arise as a result of email transmission.  If verification is required
please request a hard copy version.

Kaye Scholer LLP is a Delaware (USA) Limited Liability Partnership.

A list of the names of the partners and their professional qualifications
is open to inspection at the principal office 88 Wood Street London EC2V
7RS.  The partners are either solicitors or registered foreign lawyers.

Mark:

Attached for your further handling is the draft Master Agreement between Enron Broadband Services, L.P. and Dynegy Europe.  Please do not hesitate to contact either Robbi Rossi (x57268) or Tracy Cooper (x59534) with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

I have received Credit's comments and will try to turn around comments soon.

Marie

I still have not received any comments/feedback on the ISDA Schedule draft
forwarded to you on 7/27/01.  The last time we spoke, you said that you were
still waiting on some comments from your credit group.  I would very much
like to get the process moving again.  If there is something I can do to
expedite the process please let me know.  Also, please let me know if you
have tried to send something to me that hasn't gone through.  My email
address and phone number are below.

Todd A. Perkins
taperkin@southernco.com
(404) 506-0655

We have received the following executed financial Master Agreement:

Type of Contract:		ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:			July 30, 2001

Counterparty:			Nemak, S.A.

Transactions Covered:		Approved for all products with the exception of:  Foreign Exchange

Governing Law:			Texas

Special Handling Requirements:	No special handling requirements

Copies will be distributed.

Mr. Dixon:

Pursuant to Carol St. Clair's request, I am attaching our preliminary list of the agreements to be under the BP Master Netting Agreement.  Since we don't own 100% of EOTT, any master netting agreement involving EOTT will not be under this master netting agreement.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Just a reminder not to use the form Master Netting Agreement that was attached to the e-mail notification sent yesterday.  You will be receiving a new form later today.

Thanks!

Marie

Please ignore my earlier e-mail forwarding the Deemed ISDA.

Thanks!

Marie

Tanya and Paul:

Linda Anderson in Financial Settlements faxed me a copy of a Certificate of Amalgamation evidencing the merger of Norske Skog Canada Limited and Pacifica Papers Inc. with Norske Skog Canada Limited being the surviving entity.  You both worked on these files--Tanya, Pacifica Papers and Paul, Norske Skog.

Are you all okay with this merger from the credit side?

Thanks!

Marie

Yes.  Carol just left a voice mail that Jay Williams (x53923) will be our credit contact.

I am just gathering the last documents for FPL and Florida Power & Light and will be bringing them around to you shortly.

Here is the issues list.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

		 

Thanks for the reminder.  Marie, as it stands now,  am I correct to believe that I am waiting for the following:

1.	Intructions from Carol on who and when to call Credit regarding making contact with Florida Power & Light to forward and discuss a Master Netting Agreement;
2.	Reciept of a New Master Netting Agreement form that addresses the following:
	a.	Automatic dragnet clause as to non-specifically mentioned commodity contracts and future agreements
	b.	Tax language that addresses 10% withholding tax that would otherwise be payable upon netting under the Master Netting Agreement
	c.	Certain other changes Mary thinks are necessary in light of current facts.

In the meantime, could you please forward me a copy of the Issues List as I did not receive one earlier.

Thanks,

Steve

Just a reminder not to use the form Master Netting Agreement that was attached to the e-mail notification sent yesterday.  You will be receiving a new form later today.

Thanks!

Marie

Debra:

Please verify that Mr. Dixon's facts are accurate. 

Thanks!

Marie
Marie:

We don't show any trading contracts in existence with Vastar Gas Marketing,
Inc.  All of Vastar Gas Marketing,Inc.'s contracts were assigned to Southern
Company Energy Marketing after BP acquired Vastar.

Do you have any information otherwise?

Very truly yours,

BILLY
Billy D. Dixon
Attorney
BP America Inc.
501 Westlake Park Blvd., Rm 16.166
Houston, Texas 77079
Direct 281/366-4745
Fax 281/366-5901
billy.dixon@bp.com

***IMPORTANT -- THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHMENTS HERETO ARE ATTORNEY-CLIENT
AND/OR ATTORNEY WORK-PRODUCT PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL.  If you have
received this email in error, do not under any circumstances read, forward,
copy, disseminate or save this email or any of its attachments.  If you have
received this email in error, take the following actions: (1) reply to this
email indicating that you received this email in error, and (2) delete and
completely erase this email and its attachments from your computer and any
backup systems or "Deleted Items" folders.

Mr. Dixon:

Pursuant to Carol St. Clair's request, I am attaching our preliminary
list of the agreements to be under the BP Master Netting Agreement.
Since we don't own 100% of EOTT, any master netting agreement involving
EOTT will not be under this master netting agreement.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 <<BP Master Netting Agreement File
Index.doc>>

It appears our physical gas documents were assigned from Vastar to Southern.
Yes, Vastar was assigned to Southern.

Debra:

Please verify that Mr. Dixon's facts are accurate. 

Thanks!

Marie
Marie:

We don't show any trading contracts in existence with Vastar Gas Marketing,
Inc.  All of Vastar Gas Marketing,Inc.'s contracts were assigned to Southern
Company Energy Marketing after BP acquired Vastar.

Do you have any information otherwise?

Very truly yours,

BILLY
Billy D. Dixon
Attorney
BP America Inc.
501 Westlake Park Blvd., Rm 16.166
Houston, Texas 77079
Direct 281/366-4745
Fax 281/366-5901
billy.dixon@bp.com

***IMPORTANT -- THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHMENTS HERETO ARE ATTORNEY-CLIENT
AND/OR ATTORNEY WORK-PRODUCT PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL.  If you have
received this email in error, do not under any circumstances read, forward,
copy, disseminate or save this email or any of its attachments.  If you have
received this email in error, take the following actions: (1) reply to this
email indicating that you received this email in error, and (2) delete and
completely erase this email and its attachments from your computer and any
backup systems or "Deleted Items" folders.

Mr. Dixon:

Pursuant to Carol St. Clair's request, I am attaching our preliminary
list of the agreements to be under the BP Master Netting Agreement.
Since we don't own 100% of EOTT, any master netting agreement involving
EOTT will not be under this master netting agreement.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 <<BP Master Netting Agreement File
Index.doc>>

Pursuant to your request, attached are the documents distributed for the meeting this morning.

		 	 	 	 

In addition, here are the list of counterparties and assignments so far:

Reliant Energy - Leslie Hansen - (713) 853-6121
Aquila - Jeff Hodge - (713) 853-6911
Dynegy - Harlan Murphy - (713) 345-2679
FPL Energy Marketing - Steve Van Hooser - (713) 853-7238
Florida Power & Light - Steve Van Hooser
Hess - Frank Sayre - (713) 345-7894
Engage Energy - Francisco Pinto-Leite - (713) 345-7942
El Paso - Brent Hendry - (713) 853-7124
BP Amoco - Carol St. Clair - (713) 853-3989
Morgan - Angela Davis (713) 345-8347

As we have additional assignments, I will send them on to you.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Please do this
I also need the list of counterparties and the Enron personnel assigned to
each one.

Thanks.
                    Rick Antonoff
It sounds like you handed out things at the meeting besides the form of the
MNA and CA, such as an agenda, checklist, process, etc.  Can you send me
copies of what was handed out?

Rick

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

Please be advised that Jay Williams will be our credit contact for all master netting agreement credit terms.  Jay will also provide us with all counterparty names and maintain the list of agreements.  Jay's phone number is (713) 345-3923 and, for e-mail purposes, he is listed as Williams, Jason R. (Credit).

Mary:

Here is the group list I created.  Let me know when you have a second and we'll put it (or attempt to) in your contact file.

Marie

		 

	

We are coordinating a project regarding the preparation of various master netting agreements.  This is a very time sensitive project and we are trying to solicit as much help as we can.  Please attend a meeting this afternoon at 4:30 in EB38C2 to help us coordinate this effort. 

Jay:

Please add AEP to your list of counterparties for master netting agreements.  If at all possible, can you provide us with the names of all related entities and contracts for those counterparties we gave you awhile ago as soon as possible so that we can begin pulling contracts?

Thanks!

Marie 

	 

	

Attached is the current list of master netting agreement assignments.  We will circulate a revised list periodically.

		 

Which Hess entity?

Legal whizzes - 

I received a call from a woman at Hess who is looking to see whether we executed a recent assignment they sent to us in August.  Joe Hunter told me that one of you folks would know about this. 

Does anyone know about this assignment?  

Thanks,

Diane
30443

Darren:

These are the entities BP has on its MNA:

Vastar Resources, Inc., acting through BP Energy Company, agent
Cibola Energy Services Corporation
IGI Resources, Inc.
BP Products North America Inc.
BP North American Petroleum, a division of BP North America Inc.

THANKS!!!!!!!!!!

Marie

Sure, once we figure it out, I'll let you know.

Marie,

Can you please let me know which of these Agreements involve Enron Canada Corp.? Thanks.

MRC

Attached is the current list of master netting agreement assignments.  We will circulate a revised list periodically.

		 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 

Whatever, Steve's working on them.  It is J. P. Morgan but we also have Morgan Stanley.

Confused?  We are.

fpl and florida power and light are the same thing. are we sure it is jp morgan and not morgan stanley?

Attached is the current list of master netting agreement assignments.  We will circulate a revised list periodically.

		 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 

Kate and Teresa:

We are working on a time sensitive project and ask that you assist us in determining the names of various Enron entities by doing an historical analysis or whatever means you use.

The entities I need info on are:

Enron Gas Processing Company
Enron Gas Marketing Canada
Enron Oil Canada Ltd.
Enron Oil Corporation

Are these prior names of current Enron entities, are they existing entities, etc.?

Please call me if you need any additional info or if my request is confusing.

Thanks for your help!

Marie
x33907

Please see Elizabeth's e-mail below.

Reminder - If you are working on a Master Netting Agreement, you also need to understand what type of entities are being included in the netted group.  On the power side, there are regulatory restrictions on a regulated utility from becoming a guarantor of the debts of unregulated companies;  accordingly,  an MNA with a regulated utility and other unaffiliated parties on its side will not work, particularly if you are posting collateral on a fully netted basis.  In this case, the only option would be to keep the underlying margining agreements in place (no new global collateral annex) and have the MNA only be a cross default and acceleration and  possible setoff (just in case the money is going the right way and/or just in case it works).  Mary is working on a new draft of the MNA to be used if we are not superceding the underlying margining terms. Thanks 

Elizabeth Sager
713-853-6349

THANKS!!!!!!!!!

See below answers:  let me know if you need corporate data sheets or any other info.  Kate

Kate B. Cole
Director, Corporate Services
Enron Corp.
Tel: (713) 853-1624
Fax: (713) 646-8007
Email: kate.cole@enron.com

Kate and Teresa:

We are working on a time sensitive project and ask that you assist us in determining the names of various Enron entities by doing an historical analysis or whatever means you use.

The entities I need info on are:

Enron Gas Processing Company
[Cole, Kate] 3/31/97 - Divested to KN Processing, Inc., subsidiary of KN Energy, Inc. 

Enron Gas Marketing Canada
[Cole, Kate]  5/3/94 - Enron Gas Liquids Canada, Ltd. and Canadian Gas Marketing Inc. amalgamated with Enron Gas Marketing Canada Inc. to form Enron Gas Services Canada Corp.

Enron Oil Canada Ltd
[Cole, Kate]  Divested:
08/16/99 - Spun off to EOG Resources and changed its name to EOG Resources Canada Inc.
.
Enron Oil Corporation
[Cole, Kate]  10/19/95 - Dissolved.

Are these prior names of current Enron entities, are they existing entities, etc.?

Please call me if you need any additional info or if my request is confusing.

Thanks for your help!

Marie
x33907

Dede:

Per Leslie's request, I am attaching our form Master Netting, Setoff and Security Agreement and Collateral Annex.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	  

Also, if you have any gas contracts with Castrol Industrial North America, Inc.  If there are only confirmations for both, please send me a copy of the confirm with GTC's.  These documents are needed ASAP.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Do you have any gas contracts with the following entity?

BP Energy Company

If so, please have Larry deliver a copy to Marie Heard, EB3803B.

Thank you.

Morris:

So far these are the ones we know involve Enron Canada Corp.

Dynegy Canada Inc.

El Paso Merchant Energy Canada Inc.
El Paso Merchant Energy, L.P.

BP Canada Energy Company

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

Marie,

Can you please let me know which of these Agreements involve Enron Canada Corp.? Thanks.

MRC

Attached is the current list of master netting agreement assignments.  We will circulate a revised list periodically.

		 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 

Please add the referenced counterparty for your conflicts check.

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Never mind!  Frank Sayre is looking at it.

Legal whizzes - 

I received a call from a woman at Hess who is looking to see whether we executed a recent assignment they sent to us in August.  Joe Hunter told me that one of you folks would know about this. 

Does anyone know about this assignment?  

Thanks,

Diane
30443

Attached is an updated list of master netting assignments.

	 

We will get you documents.

Are you getting me Dominion documents and do I call for credit info and contact person or do you guys?

Angela D. Davis
Attached is an updated list of master netting assignments.

	 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 

Kate:

Can you do an historical analysis for Enron Marketing Services Inc. and Enron Oil Trading & Transportation?

Thanks!

Marie

Cheryl:

Can you respond to Tom Spencer? 

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

Please update me on the status of our AES Eastern Energy ISDA Agreement
with Enron.

Thanks,

Tom Spencer

AES Odyssey
Phone: 607-216-3309
Fax: 607-256-2201

Enron Marketing Services, Inc. was dissolvewd 6/25/97

Enron Oil Trading & Transportation Company is a former name of EOTT Energy Corp., which merged out of existence.

Hope this helps.

Please check on the following Enron entities to determine if they also need
to be added to the netting agreement:

Enron Marketing Services Inc.
Enron Oil Trading & Transportation

Our Canada business unit has deals with the above.

Many Thanks.

Very truly yours,

BILLY
Billy D. Dixon
Attorney
BP America Inc.
501 Westlake Park Blvd., Rm 16.166
Houston, Texas 77079
Direct 281/366-4745
Fax 281/366-5901
billy.dixon@bp.com

***IMPORTANT -- THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHMENTS HERETO ARE ATTORNEY-CLIENT
AND/OR ATTORNEY WORK-PRODUCT PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL.  If you have
received this email in error, do not under any circumstances read, forward,
copy, disseminate or save this email or any of its attachments.  If you have
received this email in error, take the following actions: (1) reply to this
email indicating that you received this email in error, and (2) delete and
completely erase this email and its attachments from your computer and any
backup systems or "Deleted Items" folders.

Mr. Dixon:

Pursuant to Carol St. Clair's request, I am attaching our preliminary
list of the agreements to be under the BP Master Netting Agreement.
Since we don't own 100% of EOTT, any master netting agreement involving
EOTT will not be under this master netting agreement.

Please let us know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 <<BP Master Netting Agreement File
Index.doc>>

Morris:

Mirant has documents with ECC.

Thanks!

Marie

Attached is the updated list.

	 

Per Ed Sacks' request, I am attaching a copy of our form Master Netting, Setoff and Security Agreement and Collateral Annex.

		 	 

Peter:

Per my fax, attached is the final form of the BP Amoco Master Netting Agreement.  If acceptable, please have the signature page signed on behalf of ECC and fax to me ASAP.  I am routing originals for signature here and will forward to you for signature.

Thanks!

Marie

Dear Carol and Marie:

Pursuant to our recent telephone conference, attached is the final form of
the North American Master Netting Agreement for signature by all of the
respective parties.

If this does not reflect all of the changes we previously agreed to, please
call me right away.

Very truly yours,

BILLY
Billy D. Dixon
Attorney
BP America Inc.
501 Westlake Park Blvd., Rm 16.166
Houston, Texas 77079
Direct 281/366-4745
Fax 281/366-5901
billy.dixon@bp.com

***IMPORTANT -- THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHMENTS HERETO ARE ATTORNEY-CLIENT
AND/OR ATTORNEY WORK-PRODUCT PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL.  If you have
received this email in error, do not under any circumstances read, forward,
copy, disseminate or save this email or any of its attachments.  If you have
received this email in error, take the following actions: (1) reply to this
email indicating that you received this email in error, and (2) delete and
completely erase this email and its attachments from your computer and any
backup systems or "Deleted Items" folders.
 <<BP Form NA Master Netting (11-1-01)#3.DOC>>  <<RL NA MASTER
11-1-01#3.DOC>>

 - BP Form NA Master Netting (11-1-01)#3.DOC 
 - RL NA MASTER 11-1-01#3.DOC 

Yes.  Their lawyer.

Marie

Is this a Constellation person that this was sent to?

Andrew Ralston

Per Ed Sacks' request, I am attaching a copy of our form Master Netting, Setoff and Security Agreement and Collateral Annex.

		 << File: Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h-1.doc >> 	 << File: Master Netting Agreement Credit Support Annex 10 d.doc >> 

Bianca:

Samantha Boyd is working on this deal, so you may want to check with her.

Marie

Hello Everyone,

I have been summoned to find out where you are on getting the additional language for Dial Corp.  The orig guys really want this deal sent out today.  Any info. you have on this deal will help.

Thanks very much.

Bianca 

Legal -

Attached is an Omnibus Worksheet for trade Y35443, with The Dial Corp.  Please prepare credit annexes and forward to the Financial Confirms group at your earliest convenience.

Confirms -

David Cho, who originated this deal, has asked if we can get this out today.  Please expedite as much as possible.

Thanks to all for your help.

JRW

 << File: Dial Corp OMNIBUS CONFIRM, trade Y35443.xls >> 

You're already down.

Please put me down for Calpine as well.  I was working on this before this process was developed.

Thanks,

Harlan E. Murphy
Enron Wholesale Services - Legal
1400 Smith Street, EB 3811
Houston, Texas 77002
Tel: 713.345.2679
Fax: 713.646.3490
E-mail: Harlan.Murphy@Enron.com

Attached is the updated list.

	 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 

Tanya:

Can someone in your shop get us copies of the guaranties?  I pulled the one in our ISDA file and the amounts don't match, so I don't know if there have been any amendments or not.

If you can't find someone to pull these, let me know and I'll come down and get them.

Also, Livelink doesn't show a power master with Coral Power LLC, but I have someone checking on this.

Thanks!

Marie

A Breakdown on the activity to be included:

Coral Power LLC
	physical power with EPMI under EEI

Coral Energy Holding LP
	financial trading with ENA under ISDA

Coral Energy Resources LP
	physical gas trading with ENA under Master

Coral Energy Canada, Inc.
	physical gas trading with ECC under Master
	physical gas trading with ENA no master		

Gtys:

Outgoing:  	75MM multi product/affilaite	12/7/00
		30MM ENA ISDA		9/2/97

Incoming:	50MM  12/7/00 EPMI
		3MM	9/15/97 EPMI
		5MM  3/20/97 ENA
		10MM  8/14/99 ENA
		10MM CAD 1/8/98 ECC
		3.8MM (?) CAD 6/20/97  ECC

Credit Terms:  To come

Should we try to put a master physical with Coral Energy Canada/ ENA simultaneously?

Thanks,
Tanya
	

Can you get me copies of these?

Thanks!  Marie

ECC has the following contracts with Coral Energy Canada, Inc.:

	- Master Firm Gas Purchase/Sale Agreement dated January 3, 1995
	- Firm Gas Purchase/Sale Agreement (<31 days) dated June 30, 1993
	- Interruptible Agreement dated October 21, 1993

ECPC has no contracts with this counterparty.

Sharon, can you also confirm the contracts we have with Coral Energy Canada, Inc.

A Breakdown on the activity to be included:

Coral Power LLC
	physical power with EPMI under EEI

Coral Energy Holding LP
	financial trading with ENA under ISDA

Coral Energy Resources LP
	physical gas trading with ENA under Master

Coral Energy Canada, Inc.
	physical gas trading with ECC under Master
	physical gas trading with ENA no master		

Gtys:

Outgoing:  	75MM multi product/affilaite	12/7/00
		30MM ENA ISDA		9/2/97

Incoming:	50MM  12/7/00 EPMI
		3MM	9/15/97 EPMI
		5MM  3/20/97 ENA
		10MM  8/14/99 ENA
		10MM CAD 1/8/98 ECC
		3.8MM (?) CAD 6/20/97  ECC

Credit Terms:  To come

Should we try to put a master physical with Coral Energy Canada/ ENA simultaneously?

Thanks,
Tanya
	

Can you get me copies of these?

Thanks!

Marie

ECC has the following contracts with Engage Energy Canada L.P.:

	- ISDA Master Agreement dated effective January 31, 1997
	- Amended and Restated Master Firm Gas Purchase/Sale Agreement dated January 4, 2001
	- Firm Gas Sales Contract (15-year Sithe Supply) Terminates November 1, 2004

ECPC has no contracts with this counterparty.

Sharon, you confirm what contracts Enron Canada Corp. or Enron Canada Power Corp. has with Engage Energy Cnada L.P.

Peter.

It would make sense to me.  Jeff what do you think?

Francisco Pinto-Leite
Enron Americas
1400 Smith Street, EB 3888 
Houston, TX 77002-7361

Tel: 713-345-7942
Fax:713-646-3490
fleite@enron.com

Here is the breakdown of where doing business, etc.		

Engage Energy America, LLC
	financial business with ENA under an ISDA
	physical power business with EPMI under master
	physical gas business with ENA - no master

Engage Energy Canada LP
	financial business with ECC under ISDA
	physical business with ECC under Master Firm
	physical business with ENA - no master

Gtys
	bilateral 100MM gty executed just recently (Mary Cook worked on)

Credit Terms to come

Should we try to submit Master Firms for above "no master" trading at the same time????

Thanks,
Tanya

Hi, Sharon:

Can you fax me a copy of the Master Firm Gas Purchase/Sale Agreement dated effective as of September 15, 1999 between ECC and Reliant Energy Services, Inc.?

Thanks!

Marie

Thanks, Karen.

I think I have what I need on this counterparty, however, there may be others.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

EES entered into a GISB with BP Energy Company.  I cannot locate the file.  Christy Finelli is in charge of the GISB World and is out today.  By copy of this e:mail I am requesting Christy to provide a copy of the agreement for you.

With respect to Castrol Industrial North America, Inc. Legal does not have any contracts with this counterparty nor does the Confirmation desk have any documentation  that supports EESI doing business with this company.

If there is other info about this customer you may have, I could pass that along to the confirmation desk for further research.

Karen

Karen

Thanks, Sharon.  I'll get the ISDA here.

Marie

Marie, we do not have a Master Firm Gas P/S Agreement with Reliant Energy Services, Inc.  We do, however, have a Master Firm Gas P/S Agreement with Reliant Energy Services Canada, Ltd. dated September 19, 1999.  Attached is a copy of the agreement (I will fax the signed execution page to you):

 << File: reliant.master5.clean.final.doc >> 

With respect to Engage Energy Canada L.P., attached is the Amended and Restated Master Firm Gas P/S Agreement dated January 4, 2001 (I will fax the signed execution page to you):

 << File: Amended&Restated.Master(2000)-5.doc >> 

I will have to fax the Firm Gas Sales Contract (15-year Sithe Supply) Agreement (plus the Amendment) to you, as I can't seem to locate it on the system.  Stephanie Panus should have a copy of the ISDA Master Agreement with Engage.  Are you able to get it from her or would you just like me to fax our copy to you?  ISDAs are not on our system as they are generated in Houston.

With respect to Coral Energy Canada, Inc., I will be faxing to you the following documents:

	- Letter from Shell Canada Limited dated June 1, 1997 assigning certain agreements to Coral (see Schedule "A" attached to letter)
	- Master Firm Gas P/S Agreement to you (again, I can't seem to locate it on the system) dated January 3, 1995
	- Firm Gas P/S Agreement (for transactions of 31 days or fewer) dated June 30, 1993(plus letter amending agreement dated June 13, 1994)
	- Interruptible Gas P/S Agreement dated October 21, 1993

If you need anything else after you've reviewed these documents, please let me know.

Sharon

Thanks, that's awfully sweet, but you don't have to do it.  But if you insist, Monday will be fine.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi Marie,

I hope you have a really happy birthday this weekend.  I would like to make a chocolate cake for your birthday.  I figure I could bring it in on Monday.  I know that everyone is so busy right now.  Do you think it would be okay?  If not, I could always make it and bring it to your house.  Just let me know.

Erica

Mr. Spencer:

I asked Cheryl Nelson, the attorney working with me on this file to give you an update as to the status of the ISDA, and I am not sure if she responded or not.  Cheryl is out of the office for the next week and the attorney who will be covering for her is out of the office today.  I will check with him Monday as to the status and let you know.  Sorry for the delay in responding.

Marie,

Please update me on the status of our AES Eastern Energy ISDA Agreement
with Enron.

Thanks,

Tom Spencer

AES Odyssey
Phone: 607-216-3309
Fax: 607-256-2201

Pursuant to your request, I am attaching our form Master Netting, Setoff and Security Agreement and Collateral Annex.

	  

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Paul:

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

		 

Hi, Lech!

My understanding is that you all will be handling the filings.  It's been so long since I've done UCC filings that I'm not sure I would even remember what to do.

Thanks!

Marie

We have ordered the searches, but not prepared filings.  Are you handling
the latter, or would you like us to do that, too?

Lech Kalembka
Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
100 Maiden Lane
New York, NY  10038
Tel.: (212) 504-6918
Fax: (212) 504-6666
E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com

                    "Korkmas,
                    10/31/2001
                    06:16 PM

Marie Heard has requested that I forward the following company names and
jurisdictions for compiling UCC lien searches:

Dynegy, Inc. - Incorporated in Illinois; principal office in Houston,
TX.
Dynegy Marketing and Trade - a Colorado general partnership; principal
office in Houston, TX.
Dynegy Power Marketing, Inc. - Incorporated in Texas; principal office
in Houston, TX.

All of the following are incorporated in Delaware and have principal
offices in Houston, TX:

     Coastal Coal Company, LLC
     Coastal Gas Marketing Company
     Coastal Refining & Marketing, Inc.
     Coastal States Trading Inc.
     Dynegy Midstream Services, Limited Partnership
     El Paso Corporation
     El Paso Merchant Energy, L.P.

Thank you for your assistance.

Deb Korkmas, Senior Legal Specialist
==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

Brian:

Here are the counterparties we have financial masters with:

Calpine Energy Services, L.P.
Constellation Power Source, Inc.
Baltimore Gas and Electric Company
Transcanada Energy Financial Products Limited
Sempra Energy Trading Corp.
San Diego Gas & Electric Company
J. Aron & Company
Goldman Sachs Capital Markets, L.P.
Goldman Sachs International
Conectiv Energy Supply, Inc.
PSEG Energy Resources & Trade LLC
CMS Marketing, Services and Trading Company
Louis Dreyfus Natural Gas Corp.
Louis Dreyfus Energy Services L.P.
Louis Dreyfus Corporation
Engage Energy Canada L.P.
Engage Energy America LLC
PanCanadian Petroleum Limited
PanCanadian Energy Services Inc.
Canadian Natural Resources

Marie
Marie,
Thanks for your help!
Please find attached the list we reviewed this afternoon--let us know if these counterparties have financial masters or not.  I will arrange for someone to make copies of the physical masters tomorrow.  Thanks again!
Brian
3-5009

 << File: Master CPs.xls >> 

Yes.  Are you back on 28 or are you in your office on 45?

Barbara
I am working on Agreements with Mirant and Constellation.  For Mirant, here are the following entities
Mirant Americas Energy Marketing Canada
Mirant Americas Energy Marketing L.P.
Mirant Europe BV

Marie:
Do you have the print out and docs for Constellation?  

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Deb and Mary:

Attached for your assistance in ordering lien searches is a list I have prepared noting the various entities we think will be parties to the various master netting agreements.  I'll let you know if any or added or deleted.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

		 

Yes, we do want to exchange originals.  My originals are in our Calgary office getting original signatures.  I will send one copy to you when I receive them back.  Should probably be tomorrow or Wednesday.

Thanks!

Marie

Carol and Marie:

I am assuming that Enron wants to exchange one set of originals on the NA
Master Agreement?  If so, please indicate by reply and I will mail a set to
Marie Heard.

Very truly yours,

BILLY
Billy D. Dixon
Attorney
BP America Inc.
501 Westlake Park Blvd., Rm 16.166
Houston, Texas 77079
Direct 281/366-4745
Fax 281/366-5901
billy.dixon@bp.com

***IMPORTANT -- THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHMENTS HERETO ARE ATTORNEY-CLIENT
AND/OR ATTORNEY WORK-PRODUCT PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL.  If you have
received this email in error, do not under any circumstances read, forward,
copy, disseminate or save this email or any of its attachments.  If you have
received this email in error, take the following actions: (1) reply to this
email indicating that you received this email in error, and (2) delete and
completely erase this email and its attachments from your computer and any
backup systems or "Deleted Items" folders.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

		 

Thanks.  Russ Cavanaugh did send me a copy of an agreement with Castrol that I passed along to the attorney.

Marie, this will confirm that EES does NOT have a GISB with BP Energy.
Christy

EES entered into a GISB with BP Energy Company.  I cannot locate the file.  Christy Finelli is in charge of the GISB World and is out today.  By copy of this e:mail I am requesting Christy to provide a copy of the agreement for you.

With respect to Castrol Industrial North America, Inc. Legal does not have any contracts with this counterparty nor does the Confirmation desk have any documentation  that supports EESI doing business with this company.

If there is other info about this customer you may have, I could pass that along to the confirmation desk for further research.

Karen

Karen

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Billy:

All are Delaware with the exception of:

LOA, Inc. -- Texas
Enron Canada Corp. -- Province of Alberta

Marie

Marie:

Would you please tell me the state or province of incorporation of all of
the Enron entities in the master netting agreement?

This is for financing statement purposes.

Below are bp's:

BP Corporation North America Inc. -- Indiana
BP Energy Company -- Delaware
Vastar Resources, Inc. -- Delaware
BP Canada Energy Company -- Nova Scotia
BP Canada Energy Marketing Corp. -- Delaware
Cibola Energy Services Corporation -- Texas
IGI Resources, Inc. -- Idaho
BP Oil Supply Company -- Delaware
BP Products North America Inc. -- Maryland
BP Amoco Chemical Company -- Delaware
Atlantic Richfield Company -- Delaware
Amoco Production Company -- Delaware
BP Chemicals Inc. -- Ohio

Thanks.

Billy Dixon

Yes, we do want to exchange originals.  My originals are in our Calgary
office getting original signatures.  I will send one copy to you when I
receive them back.  Should probably be tomorrow or Wednesday.

Thanks!

Marie

>  -----Original Message-----

Lech:

I will ask the attorneys to forward you their initial draft of the Master Netting Agreement and then to send you the final draft.

I will fax you a copy of the final BP Amoco agreement, together with the states of incorporation for each of the BP entities.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie
Are you planning to address Lech's request?  Or is he in need of details that somebody else at Cadwalader already has?

It might be easiest if you would send me the agreements related to the UCC
filings.  That way, I will have names, addresses, etc., in one place.
Thank you.

Lech Kalembka
Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
100 Maiden Lane
New York, NY  10038
Tel.: (212) 504-6918
Fax: (212) 504-6666
E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

In order for Cadwalader to be in a position to order lien searches, please e-mail Lech Kalembka (Lech.Kalembka@cwt.com) the initial draft of your Master Netting Agreement(s).  When your agreement is finalized, please e-mail Lech a copy of the final draft so that he can prepare the financing statement filings.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Tanya!

Here is CSFB's draft Schedule and Paragraph 13 for Credit Suisse First Boston (Europe).  We will do a comparison when we get a worksheet.

Thanks!

Marie

Dear Ms. Heard,

	On behalf of my colleague Michael Mask, I attach a draft ISDA
Schedule and a draft Credit Support Annex for your review.  The terms are
subject to CSFB's review of the draft Enron Guarantee that I believe Lissa
Rosenthal has discussed with you.  Please forward this Guarantee, along with
any comments you may have to the attached, to Michael (212-538-2313) or me.
(Although Michael is negotiating this transaction, he will be out of the
office for the next week and I will be the contact in the interim.)

Thank you,

Reid Gray
212-538-2327

 <<Draft ISDA Schedule (non-Hedge-Fund)091701.doc>>  <<Draft CSFBEL NY Law 2
Way CSA 091701.doc>>

This message is for the named person's use only.  It may contain
confidential, proprietary or legally privileged information.  No
confidentiality or privilege is waived or lost by any mistransmission.
If you receive this message in error, please immediately delete it and all
copies of it from your system, destroy any hard copies of it and notify the
sender.  You must not, directly or indirectly, use, disclose, distribute,
print, or copy any part of this message if you are not the intended
recipient. CREDIT SUISSE GROUP and each of its subsidiaries each reserve
the right to monitor all e-mail communications through its networks.  Any
views expressed in this message are those of the individual sender, except
where the message states otherwise and the sender is authorised to state
them to be the views of any such entity.
Unless otherwise stated, any pricing information given in this message is
indicative only, is subject to change and does not constitute an offer to
deal at any price quoted.
Any reference to the terms of executed transactions should be treated as
preliminary only and subject to our formal written confirmation.

 - Draft ISDA Schedule (non-Hedge-Fund)091701.doc 
 - Draft CSFBEL NY Law 2 Way CSA 091701.doc 

Hi, Robbi!

How are things up your way?  It's incredibly busy here--entering into numerous master netting agreements.  Hope things quiet down soon.  I can't take much more of this turmoil!

Anne got her fabric from Schumacher Saturday.  Do you have an invoice or will you let us know the total when you get one?  There wasn't an invoice included in the package.  The toile is so pretty.

Thanks!

Marie

Barbara:

I left Jay Williams in Credit a voice mail earlier re getting me a list of entities for Duke, J. P. Morgan, Goldman, Sachs and Williams.  I just spoke with him and he is working on the lists, so as soon as I get the names from him, I'll update my list and send to you and Leslie.

Marie

Barbara:

I have Williams (called Leslie and gave them to her).  Jay Williams in Credit is working on J.P. Morgan and Bill Bradford is working on Duke.  Leslie said she has already pulled Goldman and J. Aron.

It looks like we should have them soon.

Marie  

Marie, do you think we will have  all the names of the legal entities comprising the "houses of Williams, Goldman, Jp Morgan and Duke by tomorrow...I need to know if you think it cannot be done,,,,,,,,thanks bng

Yes.

thanks for update,  Are you simultaneously updating the schedule you created  upon which I am basing Annex I
 -bng

----Original Message-----
Barbara:

I have Williams (called Leslie and gave them to her).  Jay Williams in Credit is working on J.P. Morgan and Bill Bradford is working on Duke.  Leslie said she has already pulled Goldman and J. Aron.

It looks like we should have them soon.

Marie  

Marie, do you think we will have  all the names of the legal entities comprising the "houses of Williams, Goldman, Jp Morgan and Duke by tomorrow...I need to know if you think it cannot be done,,,,,,,,thanks bng

Right now Goldman and J Aron is unassigned, but the Goldman lawyer will be speaking to Carol re their comments to the form master netting agreement, so probably Carol will be assigned to Goldman.

Is anyone working on Goldman and J Aron?

Barbara:

I have Williams (called Leslie and gave them to her).  Jay Williams in Credit is working on J.P. Morgan and Bill Bradford is working on Duke.  Leslie said she has already pulled Goldman and J. Aron.

It looks like we should have them soon.

Marie  

Marie, do you think we will have  all the names of the legal entities comprising the "houses of Williams, Goldman, Jp Morgan and Duke by tomorrow...I need to know if you think it cannot be done,,,,,,,,thanks bng

Lech:

I just spoke with Elizabeth Sager and she said there was no need to order lien searches for AEP as the contract expires in March, 2002.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
I did receive the document.  Should I contact anyone, or am I awaiting a
call to discuss/negotiate?  Thanks.

Lech Kalembka
Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
100 Maiden Lane
New York, NY  10038
Tel.: (212) 504-6918
Fax: (212) 504-6666
E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com

                    David.Portz@e
Lech -- Please let me know if you did not receive the attachment via my
subsequent e-mail.  I understand the UCC searches and filings to be needed
in relation to the attachment's Section 6(b).  Upon completion of
negotiations, I will send you an electronic copy of the finalized Netting
and Setoff Agreement to faciliate Cadwalader's preparation of the financing
statement filings.  --David Portz

    -----Original Message-----
   I did not find an attachment.  Also, I assume that we will prepare UCC
   filings and order UCC searches.  Thank you.

   Lech Kalembka
   Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
   100 Maiden Lane
   New York, NY  10038
   Tel.: (212) 504-6918
   Fax: (212) 504-6666
   E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com

                       "Portz,
   Lech - A high priority Master Netting and Setoff Agreement (see
   attached) is in the late stages of negotiation with the below-referenced
   AEP affiliates.  The agreement is currently intended to be limited to
   masters/ transactions between ENA &/or EPMI and two major AEP trading
   affiliates, American Electric Power Service Corporation as Agent for the
   AEP Operating Companies ("AEP") and AEP Energy Services, Inc.
   ("AEPESI").  The Netting Agreement explicitly identifies enabling
   agreements between those entities relating to trading physical gas,
   physical power, and financial swaps.  Earlier today the Enron Credit
   group indicated that ENA trades (using GTCs) physical coal and physical
   synfuel with American Electric Power Service Corporation.  Please
   contact me with any questions. -- David

   David A. Portz
   Senior Counsel
   Phone:   713-853-9239
   Fax:  713-646-3491
   Assistant:   Linda Simmons (Ext. 57851)

   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of
   the intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure
   by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and
   delete
   all copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are
   not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

==============================================================================

   NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally
   privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read,
   use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any
   attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
   that might affect any computer system into which it is received and
   opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is
   virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
   & Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

Barbara:

I just called and gave Leslie the Duke entities.  The only one left is J.P. Morgan/Chase.  When I get these, I'll send you and Leslie an updated list of entities.

Marie

Updated list of master netting agreement assignments.

	 

Barbara and Leslie:

Attached is the updated list of master netting counterparties.  Jay Williams in Credit is working on J.P. Morgan/Chase.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

Yes.

Marie:
I have a binder of Williams' contracts in my office on 45.  Do you need it?

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Updated list of master netting agreement assignments.

	 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 

What is your location and I'll have a "sample" sent to you.

Marie

Hey gang,

Would it be possible to obtain a blank ISDA Master Agreement?  I have just worked up a draft ISDA Swap for Gray Communications, and I have been informed that they would also like to see a copy of a sample ISDA Master Agreement as well.

Your help is much appreciated.

Thank you,
Becca
Rebecca Bell

We just received comments to our form from Goldman and here are the names they included (excluding UK):

J. Aron & Company
Goldman Sachs Capital Markets, L.P.

I really meant is anyone in credit working on them, but maybe carol can get those names...would you coordinate with her....similarly if someone has been assigned to J Aron, I would like getting the names of entities in the J Aron house to be a high priority.....even imperfect names would be better than no names..   thanks muchly   bng

Right now Goldman and J Aron is unassigned, but the Goldman lawyer will be speaking to Carol re their comments to the form master netting agreement, so probably Carol will be assigned to Goldman.

Is anyone working on Goldman and J Aron?

Barbara:

I have Williams (called Leslie and gave them to her).  Jay Williams in Credit is working on J.P. Morgan and Bill Bradford is working on Duke.  Leslie said she has already pulled Goldman and J. Aron.

It looks like we should have them soon.

Marie  

Marie, do you think we will have  all the names of the legal entities comprising the "houses of Williams, Goldman, Jp Morgan and Duke by tomorrow...I need to know if you think it cannot be done,,,,,,,,thanks bng

Here is an updated list of master netting counterparties.  Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

I sure will if you will tell me the principal place of business of all your entities party to the Master Netting Agreement.

Enron Canada Corp.
3500, 400 - 3rd Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta  T2P 4H2

Would you please tell me where Enron Canada Corp.'s principal place of
business in Canada is located?

Very truly yours,

BILLY
Billy D. Dixon
Attorney
BP America Inc.
501 Westlake Park Blvd., Rm 16.166
Houston, Texas 77079
Direct 281/366-4745
Fax 281/366-5901
billy.dixon@bp.com

***IMPORTANT -- THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHMENTS HERETO ARE ATTORNEY-CLIENT
AND/OR ATTORNEY WORK-PRODUCT PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL.  If you have
received this email in error, do not under any circumstances read, forward,
copy, disseminate or save this email or any of its attachments.  If you have
received this email in error, take the following actions: (1) reply to this
email indicating that you received this email in error, and (2) delete and
completely erase this email and its attachments from your computer and any
backup systems or "Deleted Items" folders.

Hi, Sharon!

It's me again.  Can you get me a copy of the master physical agreement for Duke Energy Marketing L.P.?  It appears from the list below that this the only Canada master I need.  I have the ISDA.

Thanks!

Marie
This is my stab at the very complicated Duke relationship.  Please call with questions.  Janna Blanter at Duke should validate this list as well.  Call with questions.  The guaranties are a disaster because some of these are gtd by Duke Capital, others stand on their own or currently have an intermediate guarantor.  We should think about one all encompassing gty from Enron Corp and Duke Capital to simplify things.

Duke Energy Trading and Marketing LLC
	ENA ISDA
	EPMI EEI
	ENA Master Physical (currently in negotiation - Hodge)
	ENA Upstream physical gas - no master

Duke Energy Marketing LP
	ECC ISDA
	ECC Master Physical
	ENA Master Physical

Duke Energy Merchants LLC
	ENA ISDA (currently in negotiations - Hendry)
	ERAC physical crude (no master - should consider sending our new Master Crude - Aronowitz)
	

Duke Energy NGL Services LP
	ENA financial transactions - no ISDA 

Duke Energy Field Services Marketing LLC
	ENA financial transactions - no ISDA
	ENA physical gas - GISB maybe??

Carol:

Here are the coal gtc's and a sample confirm.  Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

	Good Morning Marie:

	Attached please find what i hope is
	what you are looking for:

	  

	thanks so much,
	alexia

Goldman Sachs
Dear Carol and Marie:

Following our conversation with Marie and voice mail to Carol, we are
attaching a version of the Master Netting Agreement that has been revised to
reflect our comments and marked to show changes.  As we indicated, we are
interested in pursuing implementing the agreement.  However, we are
concerned that the cross-affiliate netting provision may not be enforceable.
This concern has resulted in two important changes that are reflected in the
attached markup:  (i) we have changed the severability clause to provide
that the agreement would survive even if Section 3 is not enforceable and
(ii) we have removed the collateral provisions that are predicated on the
operation of cross-affiliate netting.

Please contact me at the number below, or my colleague Mike Brogan (212 357
3204), with any questions or comments.

Best regards, Steve Bunkin

>  <<ENRON Master Netting  Security Agreement.doc>>
>
___________________________________________________
Steven M. Bunkin
Vice President & Associate General Counsel
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
One New York Plaza, 37th Floor
New York, New York  10004
phone: 212-902-0952
fax: 212-428-3675
____________________________________________________

 - ENRON Master Netting  Security Agreement.doc 

Alan:

Mary asked if you could handle the master netting agreement with Goldman Sachs.  Jay Williams in Credit is researching GS and will provide me with a list of entities and documents.  I will pull copies of the documents and give to you.

Thanks!

Marie

Dear Carol and Marie:

Following our conversation with Marie and voice mail to Carol, we are
attaching a version of the Master Netting Agreement that has been revised to
reflect our comments and marked to show changes.  As we indicated, we are
interested in pursuing implementing the agreement.  However, we are
concerned that the cross-affiliate netting provision may not be enforceable.
This concern has resulted in two important changes that are reflected in the
attached markup:  (i) we have changed the severability clause to provide
that the agreement would survive even if Section 3 is not enforceable and
(ii) we have removed the collateral provisions that are predicated on the
operation of cross-affiliate netting.

Please contact me at the number below, or my colleague Mike Brogan (212 357
3204), with any questions or comments.

Best regards, Steve Bunkin

>  <<ENRON Master Netting  Security Agreement.doc>>
>
___________________________________________________
Steven M. Bunkin
Vice President & Associate General Counsel
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
One New York Plaza, 37th Floor
New York, New York  10004
phone: 212-902-0952
fax: 212-428-3675
____________________________________________________

 - ENRON Master Netting  Security Agreement.doc 

They were added awhile back.  Here is the updated group list.

	 

Please add these people to the Master Netting Group

athena.alexander@cwt.com
david.mitchell@cwt.com
marissa.morelle@cwt.com

Mary, going forward, could you please include me, David Mitchell and
Marissa Morelle on all distributions that you make to Rick and Lech
Kalembka?  Thanks.

[athena.alexander@cwt.com, david.mitchell@cwt.com, marissa.morelle@cwt.com]

                    Lech Kalembka
Can you forward to David my forwards to you?  Thanks.

Lech Kalembka
Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
100 Maiden Lane
New York, NY  10038
Tel.: (212) 504-6918
Fax: (212) 504-6666
E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com

                    Athena
OK, I will add us to the distribution list.  However, please include David
on anything you forward until he is also on the list.  Thanks.

                    Lech Kalembka
I have been forwarding these messages at Rick's request.  Going forward,
perhaps either of you could contact Mary Cook to be added to the
distribution list.  Thanks.

Lech Kalembka
Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
100 Maiden Lane
New York, NY  10038
Tel.: (212) 504-6918
Fax: (212) 504-6666
E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com
                    "Cook, Mary"
1.  Be sure to verify that the underlying contracts do not allow cherry
picking under any default scenario.  If it does, amend the express
language.

2.  We have made 2 changes to the netting agreement forms on the basis
of further review by Leslie Hansen of some provisions in our trading
forms.  The first change is in paragraph 2(a) to clarify the definition
of Default.  The second change is in paragraph 14(b) to delete the day
limitation on claims of Force Majeure.  We feel this should not be
included in any physical contract that will be included in a master
netting agreement, especially because of the current international
situation and security concerns.

See attached reline version to read the changes.

 <<MASTER NETTING & SECURITY AGMNT 10 H V1 RED.DOC>>
3.  No changes have been made to the Collateral Annex.

4.  Attached below are the new forms.  Rather than continue with forms
with and without the user notes, I put the user notes in a separate
document.  They are not at the back of the forms.  Simpler.

 <<Master Netting User Notes.doc>>

The attached forms are Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h a v1 (to use
without collateral annex) and Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h v1
(to use with collateral annex).

 <<Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h a v1.doc>>  <<Master Netting &
Security Agmnt 10 h v1.doc>>

Cordially,
Mary Cook
==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

 - MASTER NETTING & SECURITY AGMNT 10 H V1 RED.DOC << File: MASTER NETTING & SECURITY AGMNT 10 H V1 RED.DOC >> 
 - Master Netting User Notes.doc << File: Master Netting User Notes.doc >> 
 - Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h a v1.doc << File: Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h a v1.doc >> 
 - Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h v1.doc << File: Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h v1.doc >> 

Sharon:

Can you send me a copy of the physical gas master with Williams Energy Marketing & Trading Company?

Thanks!

Marie

Never mind, I think I found it.

Thanks, anyway!

Sharon:

Can you send me a copy of the physical gas master with Williams Energy Marketing & Trading Company?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Georgi!
 
In light of the NYMEX being closed last week, the 5 paralegals are involved in a project right now that is taking up our extra time, so we don't know when we would be able to get to this project.  Perhaps someone in your group could come to our area and copy these files.  Just let us know who and when they will be coming and we will help them locate the documents.
 
Thanks!
 
Marie
I have completed an audit comparing the financial agreements that are established in the Global Contract System against the executed agreements that are scanned in Livelink.  
 
I have identified the following counterparties as NOT having any agreements in Livelink.  Please check your files for any executed agreement on these counterparties and forward them to me for immediate processing.  Also, let me know if you are unable to locate any of these documents.
 
Your urgency in this matter would be greatly appreciated.  
Thanks, Georgi
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
CONTRACT NO.
COUNTERPARTY
CP ID NO.
96022842
ACE TEMPTEST REINSURANCE LTD.
64833
96018722
AMERICAN RE CAPITAL MARKETS, INC.
61907
96030723
BP OIL INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
26621
96030691
CENTRAL PUERTO S.A.
57364
96029699
CES-FERRELL RESOURCES, LLC
73784
96029863
CES-VITOL GAS & ELECTRIC LLC
73354
95000383
CONTINENTAL BANK INTERNATIONAL
26137
96021763
CORNERSTONE PROPANE, LP
52577
96016548
CREDIT LYONNAIS NEW YORK BRANCH
58651
96021809
CREDIT LYONNAIS NEW YORK BRANCH
58651
96004598
ECT STRATEGIC VALUE CORP
52121
96030725
ELF TRADING SA
26485
96030698
ENERGY WEST INCORPORATED
1579
96007416
ENRON CANADA CORP
11266
96030717
ENRON CAPITAL & TRADE RESOURCES INTERNATIONAL CORP
46503
95000479
ENRON CORP.
717
95000477
ENRON FINANCE CORP
1315
96006318
ENRON FINANCE CORP
1315
95000485
ENRON GAS LIQUIDS, INC.
5375
95000478
ENRON GAS MARKETING, INC.
1329
95000486
ENRON METHANOL COMPANY
1342
96018779
ENRON NORTH AMERICA CORP
1305
96018319
ENRON NORTH AMERICA CORP
1305
96018321
ENRON NORTH AMERICA CORP
1305
96018323
ENRON NORTH AMERICA CORP
1305
96031351
ENRON POWER MARKETING, INC.
26048
96031346
ENRON POWER SERVICES, INC.
1312
95000491
EOG RESOURCES, INC
71318
96031313
HEINZ FROZENF OOD COMPANY
71747
96006373
HOUSTON PIPE LINE COMPANY
1321
96006388
HPL RESOURCES COMPANY
11285
96054147
HSBC FUTURES INC.
45499
96054142
HSBC SECURITIES
52716
96004604
HUNT, WILLIAM HERBERT TRUEST ESTATE
1777
96031280
INDEPENDENT ENERGY UK LIMITED
53118
96031274
INLAND RESOURCES INC.
11207
96031272
JOINT ENERGY DEVELOPMENT INVESTMENTS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
60568
95000341
JOINT ENERGY DEVELOPMENT INVESTMENTS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
11284
95000313
LEHMAN BROTHERS COMMERCIAL CORPORATION
127
96010012
LOMAX EXPLORATION CO.
11209
95000446
LOUIS DREYFUS ENERGY CORPORATION
84
96000113
LOUISIANA LAND AND EXPLORATION COMPANY, THE
130
95000459
MERCATO ENERGY, INC.
53136
96019602
METHANEX CORPORATION
6214
96031248
MORAVSKE NAFTOVE DOLY A.S.
64396
96031245
MORGAN GUARANTY TRUST COMPANY OF NEW YORK
122
96031244
MORGAN STANLEY CAPITAL GROUP INC.
9409
96004753
NATIONAL FUEL MARKETING COMPANY, LLC
32612
96028066
PALLADIUM INSURANCE LTD
61801
96032355
PXRE CORPORATION
58478
96010016
RATON GAS COMPANY LLC
26227
96031231
RISK MANAGEMENT & TRADING CORP.
53447
96031232
RISK MANAGEMENT & TRADING CORP.
53447
96022575
ST. PAUL RE (BERMUDA) LTD
64784
95000259
STARTECH ENERGY INC.
5196
96031060
STRATUM GROUP ENERGY CAPITAL, LP
51379
96056984
SUNTRUST BANK, ATLANTA
51369
95000326
THE TORONTO-DOMINION BANK
11352
96031039
THE TORONTO-DOMINION BANK
11352
96000720
TOTAL MINATOME CORPORATION
3094
96018552
WAUSAU-MOSINEE PAPER CORPORATION
64195
96036414
WEATHERTRADE, INC.
75244
95000262
WEST TEXAS GAS INC.
230
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
TOTAL CONTRACTS THAT DO NOT HAVE LIVE LINK 
 
 
CONTRACT DOCUMENTS AT THIS TIME------------------>
63
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Georgi Landau
Enron Net Works
(Ph) 713/345-4435
(Fx)  713/646-2495
 

Mr. Giordano:

We have received the executed copies of the ISDA Master Agreements for the referenced counterparties, however, we still need to receive the supporting documentation set forth in my letters transmitting the execution copies to you.

For Catequil Partners, L.P., we need to receive items 1-5 set forth in my transmittal letter of 10/11/01 (copy attached).

		 

For Catequil Overseas Partners Ltd., we need to receive items 1-5 set forth in my transmittal letter of 10/11/01 (copy attached).

			 

We look forward to receiving these documents as soon as possible, so that we can close our files.  Thank you for your assistance and, should you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact us.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

We have received the following executed financial master agreement:

Type of Contract:			ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:				September 11, 2001

Counterparty:				City of Glendale

Transactions Covered:			Approved for all products with the exception of:  Foreign Exchange

Governing Law:				New York

Special Handling Requirements:	Please note that only transactions having terms that expire BEFORE June 30, 2002 can be documented under this ISDA Master Agreement.

Copies will be distributed.	

I only asked my assisant over here because she is so sweet and she would like a 10 lb. bag.  I guess we want to get some?  I don't remember what we've gotten in the past--20 lbs.?  Whatever you want to get is okay with me.\

Thanks!

Oops!  Just remember, maybe I'll check with Robbi if that's okay.

Any  interested parties?
 
Remember they make  great gifts especially at Thanksgiving.  You can have them cracked at the  Farmers Market for about .25/pound.  Tell your friends but hurry  supplies are limited. I will keep a supply until December 1 and then I will  take what I have left to the wholesaler.
 
Help the poor  downtrodden farmer.  We have taken it on the chin the last couple of  years with the severe drought and heat that we have  experienced.
 
E-mail your orders  are call me at 254.
 
 
Sincerely,
 
Farmer  Brown(alias)
Gene  Presley 

Is there anything else you need for BP Amoco?

Marie
Principal Operating Offices:

BP Corporation North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Energy Company
501 West Lake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

Vastar Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Canada Energy Company
240 - 4th Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta T2P 4H4

BP Canada Energy Marketing Corp.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Cibola Energy Services Corporation
350 N. St. Paul Street
Dallas, TX 75201

IGI Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Oil Supply Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Products North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Amoco Chemical Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Atlantic Richfield Company
333 S. Hope Street
Los Angeles, CA 90071

Amoco Production Company
501 WestLake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

BP Chemicals Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

I sure will if you will tell me the principal place of business of all
your entities party to the Master Netting Agreement.

Enron Canada Corp.
3500, 400 - 3rd Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta  T2P 4H2

>  -----Original Message-----

THANKS!!!!!!!!

Marie

Principal Operating Offices:

BP Corporation North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Energy Company
501 West Lake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

Vastar Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Canada Energy Company
240 - 4th Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta T2P 4H4

BP Canada Energy Marketing Corp.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Cibola Energy Services Corporation
350 N. St. Paul Street
Dallas, TX 75201

IGI Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Oil Supply Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Products North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Amoco Chemical Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Atlantic Richfield Company
333 S. Hope Street
Los Angeles, CA 90071

Amoco Production Company
501 WestLake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

BP Chemicals Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

I sure will if you will tell me the principal place of business of all
your entities party to the Master Netting Agreement.

Enron Canada Corp.
3500, 400 - 3rd Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta  T2P 4H2

>  -----Original Message-----

Hello! Stephen & Maureen has just sent you a greeting card from Bluemountain.com.

You can pick up your personal message here:

http://www5.bluemountain.com/cards/boxe227339v3/6hvzxhtajcerte.html

Your card will be available for the next 90 days.

This service is 100% FREE! :) Have a good day and have fun!

Send FREE Blue Mountain cards to friends and family (and attach gifts too!)
http://www.bluemountain.com

Attached is the updated list deleting J. P. Morgan.

Marie

		 

Thanks!

Would you be interested in some pecans?  This guy Anne works with has an orchard and he is selling them in 10lb bags at $1.80/lb.  They are not cracked or shelled.

Marie,

  Rober Allen just called me and approved my account.  I'll confirm pricing and send in your order by tomorrow.

Is this okay?

		 

one favor...please type Annex I on the bottom of the 1st page and retransmit to me......many,many thanksbng
Attached is the updated list deleting J. P. Morgan.

Marie

		 << File: master netting counterparties.doc >> 

Credit has requested that we cancel the Legal/Credit Meeting today.

Nidia:

You can fax the guaranty to me (646-3490).

Marie

Please include terms of this credit worksheet in annex b to be attached to all future financial trades with this customer.

 << File: Colonial Oil Industries credit worksheet 09-17-01.xls >> 

Thanks,

Nidia A. Mendoza
Credit Specialist
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith St.,  Suite 2808 D
Houston, TX  77002
Tel:  713/853-4868
Fax:  713/853-9476
e-mail: nidia.mendoza@enron.com

Sharon:

Does ECC have any physical gas masters with J. Aron & Company?  If not, can you send me a sample gtc used?

Thanks!

Marie

My gosh that was quick!  Do you have ESP and knew I was going to ask you for this?

Marie, we do not have a signed Master with J. Aron.  Attached is the GTC we use for their transactions:

 << File: JARON.GTC.August.2001.doc >> 

Sharon:

Does ECC have any physical gas masters with J. Aron & Company?  If not, can you send me a sample gtc used?

Thanks!

Marie

Per Carol's request, please e-mail Carol, Mary and me with an update on the agreements you are working on.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Athena!

I apologize for getting back to you so late, but I just saw your e-mail that I printed out this morning.  As you can guess, it's pretty hectic here.  Here is the info I have on Coral and Coastal:

Coral:

Coral Power LLC - I don't have an address, but it is probably the Houston address
Coral Energy Holding LP - 909 Fannin, Suite 7000, Houston, Texas  77010
Coral Energy Resources LP - 909 Fannin, Suite 7000, Houston, Texas  77010
Coral Energy Canada, Inc. - 1800, 530-Eighth Avenue S.W., Calgary, Alberta  T2P 3S8

Coastal (part of the El Paso family):

El Paso Corporation
El Paso Merchant Energy Canada Inc. - 1001 Louisiana Street, Houston, Texas  77002
El Paso Merchant Energy, L.P. - 1001 Louisiana Street, Houston, Texas  77002
Coastal Chemical Company, Inc.
Coastal Coal Company, LLC
Coastal Gas Marketing, Inc.
Coastal Refining & Marketing, Inc.
Coastal States Trading, Inc.

This is the only address I have for El Paso/Coastal

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

Hello, Marie.  I am involved in getting our Conflicts Department to run
checks on the various Counterparties.  The department needs more
information for Coastal and Coral.  Please provide the full legal names and
addresses for these two Counterparties.  Thanks.

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

Debra:  Will you pull any masters for me?

Sharon:  Will you check on ECC masters?

Thanks!

Marie

Credit terms will follow on this proposed master netting arrangement.

						
 

 Guaranties
	Outgoing:
	Original Date:
	12/16/96- Covered Counterparty: ENA covering TXU Energy Trading Company for $20MM of financial business
	4/1/98 -   Covered Counterparty: EPMI covering TXU Energy Trading Company for $30MM of physical power business
	7/1/00 -   Covered Counterparty: ECC and ENA covering TXU Energy Trading Company and TXU EnergyTrading Canada Ltd for $50MM of physical gas and other 		  petroleum related products
	Incoming: All entities guaranteed by TXU Gas Company
	Original Date:
	3/31/2000 - Covered counterparty: TXU Energy Trading Company covering $20MM of ENA financial business.
	10/12/01 - Covered Counterparty: TXU Energy Trading Canada Ltd and TXU Energy Trading Company for $25MM ofphysical and financial natural gas business with 		   ENA and ECC
	5/25/01 - Covered Counterparty: TXU Energy Trading company for $20MM of physical power business with EPMI

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

Pursuant to Frank Vickers' request, I am attaching our form master netting agreement.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				  

				

Attached is the updated assignment list.

Marie

		 

David:

Mary has assigned the TXU master netting agreement to you.  We are in the process of gathering the documents and will pass them along to you.  Please contact Steve Douglas in Tax prior to preparing your initial draft/contacting TXU.  Steve's number is x30938.

Thanks!

Marie

Frank:

Please have Sequent direct any questions or comments regarding the Master Netting Agreement to Legal.

Thanks!

Marie

Pursuant to Frank Vickers' request, I am attaching our form master netting agreement.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				  

				

Here it is, Vanek!

	 

Can I please have the list of counterparties for Duke?

peas and carrots,
-d

Veronica:

FYI.  Let me know what you want to do.

Marie

Marie,

Virginia Power Energy Marketing, Inc. is opposed to amendment No. 1 of the below
referenced document.  I've attached a blackline of our changes for your review.
If this current draft is acceptable I've included a clean version for execution.
If you have any questions, please give me a call.

Best regards,
Shelley Tebbens
Contract Administrator
(804) 273-4149

(See attached file: VPEM-Enron ISDA Amendment 9-18.doc)(See attached file:
VPEM-Enron ISDA Amendment 9-18 blackline.doc)

Ms. Tebbens:

Attached for your review is a draft of a First Amendment to ISDA Master
Agreement between Virginia Power Energy Marketing, Inc. and Enron North
America Corp.  If the attached document is acceptable, please let me
know and I will prepare execution copies.  Thank you for your assistance
and, please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or
comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
                     <<003amend(virginia power).doc>>

 - 003amend(virginia power).doc 
 - VPEM-Enron ISDA Amendment 9-18.doc 
 - VPEM-Enron ISDA Amendment 9-18 blackline.doc 

Thanks!  Do we make the check out to you, Hooks Industrial?

Marie

Marie,

  I sent in your order to Robert Allen today.  I believe it is all in stock - so it shouldn't take too long.  Below are the charges for the fabric you have already received.  I should find out shipping costs for Robert Allen by the end of the week and will let you know.  Hope it all turns out great - I'd love to see it when its done!

Schumacher

4 yards @ $25/yd       	$100
Tax			$    8.87
Shipping   		$     5.25
Total			$114.125

Kravet

81/2 yards @ 34.9/yd	$296.65
Tax			$  26.32
Shipping		$11.89
Total			$334.86

Total:    $448.98

Hi, Sharon!

I have a rush project.  Can you check on your end and send me any masters between ECC and Conoco Canada Limited and Gulf Canada Resources Limited?

We have to respond to Conoco by 2:00 p.m. (Houston time) today.

THANKS!!!!!

Marie

Hi, Edmund!

Can you assist me in obtaining copies of some confirmations?  I just need a copy of one representative confirmation for the following:

You can either fax them to me at (713) 646-3490 or e-mail.

THANKS!!!!!!!!

Marie

THANKS!!!!!!!!!

Hi, Marie.  I'm just faxing them to you now (65 pages), so keep an eye out for them!

Hi, Sharon!

I have a rush project.  Can you check on your end and send me any masters between ECC and Conoco Canada Limited and Gulf Canada Resources Limited?

We have to respond to Conoco by 2:00 p.m. (Houston time) today.

THANKS!!!!!

Marie

Pursuant to Frank Sayre's request, I am attaching a clean and blacklined draft of the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement noting certain revisions.  Please contact Frank with any questions or comments.

Thank you!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Attached is the latest list of master netting counterparties.  Please note that the new counterparties added to the list are in bold.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.  I will send you an updated list as I add new counterparties.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Pursuant to Frank Vickers' request, I am attaching our form master netting agreement.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				  

				

Tanya:

Please see Tom Doukas's request below.  Enron Corp. issued a guaranty in favor of The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. et al dated March 29, 2001, with a $25,000,000 cap.  This guaranty secured obligations of Enron Credit, Inc. in connection with a Securities Loan Agreement and brokerage agreement.  The cap was increased to $100,000,000 by amendment dated May 15, 2001.  Are you okay with adding ECT Europe Finance, Inc. as an additional guaranteed party?

Thanks!

Marie  

Sara,

I just left you a voice mail about this.

We need to amend the Bear guaranty to cover the new ECT Europe Finance that we moved the Anker positions into.  By amending the guanranty I can free up $2.5mm cash.

Please tell me if this can happen.

Thanks,

Tom

Please either send me the agreement also or a list of entities so that I can pull agreements.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie, please assign to Leslie H.  Ed, please forward the email with the attachment directly to Leslie as it is not printable from this trailed email.

I don't think this has been assigned.  Looks like Southern wants to use their own form (ugh).  Any thoughts on priority or who should get this one.  Sarah or Leslie? Thanks
Elizabeth Sager
713-853-6349

Elizabeth - Attached is a netting agreement from Southern Company Services, Inc.  Please see if one of the EPMI attys can work on this.  

Ed

As we discussed last week, attached is netting agreement for Electric Power.
In my opinion the agreement is standard in nature and as you should  agree,
in my opinion of course.  Please review and comment if you would like to
modify.  

As you know,  I will  be question frequently regarding the status of this
agreement,  therefore anything I can do to help complete this agreement in a
timely manner will be appreciated.

 <<Enron SOCO Netting 110601.doc>> 

Robert F. Markham
Southern Company Generation and Energy Marketing
Risk Control
205-257-5835
205-257-5858 fx
rfmarkha@southernco.com

Attached is the updated list of master netting agreement assignments.

		 

Is John Suttle okay with our providing this guaranty and in this amount?  Also, are you signing a master agreement or a short form confirmation?  I don't know if we can get this guaranty on such short notice, but we'll try.

Marie

I forgot to mention that the legal name of the company is:

Optus Networks Pty Limited 
101 Miller Street
North Sydney
NSW 2060
ACN 008 570 330

Thanks!

Pat

marie, I suspect that would it probably cause problems to put a provision to review the value of the guaranty in the actual guaranty document. It would be fine to stick with the standard guaranty wording. We will sort something out with them here regarding a process to review of the value of the guaranty.             

Marie,

We're down to the last item on signing a contract with Optus which would allow us to buy capacity from them in order to fill the circuit we sold to Uecomm (associated w/ the MSA).  They've requested a US$5 million parent guarantee from Enron Corp.  I don't know if this is standard, but they would like us to include some language that says we could review the amount in the future if needed.  But don't worry about this if it would slow things down.

Could you please arrange for a guarantee from Enron Corp?  How long does it take?  would it be possible to do it today (Wednesday)?  If we can get the guarantee and the contract executed by Thursday, Optus will have the circuit ready on Friday -- which is when our Customer needs it.

If you need any clarification, please feel free to call David Minns or me at any time.  My home number is 011-61-2-9360-1920.

Thanks

Pat

Patrick M. Leahy
Enron Broadband Services
Global Wholesale Services - Asia Pacific
tel:  02-9229-2314
fax: 02-9229-2350

Sounds good to me!

Marie,

  Are you free for lunch today - Jane and I need to escape.

yes - I'd love to get away

FYI - this is all I have for now.  Do you want to try and do lunch with Marie?
W. Lance Schuler
Guys

Attached is a DRAFT.  I still have to work with Mark Santikos to get a better understanding of what we can do with the operating agreement.

 << File: Enron Proposal_091701.doc >> 

Regards
Grant Zimmerman

Hi, Sharon!

Have you received my package with the original BP Amoco master netting agreements and, if so, have they been signed?

Thanks!

Marie

Uh, oh!  It was sent to Peter in the interoffice pouch.  My assistant said she put it to go on Friday.  I sure hope you find it, cause it has original signatures.

Please let me know what you find out?

Thanks!

Marie

Huh?  I don't mean to sound so stupid, but I haven't received anything from you in the internal mail or by Fed Ex (or at least I don't remember).  With all the excitement around here the last few days, I could very well have forgotten I received them.  When did you send them?  I'll check my area just in case its beneath other stuff and let you know if I find anything.

Hi, Sharon!

Have you received my package with the original BP Amoco master netting agreements and, if so, have they been signed?

Thanks!

Marie

Let us know if you hear from credit.

Tanya:

Please see Tom Doukas's request below.  Enron Corp. issued a guaranty in favor of The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. et al dated March 29, 2001, with a $25,000,000 cap.  This guaranty secured obligations of Enron Credit, Inc. in connection with a Securities Loan Agreement and brokerage agreement.  The cap was increased to $100,000,000 by amendment dated May 15, 2001.  Are you okay with adding ECT Europe Finance, Inc. as an additional guaranteed party?

Thanks!

Marie  

Sara,

I just left you a voice mail about this.

We need to amend the Bear guaranty to cover the new ECT Europe Finance that we moved the Anker positions into.  By amending the guanranty I can free up $2.5mm cash.

Please tell me if this can happen.

Thanks,

Tom

Anne:

Elizabeth said I should forward this to you.

Let me know if I can help.

Marie
Marie and Mary:
Please give this to the attorney that is handling the Phibro matter.  Liz will be talking to Mary about this shortly.  Thanks.  Let me know by e-mail who is handling this.  Thanks.

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Please review

Bill,

Here's the novation we discussed.

Please call me as soon as possible to discuss.

Daniel J. Griffin
Treasurer
Phibro Inc.
(203) 221-5894
 - enron novation1.doc 
 - EnronNovate.rtf 

Hi, Diane!

Here's Leslie's e-mail with the revised paragraph.  She said that the revision is "Acknowledgement of relation transactions".  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

THANKS!!!!!

Marie

Marie:

Can you please forward the following paragraph to the confirm desk and ask them to revise confirmationYH2566.1, YH2564.1 and YH2567.1 by replacing the first full paragraph on page 2 of each of the three confirmations (replacing the paragraph that begins "Each of the parties to this Agreement recognizes and acknowledges that the parties are acting and agreeing to perform their obligations hereunder in reliance upon . . . ") with the paragraph that follows.  When they have completed the revision, please ask them to reissue the confirmations to Bank of Montreal and Reliant, respectively.  Please ask the confirm desk to send a copy of the Bank of Montreal confirm to Diane Bruning in the legal department IN ADDITION TO Bank of Montreal's confirmation group.  Diane's fax number is 646-366-1724.  

Thanks

Leslie

Here's the new paragraph:

Hello, Leslie:

Dede Russo requested that I e-mail the attached language to you for review.

Please let me know if you approve or have comments.

Thanks very much!

Sherry Stofer
(713) 207-5893

(See attached file: Ring Trades-Bank of Montreal-Enron NA 11-8-01.doc)

 - Ring Trades-Bank of Montreal-Enron NA 11-8-01.doc 

You're right!  Thanks for catching it.

Acknowledgement of relation transactions?   Not "related" ?

Hi, Diane!

Here's Leslie's e-mail with the revised paragraph.  She said that the revision is "Acknowledgement of relation transactions".  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

THANKS!!!!!

Marie

Marie:

Can you please forward the following paragraph to the confirm desk and ask them to revise confirmationYH2566.1, YH2564.1 and YH2567.1 by replacing the first full paragraph on page 2 of each of the three confirmations (replacing the paragraph that begins "Each of the parties to this Agreement recognizes and acknowledges that the parties are acting and agreeing to perform their obligations hereunder in reliance upon . . . ") with the paragraph that follows.  When they have completed the revision, please ask them to reissue the confirmations to Bank of Montreal and Reliant, respectively.  Please ask the confirm desk to send a copy of the Bank of Montreal confirm to Diane Bruning in the legal department IN ADDITION TO Bank of Montreal's confirmation group.  Diane's fax number is 646-366-1724.  

Thanks

Leslie

Here's the new paragraph:

Hello, Leslie:

Dede Russo requested that I e-mail the attached language to you for review.

Please let me know if you approve or have comments.

Thanks very much!

Sherry Stofer
(713) 207-5893

(See attached file: Ring Trades-Bank of Montreal-Enron NA 11-8-01.doc)

 - Ring Trades-Bank of Montreal-Enron NA 11-8-01.doc << File: Ring Trades-Bank of Montreal-Enron NA 11-8-01.doc >> 

Please review the attached Schedule and Paragraph 13 ASAP and let Frank have your comments.

Thanks!

Marie

		 		 

Attached for your review are a revised Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the Credit Support Annex.  These documents are currently being reviewed by our credit department and are subject to revision based upon their review of same.  Please contact Frank with any questions or comments.

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	 

Paul:

Pursuant to my voice mail, Elizabeth Sager is finalizing a Master Netting Agreement with AEP that is to be signed by ECTRIC, ECT Resources Limited, Enron Financial Energy Trading and Enron Coal Services Limited.  It appears that John Sherriff is an officer of three of the entities and Stuart Staley is a director of Enron Coal Services Limited.  Will you assist us in getting this document signed by initialling, if appropriate, and obtaining signatures and faxing a signed copy back to us at (713) 646-3490?

If you have any questions, please call either Elizabeth Sager at (713) 853-6349 or David Portz at (713) 853-9239.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

No, it doesn't.  We don't have Calpine Energy Services Canada Ltd.  We do have Calpine Fuels Texas, Corporation and Calpine Natural Gas Company.

Marie

would you check to make sure that this jives with our list????many thanks  bng
 << File: List of Agreements.doc >> 

Harlan E. Murphy
Enron Wholesale Services - Legal
1400 Smith Street, EB 3811
Houston, Texas 77002
Tel: 713.345.2679
Fax: 713.646.3490
E-mail: Harlan.Murphy@Enron.com

Mark:

Attached is my work report.

Marie

		 

If you have not already done so this week, please remember to update your work reports for me this afternoon.

Mark Taylor
Vice President and General Counsel
Enron Wholesale Services
(713)853-7459

Barbara:

Here are the two revised lists, one with TXU and one without.

	 	 

would you check to make sure that this jives with our list????many thanks  bng
 << File: List of Agreements.doc >> 

Harlan E. Murphy
Enron Wholesale Services - Legal
1400 Smith Street, EB 3811
Houston, Texas 77002
Tel: 713.345.2679
Fax: 713.646.3490
E-mail: Harlan.Murphy@Enron.com

Here is the updated list.

		 

Paul:

Pursuant to my voice mail, Harlan Murphy is finalizing a Master Netting Agreement with Dynegy that is to be signed by ECTRIC and ECT Resources Limited.  It appears that John Sherriff is an officer of both entities.  Will you assist us in getting this document signed by initialling, if appropriate, and obtaining signatures and faxing a signed copy back to us at (713) 646-3490?

If you have any questions, please call eitherHarlan Murphy at (713) 345-2679 or Mary Cook at (713) 345-7732.

Thanks for your help!

I have been trying to call you but your phone never rings.  I'm ready to go when you are.  Give me a call if you can.

Paul:

Attached is the Dynegy Master Netting Agreement.  Please have signed by ECTRIC and ECT Resources Limited and fax the signature pages back to me ASAP at (713) 646-3490.

Many thanks!

Marie

		

			 

Everyone signed but ENA Upstream and Canada.  Reliant signed yesterday and brought them back to me this morning so that I can get the other signatures.  I am having the document taken to Brian Redmond to sign for ENA Upstream and then Peter Keohane will sign for ECC.  Barbara signed off on the receivables.

Marie:

Just checking on the status of the Reliant MNA -- did it get executed?  Did Joel sign off on it?  

Leslie

I have left Diane Anderson on the Confirm Desk a voice mail as to status.  Will let you know what she says.

Marie:

Can you please check on the status of the confirmations for the Reliant/Bank of Montreal Ring Trades.  Please confirm that the confirmations have been reissued and ask to be informed immediately when we receive executed copies back from the counterparties.  This is a big transaction and we need to make sure that we get the confirms signed, sealed and delivered as soon as possible!

Thanks for your help with this.

Leslie

Beth:

Pursuant to Sara Shackleton's request, I am attaching our form master netting agreement.  Please do not hesitate to contact Sara with any questions or comments.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Clement!

Attached is the Amendment to the Enron Corp. guaranty delivered to Dynegy last week.  The only change we made is to include a reference to the inclusion of master netting agreements in the second paragraph.

If the attached is acceptable, please have signed and call me when it's ready and I'll pickup.

Thanks for your help!

Marie
x33907

			 

Hi, Sharon:

Did the BP Amoco Master Netting Agreement ever show up?

Marie

Eric and Russell:

I spoke with Roeline Hudson at Torch just a few minutes ago.  She is having a medical procedure today and probably won't be back in the office until Monday.  She answered my question, so I will finalize drafts of the assignments and give them to one of the lawyers for review.  The lawyer may want verification from Torch as to the appropriate entity that is the counterparty to the transactions being assigned (specifically the Dynegy trades), which evidence of authority Roeline will have to send when she returns to the office on Monday.  Roeline stated that she has not received the additional documentation from UOM so she is not aware of any urgency in finalizing these assignments until all documentation has been delivered to us to finalize documents.  We will want to see the additional documentation from UOM before we send the drafts out for review.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Marie

John,

Here is Russell's update on Torch....

 Torch-  I put a call into the person at Torch handling the assignment of the swaps, Roulene Hudson (Torch Credit), although she was not there.  I notified Marie Heard (our legal person x33907) of this, she will follow up with her questions, so she can send the drafts out.  Marie had some issues with the names on the confirms.

So, Maria should be attempting to get in touch with Roulene today regarding her questions.

Maria, please update everyone (Russell is out today) when you have updated information later today.

Thanks,

Eric

It was put in the interoffice pouch, so who knows where it is!

Nope, I'm still hopeful it'll show up some time today.  Couriers come at all times of the day around here.  Were you able to put a trace on it or do you have a tracking number and maybe we can trace it from up here?

Hi, Sharon:

Did the BP Amoco Master Netting Agreement ever show up?

Marie

Edmund:

Attached is the signature page for the Dynegy master netting agreement.

Please have two originals signed and return to me by fax ASAP (713) 646-3490.

THANKS!!!!!!!
Marie

			 

Harlan:

Here are the form master netting agreement and credit annex for BNP Paribas.  Do you want to send it on or do you want me to?  If you want me to, do you have an e-mail address or should I call?

Thanks!

Marie

		 	 

I spoke with Peter Keohane and he said that Greg Johnston (403/974-6745) and Chris Gaffney (416/865-3711) are on board to handle the Canada filings.

We have signed BP Amoco and Reliant, which I will get you copies of so that you will have the exact names, etc.  Also, I will send you an e-mail with BP's jurisdictions and addresses.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

Principal Operating Offices:

BP Corporation North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Energy Company
501 West Lake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

Vastar Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Canada Energy Company
240 - 4th Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta T2P 4H4

BP Canada Energy Marketing Corp.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Cibola Energy Services Corporation
350 N. St. Paul Street
Dallas, TX 75201

IGI Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Oil Supply Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Products North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Amoco Chemical Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Atlantic Richfield Company
333 S. Hope Street
Los Angeles, CA 90071

Amoco Production Company
501 WestLake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

BP Chemicals Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

I sure will if you will tell me the principal place of business of all
your entities party to the Master Netting Agreement.

Enron Canada Corp.
3500, 400 - 3rd Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta  T2P 4H2

>  -----Original Message-----

Marie:

Would you please tell me the state or province of incorporation of all of
the Enron entities in the master netting agreement?

This is for financing statement purposes.

Below are bp's:

BP Corporation North America Inc. -- Indiana
BP Energy Company -- Delaware
Vastar Resources, Inc. -- Delaware
BP Canada Energy Company -- Nova Scotia
BP Canada Energy Marketing Corp. -- Delaware
Cibola Energy Services Corporation -- Texas
IGI Resources, Inc. -- Idaho
BP Oil Supply Company -- Delaware
BP Products North America Inc. -- Maryland
BP Amoco Chemical Company -- Delaware
Atlantic Richfield Company -- Delaware
Amoco Production Company -- Delaware
BP Chemicals Inc. -- Ohio

Thanks.

Billy Dixon

Yes, we do want to exchange originals.  My originals are in our Calgary
office getting original signatures.  I will send one copy to you when I
receive them back.  Should probably be tomorrow or Wednesday.

Thanks!

Marie

>  -----Original Message-----

I will have the lawyer call John Sherriff.  Is Michael Brown around to sign if Sherriff won't?

Thanks!

Marie

John Sherriff will not sign off on this without a DASH or CACS.  Please have the responsible attorney call Sherriff to discuss. Thanks, Edmund

Paul:

Pursuant to my voice mail, Harlan Murphy is finalizing a Master Netting Agreement with Dynegy that is to be signed by ECTRIC and ECT Resources Limited.  It appears that John Sherriff is an officer of both entities.  Will you assist us in getting this document signed by initialling, if appropriate, and obtaining signatures and faxing a signed copy back to us at (713) 646-3490?

If you have any questions, please call eitherHarlan Murphy at (713) 345-2679 or Mary Cook at (713) 345-7732.

Thanks for your help!

Samantha:

Will you either assign to take care of this?  I'm not sure what they need exactly.

Thanks!

Marie

Hey Marie, can you forward deemed isda for ltd?  Thanks.

Please confirm under the old deemed ISDAs.

Paul

Hey Paul.  Left you a vm earlier today.  The bottom portion of this email indicates what I was referring to.  I already have the Deemed ISDA for the LP that was approved mid October.  What I need is your blessing for the LTD.  I will be preparing two confirmations for each deal...for a total of four deals.  We bought at a strike of 650 October and now we have turned around to sell the same deal at 610.  They are both November 2001 deals.  No premium as they are swaps.  

Unfortunately, I will be working from home this afternoon so please either call me at 281-485-6520 or simply respond to this email.  FYI,  Marie Heard originally fowarded the Deemed ISDA's this past October.

Thanks for your help.  

Hi Diane:
I just left you a voicemail about these deals. I have also inserted a comment on the actual deal ticket in the Tickets folder.
The payout from this deal basically has to be broken down between two different entities.

Thanks,
Ali
X. 31654

AIG, a hedge fund that we deal with, has done 2 weather trades: an original trade on 10/29/01 (W1597) and an offsetting one yesterday. 

Both trades need to be rebooked to reflect the fact that AIG allocates all its trades between 2 entities: AIG Commodity Arbitrage Fund Ltd and AIG Commodity Arbitrage Fund LP. The split between the 2 counterparties is: 77% to Ltd and 23% to LP. 

At the moment, the original trade as well as (I'm assuming) the offsetting one are booked only to LP. Please rebook the trades, changing both the tick size and the cap amount, to reflect the above allocations. By my calculation, they should be as follows:

Entity				Tick Size			Cap
AIG Commodity Arb. Fund. Ltd	$1540				$308,000
AIG Commodity	Arb. Fund  LP	$460				$92,000

Once the deals are rebooked, please also reconfirm them this way. The confirmations will need to include a complete deemed ISDA (you can contact Diane Anderson if you need a copy of the specific deemed ISDA we use for DKR). 

Thanks a lot for this.
Rgds,
Russ

Pursuant to Harlan Murphy's request, attached is our form master netting agreement.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Mr. Rosen:

Attached is the form master netting agreement without the collateral annex.  Please disregard the form I sent you late Friday.  I apologize for any inconvenience.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Attached is the Annex B to be used for all future financial transactions with the referenced counterparty.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Will the person who will be working on this please let me know so that I can fax a copy of the guaranty to be attached to Annex B?

Thanks!

Marie

		 

Harlan:

Here is the master netting agreement.

Marie

		 

We have received the following financial Master Agreement:

Type of Contract:		ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:			March 9, 2001

Counterparty:			Catequil Partners, L.P.

Transactions Covered:		Approved for all products with the exception of:  Foreign Exchange

Governing Law:			New York

Special Handling Requirement:	Counterparty has five (5) Local Business Days after a confirmation was effectively received by it to accept or dispute a confirmation.

Copies will be distributed.

We have received the following financial Master Agreement:

Type of Contract:		ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:			March 9, 2001

Counterparty:			Catequil Overseas Partners Ltd.

Transactions Covered:		Approved for all products with the exception of:  Foreign Exchange

Governing Law:			New York

Special Handling Requirement:	Counterparty has five (5) Local Business Days after a confirmation was effectively received by it to accept or dispute a confirmation.

Copies will be distributed.

Pursuant to your request, attached is our form master netting agreement.

		 	 

Steve:

Here is another master netting agreement.  Do you want me to forward the template to Cindy Midura or do you want to?  I will ask Ed for a listing of counterparties and will pull documents.

Thanks!

Marie
Marie - PSEG has requested a Master Master agreement.  Can you please have an atty forward a template to Cindy Midura.

cynthia.midura@pseg.com
973-430-6643

Ed

I'll send Ed Sacks an e-mail and ask him to send you credit when I ask him to send me a list of counterparties.

Marie

Marie,

Please forward to Cindy and ask her to call me to discuss.  Would you please cc me with it so that I'm sure I've got the latest draft?  Thanks for your help.

Steve

P.S.  Am I supposed to call Credit for the terms of the Collateral Annex, or does that come later?

Steve:

Here is another master netting agreement.  Do you want me to forward the template to Cindy Midura or do you want to?  I will ask Ed for a listing of counterparties and will pull documents.

Thanks!

Marie
Marie - PSEG has requested a Master Master agreement.  Can you please have an atty forward a template to Cindy Midura.

cynthia.midura@pseg.com
973-430-6643

Ed

Ed:

Can you send me a list of PSEG entities that will be parties to the master netting agreement, together with a list of master you think exist?  Also, Steve Van Hooser will be the lawyer working on this document, so he will need credit information to complete the documentation.

Thanks!

Marie

Yes.

Marie, can you and Chris make sure that you are on the same page with agreements affecting Canada, especially as it relates to registering security notices.

Peter.

Per Carol's request, please e-mail Carol, Mary and me with an update on the agreements you are working on.

Thanks!

Marie

Chris:

What information do you need from me?

Marie
Marie, can you and Chris make sure that you are on the same page with agreements affecting Canada, especially as it relates to registering security notices.

Peter.

Per Carol's request, please e-mail Carol, Mary and me with an update on the agreements you are working on.

Thanks!

Marie

I had a sneaking suspicion that it just might be you!  Will you send me your fax number?

Thanks!

Hi Marie,

It is me.  

Bianca

Attached is the Annex B to be used for all future financial transactions with the referenced counterparty.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Will the person who will be working on this please let me know so that I can fax a copy of the guaranty to be attached to Annex B?

Thanks!

Marie

		 << File: 021conf(colonial oil).doc >> 

Chris:

BP Amoco and Dynegy both involve ECC.

Marie

Marie - I have been involved in seeing that the proper security notices are being registered in respect of the PG&E master netting agreement as it involves Enron Canada.  Just today I became aware that the master netting agreement with Reliant involves Enron Canada as well.  Greg Johnston and I will see that the proper Canadian registrations are made for the Reliant agreement.

Please let me know if there are any other agreement that involve Canadian Enron entities (BP Amoco I believe may).

Regards
Chris
Marie, can you and Chris make sure that you are on the same page with agreements affecting Canada, especially as it relates to registering security notices.

Peter.

Per Carol's request, please e-mail Carol, Mary and me with an update on the agreements you are working on.

Thanks!

Marie

Ms. Midura:

Pursuant to your request, attached is our form master netting agreement.  Please do not hesitate to contact Steve Van Hooser (713/853-7238; steve.van.hooser@enron.com) with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	 

Chris:

Here is the final BP master netting agreement.  If you need a copy of the signed one, let me know and I will fax it to you.  I will send Dynegy once I get signoff from Harlan Murphy.

Marie

Dear Carol and Marie:

Pursuant to our recent telephone conference, attached is the final form of
the North American Master Netting Agreement for signature by all of the
respective parties.

If this does not reflect all of the changes we previously agreed to, please
call me right away.

Very truly yours,

BILLY
Billy D. Dixon
Attorney
BP America Inc.
501 Westlake Park Blvd., Rm 16.166
Houston, Texas 77079
Direct 281/366-4745
Fax 281/366-5901
billy.dixon@bp.com

***IMPORTANT -- THIS EMAIL AND ANY ATTACHMENTS HERETO ARE ATTORNEY-CLIENT
AND/OR ATTORNEY WORK-PRODUCT PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL.  If you have
received this email in error, do not under any circumstances read, forward,
copy, disseminate or save this email or any of its attachments.  If you have
received this email in error, take the following actions: (1) reply to this
email indicating that you received this email in error, and (2) delete and
completely erase this email and its attachments from your computer and any
backup systems or "Deleted Items" folders.
 <<BP Form NA Master Netting (11-1-01)#3.DOC>>  <<RL NA MASTER
11-1-01#3.DOC>>

 - BP Form NA Master Netting (11-1-01)#3.DOC 
 - RL NA MASTER 11-1-01#3.DOC 

See attached.  Changes are bold.  

 

Cordially,
Mary Cook

Is it okay to send?

Check with Jay and if credit ok to go, see me for assignment.

Jay,

FYI
Bill Hayes 817-339-7410 with Richardson Energy Marketing, Ltd. is looking for a master netting agreement.

Nidia A. Mendoza
Credit Specialist
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith St.,  Suite 2808 D
Houston, TX  77002
Tel:  713/853-4868
Fax:  713/853-9476
e-mail: nidia.mendoza@enron.com

Sarah:

Here is our credit support annex template.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 
Spoke to Carol and Tanya.  They suggested you use our standard credit support annex template.

Marie or Tana - could you please send Sarah our standard template.

Thanks
Molly6
Please send me ASAP a sample agreement that contains good language for the credit rating provision and the timing of the payment of the Margin Call.

I hope to have a proposed re-write to send to SoCal with our conversation tomorrow.

Thanks.

Sarah

Jay:

Kevin Freeman (785/575-8128) at Western Resources left me a voice mail stating that they want to finalize the master netting agreement ASAP.  Mary Cook is assigning this to Anne Koehler to work on.  Will you send me a list of counterparties involved and agreements you show are in place?

Thanks!

Marie

Anne:

This is an e-mail I forwarded to Kevin Freeman on Monday sending the form of master netting agreement.  He left me a voice mail this morning and said that they wanted to get a mna in place ASAP.  Mary has assigned this counterparty to you.  Kevin's phone number is (785) 575-8128.  Will you call him to discuss?

Thanks!

Marie

Pursuant to your request, attached is our form master netting agreement.

		 	 

Our Canadian lawyers are on board.

I assume that you will speak with Peter.  Thanks.

Lech Kalembka
Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
100 Maiden Lane
New York, NY  10038
Tel.: (212) 504-6918
Fax: (212) 504-6666
E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com
                    Mary.Cook@enr
Be sure to talk to Peter on any of the Canada related master nettings so he
can orchestrate any necessary Canada filings.  I have spoken with him on
this matter so he should be up to speed.  Any questions, stop by.

    -----Original Message-----
   We will need the "organizational ID" number for the Delaware, Maryland
   and
   Texas entities.  If you wish, we can obtain this information from CT
   Corp.
   or a similar service provider for a charge of $12 per entity.

   Also, for UCC filing purposes, we need to know whether any counterparty
   is
   a "transmitting utility", i.e., entity primarily engaged in transmitting
   or
   producing electricity or transmitting goods by pipeline.

   Finally, I assume you will consult with local counsel regarding the
   Canadian counterparties.

   Thank you.

   Lech Kalembka
   Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
   100 Maiden Lane
   New York, NY  10038
   Tel.: (212) 504-6918
   Fax: (212) 504-6666
   E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com

                       "Heard,
                       11/06/2001
                       02:04 PM

   Is there anything else you need for BP Amoco?

   Marie
   >  -----Original Message-----
==============================================================================

   NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally
   privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read,
   use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any
   attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
   that might affect any computer system into which it is received and
   opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is
   virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
   & Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

Here is Alan's status of Goldman/J. Aron.
The update on Goldman Sachs/J Aron Master Netting Agreement is that the legal form of the document has been agreed to with their inside counsel. We are waiting for Credit (Houston)'s approval before circulating for signature. I spoke with Tanya R. today. She said she would speak to Bill about GS' request to sign the cross-affiliate netting agreement w/o collateral. With Bill's approval, we can circulate for signature.

Alan

Per Carol's request, please e-mail Carol, Mary and me with an update on the agreements you are working on.

Thanks!

Marie

I am preparing the information on the Company Account Application and have a question regarding the address section.  I have completed the section regarding ECT Investment's "principal executive office" (Houston address) and would like to know how this differs, or if it differs, from the address of "registered office".  Would you explain the difference, if any?

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Dear Sara

I am responding to you whilst Daniel Harris is out of the office.

In reference to Arbitration, we can agree to Arbitration in the English
Courts.

Daniel will contact you tomorrow in reference to the remaining points.

I look forward to receiving the outstanding documentation.

Kind regards
Talya Gordon

Daniel:

Thank you for your response.  Unfortunately, the outstanding issues
relating to the Terms of Business Letter impact our corporate policy.
If you insist upon arbitration, it should be at either party's option
and we can agree to arbitrate in accordance with the International
Chamber of Commerce Rules.  Also, as you mentioned below, there may be
non-prime brokerage issues that relate to the terms of business and,
therefore, are not adequately addressed in the terms of business letter.
We do have other business relationships with GSI and again request
inclusion of limitation of liability language in the terms of business
letter.  I propose:

"Neither party shall have any liability arising from this Letter or from
any obligations which relate to this Letter for any indirect, special,
punitive, exemplary, incidental or consequential loss or damage."

Please reconsider the foregoing with explanation.  I will be out of the
office 9/18/01 in the a.m.

All remaining documents have been completed and we will have them
executed together with the terms of business letter.

Regards.  Sara

Sara Shackleton
Enron Wholesale Services
1400 Smith Street, EB3801a
Houston, TX  77002
Ph:  (713) 853-5620
Fax: (713) 646-3490

>  -----Original Message-----

I checked with Harlan Murphy and he said it hadn't been signed, however, the master netting agreement references an executed master agreement dated as of 10/10/01.  We haven't seen either the original or a copy of the signed agreement.

Marie  

I don't know, all I know is that it was executed in order to get the master netting agreement done with Dynegy.  You might check with Marie Heard since she worked on the master netting agreement.

I've checked her desk and it's not there and I haven't received anything either.  Did they send it by UPS?

Robin L. Hill
Legal Specialist
Enron Broadband Services, Inc.
1400 Smith St., Suite 4550b
Houston, Texas 77002
713-853-3255
713-646-8537 fax

Apparently they have signed the agreement.  Can someone please check Tracy's desk and see if we have gotten the signed copy?

Thanks,

Jane Wilhite
ext. 35063

Jane

I called and left a message w/Steven Smith and response before I went out.  Robin Hill has the information -- not sure what the hold up is, Steven says it's b/c he is trying to find someone to sign the document, but that was almost two weeks ago.

Tracy

any response?

Robbi

I still haven't heard from these folks.  I talked to Steven Smith last week on 10/24/01 and he said there were no issues with the MSA, but he was having a hard time finding someone to sign it.  I told Jane this info last week.  I haven't heard back from him either via email or phone, should I pursue this further?  One more call before I go out on maternity leave?  I know Jane is anxious to get this back signed.

Please advise.

Thanks

Tracy

Carroll just called me and told me that they had a janitorial position opening at the courthouse and did I want to send my resume.
>

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

 - Turbanator.jpg << File: Turbanator.jpg >> 

I guess so, cause I got your e-mail.  Just in case, it's marie.heard@enron.com.  
Marie,
    Just wanted to drop you a line and check and see if this is a good e-mail
address.  I haven't sent you any corny jokes in a while.  Love,  your older
adopted brother, Carroll

Thanks for the address.  We will keep you all (especially Grant) in our prayers, although I don't think there's any hope for you.

Thought you might like to have Grant's mailing address for card or note while
he is in Bethesda for surgery.  He really appreciates getting mail.  We will
be there from December 1st thru December 18th with Grant's surgery scheduled
for the 6th of December.

Grant Wilborn
National Institutes of Health
Building 10, BW Nursing Unit
10 Center Drive
Bethesda, Maryland 20892

I haven't tried.

Can you send mail to Genia?  I did this a.m., but can't anymore!
Me

Barbara:

Below is an e-mail that Richardson Energy Marketing, Ltd. wants a master netting agreement.  Mary said to assign it to you.  His e-mail address is bhayes@sidrich.com.  Nidia Mendoza in Credit is preparing a listing of counterparties and when I receive the list from her, I will pull documents.

Let me know if you need anything.

Marie

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Jay,

FYI
Bill Hayes 817-339-7410 with Richardson Energy Marketing, Ltd. is looking for a master netting agreement.

Nidia A. Mendoza
Credit Specialist
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith St.,  Suite 2808 D
Houston, TX  77002
Tel:  713/853-4868
Fax:  713/853-9476
e-mail: nidia.mendoza@enron.com

HALLELUJAH!!!!!!!!!

Just to let you know I received the documents this morning.  Once Rob Milnthorp has signed them, I will let you know when I courier them out to you.

Have a great day!
Sharon

Who is ECTD?
Harlan E. Murphy
Enron Wholesale Services - Legal
1400 Smith Street, EB 3811
Houston, Texas 77002
Tel: 713.345.2679
Fax: 713.646.3490
E-mail: Harlan.Murphy@Enron.com

Transactions to be included:

ENA/ BNPP ISDA
ECTRIC/BNPP ISDA
ECL/BNPP ISDA
ECTD/BNPP physical UK gas business

Bill does not want to include any of the brokerage agreeements.  Also, I beleive we have kept Metals out of everyhting thus far and should continue to do so.  One point of note in the document is section 2 BNPP appears to have modified the language such that the Non Defaulting party can cherry pick which agreements it wants to terminate - this is unacceptable. To be honest, I am going to need your help walking me through this document as they have changed so much I am unclear in many instances  what their changes accomplish.  Please advise.

Thanks,
Tanya

Harlan E. Murphy
Enron Wholesale Services - Legal
1400 Smith Street, EB 3811
Houston, Texas 77002
Tel: 713.345.2679
Fax: 713.646.3490
E-mail: Harlan.Murphy@Enron.com

Lech Kalembka
Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft
100 Maiden Lane
New York, NY  10038
Tel.: (212) 504-6918
Fax: (212) 504-6666
E-mail: lech.kalembka@cwt.com
                    "David Rosen"
Dear Lech:

I have attached a version of the proposed Master Netting,  Setoff, and
Security Agreement between Enron Group and BNP Paribas Group,  subject to
BNP Paribas' review, along with a redline against Enron's form.   I have
also faxed the same to you at 212 945-2911.  We  would like to discuss the
draft with you tomorrow morning with a view to its  execution by tomorrow
afternoon.  Seth may be reached at 212 572-5317, and  I may be reached at
212 572-5398.

Yours truly,

David Rosen
Not yet admitted to the bar

Temporary Location Information:
Cleary Gottlieb Steen &  Hamilton
153 E. 53rd Street (Citigroup Center)
38th Floor
New York, NY  10022

Phone: (212) 572-5398
Home: (201) 876-0278
Mobile: (646)  479-3283
Fax: (212) 572-5399
Email: drosen@cgsh.com; dcrosen@home.com

This message is being sent from a law firm and may contain  information
which is confidential or privileged.  If you are not the  intended
recipient, please advise the sender immediately by reply e-mail and  delete
this message and any attachments without retaining a  copy.

(See attached file: Master Netting (redline against Enron Form).doc)
(See attached file: MASTER NETTING.doc)

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================
 - Master Netting (redline against Enron Form).doc 
 - MASTER NETTING.doc 

Attached is a copy of the master netting assignments list that sets forth those that are signed and/or currently being worked on.  As you can see, BP Amoco, Dynegy and Reliant have recently been executed.  A master crude netting agreement has been signed with ConAgra.  Liquid payments netting agreements have been signed with Coastal, Conoco, Morgan Stanley, Sunoco and Valero.  Master Netting Agreements have previously been executed with PG&E, The New Power Company and Entergy-Koch Trading, LP.  

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 
Please let Melinda know.  Don't forget to include PGE and New Power.
Mary, could you tell me which parties have executed the agreements and which are currently in negotiation?

	Thanks,
	Melinda

Veronica:

Can you provide me with a list of documents in place with Oneok (other than the ISDA) and the ENA entity and products covered under each agreement.  I'm not familiar with the documentation that ENA Upstream, EES and EGLI would have in place with Oneok.

Thanks!

Marie

Legal Team--

ONEOK Energy Marketing and Trading Company, L.P. would like to replace the current Gty's that Enron has issued to them and receive one overall gty to cover the financial and physical business with ENA, ECC, ENA Upstream Company, LLC, EPMI, EES and EGLI.  This would include the trading executed under the ISDA, GISB, and GTC's.  In executing this new gty, we would simultaneously cancel the existing outgoing Gty's that we have out to them already.  The cap amount on this new Gty would be $75MM.

Can you please advise whether this is acceptable or not so that I can tell the counterparty--we're currently avoiding posting cash on a Margin call as ONEOK will accept a higher Gty amount to cover their exposure.

Thanks,

Veronica

Hi, Edmund!

Can you help me obtain copies of some of your executed documents with BNP?  I need copies of the following:

1.	ECTRIC/BNPP ISDA

2.	Enron Credit Limited/BNPP ISDA

3.	ECTD /BNPP physical UK gas confirm (representative sample)

I hope you know who ECTD is cause I sure don't.  I am only assuming that because it's UK gas, it's a UK company.

My fax is (713) 646-3490.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

THANKS!!!!!!!

Marie, I'll be forwarding the original BP Master Netting Agreements to you by overnight courier today, so you should be receiving it tomorrow some time.

Sharon

No.  Do you have anyone in mind?

has this been assigned

Elizabeth Sager
713-853-6349

Tractebel has requested a Master Netting agmt.  Please forward a draft to Laura Kinner at

lkinner@tractebelusa.com
713-350-1763
713-548-5153 (fax)

Ed

Per Frank Sayre's request.

Attached for your review are a revised Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the Credit Support Annex.  These documents are currently being reviewed by our credit department and are subject to revision based upon their review of same.  Please contact Frank with any questions or comments.

Thank you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	 

Trey:

The power-related receivables would only apply to our power contracts (EPMI) and would not apply to the liquids payments netting agreements.

Can you confirm that the listed Liquid Payments Netting Agreements would not apply to power-related receivables held by Enron Power Marketing, Inc.?

Thanks
FYI

Attached is a copy of the master netting assignments list that sets forth those that are signed and/or currently being worked on.  As you can see, BP Amoco, Dynegy and Reliant have recently been executed.  A master crude netting agreement has been signed with ConAgra.  Liquid payments netting agreements have been signed with Coastal, Conoco, Morgan Stanley, Sunoco and Valero.  Master Netting Agreements have previously been executed with PG&E, The New Power Company and Entergy-Koch Trading, LP.  

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 
Please let Melinda know.  Don't forget to include PGE and New Power.
Mary, could you tell me which parties have executed the agreements and which are currently in negotiation?

	Thanks,
	Melinda

I guess we can go whenever.  It'll just mean we won't get as much done this weekend, but we don't have anything else going on.

Ramona,
	Let me check with my sister.  I would love to go, but don't know if
we can make the time.  She's probably at lunch right now, but I'll send her
this e-mail.

Thanks,  Anne

>  -----Original Message-----

Attached, for your review, are final execution copies of the Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Please note that Part 5(j) of the Schedule was changed pursuant to your discussion with Frank Sayre.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

That's fine.  That way we'll have all day Sunday to work.

Do you want to go at all?  If so, maybe we could go Saturday afternoon--you
could pick me up from work and we could go for a couple of hours?
Me

I guess we can go whenever.  It'll just mean we won't get as much done
this weekend, but we don't have anything else going on.

>  -----Original Message-----

Ed:

Will you get me a list of counterparties/documents?

Thanks!

Marie

has this been assigned

Elizabeth Sager
713-853-6349

Tractebel has requested a Master Netting agmt.  Please forward a draft to Laura Kinner at

lkinner@tractebelusa.com
713-350-1763
713-548-5153 (fax)

Ed

Marcus:

Attached are the form Master Netting Agreement, together with the Credit Support Annex.

Thank you for waiting so patiently (NOT!!!!!) for this.

Marie

		 	 	 			

See below

We are trying to update our information and I would really appreciate if you all could help me by giving me the most current information........

Name:   [Heard, Marie]  Marie Heard 

Location: [Heard, Marie]    EB3801B 

Phone Number: [Heard, Marie]    853-3907 

Group Name: [Heard, Marie]    Financial Trading - ENA Legal 

Fax Number: [Heard, Marie]    (713) 646-3490 

Asst. Name: [Heard, Marie]    Joanne Rozycki 

Asst. Location: [Heard, Marie]    EB3880D 

Asst. Ph. Number: [Heard, Marie]    853-5968 

On behalf of Teresa Callahan and myself I would like to thank you all for your time and help. If you have any questions please feel free to contact me by e-mail (iperez@enron.com) or at Ext. 3-9228. If I left any specialist or legal assistants out of this list please forward this e-mail to them as well. Once again I would like to thank you all for your help.
	
										Irma L. Perez :)

THEM'S FIGHTING WORDS!!!!!!!!

Marie:
	
Thank you for getting this to me so quickly (NOT!!!!!!)
	
T R A C T A B EL
	
Marcus

Marcus:

Attached are the form Master Netting Agreement, together with the Credit Support Annex.

Thank you for waiting so patiently (NOT!!!!!) for this.

Marie

		 << File: Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h a v1.doc >> 	 << File: Master Netting Agreement Credit Support Annex 10 d.doc >> 	 << File: Master Netting User Notes a.doc >> 			

I had no exception time.

Timesheets are due tomorrow, Thursday November 15.  If you have not already done so, please forward me your exception time.

Thanks!

Holly Keiser
Enron Wholesale Services
Legal Department
Phone: 713-345-7893
Fax: 713-646-3490
Location: EB 3887
Holly.Keiser@enron.com

Sheila:

Do you need a copy of the base agreement too?

Marie,
Gary signed off on the SNL agreement yesterday for the financial database services.
Can we get a copy for our files?
thanks. sheila

Harlan:

Did you get the Calpine master netting agreement signed?  Please give me an original copy once it has been signed.

Also, what's going on with Dynegy?  Tanya wants copies of all the signed master netting agreements.  Can I get the agreement to make her a copy?

Thanks!

Marie

Mary Cook has asked me to try to locate the documentation for the two prepays.  Which of the documents do you specifically need--all or just the ISDAs, swap confirmations and guarantees.  If you only need the ISDAs, etc., it may be quite a lot of pages to fax.  Would you prefer I overnight them and, if so, where should I send them?

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Hi, Greg!

Mary Cook asked me to contact you regarding locating documents in connection with a couple of prepays.  The first is a prepay (December 13, 1999)  among ENA, Citibank, Barclays, Royal Bank of Scotland and Toronto Dominion.  Is this Yosemite II?  If so, I have copies of the ISDA, swap confirms, etc.  Would you have copies of any other documents, or are there any other documents?  Also, they are looking for documentation in connection with the Corp. prepay for December 2000.  This was among ENA, Toronto Dominion, Credit Suisse First Boston and Morgan Stanley.  Do you happen to have copies of these documents or do you know the project name in case they were prepared here?

Thanks!

Marie

Thanks, Greg.

Marie, I do not believe that Enron Canada was involved in either of the prepays you have described below.  To my knowledge (and I have checked with Peter and he has confirmed), the only prepay deal that has been done by ECC or out of the ECC office was the Alberta Prepay dated September 28, 2000 among ECC, Royal Bank of Canada, Toronto-Dominion Bank, ENA and Chase.  The obligation was retired on September 28, 2001.  I believe Tana has all of the relevant documentation relating to that deal.  However, we do not have any of the documentation relating to the two deals you reference below.

Thanks
Greg

Hi, Greg!

Mary Cook asked me to contact you regarding locating documents in connection with a couple of prepays.  The first is a prepay (December 13, 1999)  among ENA, Citibank, Barclays, Royal Bank of Scotland and Toronto Dominion.  Is this Yosemite II?  If so, I have copies of the ISDA, swap confirms, etc.  Would you have copies of any other documents, or are there any other documents?  Also, they are looking for documentation in connection with the Corp. prepay for December 2000.  This was among ENA, Toronto Dominion, Credit Suisse First Boston and Morgan Stanley.  Do you happen to have copies of these documents or do you know the project name in case they were prepared here?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Athena:

The Williams counterparties are:  Williams Energy Marketing & Trading Company and Williams Refining & Marketing, L.L.C.  I don't know about British Energy as that is being handled out of our London office.

The following entities have been added to our master netting agreement list today:

Forest Oil:
Forest Oil Corporation
Producers Marketing Ltd.

Noble:
Noble Gas Marketing Inc.
Samedan Oil Corporation

Tractebel Energy Marketing, Inc.

My phone number is (713) 853-3907.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Marie, hope all is well.  In order to complete our conflicts checks on
two counterparties, we need to know exactly which Williams and British
Energy Power and Energy Trading Limited entities/subsidiaries will be
involved in the Master Netting Agreements.  Please let me know.  Also,
going forward, we will need this type of information for any new
counterparties added to the current list.  Thanks and please call with any
questions.

Best Regards,
Athena

P.S.  Please send me your telephone number.  Thanks!

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

Hi, Una!

I don't know if you can help me or not, but I need the below agreements ASAP.  We have to finalize a master netting agreement and the lawyer over here needs to see the agreements.  If you are not the right person, will you forward my e-mail on?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Edmund!

Can you help me obtain copies of some of your executed documents with BNP?  I need copies of the following:

1.	ECTRIC/BNPP ISDA

2.	Enron Credit Limited/BNPP ISDA

3.	ECTD /BNPP physical UK gas confirm (representative sample)

I hope you know who ECTD is cause I sure don't.  I am only assuming that because it's UK gas, it's a UK company.

My fax is (713) 646-3490.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

Paul Simons is the lawyer.  His phone number is 011-44-20-7783-6566 and his e-mail address is paul.simons@enron.com.

OK, thanks, Marie.  Please let me know who I should contact in London for
that information.  I will add the other parties to the list.

Best Regards,
Athena

                    Marie.Heard@e
Hi, Athena:

The Williams counterparties are:  Williams Energy Marketing & Trading
Company and Williams Refining & Marketing, L.L.C.  I don't know about
British Energy as that is being handled out of our London office.

The following entities have been added to our master netting agreement list
today:

Forest Oil:
Forest Oil Corporation
Producers Marketing Ltd.

Noble:
Noble Gas Marketing Inc.
Samedan Oil Corporation

Tractebel Energy Marketing, Inc.

My phone number is (713) 853-3907.

Thanks!

Marie

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi, Marie, hope all is well.  In order to complete our conflicts checks
   on
   two counterparties, we need to know exactly which Williams and British
   Energy Power and Energy Trading Limited entities/subsidiaries will be
   involved in the Master Netting Agreements.  Please let me know.  Also,
   going forward, we will need this type of information for any new
   counterparties added to the current list.  Thanks and please call with
   any
   questions.

   Best Regards,
   Athena

   P.S.  Please send me your telephone number.  Thanks!

==============================================================================

   NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally
   privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read,
   use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any
   attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
   that might affect any computer system into which it is received and
   opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is
   virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
   & Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

We are trying to update our information and I would really appreciate if you all could help me by giving me the most current information........

Name:  

Location:

Phone Number:

Group Name:

Fax Number:

Asst. Name:

Asst. Location:

Asst. Ph. Number:

On behalf of Teresa Callahan and myself I would like to thank you all for your time and help. If you have any questions please feel free to contact me by e-mail (iperez@enron.com) or at Ext. 3-9228. If I left any specialist or legal assistants out of this list please forward this e-mail to them as well. Once again I would like to thank you all for your help.
	
										Irma L. Perez :)

Attached is the current list of master netting counterparties.  The new counterparties are in bold.  They are: certain AEP entities, BNP Paribas, certain Dynegy entities, Forest Oil entities, Noble Affiliates entities, Progress Energy entities, PSEG Energy Resources & Trade LLC, Richardson Energy Marketing, Ltd., Tractebel Energy Marketing, Inc. and Western Resources (I don't have specific entities for Western yet).

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Chris:

Do you need the notice information in the agreements or will a listing of the chief executive offices for each work?  I have a listing of the BP Amoco entities and the addresses of their chief executive offices and I can also send Reliant's as set forth in the Master Netting Agreements.

Marie

Marie/Tana - would you be able to help me out again on the looking up the agreements that we have with the following entities.  Also to the extent that we have agreements please provide me with the address from the notice provision.

Reliant Energy Services, Inc. (also formerly known as Noram Energy Services, Inc. and Noram Energy Corp.) 

BP Corporation North America Inc.
BP Energy Company
Vastar Resources, Inc. 
BP Canada Energy Marketing Corp.
Cibola Energy Services Corporation
IGI Resources, Inc.
BP Oil Supply Company
BP Products North America Inc.
BP North American Petroleum (a division of BP Products North America Inc.)
BP Amoco Chemical Company
BP Chemicals Inc.
Atlantic Richfield Company
Amoco Production Company 

I you could get back to me sometime in the next few of days I would appreciate it.

Thanks,
Chris

Chris:

Pursuant to Barbara Gray's request, I am attaching the list of master netting agreement counterparties.  Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

			 

Master Netting Group:

I just want to personally thank all of you for all of your hard work the past few weeks in addressing our counterparties' requests for Master Netting Agreements.  We have been able to sign up a number of them as a result of your efforts and have managed to keep certain counterparties from cutting us off in trading.  	Thanks again for your efforts and for putting up with one fire drill after another!  Hopefully we all learned alot in the process.

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Chris:

Below is an e-mail with the addresses for the BP Amoco entities.  The addresses for the Reliant entities are:

Reliant Energy Services, Inc.:  1111 Louisiana, Houston, Texas  77002
Reliant Energy Services Canada, Ltd.:  1111 Louisiana, Houston, Texas  77002

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

Principal Operating Offices:

BP Corporation North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Energy Company
501 West Lake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

Vastar Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Canada Energy Company
240 - 4th Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta T2P 4H4

BP Canada Energy Marketing Corp.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Cibola Energy Services Corporation
350 N. St. Paul Street
Dallas, TX 75201

IGI Resources, Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Oil Supply Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Products North America Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

BP Amoco Chemical Company
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

Atlantic Richfield Company
333 S. Hope Street
Los Angeles, CA 90071

Amoco Production Company
501 WestLake Park Boulevard
Houston, Texas 77079

BP Chemicals Inc.
200 East Randolph Drive
Chicago, Illinois 60601

I sure will if you will tell me the principal place of business of all
your entities party to the Master Netting Agreement.

Enron Canada Corp.
3500, 400 - 3rd Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta  T2P 4H2

>  -----Original Message-----

Pursuant to Jason Williams's request, I am attaching our form master netting agreement.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Hi, Edmund!

Thanks!

Marie
Hi Marie,

I have found the 1st two but can't locate anything on the 3rd one.  Will need more detail to assist.

Una

Hi, Una!

I don't know if you can help me or not, but I need the below agreements ASAP.  We have to finalize a master netting agreement and the lawyer over here needs to see the agreements.  If you are not the right person, will you forward my e-mail on?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Edmund!

Can you help me obtain copies of some of your executed documents with BNP?  I need copies of the following:

1.	ECTRIC/BNPP ISDA

2.	Enron Credit Limited/BNPP ISDA

3.	ECTD /BNPP physical UK gas confirm (representative sample)

I hope you know who ECTD is cause I sure don't.  I am only assuming that because it's UK gas, it's a UK company.

My fax is (713) 646-3490.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

Hi, Una:

Thanks for sending me those two ISDAs.  Hopefully, Edmund Cooper will be able to help us find the other document.

Again, thanks for your help.

Marie

Hi Marie,

I have found the 1st two but can't locate anything on the 3rd one.  Will need more detail to assist.

Una

Hi, Una!

I don't know if you can help me or not, but I need the below agreements ASAP.  We have to finalize a master netting agreement and the lawyer over here needs to see the agreements.  If you are not the right person, will you forward my e-mail on?

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Edmund!

Can you help me obtain copies of some of your executed documents with BNP?  I need copies of the following:

1.	ECTRIC/BNPP ISDA

2.	Enron Credit Limited/BNPP ISDA

3.	ECTD /BNPP physical UK gas confirm (representative sample)

I hope you know who ECTD is cause I sure don't.  I am only assuming that because it's UK gas, it's a UK company.

My fax is (713) 646-3490.

Thanks for your help!

Marie

Hi, Kim:

Can you send me a representative copy of a confirm (with gtcs) for each of the following?

Physical gas with ENA Upstream Company LLC and Samedan Oil Corporation
Physical gas with ENA Upstream Company LLC and Forest Oil Corporation
Financial with ENA and Forest Oil Corporation

If you want to send them to "Justice" to print that will work for me.

Thanks!

Marie

Thank you!

Marie,

  I just spoke to Robert Allen and they are going to send you a retun slip so that the 7 yards can be sent back via UPS without charge.  They have a 17 yard piece that they will ship to you.  I think the Houston show room screwed up the order - because I have a copy of what I sent them in writing - and it says 17 yards.  They have the 17 yards in stock so it shouldn't take long.  Just keep your eyes open for the return tag that they will send you in the mail for the 7 yards.  Ah -  the trials and tribulations of home decorating!

Ms. Russell:

Per your request, I am attaching a copy of our draft Schedule to the ISDA Master Agreement and Paragraph 13 to the ISDA Credit Support Annex.  Please let me know if you need the pre-printed forms and I will either fax them or overnight them to you.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

Hi, Una:

Can you send me some other copies?  I need a representative copy of a confirmation for the following:

Financial trading with ECTRIC and Louis Dreyfus Energy Services L.P.
Financial trading with ECTRIC and Louis Dreyfus Corporation

If you will fax them to (713) 646-3490 I would certainly appreciate it.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Nony:

Can you get me a representative copy of each of the following confirms?

Crude with ERAC and Forest Oil Corporation
Physical liquids with EGLI and Louis Dreyfus Energy Services L.P.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Sharon!

Bet you thought you had heard the last from me.  Can you get me a copy of a physical gas master between ECC and Producers Marketing Ltd.?  Our Credit group gave me the document no. 96013847.

By the way, I received the BP Amoco documents.

Thanks!

Marie

I'll be there.

How about 11:30 downstairs - Jane is coming!

Thank you!

Marie,

  I just spoke to Robert Allen and they are going to send you a retun slip so that the 7 yards can be sent back via UPS without charge.  They have a 17 yard piece that they will ship to you.  I think the Houston show room screwed up the order - because I have a copy of what I sent them in writing - and it says 17 yards.  They have the 17 yards in stock so it shouldn't take long.  Just keep your eyes open for the return tag that they will send you in the mail for the 7 yards.  Ah -  the trials and tribulations of home decorating!

Andrew:

Attached are the forms.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Susan

I have been asked my business group to send a master netting agreement and collateral annex to Allegheny.  Can you send me  a form of those two agreements. 

thanks

Andrew

Andrew:

Please hold off sending the master netting agreement forms to Allegheny until we get the go ahead from credit.  I will let you know as soon as I speak with them.

Thanks!

Marie

Dana:

I faxed these to you this morning and the originals have already gone to Federal Express.  I will resend them to you now.

Marie

Hi Marie,

As I referenced in my earlier e mail, I am in the process of reviewing the
AHC-Enron originals.  However, I noticed that I have not yet received a
faxed set of Authorizations from Enron for this ISDA.  As referenced in your
cover letter, could you fax these to me at your earliest convenience?  If
acceptable, you can than forward a set through the mail.

Thanks so much,

Dana M. Dellacona, Esq.
1185 Avenue of the Americas
NY, NY 10036
Ph:212.536.8133
Fx:917.342.8810
ddellacona@hess.com

		-----Original Message-----
		 << File: enron-ahc schedule-execution copy.11-14.doc >> <<
File: enron-ahc credit support annex-execution copy1.11-14.doc >> Attached,
for your review, are final execution copies of the Schedule to
		the ISDA Master Agreement, together with Paragraph 13 to the
ISDA Credit
		Support Annex.  Please note that Part 5(j) of the Schedule
was changed
		pursuant to your discussion with Frank Sayre.

		Marie Heard
		Senior Legal Specialist
						 <<enron-ahc
schedule-execution
		copy.11-14.doc>> 	 <<enron-ahc credit support
annex-execution
		copy1.11-14.doc>>

Attached is the updated list.

		 

Attached is the updated list of master netting agreement counterparties.  The entities added since I distributed the list yesterday (Louis Dreyfus) are in bold.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

Nidia:

Will you send me the final information on Richardson?

Thanks!

Marie

Do you have the info from credit on Richardson?
Attached is the updated list.

		 << File: master netting agreement assignments.doc >> 

I don't know what you told them, but it sure got them to respond.
Dear Lucy:

Our financial council considers that there should be no problem to
include your comments in the guaranty form, although it has to be
authorized by the corporate council.  We are currently working on that
authorization and will let you know as soon as we have an answer.

Best regards,
Martha Navarro

Martha & Alex,

De acuerdo a su solicitud, anexo les envio los comentarios de Enron
sobre la garantia.   Les agradezco su pronta respuesta.
Estoy a sus ordenes para cualquier commentario al respecto.

Lucy Ortiz
713.853.3238

>  -----Original Message-----
 - WINMAIL.DAT 

Whew!!!!  I had a hard time following such "proper" English!

Marie -

Per our earlier conversation, below are the names and email addresses of the gentlemen to whom should be sent the amendment to the Noble Affiliates guaranty for Noble Gas Marketing (how's THAT for fancy English???):

	Mr. Bob Burleson
	bburleson@noblegas.com

	Mr. Ron McClure
	rmcclure@noblegas.com

Please copy Freddie Lagrasta and me on your email.  Thanks for your help on this; please call me with any questions.

JRW

Let me know if this isn't what you are looking for or if you need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 

Hi, Roeline:

No, I haven't received any original documents from Sempra.  If he sent them here I would surely have them by now.  Thanks for sending your copies--now I can get a big pile off my desk too.

We are trying to hold our own over here, hoping to miss the first round of layoffs.  It is still so incredibly unbelievable that this is happening.  It seems like a bad dream and any minute we will awaken.  It's supposed to be "business as usual" but it's pretty hard to get into the swing of things.  Hopefully everything will work out.

Have a Happy Thanksgiving!

Marie

Hi Marie -

I have been trying to get the paperwork back from Sempra, however, Eric
Twombly keeps saying he thinks all assignment documents were returned to
Enron, including my copy.  I cannot get a confirmation that this is so
though.

So I thought I'd better check with you - please let me know whether you have
the Sempra assignment documents.  Also I wanted to send you the documents
signed by us, UOM and Dynegy - so as to get it off my desk.

Hope all is well with you - especially with what has happened in the past
two weeks.  Things sure do change in a hurry, don't they?

Regards,
Roeline

Don't know if my response reached you or not.  When we reply to e-mails, it automatically puts "@ENRON" at the end, so I'm sending it again.
Hi, Roeline:

No, I haven't received any original documents from Sempra.  If he sent them here I would surely have them by now.  Thanks for sending your copies--now I can get a big pile off my desk too.

We are trying to hold our own over here, hoping to miss the first round of layoffs.  It is still so incredibly unbelievable that this is happening.  It seems like a bad dream and any minute we will awaken.  It's supposed to be "business as usual" but it's pretty hard to get into the swing of things.  Hopefully everything will work out.

Have a Happy Thanksgiving!

Marie

Hi Marie -

I have been trying to get the paperwork back from Sempra, however, Eric
Twombly keeps saying he thinks all assignment documents were returned to
Enron, including my copy.  I cannot get a confirmation that this is so
though.

So I thought I'd better check with you - please let me know whether you have
the Sempra assignment documents.  Also I wanted to send you the documents
signed by us, UOM and Dynegy - so as to get it off my desk.

Hope all is well with you - especially with what has happened in the past
two weeks.  Things sure do change in a hurry, don't they?

Regards,
Roeline

Thanks, Rod!

[1] ECTRL and BNP Paribas - Physical Gas Trading:  The attached are confirms (for phone executed and EOL executed trades) which covers all physical gas trading in Europe. (Info provided by Pavi Sale in UK gas documentation, 44 207 783 2347, if you have further questions.)

Phone deal	EOL deal	
 << File: G057956.doc >>  << File: BNP ParibaEOL1105.doc >> 
[2] ECL and BNP Paribas - Credit Default Swap Trading:  Blair Van Zant (RAC-Credit) will fax the schedules of the ISDA which governs this trading. (Please call Blair direct at 44 207 783 6571 if you do not receive within the half-hour.)

[3] EML and BNP Paribas - Metals Trading:  Simon Hockenhull (RAC-Credit) is investigating.  Probably confirmed under GTC for financial metal trading.  May not have today.

 

No comments.  Did not give her anything to do.

Your comments are needed for Debra Garcia who sat in for Joanne Rozycki.  Please return as soon as possible.  Thank you!-Becky
		
	Excellent = 5       Above Average = 4      Average = 3            Below Average = 2            Poor = 1

	Initiative

	Cooperation

	Punctuality

	Attendance

	Quality of Work

	Would you request this person again Y/N?

Please see Max's e-mail below.

Marie,
	Since Jay is out this week, I'll be "working" on the master netting for Forest Oil and Noble Affiliates.  When these are ready to go out please send a copy to me so I can advise the counterparties.  Thank you.

Max

Andrew:

Attached are the forms.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Susan

I have been asked my business group to send a master netting agreement and collateral annex to Allegheny.  Can you send me  a form of those two agreements. 

thanks

Andrew

Harlan:

Harlan E. Murphy
Enron Wholesale Services - Legal
1400 Smith Street, EB 3811
Houston, Texas 77002
Tel: 713.345.2679
Fax: 713.646.3490
E-mail: Harlan.Murphy@Enron.com

Dear Harlan:

The comments below are in addition to, and should be read with, the hand
mark-up we faxed to you on Friday.   Notwithstanding that these comments
remain subject to the resolution of the business issues, we hope to close
out as many outstanding items as possible to expedite the final execution
of the agreement.  Please feel free to call me at (212) 572-5398 if you
have any questions.

Yours truly,

David Rosen
Not yet admitted to the bar

Temporary Location Information:
Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton
153 E. 53rd Street (Citigroup Center)
38th Floor
New York, NY 10022

Phone: (212) 572-5398
Voicemail: (212) 572-5202 x2532
Mobile: (646) 479-3283
Fax: (212) 572-5399
Email: drosen@cgsh.com; dcrosen@home.com

1.   Replace Paragraph 1 with:

     This Master Netting, Setoff, and Security Agreement (this "Agreement")
     is made and entered into effective as of November [   ], 2001 by and
     among BNP Paribas (including all branches and agencies thereof,
     "BNPP"), BNP Paribas Commodity Futures Inc. ("PFI") and BNP Paribas
     Commodity Futures Limited ("BNPPCML"), and Enron Corp. ("Enron"),
2.   Change definition of BNPP Party to "means each of BNPP, PFI and
BNPPCML."

3.   Change definition of Enron Party to " means each of Enron, ENA, EPMI,
ECTRIC, ERMTIC, ECL, EML and ECTD."

4.   In the definition of Transaction, insert before the word "between"
"(i)" and add at the end the following:

     or (ii) held at a contract market, exchange, board of trade or
     clearing organization by any Party on behalf of a member of the other
     Group pursuant to an Underlying Master Agreement.

5.   In Section 2(b), in (i), replace the phrase "all Transactions under
one or more Underlying Master Agreements" with "each Transaction".

6.   In Section 2(b), at the end of (ii) and (v) before the semi-colon,
insert the following:

     , under any other agreement or under applicable law or equity, whether
     in respect of the Transactions thereunder, or otherwise

7.   In Section 2(b), at the end of (iii), after "applicable law", insert
"or equity"

8.   In Section 4, in the third sentence, after the words "from whom such
payment is due" insert the following:

     to such Party or Parties as the Non-defaulting Group determines are
     entitled to such payment

9.   In Section 7(b), in each of the forth and the twelfth lines between
the words "hereby" and "grants", insert "except as provided in the next
sentence" and in each of the ninth and the sixteenth lines replace the text
beginning "Obligations, " until the end of each sentence with:

     Obligations.  Without limiting the rights referred to in Section 5,
     the security interest granted in the immediately preceding sentence
     shall not apply to the Final Settlement Amount.

10.   At the beginning of Sections 7(c) and 7(e), insert the words "Subject
to Section 3,".

11.   In Section 15(b), following the words "on the basis of a payment
owed", insert the words "(including margin)".

12.   With respect to Section 17, our client has indicated that it would
not be useful or efficient to have the issue of arbitration (which is
clearly not central to the risk reducing purposes of the arrangements)
mixed up with the proposed agreement, which has arisen from the
circumstances of Enron that have developed over the last few months.  BNP
Paribas' primary reason for not wanting to include an arbitration clause
(even with the suggested language changes) is that, although the concept of
arbitration is being considered generally, BNP Paribas has, of yet, not
made any definitive decisions as to the implicit or necessary value of
arbitration clauses and such a decision would require significant internal
review and discussion.  Over the next few months, further consideration can
be given as to including arbitration in this agreement.

13.  Please note that BNP Paribas contemplates at least one long-form
confirmation as an Underlying Master Agreement.

 This message is being sent from a law firm and may contain information
which is confidential or privileged.  If you are not the intended
recipient, please advise the sender immediately by reply e-mail and delete
this message and any attachments without retaining a copy.

Robbi:

If you haven't found anyone else to go, I would like to go.  Just let me know.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie,

  I have an extra ticket to see Swan Lake on Saturday night - any interest in going with me?

Attached is the latest list of master netting agreement counterparties.  The only addition is Western Resources (in bold).  Also, I have added The New Power Company and Entergy-Koch Trading, L.P. which, along with PG&E, were previously executed.  In addition, I have noted those master netting agreements that have been executed.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

			 

Per Carol St. Clair, at this time, there is no urgency in finalizing and executing any master netting agreements.  No master netting agreement should be signed without Bill Bradford's or Louise Kitchen's prior approval.  If any questions, please contact either Carol or Elizabeth Sager.

Thanks!

Marie

Barbara:

I must not have sent a form master netting agreement to Billy Hayes at Richardson, as I can't seem to find an e-mail where I did.

Marie

Please be advised the attached credit worksheet for AltaGas Services should be put on the High Priority List as their is a potential deal pending with Derek Davies in Calgary.  Please forward draft ISDA with credit terms to Derek Davies for further handling as soon as possible.  Call with questions or comments. 

Thanks
Wendy

 
 

Updated list.

		 

Marie, any updates to this list?  

Thanks,
Melinda

FYI

Attached is a copy of the master netting assignments list that sets forth those that are signed and/or currently being worked on.  As you can see, BP Amoco, Dynegy and Reliant have recently been executed.  A master crude netting agreement has been signed with ConAgra.  Liquid payments netting agreements have been signed with Coastal, Conoco, Morgan Stanley, Sunoco and Valero.  Master Netting Agreements have previously been executed with PG&E, The New Power Company and Entergy-Koch Trading, LP.  

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie
x33907

		 << File: MASTER NETTING AGREEMENT ASSIGNMENTS.doc >> 
Please let Melinda know.  Don't forget to include PGE and New Power.
Mary, could you tell me which parties have executed the agreements and which are currently in negotiation?

	Thanks,
	Melinda

Copies will be distributed.

Copies will be distributed.

Copies will be distributed.

Let me know if you need anything else.

		 

Hi, Matt:
 
I have faxed the J.Aron, et al/ENA, et al Master Close-Out Agreement to you at fax number 7783-8667.  The other fax number you gave me wouldn't work.  I have added EEFT under ECTRIC's name and have also added a signature line for ECT Resources Limited.  Carol St. Clair has initialled.  I am also attaching the document should you need to change any signature lines.  The attached document cannot be edited but you can print and manually type in changes.  Once the agreement has been approved, please have an officer of both ECTRIC (EEFT) and ECT Resources Limited sign and return to us by fax.  Please fax a copy to the following fax numbers:
 
(713) 853-9576, attention Bill Bradford
(713) 646-3490, attention Carol St. Clair/Marie Heard
 
If Ted has any questions, Bill's phone number is (713) 853-3831 and Carol's number is (713) 853-3989. 
 
Tomorrow is Thanksgiving here in the States, so if Bill or Carol aren't in, just leave a voice mail as I'm sure they will be checking their messages.
 
Thanks so much for your help!
 
Marie
 
Marie Heard 
Senior Legal Specialist 
 
 

Carol St. Clair 
EB 4539 
713-853-3989 (phone) 
713-646-8537 (fax) 
281-382-1943 (cell phone) 
8774545506 (pager) 
281-890-8862 (home fax) 
carol.st.clair@enron.com 

Tanya:
 
Goldman is pushing agressively toward execution of the Master Close-Out Agreement. So much so, that they have forwarded to me an executed counterpart signed by their three affiliates. I left you (and Carol) a voice mail a little while ago, please give me some guidance on this.
 
Alan

Alan- I'm attaching an executed version of the Netting Agreement.  I would

appreciate if you could have this signed by Enron tomorrow.  Please contact

me at 212 902 0952.  Best regards, Steve

 - 11202001_182931_ETFXNODE8_2.tif <<11202001_182931_ETFXNODE8_2.tif>> 

Some  of you may have already gotten this, so I apologize for cluttering your e-mail  box, just thought it was too good not to send.  
 
Anne
 

Attached for your review is the El Paso amendment.

		 

The address for Reliant Energy Services, Inc. is 1111 Louisiana, Houston, Texas  77002.  Please let me know if you need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Please coordinate with Leslie Hansen.
In preparing to file the UCC-1 against Reliant entities, kindly provide us
with a street address for Reliant Energy Services, Inc.  We know it is a
Delaware corporation.  We have obtained its organizational ID#.
We are using the Calgary address provided by Leslie Hansen on 11/6 for
Reliant Energy Services Canada, Ltd.
We are using the 1400 Smith St., Houston address for the 5 Enron entitiies
as the secured parties.
Kindly advise if our understanding is incorrect.  Tks.

From MWL with best regards.

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

Pursuant to Lora Kinner's request, I am attaching our form master netting agreement.  The lawyer who will be working with you is Anne Koehler (713/853-3448; anne_koehler@enron.com).  She is out of the office at a seminar and will be returning on Thursday, November 29.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	 

Pursuant to Lora Kinner's request, I am attaching our form master netting agreement.  The lawyer who will be working with you is Anne Koehler (713/853-3448; anne_koehler@enron.com).  She is out of the office at a seminar and will be returning on Thursday, November 29.

Please let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
			 	 

Jay:

Can we incorporate our UK entities?

Marie

Thank you for the drafts.  We are working on comments and hope to get you a redraft this week.   
Pursuant to Jason Williams's request, I am attaching our form master
netting agreement.
Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

 - Master Netting & Security Agmnt 10 h v1.doc 
 - Master Netting Agreement Credit Support Annex 10 d.doc 

Hi, John:

Can you answer Athena's questions re Navajo?

It you want to just respond to me, I'll include it in my response re Louis Dreyfus.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Marie, hope all is well.  In order to complete our conflicts checks on
two counterparties, we need answers to the following questions:  (1)
Exactly which Navajo and Louis Dreyfus entities/subsidiaries will be
involved in the Master Netting Agreements?  (2) Is the Louis Dreyfus on
your list the same as the Dreyfus Corporation?  (3) What is the main
business address for Navajo?  Thanks and please call with any questions.

Best Regards,
Athena

                    "Heard,
Attached is the updated list of master netting agreement assignments.

           <<master netting agreement assignments.doc>>

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

 - master netting agreement assignments.doc 

Thanks, Nony and John.

Hi Marie, 

Details re Crude Netting Agreement between ERAC and Navajo:

Navajo Refining Company
Scott C. Surplus	
Vice President, Treasury & Tax	
c/o Holly Corporation
100 Crescent Court, Suite 1600
Dallas, TX  75201-6927		
Ph:  214-871-3555
Fax: 214-871-3566	

Nony

Nony-

Please see Marie's note below and respond to the questions.

Thanks,

John

Hi, John:

Can you answer Athena's questions re Navajo?

It you want to just respond to me, I'll include it in my response re Louis Dreyfus.

Thanks!

Marie

Hi, Marie, hope all is well.  In order to complete our conflicts checks on
two counterparties, we need answers to the following questions:  (1)
Exactly which Navajo and Louis Dreyfus entities/subsidiaries will be
involved in the Master Netting Agreements?  (2) Is the Louis Dreyfus on
your list the same as the Dreyfus Corporation?  (3) What is the main
business address for Navajo?  Thanks and please call with any questions.

Best Regards,
Athena

                    "Heard,
Attached is the updated list of master netting agreement assignments.

           <<master netting agreement assignments.doc>>

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

 - master netting agreement assignments.doc << File: master netting agreement assignments.doc >> 

Hi, Athena:

Here is the information you requested:

Navajo Refining Company
c/o Holly Corporation
100 Crescent Court, Suite 1600
Dallas, Texas  75201-6927

Louis Dreyfus Energy Services L.P.
Louis Dreyfus Corporation

I don't know if Louis Dreyfus Corporation is the same as the Dreyfus Corporation.  Louis Dreyfus Corporation is located in Wilton, Connecticut.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
Hi, Marie, hope all is well.  In order to complete our conflicts checks on
two counterparties, we need answers to the following questions:  (1)
Exactly which Navajo and Louis Dreyfus entities/subsidiaries will be
involved in the Master Netting Agreements?  (2) Is the Louis Dreyfus on
your list the same as the Dreyfus Corporation?  (3) What is the main
business address for Navajo?  Thanks and please call with any questions.

Best Regards,
Athena

                    "Heard,
Attached is the updated list of master netting agreement assignments.

           <<master netting agreement assignments.doc>>

==============================================================================
NOTE:  The information in this email is confidential and may be legally privileged.  If you are not the intended recipient, you must not read, use or disseminate the information.  Although this email and any attachments are believed to be free of any virus or other defect
that might affect any computer system into which it is received and opened, it is the responsibility of the recipient to ensure that it is virus free and no responsibility is accepted by Cadwalader, Wickersham
& Taft for any loss or damage arising in any way from its use.

==============================================================================

 - master netting agreement assignments.doc << File: master netting agreement assignments.doc >> 

Mr. Butler:

Pursuant to your request, attached is our form master netting agreement.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Pursuant to Jason Williams' request, attached is our form master netting agreement.  Please do not hesitate to contact us with any questions or comments.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 	 

Dear Osama Bin Laden, Yasser Arafat, and Sadam Hussein, et.al.,

We are pleased to announce that we unequivocally accept your challenge to an
old-fashioned game of whoop-ass. Now that we understand the rule that there
are no rules, we look forward to playing by them for the first time.

Since this game is a winner-take-all, we unfortunately are unable to
invite you to join us at the victory celebration. But rest assured that we
will toast you -- LITERALLY.

While we will admit that you are off to an impressive lead, it is however
now our turn at the plate.

By the way, we will be playing on your court now.
Batter up.

Sincerely,

The 270,000,000 citizens of the United States of America

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

Paul, Matt and Edmund:

Please take whatever steps are necessary to have the attached document signed ASAP.  Harlan Murphy (713/345-2679 is the lawyer here in Houston who prepared the document.  Please contact either Harlan, Mary Cook (713/345-7732), Elizabeth Sager (713/853-6349) or Carol St. Clair (713/853-3989) if you have any questions.  Bill Bradford is the Credit contact and his number is (713) 853-3831.

When the document is signed, please fax the signature pages to me at (713) 646-3490.

MANY THANKS!!!!!!!

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
				 

We have received the following financial Master Agreement:

Type of Contract:		ISDA Master Agreement (Multicurrency-Cross Border)

Effective Date:			November 14, 2001

Counterparty:			Amerada Hess Corporation

Transactions Covered:		Approved for all products with the exception of:  Foreign Exchange

Governing Law:			New York

Special Handling Requirement:	Counterparty has five (5) Local Business Days after a confirmation was received by it to accept or dispute a confirmation.

Copies will be distributed.

Hi, Dana:

We have received the original copy of the ISDA Master Agreement.  In looking through the supporting documents, we noted two outstanding items:

1.	We did not receive an original signed IRS Tax Form W-9 as required pursuant to Part 3(a); and

2.	The Certificate of Incumbency we received was not an original and was dated November 14, 2000.  We would like to receive an original certificate dated a current date.

If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact either Frank or me.  We look forward to receiving this documentation.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Harlan:

Here are a clean and blacklined copy of the mna with the revised Exhibit A.  The second one is the blackline copy.

Marie

		 	 

Here is the current draft of the Paribas Master Netting Agreement.  We intend to execute this this morning.  The entities and agreements may change prior to execution.  Contact me with any questions.

 << File: BNP PARBS MSTR NTTG 11-27-01 CLEAN I.doc >> 

Harlan E. Murphy
Enron Wholesale Services - Legal
1400 Smith Street, EB 3811
Houston, Texas 77002
Tel: 713.345.2679
Fax: 713.646.3490
E-mail: Harlan.Murphy@Enron.com

Clean and blacklined copies.

		 	 

We are finalizing the master netting agreement among BNP Paribas and Enron Corp., et al for execution, and have received copies of all underlying documentation with the exception of documentation for Enron Metals Limited.  Can you fax or e-mail me a copy of what documentation Enron Metals Limited signs--ISDA, general terms and conditions, etc. with BNP Paribas?   We need to receive this documentation ASAP.

Thanks for your help.

Marie

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

(713) 896-1673.  It doesn't matter to me if we eat before or go for coffee after.  The only places I know to eat near the Wortham are at Bayou Place.  I know there's Hard Rock Cafe, a barbecue place and I don't know what else is there.  Let me know what you want to do. If we don't eat before, I guess we can meet at the bottom of the escalators at the theatre.

Marie,

  My home phone is 281-298-2813.  What's yours?

It would definitely be out of your way.  I don't mind driving downtown, so why don't we just meet at the Wortham at about 7?.  We have been parking in one of the outside lots off Smith right across from the side of the Wortham (the Bank One Lot) since the flood closed down so many of the underground garages.

Why don't we have coffee after.  Can I pick you up either at your house or someplace on 1960?  No sense in you having to drive into the city too?  I wish I had a ticket for Ann!

(713) 896-1673.  It doesn't matter to me if we eat before or go for coffee after.  The only places I know to eat near the Wortham are at Bayou Place.  I know there's Hard Rock Cafe, a barbecue place and I don't know what else is there.  Let me know what you want to do. If we don't eat before, I guess we can meet at the bottom of the escalators at the theatre.

Marie,

  My home phone is 281-298-2813.  What's yours?

Me too!

ok - thanks for the parking tips.  I'll look for you at the bottom of the escalators at 7:00.  Looking forward to it!

It would definitely be out of your way.  I don't mind driving downtown, so why don't we just meet at the Wortham at about 7?.  We have been parking in one of the outside lots off Smith right across from the side of the Wortham (the Bank One Lot) since the flood closed down so many of the underground garages.

Why don't we have coffee after.  Can I pick you up either at your house or someplace on 1960?  No sense in you having to drive into the city too?  I wish I had a ticket for Ann!

(713) 896-1673.  It doesn't matter to me if we eat before or go for coffee after.  The only places I know to eat near the Wortham are at Bayou Place.  I know there's Hard Rock Cafe, a barbecue place and I don't know what else is there.  Let me know what you want to do. If we don't eat before, I guess we can meet at the bottom of the escalators at the theatre.

Marie,

  My home phone is 281-298-2813.  What's yours?

Ms. Navarro:

Thank you for sending your comments to the guaranty.  Please note our comments below.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Lucy:

Following please find our Corporate Lawyers comments to the changes you
requested to the Guaranty we are working on:

1.	Recitals.  We do not see why it would be necessary to add that
"The Guarantor will directly or indirectly benefit from the
Transactions between the Beneficiary and PMI".  Please explain. [Heard, Marie]    Because (i) it is a correct statement and (ii) it clarifies the element of consideration which is essential for purposes of enforceability. 

2.	Section 1.  Considering that Pemex normally needs 5 business
days to request funds in foreing currencies to the Central Bank, we
need to change the payment date to be 5 Business Days after receipt of
the Payment Demand instead of 3 days. [Heard, Marie]    We are okay with this change. 

3.	Section 6. Jurisdiction.  We think that New York Jurisdiction is
a good option and probably the most experienced in terms of derivatives
trading, and therefore we prefer to keep the "exclusive" jurisdiction
of any federal court sitting in the Borough of Manhattan. [Heard, Marie]    We are okay with the "exclusive" jurisdiction. 

The rest of your comments are acceptable to us.  Carlos Riveroll will
be sending you PMI?s comments to the amendment to the MSA, so we can
finalize this as soon as posible.

Best regards,

Martha Navarro

 - WINMAIL.DAT << File: WINMAIL.DAT >> 

Ms. Navarro:

Thank you for sending your comments to the guaranty.  Please note our comments below.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Lucy:

Following please find our Corporate Lawyers comments to the changes you
requested to the Guaranty we are working on:

1.	Recitals.  We do not see why it would be necessary to add that
"The Guarantor will directly or indirectly benefit from the
Transactions between the Beneficiary and PMI".  Please explain. [Heard, Marie]    Because (i) it is a correct statement and (ii) it clarifies the element of consideration which is essential for purposes of enforceability. 

2.	Section 1.  Considering that Pemex normally needs 5 business
days to request funds in foreing currencies to the Central Bank, we
need to change the payment date to be 5 Business Days after receipt of
the Payment Demand instead of 3 days. [Heard, Marie]    We are okay with this change. 

3.	Section 6. Jurisdiction.  We think that New York Jurisdiction is
a good option and probably the most experienced in terms of derivatives
trading, and therefore we prefer to keep the "exclusive" jurisdiction
of any federal court sitting in the Borough of Manhattan. [Heard, Marie]    We are okay with the "exclusive" jurisdiction. 

The rest of your comments are acceptable to us.  Carlos Riveroll will
be sending you PMI?s comments to the amendment to the MSA, so we can
finalize this as soon as posible.

Best regards,

Martha Navarro

 - WINMAIL.DAT << File: WINMAIL.DAT >> 

Carol:

I apologize for not getting back to you on Friday, but it was pretty hectic here.  There are no special provisions for a German counterparty other than the tax reps.  We do have a treaty with Germany.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Marie

Mr. Kohler:

Just a follow-up to check on the status of the Master Agreement forwarded to you by our Calgary office for execution.

Thanks!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Mr. Daborn:

Would you please send me your delivery address so that I can send you the documentation requested in connection with the opening of ECT Investments' account with CSFB Europe?

Thank you!

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist

Gordon:

Attached is the revised Deemed ISDA for the referenced counterparty, changing the EBITDA/Interest Expense ratio.

Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

Gordon:

Have you received a W8BEN tax form and/or a legal opinion from Nemak?  They are supposed to deliver these to us in connection with the signed ISDA Master Agreement, but I haven't seen them and before I contact them, I thought I'd check just to make sure you didn't receive them.

Thanks!

Marie

Thanks, Gordon.  I'll send them a letter asking for these items.

Thanks!

Marie

Marie, I don't believe so.  I checked TAGG, and noticed that I executed the deals for Nemak, S.A (and therefore, would have provided you with a copy of everthing other than straight ISDAs for the counterparties).  Please let me know if you need for me to contact them for this document.

Thanks,
Gordon

Gordon:

Have you received a W8BEN tax form and/or a legal opinion from Nemak?  They are supposed to deliver these to us in connection with the signed ISDA Master Agreement, but I haven't seen them and before I contact them, I thought I'd check just to make sure you didn't receive them.

Thanks!

Marie

Celeste:

You can use this ISDA to confirm your weather deal.

Marie

Weather traders sold an HDD Call to the above referenced counterparty.  I see in GCP and legal database that we have an ISDA of 4/16/99.  Does this cover weather?

Attached is the Annex B to be used for all future financial transactions with the referenced counterparty.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

Attached is the Annex B to be used for all future financial transactions between ENA and the referenced counterparty.  Let me know if you have any questions or need anything else.

Marie

		 

Genia:

We have credit sign off on all masters, amendments, assignments and terminations--any document where credit is involved.  We don't have them initial the day to day confirms, but if there is a confirm with a lot of credit terms which may have been negotiated, then we'll have them initial those.

Marie 

Marie,

Can you tell me what the Swap Group has credit sign off on before sending out for execution.  Is it all agreements, amendments, confirms, etc.?  We will be duplicating your procedures.

Thanks,
Genia

Looks like we may have an agreed to guaranty from Pemex.

Marie:

Our Corporate Lawyers just agreed to your suggested addition to the
Recitals Section.  In order to be able to execute the Guaranty we need
the final blessing of Hacienda, which should be no problem and is
already in process.  Carlos Riveroll contacting you to reach an
agreement regarding the Amendment to the MSA to incorporate the
Guaranty. In the mean time we will prepare the execution copyes be
ready to sign it.

Best regards,

Martha Navarro

Ms. Navarro:

Thank you for sending your comments to the guaranty.  Please note our
comments below.

Marie Heard
Senior Legal Specialist
    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-mnavarro+40gas+2Epemex+2Ecom+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Friday, September 21, 2001 10:50 AM
   Lucy:

   Following please find our Corporate Lawyers comments to the changes
you
   requested to the Guaranty we are working on:

   1.      Recitals.  We do not see why it would be necessary to add
that
   "The Guarantor will directly or indirectly benefit from the
   Transactions between the Beneficiary and PMI".  Please explain.
[Heard,
   Marie]    Because (i) it is a correct statement and (ii) it clarifies
   the element of consideration which is essential for purposes of
   enforceability.

   2.      Section 1.  Considering that Pemex normally needs 5 business
   days to request funds in foreing currencies to the Central Bank, we
   need to change the payment date to be 5 Business Days after receipt
of
   the Payment Demand instead of 3 days. [Heard, Marie]    We are okay
with
   this change.

   3.      Section 6. Jurisdiction.  We think that New York
Jurisdiction is
   a good option and probably the most experienced in terms of
derivatives
   trading, and therefore we prefer to keep the "exclusive" jurisdiction
   of any federal court sitting in the Borough of Manhattan. [Heard,
Marie]
      We are okay with the "exclusive" jurisdiction.

   The rest of your comments are acceptable to us.  Carlos Riveroll will
   be sending you PMI?s comments to the amendment to the MSA, so we can
   finalize this as soon as posible.

   Best regards,

   Martha Navarro

    - WINMAIL.DAT << File: WINMAIL.DAT >>

 - WINMAIL.DAT 

Hi, Diane!

Can you have someone in your group provide me with copies of the following confirms:

	VB7464.1
	VC1359.1
	VC1330.1
	
If you will call when the copies are ready, I'll send one of our clerks down to pick them up.

Thanks!

Marie
x33907

Connie ---

Where's my morning email?  I don't have anything to entertain me this morning.

Scott

Outlook Migration Team@ENRON
05/14/2001 01:26 PM
Current Notes User:=20

To ensure that you experience a successful migration from Notes to Outlook,=
 it is necessary to gather individual user information prior to your date o=
f migration.  Please take a few minutes to completely fill out the followin=
g survey. Double Click on document to put it in "Edit" mode. When you finis=
h, simply click on the 'Reply With History' button then hit 'Send'  Your su=
rvey will automatically be sent to the Outlook 2000 Migration Mailbox.

Thank you.

Outlook 2000 Migration Team

Full Name:        Scott Hendrickson=09

Login ID:  shendri=09

Extension:  36376

Office Location:  eb3223b

What type of computer do you have?  (Desktop,  Laptop,  Both)  desktop

Do you have a PDA?  If yes, what type do you have:   (None, IPAQ, Palm Pilo=
t, Jornada)  no

Do you have permission to access anyone's Email/Calendar?  no
    If yes, who? =20

Does anyone have permission to access your Email/Calendar?  no
    If yes, who? =20

Are you responsible for updating anyone else's address book?  no
    If yes, who? =20

Is anyone else responsible for updating your address book?  no
    If yes, who? =20

Do you have access to a shared calendar?  no
    If yes, which shared calendar? =20

Do you have any Distribution Groups that Messaging maintains for you (for m=
ass mailings)?  no
    If yes, please list here: =20

Please list all Notes databases applications that you currently use: =20

In our efforts to plan the exact date/time of your migration, we also will =
need to know:

Will you be out of the office in the near future for vacation, leave, etc?
       If so, when?        From (MM/DD/YY):   05/17/01 pm   To (MM/DD/YY): =
    =20

No, I didn't see my mom for Mother's Day because they left early Sunday morning to go to New England for about 10 days.  So, I'm glad that they feel okay to travel!  We'll do something after they get back to celebrate both my birthday and Mother's Day.

My weekend was fine.  I didn't do anything exciting....didn't really feel like going out.  I did run both days and am starting back at the gym today so I can become superbuff.  I've lost 6 lbs during this whole thing at least.  Just 9 more lbs to my goal of 140.  I saw Rayfael Friday when he came over to bring me a birthday present (he didn't think I was home!)  Then I took him some stuff that was at my house yesterday and we hung out a little bit.  I'm still hoping there's a chance we can get back together, but I don't want to get my hopes up too much.  He definitely needs some time to himself and to get over this bout of depression.  I just hope that if he does, then he wants to get back together then, but I'm not sure he does.  We'll see.  I'm not interested in seeing anyone else right away, so I guess I can afford to give it a little time.  Can you put a spell on him?  hehehe

Of course, if we do get back together, that's bad news for the puppies.  If it did come to that, though, I would take them to doggie daycare during the day and they could stay outside at night - that wouldn't be so bad and they wouldn't be lonely.  Anyway, that's a BIG IF that I really shouldn't be concentrating on...so there.

How are things in Germany?  How was your trip to London?  I saw Heather in the elevator here last week, but I didn't get a chance to talk to her.

Write back!!!

Scott

Good Morning Scooter-
 
I have ordered the book Stinson recommended for  Rayfael from Amazon.  It should come in later this week.
 
Julie  :-)

Good Morning Scooter-
 
I have ordered the book Stinson recommended for  Rayfael from Amazon.  It should come in later this week.
 
Julie  :-)

Thanks!  I'm doing a tiny bit better today I think.  Probably won't be my most exciting birthday ever, though!  Yeah, I wish you were here to take me shopping too!  At least now, I have some time to do some of those little projects around the house that have been stacking up :).

Scott

Well, I think for now that he's not wanting to be in a serious relationship.  I don't think he ever really did, but we just ended up having one.  But I think he's got alot of other stuff going on in his life now with job and friends and feels that he can't be committed to a relationship and knows he's not going to make the effort.  I don't know if that will change anytime soon or not.  I'm assuming it won't, but hoping it will.  Anyway, I'm just super-depressed now and my birthday is tomorrow!  This will not be a birthday to remember.  :(  I really wasn't ready for our relationship to end, and didn't think it was about to, really.  So, I have to deal with the shock as well as the sadness.  I'm going to talk to him tonight about a couple of things, but if nothing is different today, I guess we'll just leave each other alone for a while and see what happens.

Scott

Mike ---

Did you get set up on AOL instant messenger yet?  If so, what's your screen name?  I'm scotth1965.  I've got several of my usual trading partners on there and it works out pretty well.

Scott

Darla -  Contact is:
 
Ricky Hart
3800 New Hampshire Ave NW
Suite 405
Washington, DC 20011-7930
877-637-6270

Darla Saucier@ENRON
05/10/2001 11:00 AM
Please give me a contact name and # for this deal ASAP.  I need to get the invoice out today and have no one to send it to.

Thanks
darla saucier
client services

I hope it's not really over, but i think it is, at least for now.  I'm very, very sad.  I don't want to be at work, but I might as well be here and depressed and somewhat busy, rather than at home and depressed with nothing to divert my attention.  At least the doggies still love me!

Scott

you must not have got my second message....rayfael and i broke up last night :(

unrelated to dog situation....

scott

http://www.fitnessheaven.com/resources/workouts/myworkout/

Now the dog issue isn't a problem...me and Rayfael broke up last night.  :(

Angie Zeman@ENRON
06/26/2000 02:51 PM
(See attached file: Delta.WAV)

 - Delta.WAV 

Any news on whether you can make it for the weekend of Jun 22?  I now it's way past my turn to go there, but the show will be better in Houston that weekend!

Also, what about the Aladdin...did you get comped?

Scott

I'm so sad!!!  Mr. Bean and Greta are going to have to move outside.  Rayfael's allergies just can't take them, even if I relegate them to the downstairs bedroom and outside.  It's like he's building up an immunity to the allergy medicine.  He's just miserable anytime he's at the house - obviously, that doesn't help a relationship.  So, starting tonight (?) they are going to move outside.  I'm gonna have to get them one or two (probably one) doghouse.  I'm so depressed about the whole thing.  Rayfael feels bad too, but it's important he not be near death anytime we're together.  He feels like the bad guy.  And I feel like a bad father!!!  I can't bear to think of their cute little faces staring in the french doors wondering what they did wrong!

I'm getting paid back for all the nasty things I said about Barbara Dillard and her dogs!!!  I want  you to move back and let Mr. Bean and Greta live with you and Angus!!!  Nextdoor!!!  (the house is still for sale! - $269,000 list now, down from $314,000).

So, will you come back and be my doggies' mommy?  Armin can come, too.

Write back!

Scott

Dutch ---

I need to cancel a deal where East-CNG sold 10,000 Jun NX at 4.20.  It was a limit order that EOL never recognized, but during all that turmoil, somehow got executed, about 30-40 minutes later.

Scott

Hey Eric ---

How are things?  How is the job?  Is this still the best email address for you?  What's your work phone?

Things are fine here.  Same old same old.

Scott

I dunno what's going on there...the board gave approval to pull out of the deal, but I think that was just a threat.  I think we must be staying in the deal.  But our stock price is not so great right now.  There was an ABSOLUTELY HORRIBLE article about Enron in Bloomberg Markets magazine.  It basically said we were a house of cards and lied about all our earnings expectations from new businesses.  It was very unflattering.  That came out yesterday, I think.  If I could find it in an electronic format, I'd send it to you, but I only have it on paper....

Enjoy your sun!  It's been pretty rainy and nasty here the last few days, but that's good for the yard.  Don't forget that my birthday is Friday!  I need a present from you!!!  hehehe

Scott

and I thought Ellie was fat!!!

:-)

You won't believe the size of this cat.

 
William Harper <William.Harper@nesanet.org> on 05/04/2001 09:54:00 AM
Even if you don't have time to read the story below definitely check out the
photo at the end.  That is one DAMN BIG feline!

Now this is a Big Cat!

Mr. Degagne recalls how 15 years ago he befriended two stray young cats on the old AECL research facility at Chalk River. The kittens had appeared in late summer and apparently had gotten under a security fence around the old labs, abandoned since the late 50's. With the help of his tuna  sandwich, Mr. Degagne was able to coax the kitties close enough so that he could  pick them up. A self described animal lover, he did not want to place the kittens in the local Humane Society. Later that evening his wife Louise and their two children came to a family decision to keep the kittens which they named Lost and Found.  Lost was a female and Found was a male. When nature finally took its course, a litter of kittens was born 6 years later. One of the litter was a big white female with unique black markings on her side and tail.

Something about the kitten captured the hearts of the family, and while her siblings eventually found homes elsewhere, Snowball stayed with the Degagne's.  In her 9 years Snowball's size has seemed to snowball.  Put simply, Snowball is no ordinary cat -- she measures 69 inches from nose to tail and weighs in at 87 lbs.  She started out a big kitty and she just seemed to keep growing.  She always meowed for more food and would climb up on the counter to eat food which I forgot to cover.  Chicken is her favorite. 

"Once I left a cooked chicken on the table that I was going to use for a boat picnic, an hour later the chicken was gone," Louise said. We knew that snowball wasn't your average cat when the neighbor's German Shepherd ran yelping away from his first encounter with her.  She just isn't afraid of any animals.  After we found a half eaten raccoon out by the garage, we decided that maybe Snowball should be kept fenced in. We soon discovered that while we can keep Snowball in the yard, we couldn't keep raccoons from Snowball.  "At least it kept the food bills down," Rodger laughed. "Like all female cats she is very territorial, but with us she is just a big ole kitten," he said.
				
So what does a 87 pound cat eat? Snowball goes through about 3 lbs. of cat food a day, along with cooked chicken, supplemented with deer and moose that Rodger hunts in the fall.  She likes Pike a lot, so I don 't throw them back any more.  Snowball often accompanies Rodger fishing on the Ottawa, eagerly peering over the side of the boat as soon as his line goes tight.  So what do the Degagne's attribute Snowball's size to?  Rodger says "Well,the vet thinks it could be her thyroid, but she isn't fat, she's just a real big cat. I think maybe her parents got into something at Chalk River that they shouldn't have."
				
NOW go have a look at "Snowball."

		

 - BigCat.jpg 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

Sheila - there should be an offsetting deal to this #662479.  The net effect is that Vineyard should pay us the differential of $0.05 on 37,373 MMBtu or $1,868.65.

Scott

John -  Do you have a problem customer????

Scott

Scott, 

I just wanted to inform you that Vineyard Oil and Gas has not paid this deal for March 2001 production.  I have made several calls to speak with the lady in charge of payables.  They tell me she is never in the office, and there is no one else that is handling her duties.  I was wondering if you can speak to the trader/your contact there, so I can get this issue resolved.

Thanks,
Shielah
x34315
 

Yeah, I remember everything in London being VERY expensive!!!  But I had a great time there, I'm ready to go back!  I wanted to take Rayfael there this summer, but I doubt that will happen now.

It's starting to get pretty hot....hitting 90 now.  YUK.  I wish I'd started running sooner while it was cooler....I'm trying to get back to 140, and I'm 8 1/2 lbs from my goal.  I'm going to have to get buff now that I'm on the market again - and partially to make Rayfael think twice!!!  heheh

Oops...I started typing this email two hours ago and got too busy to finish...I'll send this now and write more later...

Scott

shendri

Hey ---

FYI, Dan Junek quit today....he's going to Allegheny Power in NYC.  Thought you'd be interested to know.  Also, Kim's brother-in-law died this week.  They aren't exactly sure what the cause of death is yet.  So you may wanna contact her and give her your condolences.

Not much going on here, except I'm losing money hand over fist!!!  Talk to you later....

Scott

you are correct sir!

scott

Tom -

Call me a NX1+68 offer for the term and volumes listed.

Scott

http://www.abcnews.go.com/sections/business/DailyNews/ikeasurvey010427.html

Joann ---

Effective 5/1/01 through 10/31/01 we have a 10,000 MMBtu/d index put at Dominion South Point to PSEG.  We can do as much as we want in any month, within the 0-10,000 MMBtu/d parameters, but we can do no more than 920,000 MMBtu for the whole term.  We need to keep a running tally of how much we use.  Starting on Monday, can we keep this tally on the morning sheet and update it daily?

Scott

Sent by:	Enron Announcements@ENRON
Enron announces UNLIMITED discounted AstroWorld tickets for employees.

Due to overwhelming employee feedback, we have negotiated unlimited discounted AstroWorld tickets for you and your family in place of the traditional "Enron Day At AstroWorld."  We hope this will allow Enron families to plan their fun-filled summer trips to AstroWorld at their own convenience.  Enron AstroWorld tickets are $20.56 (Retail $50), which includes admission for one, plus a $7 meal ticket to one of five restaurants at AstroWorld.

Six Flags AstroWorld is a world-class family entertainment complex filled with exciting rides and attractions, including 10 heart-pounding coasters, over  40 blockbuster shows, interactive street entertainers and star-studded concerts.  Enron families will be able to purchase unlimited tickets for use anytime during the 2001 season.

Tickets will be on sale at Enron's Federal Credit Union, EB0399.  Visit the credit union in person to make your purchases.  AstroWorld tickets will not be mailed.  Enron employees who are not already Enron FCU members may pay by cash or money order only.  All Enron Employees are encouraged to take advantage of this great summer fun deal and may purchase tickets through August 30th.

Molly,

I'd love to go, but I have guests in town this weekend, so won't be able to make it.  Thanks for the invite, though!  And tell Chris Happy Birthday....

Scott

good thing they only shake your HAND!!!  hehehehe

ricky ---

here are the index and nymex offers for may as of this moment:

Columbia M/L	IF+$0.075  /  NX1 + $0.055
Coumbia Onsh	IF+$0.000  /  NX1 -  $0.02	
Dominion SP	IF+$0.0075 / NX1 + $0.3375
Texas Gas SL	IF+$0.000  /  NX1 - $0.0175
Transco St. 30    IF+$0.02  /  NX1 - $0.06
Transco St. 45    IF+$0.01  /  NX1 -  $0.04
Transco St. 65    IF+$0.005 / NX1 + $0.0225

these are indicative only and suject to change.

Scott

OH, that's too bad!!!  Are you feeling better now?  I guess the drugs are wearing off!  I was really looking forward to dinner tonight, too.  I had a bad night last night.  But, you may want to avoid sushi altogether until you've been remedicated.  I hope you have a better trip back!

Scott

Bobby....i'ts 10:35 am...do you know where Kim is?  I'm trying to get in touch w/her and let her know that my mom's appt. got moved up.   She was going to go, but we can't get in touch w/her.

Scott

i understand it perfectly!!!  it's saying the following:

I'm sorry to hear about your empoyer's relatives....it sounds like that Connie woman is really evil!  I hope she doesn't hit you anymore.  I do agree that you should put a spell on her.  In the meantime, I will think bad thoughts about her.

It's paraphrased, but you get the gist of it....

hehehe

http://www.abcnews.go.com/wire/Living/ap20010419_578.html

Ok, kids ---

We SOLD flex CNG Flex deals to El Paso (opposite of this month) for May.  The sitara deals are as follows:

737642 - ENA buys 5,000/d baseload from El Paso at CNG SP for Index flat.
737647 - ENA sells 0-15,500/d to El Paso at CNG SP for Index plus $0.055.  El Paso must take 155,000 for the month.

737645 - ENA buys 5,000/d baseload from El Paso at CNG SP for Index flat.
737655 - ENA sells 0-15,500/d to El Paso at CNG SP for Index plus $0.065.  El Paso must take 155,000 for the month.

On deals # 737647 and 737655 (we sell to El Paso), the volume is in as a baseload of 5,000/d but the expected volume is zero on May 1-21, and 15,500 on May 22-31.  CHRIS - make sure we keep up with this on the morning sheet and that the volume is zeroed out in the system until they actually call on it.  They will have to call us by 9:30 am to take the gas on any day.

Scott

yes, it should be dominion south point gdpa....sorry

scott

Oh well, the stock price is still going up!

http://biz.yahoo.com/rf/010417/n17603037_2.html

So, what does that mean for last weekend?  Any love?

Scott

well, keep me informed of that little issue....

scott

good boy!

So did you get comped on the room/meals?  If not, what's my share of Elements and Commander's Palace.  I ended up about $300 in the money, a little less than the hotel room.  I didn't try to get comped because I know I didn't gamble enough.  But let me know how they treated you...

Scott

I'm assuming that's the law suit related to your former employer?  Sorry to hear about the hand that rocks the cradle!!!  So have you found a new nanny?

I REALLY REALLY REALLY need a vacation soon, so we should talk!  Vegas could be "in the cards" by late July or August, but maybe we can do something prior to that even...I've had sort of a bad last couple of months....we can get into that in more detail later.

So, do you like the new job?  How's Ethan doing?  Any non-psycho love interests?

Scott

delete

But I'm super busy in the mornings trading, so I can't write much....I can barely even catch my breath in the mornings!!!  Especially today because I just turned my alarm off for some reason this morning rather than getting up when it went off.  So, I woke up later and made it to work in like 15 minutes....showered, shaved, clothed and all.  But I'm not quite all here.  I had my front door refinished yesterday (which it REALLY needed - and it looks great now!), and I think the fumes all went upstairs to my bedroom and gave me brain damage and made me want to sleep!  I promise I'll write more in a bit after trading slows down....

Scott

You know, you have to WRITE emails to GET emails...and I would hardly call
your last two, WRITING..they were just acknowlegements of your existence,
not your normal informative form of communication.

WELL????

Scott ---

I put this together to sort of summarize our activity to date on New England points.  As you can see, the volumes are moving up pretty steadily and we're at least getting a presence up there - with no assets, virtually no transport.  At the same time, we've taken pretty minimal risk.  Also of note, we are getting alot more calls for multiple month pricing on these points as well.

Please see attached spreadsheet....

 

Scott

FYI ---

They are opening a Freebird World Burrito here next to that Le Peep that we've eaten at - across from 59 Diner.  Jealous much?

Scott

Don't worry, your reward will come in heaven!

You are truly blessed.

FYI ---

They are opening a Freebird World Burrito here next to that Le Peep that
we've eaten at - across from 59 Diner.  Jealous much?

Scott

test

That sounds great!  So will they get it all spread in one day?  Sounds like everything is taking shape now!!!

Not much going on here.  I had dinner with Rayfael last night, it was a little painful, but I survived.  He's so messed up
in the head right now.  :(

Anyway, nothing too exciting happening here....at least nothing that's gonna cheer you up...

Scott
I'M SO EXCITED!!!! They are finally spreading out my land!  There's a HUGE
bulldozer out there and he's moving the dirt where-ever I tell him.  IT'S
GREAT, EARTH SCULPTING (???).  There will be some low levels, some high
levels and then some mounds...I have an acrea of dirt to play with...it's
like a great big sandbox!  I ALWAYS LOVED PLAYING IN THE DIRT!

And I am getting so excited about having a yard, ALLLLLL OUR OWN!  With no
tenants (Frau Sweetie) looking down at us.  Our only neighbor, that will
actually live on their land hasn't even started building yet.  They gave us
their plans for approval last week and they are building their house around
an atrium like area...so they won't even have any windows this way!

I needed something uplifting..I just finished calculating how much we pay
annually to the ins. company to be covered for everything....30,000 DM A
YEAR!  ONLY 14,000 is for the business!  I keep hoping that I can find
something to cancel...but no luck yet.

So what's happening???

Good luck with the grass!  I can't even get my little yard covered.  Yeah, I'm open to going out with new people.  Just not really pursuing it just yet.  Depends on how long before I really feel the need :).  Actually, I'm more interested in just making some new friends right now.  I've decided I need a few gay friends to hang out with.  That will get me out meeting more people for other stuff too.

Yeah, mom and dad got back over the weekend.  They had a good time, sounds like they did nothing but shop!  She's been going to MD Anderson for a while now.  In fact they did bloodwork yesterday and she goes in to see the doctor today.  Anyway, that's the scoop from this side of the Atlantic....

Scott

Yeah, I think they will finish with the big bulldozer today, then they come
with the little one for the delicate areas...like right in front of my
french windows!!!  It's looking really nice, just need an acrea of grass
now!

sorry that things have not improved with rayfael...have you considered
getting out and seeing other folks.  I know you don't want too but it would
be good for you and you never know what a little jealousy can do...but I
don't mean Vincent.

We are having just beautiful weather!  How is it there?  Are your parents
back yet?  when is your mom going to MD Anderson?

Below is the receipt/delivery point information we received from Cabot (Cranberry) from last September.  I will be around shortly to discuss....

Regards,

Eric Boyt

 

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

http://www.time.com/time/health/article/0,8599,127225,00.html

Scott E Hendrickson
09/14/1999 10:06 AM
This may take a while to download.....

 

Scott

Guten Morgen!!!

How was your weekend?  We had the long Memorial Day weekend here....hahaha!

Things are fine here.  I just tried to relax this weekend.  Friday night I =
went to a movie with Rayfael. We saw Angel Eyes with Jennifer Lopez.  It wa=
s pretty good.  Saturday, I pretty much just vegged out a good chunk of the=
 day.  Julie and I went to lunch and ran errands.  I went running every day=
 this weekend, too!  I've lost 10 lbs since the big breakup!!!  Down to 145=
 now, may go for 140 - not sure.  I didn't go out on Saturday because I was=
 just in a mood to stay in.  Sunday, I took care of some stuff around the h=
ouse.  I wasn't really planning to go out, but one of my new friends, Kevin=
, called and wanted me to meet him and some other folks out at a bar, so I =
went at about 9:00.  Well, you know how 1 or 2 drinks always turns into alo=
t more...I ended up staying there pretty late and having a good time.  I cr=
ashed at Kevin's house and got back to mine at about 7:00 am.  So all the w=
ork I'd done on getting caught up on sleep was ruined!!!  I came home and g=
ot right in bed, but the dogs really wouldn't let me sleep much.  I went ov=
er to Julie's yesterday to get instructions on taking care of her cats this=
 week.  She leaves Wednesday for Prague and gets back next Thursday.

Now it's back to work, but it's a short week at least.  I'm getting more an=
d more used to the fact that I'm single now, and even though I'd like me an=
d Rayfael to get back together - it's nothing I'm gonna be able to push, if=
 it happens, it happens.  I really hope it does, but the best thing for me =
is not to push it.  So, in the meantime, I guess I'm a free agent!  That fe=
els weird...but, oh well.

Anyway, how are things there?

Scott

http://www.houstonpress.com/issues/2001-05-24/feature2.html/page1.html

I don't know if you got my email, I sent it to the office.  Here's what it said in case....

"Connie --

Actually, they reacted very well - or at least as well as can be expected.  They were sad, but not horrified or anything.  They respect me and know that it's not a choice.  It was just so weird, because I did not have any agenda or intention on telling them that at that point, we were just talking about stuff (and drinking) and I just told them.  And I told them, you can't be totally surprised by this - and they said no.  They had questioned it before, but had not wanted to offend me by asking.  At the same time, they were holding out hope that it wasn't true.  But now they know.  They didn't really have alot of questions or anything, but were just accepting of it.  I'm very happy to have it off my chest.

Sorry to hear about your stomach!!!  That doesn't sound fun at all.  I had a pretty bad hangover yesterday, because I drank profusely before durning and after the whole outing myself to my parents ordeal.

Scott"

So, maybe you already read that.  Anyway, is Armin getting alzheimers???  I don't have any big plans for the weekend.  I actually have a couple of dates, but nothing major.  I've made a couple of new friends, so I want to continue to cultivate those sort of relationships...if other types come up that's fine, but I'm not really concentrating on it.  But I had to go out and tell a couple of my new friends about my revelation to my parents.  A couple of them have not done it themselves, so everybody's all proud of me and stuff.  It's kinda funny really.  But it's like the one thing that was always your biggest concern just isn't there anymore.  I hope it was the right thing to do, but I feel like it was.  Hard to say whether it was good or bad for my mom.  But, honesty is the best policy, right?

Scott

I'm at home now....WRITE ME!!!!

Scott ---

Here is an update of the chart tracking New England trades....you'll notice a dramatic increase for June.

Scott 

I doubt you will get this b4 you get back, but I'll write anyway.  Yes, I had a GREAT weekend, but I was partying way too much!!!  Went out every night from Wednesday to Sunday!!!  I'm paying the price now though.  But I had a really good time and kept very busy :).  I've been two times to your house so far.  Everything seems fine.  I saw Ellie the first time - pigging out on the canned food.  Didn't see Frankie, but I didn't look either.  The weather here has been very hot, but sunny.

Sounds like Prague is treating you well.  Is it beautiful?  Tell Peggy I'm not spreading myself TOO THIN...but remember, you can never be too thin or too rich!!!  I can't believe the prices.  And if you get me something that costs 20 cents you better get alot of them!!!  HEHEHEHE

I'll go to your house again on Wednesday before you get back on Thursday.  Sadly, the Tsunami has not been used - although there were opportunities!!!  hehehehe

Miss you!  Hurry back!

Scott

Hello Scooter,

Hope you had fun on your three dates this weekend!!!  (you slut!)

You know I am jealous.  Peggy says not to spread yourself too thin!!!!

You would not believe how cheap it is here.  Today at the musuem I had a
sandwich, snickers and a cafe latte for $1.50!!!  A three course dinner last
night cost $3.00.

The bad news is that your gift cost $0.20!!  (ha, ha)  I really haven't bought
it yet.

Take Care,

Miss you,

Julie  :-)

FW: humour 
 
 
 - sumo.mpg 

          Panic-Hit City Hunts 'Ape-Like' Attacker    NEW DELHI (Reuters) -=
 Fear gripped some suburbs of the Indian capital on Tuesday after dozens of=
 residents reported attacks by an ape-like creature able to leap from roof =
to roof.  Police had received about 65 reports of a mysterious attacker wit=
h a monkey's face and human body scratching and biting victims in and aroun=
d Delhi since Saturday, a senior police official told Reuters on Tuesday.  =
Police said they had no clues about the identity of the alleged attacker.  =
"Last night (Monday) alone we received 24 calls reporting such attacks," Ma=
noj Lal, Deputy Commissioner of Police of Delhi's eastern district, told Re=
uters. "Of these, 19 were found to have no basis. The five others had some =
wounds and we are trying to confirm with doctors how they may have been cau=
sed," he said.  Television network Star News said people in neighboring Gha=
ziabad town -- which reported the first attack two weeks ago -- spent the n=
ight on the streets armed with sticks waiting for the attacker.  Lal said t=
he entire eastern district police force of about 3,000 personnel had been o=
n patrol since Monday to hunt down the creature.  The Times of India said a=
n industrial worker died on Sunday night in nearby Noida town when he jumpe=
d off a first-floor building after being awoken by cries the "monkey man" w=
as attacking.  There are a number of monkeys running wild in New Delhi and =
on the outskirts of the city which sometimes pounce on unsuspecting pedestr=
ians or enter houses.  Copyright 2001 Reuters News Service. All rights rese=
rved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistri=
buted. =09

Scharnberger-Armin@t-online.de (Heizungsbau Armin Scharnberger) on 05/14/2001 12:36:51 PM
It was so good to get your email and to hear that you are at least doing "ok".
I still hope I can meet Rayfael when I come to Houston this summer.  He sounds
really wonderful and good for you.  Hopefully he will get over this rough spell
he's going through and realize what a catch you are!  I think that is a GREAT
idea about the dogs, if ya'll get back together.  They would love doggie day 
care and be soooo tired at night that they would sleep like logs in their little
doghouses.

I am so glad to hear that your parents are traveling.  what a beautiful time
to visit New England..did they drive or fly?

Things are fine here, the house is coming along now and we talked to a
landscaper about setting up our acre of yard...hopefully that will happen in
the next couple of weeks...WE NEED GRASS THIS YEAR!!!  We spent most of the
weekend with Christina and Mitch, they are transferred back to the states in
a month....we are all depressed about that, they love it here and don't want
to go...but when the military says JUMP, what else can you do???  We all
grilled out Sat with Lolo and family, he has his garten looking so?? fine
(we all are shocked at what he has been capable of...he built a wooden deck,
edged it in stone, filled the whole yard with dirt, planted a full yard of
shrubs, etc...THEN he layed a stone driveway and walk way...IT'S
BEAUTIFUL!!!

Then on Sun Christina, Mitch and us went to A?manns for lunch and started
having aperitiffs..they were so good and we were IN THE MOOD..so we had
more, then Herr A?mann treated us all to our favorite schnapps!  We were
feeling good by the time we left to go to our building and have MARGARITA'S
AND WINE!!! After sunning and drinking all day we feasted on a fleisch
dinner...that was all we had here to eat, so we grilled bauchfleisch, steaks
and bratw?rst...WE ATE SOOO MUCH, but we had DRANK SO MUCH THAT WE NEEDED
IT, good greasy stuff.  They left about 8pm and we went home to bed.  GREAT
DAY!  Wish so bad you could've been here!!!!

Today I worked all morning in the office, went home for lunch and we ate
outside on the terrace, then came back to the office and slept in my lounge
chair (with Angus in my lap) until Claudia woke me at 4 pm!  Just in time
for an appointment I had with one of our vendors over some bills.  the
appointment went well, we went home for dinner that Claudia made and now we
are back here at the office.  Armin has a bid to get out and Angus needed to
walk and visit with his dog friends, since he slept alllll afternoon!

Well, Armin says he's getting finished, so I better go water my flowers
outside before he's ready to head home...write me, write me...WRITE ME!!!
Connie

Well, sounds like everything is great in Germany!  You still didn't tell me about your trip to London?

I'm still doing just "ok".  The busier I am, the better I am, so I'm trying to keep as busy as possible.

If I wasn't poor and worried about my JOB right now, I'd schedule a trip to come see you, but I have to see how things shake out here.  I need to make some money quick!!!  And yesterday didn't help!  I need a vacation!!!  You guys MUST come stay with me at some point while you're here, and I wanna have a party one night while you're here.

Well, trading's getting busy....write back and I'll write more later!

Scott

Darlene C Forsyth
12/13/2000 01:22 PM

	
	

This one REALLY makes you cry!!!!!!!
>
>  > > Dear God...read this!
>  > >
>  > >
> * >                       >>>>> > >>Misty"
> * >                       >>>>> > >> My name is Misty
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I am but three,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> My eyes are swollen
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I cannot see,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I must be stupid
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I must be bad,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> What else could have
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Made my daddy so mad?
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I wish I were better
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I wish I weren't ugly,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Then maybe my mommy
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Would still want to hug me.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I can't speak at all
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I can't do a wrong
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Or else I'm locked up
> * >                       >>>>> > >> All the day long.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> When I awake
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I'm all alone
> * >                       >>>>> > >> The house is dark
> * >                       >>>>> > >> My folks arent home
> * >                       >>>>> > >> When my mommy does come
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I'll try and be nice,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> So maybe I'll get just
> * >                       >>>>> > >> One whipping tonight.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Don't make a sound!
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I just heard a car
> * >                       >>>>> > >> My daddy is back
> * >                       >>>>> > >> From Charlie's Bar.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I hear him curse
> * >                       >>>>> > >> My name he calls
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I press myself
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Against the wall
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I try and hide
> * >                       >>>>> > >> From his evil eyes
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I'm so afraid now
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I'm starting to cry
> * >                       >>>>> > >> He finds me weeping
> * >                       >>>>> > >> He shouts ugly words,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> He says its my fault
> * >                       >>>>> > >> That he suffers at work.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> He slaps me and hits me
> * >                       >>>>> > >> And yells at me more,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I finally get free And
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I run for the door.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> He's already locked it
> * >                       >>>>> > >> And I start to bawl,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> He takes me and throws me
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Against the hard wall.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> I fall to the floor
> * >                       >>>>> > >> With my bones nearly broken,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> And my daddy continues
> * >                       >>>>> > >> With more bad words spoken.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> "I'm sorry!", I scream
> * >                       >>>>> > >> But its now much too late
> * >                       >>>>> > >> His face has been twisted
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Into unimaginable hate
> * >                       >>>>> > >> The hurt and the pain
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Again and again
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Oh please God, have mercy!
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Oh please let it end!
> * >                       >>>>> > >> And he finally stops
> * >                       >>>>> > >> And heads for the door,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> While I lay there motionless
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Sprawled on the floor
> * >                       >>>>> > >> My name is Misty
> * >                       >>>>> > >> And I am but three,
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Tonight my daddy
> * >                       >>>>> > >> Murdered me.
> * >                       >>>>> > >> There are thousands of kids out
> there
> * > > just like
> * > >       >>>>> >Misty.
> * >                       >>>>> > >>And you can help. And please pass
> this
> * > > poem on because as crazy as
> * > >
> * > > >>>>>it
> * >                       >>>>> > >>might sound, it might just
> indirectly
> * > > change a life. 

Melanie Strong
07/19/2000 09:25 AM
Hello Judy!

 Thanks for getting those Royal Bank deals out to me.  I checked with Melinda 
on the status of the J. Aron and Engage deals that we were still needing a 
copy of.  We looked into the J. Aron deal NE4572.1 and it was flagged as 
executed by Bob Bowen, and she was wondering if we will be requesting a copy 
of the deal from J.Aron since we don't have a copy.  She was also wondering 
if the status in TAGG will also be changed.  For the Engage deal NN3957.1 the 
status shows that is was sent to c/p June 21/00.  Jeff Sorenson said that 
there is a revision which he is currently doing, and we would need to ask him 
to send us a confirm.  There was a confirm sent to Engage Canda and a error 
letter was sent to Engage US.  Perhaps the status was never updated?  If you 
could look into this for me I would greatly appreciate it.

Thanks again Judy

Melanie Strong
(403) 974-6935

TO WOMEN EVERYWHERE FROM A MAN WHO'S HAD ENOUGH...

If you think you're fat, you probably are. Don't ask us. We refuse to
answer.

Learn to work the toilet seat. If it's up, put it down.

If you won't dress like the Victoria's Secret girls, don't expect us to act=
=20
like soap opera guys.

Don't cut your hair. Ever. Long hair is always more attractive than short=
=20
hair. One of the big reasons guys fear getting married is that married wome=
n=20
always cut their hair, and by then you're stuck with her.

Birthdays, Valentines, and Anniversaries are not quests to see if we can
find the perfect present yet again!

If you ask a question you don't want an answer to, expect an answer you
don't want to hear.

Sometimes, we're not thinking about you. Live with it. Don't ask us what
we're thinking about unless you are prepared to discuss such topics as
navel lint, the shotgun formation, or monster trucks.

Sunday =3D sports. It's like the full moon or the changing of the tides.
Let it be.

Shopping is not a sport, and no, we're never going to think of it that
way.

When we have to go somewhere, absolutely anything you wear is fine.
Really.

You have enough clothes.  You have too many shoes.

Crying is blackmail.

Ask for what you want. Let's be clear on this one: Subtle hints don't work.
Strong hints don't work. Really obvious hints don't work. Just say it!

No, we don't know what day it is. We never will. Mark anniversaries on
the calendar.

Peeing standing up is more difficult. We're bound to miss sometimes.

Most guys own three pairs of shoes-what makes you think we'd be any good
at choosing which pair, out of thirty, would look good with your dress?

Yes and No are perfectly acceptable answers to almost every question.

Come to us with a problem only if you want help solving it. That's what
we do. Sympathy is what your girlfriends are for.

A headache that lasts for 17 months is a problem. See a doctor.

Foreign films are best left to foreigners.

Check your oil.

It is neither in your best interest nor ours to take the quiz together.
No, it doesn't matter which quiz.

Anything we said 6 months ago is inadmissible in an argument. All comments
become null and void after 7 days.

If something we said can be interpreted two ways, and one of the ways
makes you sad or angry, we meant the other one.

Let us ogle. We're going to look anyway; it's genetic.

You can either tell us to do something OR tell us how to do something
but not both.

Whenever possible, please say whatever you have to say during
commercials..

ALL men see in only 16 colors. Peach is a fruit, not a color.

If it itches, it will be scratched.

Beer is as exciting for us as handbags are for you.

If we ask what's wrong and you say "nothing," we will act like nothing's=20
wrong. We know you're lying, but it's just not worth the hassle.

What the heck is a doily anyway?
=02=05---------------------------------------------------------------------=
para Blondi...errr  Charlie:

ogle:  mirar codiciosamente o insinuante
doily:  tapete

Angela Barnett
07/26/2000 05:37 PM
Mary Westbrook <kittenkid_65@yahoo.com> on 07/26/2000 04:36:40 PM
A VISITORS' GUIDE TO HOUSTON, TX

(To enable our many visitors to cope with life in
America's Fourth
Largest
City)

1. First you must learn to pronounce the city name. It
is YEWS-TUN and
it
does not matter how people pronounce it in other
places.

2. Forget the traffic rules you learned elsewhere.
Houston has its own
version of traffic rules. Never forget that downtown
Houston is
composed
entirely of one way streets. The only way to get out
of center of town
is to
turn around and start over when you reach Dallas,
Texas.

3. All directions start with, "Go down Westheimer..."

4. Westheimer has no beginning and no end.

5. It's impossible to go around a block and wind up on
the street you
started on. The Chamber of Commerce calls this a
"scenic drive".

6. The 8am rush hour is from 6:30 to 9:30am. The
5:00pm rush hour is
from
3:30 to 6:30pm. Friday's rush hour starts on Thursday
morning.

7. If you actually stop at a yellow light, you cannot
be from Houston.

8. Reversible Lanes are not understood by anybody.

9. Kuykendahl Road can only be pronounced by a native,
so do not
attempt the
phonetic pronunciation. People will simply tilt their
heads to the
right and
stare at you.

10. The falling of one raindrop or (God forbid) one
snowflake causes
all
traffic to immediately cease; so will daylight savings
time and a girl
applying eye shadow across the street, or a flat tire
three lanes over.

11. Construction on the Gulf Freeway is a way of life,
and a permanent
form
of entertainment.

12. Many bizarre sights can be explained simply by
uttering the
phrase,"Oh, we're in Montrose!!"

13. Construction crews aren't doing their job properly
unless they
close
down all lanes except one during rush hour.

14. If someone actually has their turn signal on, it
was probably left
on at
the factory where the car was made.

15. Understand that the 95 pound woman driving the
Ford Excursion (the
largest vehicle ever produced) absolutely MUST come to
a complete stop,
then
proceed at 2.5 mph over any railroad track. What's the
deal? This
vehicle
was built to invade small countries, and she's worried
about the
railroad
tracks!!!

16. All ladies with blue hair who drive Cadillacs or
Lincoln
Continentals have the right of way.

17. The above mentioned blue haired ladies also have a
legal right to
turn
right from a left lane or to turn left from a right
lane. YOU HAVE BEEN
WARNED!

18. White haired men driving red or silver sports cars
will not
obey any known traffic rule and cannot be expected to
stop for red
lights or
stop signs.

19. Buying a Houston street map is a waste of money
since there is
absolutely no way that you can route yourself in such
a manner as to
avoid
major road construction.

20. Buying a Houston street map is a waste of money
since the
termination or continuation of any street is entirely
at the discretion
of
the Streets Department of the City. It has been
determined that the
length
of any street on any given day is a mystery known only
to "Higher
Powers" in
the department, and it is rumored that they do not
speak to mere
mortals.

21. Asking directions will help you get acquainted
with the numerous
recent
residents of an amazing ethnic diversity. It will be
not help at all
for
finding the address you seek.

22. If searching for a street on the southwest side of
Houston, a
knowledge of Chinese, Korean, or Vietnamese is
somewhere between
helpful and
mandatory, since the street signs are printed in one
of these languages
along with English. However, often the English name
for the street has
been
removed.

23. Houston natives are so rare that they are listed
on the endangered
species list. The few remaining specimens are kept in
a controlled
environment for their own safety.

24 . "Sir" and "Ma'am" are used by the person speaking
to you if
there's a
remote possibility that you're at least 30 minutes
older than they are.
You
can safely address anyone as "Sir" or "Ma'am" in
Houston as in other
southern cities.

25 . "Sugar" is a more common form of address than
"Miss". So is
"Honey" Do
not take offence. This is how southerners address
grown women.

26 . In Houston we drink Coca Cola and Dr. Pepper. It
is rumored that
other
soft drinks are sold here, but no one will admit to
knowing anyone who
actually drinks them. So don't ask for any other soft
drink.

27 . What you need to know when arriving at Bush
Intercontinental
Airport:
Your arrival gate is at least 32 miles away from the
Main Concourse of
any
terminal. Walking heels on your boots or walking shoes
are advised.

28 . Wherever you are going will be on the other side
of town. When
attempting to cross Houston, assume the trip will take
a minimum of 4
hours
and can take as long as 24 hours.

29 . If attempting to cross Houston via the freeway
system, it is
advisable to carry a supply of Coca Cola, water, a few
sandwiches, and
something to read while waiting on the freeway for the
traffic jam to
clear.
Some moderately fast readers have been known to read a
1,000 page novel
during the course of one traffic jam. If attempting to
cross Houston
during
rush hour,
additional provisions are advisable.

30 . Never get on a Houston freeway without taking a
restroom break
first!
It may be a long time to the next break.

31 . Never honk your horn at another car in Houston
traffic. The
bumpersticker that reads, "Keep honking, I'm
reloading" is considered
fair
warning.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get Yahoo! Mail - Free email you can access from anywhere!
http://mail.yahoo.com/

TO WOMEN EVERYWHERE FROM A MAN WHO'S HAD ENOUGH...

If you think you're fat, you probably are. Don't ask us. We refuse to
answer.

Learn to work the toilet seat. If it's up, put it down.

If you won't dress like the Victoria's Secret girls, don't expect us to act=
=20
like soap opera guys.

Don't cut your hair. Ever. Long hair is always more attractive than short=
=20
hair. One of the big reasons guys fear getting married is that married wome=
n=20
always cut their hair, and by then you're stuck with her.

Birthdays, Valentines, and Anniversaries are not quests to see if we can
find the perfect present yet again!

If you ask a question you don't want an answer to, expect an answer you
don't want to hear.

Sometimes, we're not thinking about you. Live with it. Don't ask us what
we're thinking about unless you are prepared to discuss such topics as
navel lint, the shotgun formation, or monster trucks.

Sunday =3D sports. It's like the full moon or the changing of the tides.
Let it be.

Shopping is not a sport, and no, we're never going to think of it that
way.

When we have to go somewhere, absolutely anything you wear is fine.
Really.

You have enough clothes.  You have too many shoes.

Crying is blackmail.

Ask for what you want. Let's be clear on this one: Subtle hints don't work.
Strong hints don't work. Really obvious hints don't work. Just say it!

No, we don't know what day it is. We never will. Mark anniversaries on
the calendar.

Peeing standing up is more difficult. We're bound to miss sometimes.

Most guys own three pairs of shoes-what makes you think we'd be any good
at choosing which pair, out of thirty, would look good with your dress?

Yes and No are perfectly acceptable answers to almost every question.

Come to us with a problem only if you want help solving it. That's what
we do. Sympathy is what your girlfriends are for.

A headache that lasts for 17 months is a problem. See a doctor.

Foreign films are best left to foreigners.

Check your oil.

It is neither in your best interest nor ours to take the quiz together.
No, it doesn't matter which quiz.

Anything we said 6 months ago is inadmissible in an argument. All comments
become null and void after 7 days.

If something we said can be interpreted two ways, and one of the ways
makes you sad or angry, we meant the other one.

Let us ogle. We're going to look anyway; it's genetic.

You can either tell us to do something OR tell us how to do something
but not both.

Whenever possible, please say whatever you have to say during
commercials..

ALL men see in only 16 colors. Peach is a fruit, not a color.

If it itches, it will be scratched.

Beer is as exciting for us as handbags are for you.

If we ask what's wrong and you say "nothing," we will act like nothing's=20
wrong. We know you're lying, but it's just not worth the hassle.

What the heck is a doily anyway?
=02=05---------------------------------------------------------------------=
para Blondi...errr  Charlie:

ogle:  mirar codiciosamente o insinuante
doily:  tapete

Maria Sandoval
07/21/2000 10:18 AM
monica.richardson@ni.com on 07/21/2000 10:02:35 AM
Cute!
Liles Lindsay-R9127C <R9127C@phoenix.mot.com> on 07/21/2000 09:58:04 AM

Lindsay Liles
College Recruiter
Motorola Global Talent Supply
1-512-996-4776 (direct)
1-800-531-5183 (toll free)
1-800-759-8352 pin #1254449 (pager)
r9127c@email.mot.com
http://www.motorola.com/ur

Terry & Associates
Executive Search
(512) 327-3555 (office)
(512) 632-3110 (mobile)
tarawest@austin.rr.com
>

Regina Blackshear@ENRON
07/21/2000 08:55 AM
We all need motivation in our lives, read it, understand it and apply it to 
your life.

gina

>> >  Mo' Betta Motivation
>> >
>> > > >Life is full of unexpected changes.  It's not
>> > > always fair.  Keep your faith
>> > > >high to avoid feeling too low and defeated.   Who
>> > > ever is around you,
>> > > >influences you.  What ever thoughts you think
>> > > about, define you.  What ever
>> > > >feelings you have the most, control you.  If you
>> > > want to have more success,
>> > > >peace and progress in your life, you can start
>> > > right now. Whatever
>> > > >challenges
>> > > >you face, God will show you His grace. Whatever you
>> > > start...finish it.
>> > > >Whatever you promise...deliver it. Whomever you
>> > > love...show it. Whatever
>> > > >you
>> > > >
>> > > >pray...believe it. Whatever you earn...save some of
>> > > it. Whenever you
>> > > >fall...bounce back up. Whatever you do...do it with
>> > > quality and enthusiasm.
>> > > >
>> > > >Whatever you have...be grateful for it.   Whatever
>> > > you want... work for it.
>> > > >
>> > > >Whatever you lose...get over it.   Whatever you
>> > > focus on or ask for, be
>> > > >careful ... 'cause you just might get it.
>> > > >
>> > > >Personal storms and bad weather happen in
>> > > everyone's life.  It is not
>> > > >during
>> > > >
>> > > >the calm waters that a sailor learns how to master
>> > > the sea.  It is during
>> > > >the
>> > > >storm that he learns his skills.  And so it is with
>> > > your faith.  It will be
>> > > >tested and you can only learn how to use it during
>> > > the difficult times ...
>> > > >not when life is smooth and comfortable.
>> >
>> > > >"Stay in the Light"
>> >
>> >
>

Regina Blackshear@ENRON
07/20/2000 09:18 AM
You guys don't have to send this back to me because I know some of you don't 
have time, but I know you will ask the Lord to bless me anyway.  I am sending 
this to you because I think it is a nice prayer.  Let's keep each other in 
our prayers.

Love ya,
gina
?? MORNING BLESSING
    I asked the Lord to bless you,
    As I prayed for you today.
??  To guide you and protect you,
    As you go along your way.
    His love is always with you,
    His promises are true,
    And when we give Him all our cares,
 ?? We know He'll see us through.
    So when the road you're traveling on
  ? Seems difficult at best,
    Just remember I'm here praying
    And God will do the rest.

 Forward this to at least 10 people whom you want God to bless and,
 don't forget to send it back to the one who asked God to bless you
 first.

Angela Barnett
07/19/2000 03:21 PM
Mary <mary@proclaimamerica.com> on 07/19/2000 12:47:36 PM
In the city of Chicago, one cold, dark night, a blizzard was setting in.
A
little boy was selling newspapers on the corner, the people were in and
out of
the cold. The little boy was so cold that he wasn't trying to sell many
papers. He walked up to a policeman and said,

"Mister, you wouldn't happen to know where a poor boy could find a warm
place to
sleep tonight would you?  You see, I sleep in a box up around the corner
there and down the alley and it's awful cold in there at night. Sure would be
nice to have a warm place to stay."

The policeman looked down at the little boy and said, "You go down the
street to that big white house and you knock on the door. When they come
out the door you just say John 3:16 and they will let you in."

So he did, he walked up the steps to the door, and knocked on the door
and a lady answered.  He looked up and said, "John 3:16."

The lady said "Come on in, Son." She took him in and she sat him down in
a split bottom rocker in front of a great big old fireplace and she went off.

He sat there for a while, and thought to himself "John 3:16....  I don't
understand it, but it sure makes a cold boy warm."

Later she came back and asked him "Are you hungry?" He said, "Well, just
a little. I haven't eaten in a couple of days and I guess I could stand a
little bit of food."

The lady took him in the kitchen and sat him down to a table full of
wonderful food. He ate and ate until he couldn't eat any more. Then he
thought to himself "John 3:16... Boy, I sure don't understand it, but it
sure makes a hungry boy full."

She took him upstairs to a bathroom to a huge bathtub filled with warm
water and he sat there and soaked for a while. As he soaked, he thought
to himself, "John 3:16... I sure don't understand it, but it sure makes a
dirty boy
clean. You know, I've not had a bath, a real bath, in my whole life.  The
only
bath I ever had was when I stood in front of that big old fire hydrant as
they flushed it out."

The lady came in and got him, and took him to a room and tucked him into
a big
old feather bed and pulled the covers up around his neck and kissed him
goodnight and turned out the lights. As he laid in the darkness and
looked out
the window at the snow coming down on that cold night he thought to
himself,
"John 3:16... I don't understand it, but it sure makes a tired boy rested."

The next morning she came back up and took him down again to that same
big table full of food. After he ate she took him back to that same big
old split bottom rocker in front of the fireplace and she took a big old
Bible and
sat down in front of him and she looked up at and she asked, "Do you
understand John 3:16?"

He said, "No, Ma'am, I don't. The first time I ever heard it was last
night when the policeman told me to use it."

She opened the Bible to John 3:16 , and she began to explain to him
about Jesus. Right there in front of that big old fireplace he gave his
heart
and life to Jesus. He sat there and thought, "John 3:16. I don't
understand it, but it but it sure makes a lost boy feel safe."

You know, I have to confess I don't understand it either, how God would
be willing to send His Son to die for me, and how Jesus would agree to do
such a
thing. I don't understand it either, but it sure does make life worth living..

Author Unknown

John 3:16
16.  For God so loved the world, that he gave his only begotten Son,
that whosoever believeth in him should not perish, but have everlasting
life..

17.  For God sent not his Son into the world to condemn the world; but
that the world through him might be saved.

18.  He that believeth on him is not condemned: but he that believeth
not is condemned already, because he hath not believed in the name of the
only
begotten Son of God.

Regina Blackshear@ENRON
07/13/2000 08:44 PM
this is very nice
-
>>Thought you'd like this...
>>
>>Edmund J. Petry
>> > Taste My Jesus!
>> > At the University of Chicago Divinity School each year they have what
>>is
>> > called "Baptist Day." On this day each one is to bring a lunch to be
>>eaten
>> > outdoors in a grassy picnic area.  Every "Baptist Day" the school would
>> > invite one of the greatest minds to lecture in the theological
>>education
>> > centre. One year they invited Dr. Paul Tillich. Dr.Tillich spoke for
>>two
>> > and
>> > one-half hours "proving" that the resurrection of Jesus was false. He
>> > quoted
>> > scholar after scholar and book after book.  He concluded that since
>>there
>> > was no such thing as the historical resurrection, the religious
>>tradition
>> > of
>> > the church was groundless, emotional mumbo-jumbo, because it was based
>>on
>> > a
>> > relationship with a risen Jesus, who, in fact, never rose from the dead
>>in
>> > any literal sense. He then asked if there were any questions. After
>>about
>> > 30
>> > seconds, an old, dark skinned preacher with a head of short-cropped,
>> > woolly
>> > white hair stood
>> > up in the back.
>> >
>> > "Doctah Tillich, I got one question," he said as all eyes turned toward
>> > him. He reached into his sack lunch and pulled out an apple and began
>> > eating
>> > it.
>> >
>> > "Doctah Tillich..." CRUNCH, MUNCH "My question is a simple
>>question,..."
>> > CRUNCH, MUNCH... "Now, I ain't never read them books you read..."
>>CRUNCH,
>> > MUNCH.. "and I  can't recite the Scriptures in the original Greek..."
>> > CRUNCH, MUNCH ... " I don't know nothin' about Niebuhr and
>>Heidegger..."
>> > CRUNCH, MUNCH... He finished the apple.
>> >
>> > "All I wanna know is: This apple I just ate,------was it bitter or
>>sweet?"
>> > Dr. Tillich paused for a moment and then answered in exemplary
>>scholarly
>> > fashion: "I cannot possibly answer that question, for I haven't tasted
>> > your
>> > apple." The white-haired preacher dropped the core of his apple into
>>his
>> > crumpled paper bag, looked up at Dr. Tillich and said calmly, "Neither
>> > have
>> > you tasted my Jesus."
>> >
>> > The 1,000 plus in attendance could not contain themselves. The crowd
>> > erupted
>> > with applause and cheers.  Dr. Tillich thanked his audience and
>>promptly
>> > left.
>> >
>> >
>> >
>>________________________________________________________________________
>> > Get Your Private, Free E-mail from MSN Hotmail at
>>http://www.hotmail.com
>>
>>
>>
>

Maria Sandoval
07/13/2000 01:50 PM

Sara Carrizal <scarrizal_99@yahoo.com> on 07/12/2000 02:39:26 PM

Note: forwarded message attached.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get Yahoo! Mail =01) Free email you can access from anywhere!
http://mail.yahoo.com/

 > Chicks rule!!!
 >
 > We got off the Titanic first.
 >
 > We can scare male bosses with mysterious gynecological disorder excuses.
 >
 > We've never lusted after a cartoon character or the central figure  in  =
a
 > computer game.
 >
 >  Taxis stop for us.
 >
 > We don't look like a frog in a blender when dancing.
 >
 > No fashion faux pas we make could ever rival The Speedo.
 >
 > We don't have to fart to amuse ourselves.
 >
 > If we forget to shave, no one has to know.
 >
 > We can congratulate our teammate without ever touching her butt.
 >
 > We never have to reach down every so often to make sure our privates are
 > still there.
 >
 > We have the ability to dress ourselves.
 >
 > We can talk to people of the opposite sex without having to picture  the=
m
 > naked.
 >
 > If we marry someone 20 years younger, we're aware that we look like an
 > idiot.
 >
 > There are times when chocolate really can solve all your problems.
 >
 > We'll never regret piercing our ears.
 >
 > We can fully assess a person just by looking at their shoes.............
 >
 >
 > Send this to five bright women you know and make their day!!!
 >
 >

******************************************************************
This email and any files transmitted with it from El Paso
Energy Corporation are confidential and intended solely
for the use of the individual or entity to whom they are
addressed. If you have received this email in error
please notify the sender.
******************************************************************

Daily-Blessings <dailyblessings.10@lists.postmastergeneral.com> on 11/19/2000 
10:47:06 PM
Daily-Blessing
http://www.daily-blessings.com/bless145.htm

Lord's prayer
http://www.daily-blessings.com/humor53.htm

check out thanksgiving pages...send them on to friends and family to let them 
know you are thankful for them!

http://www.debsfunpages.com/thanksgiving.htm

win a digital camera, $4500.00 or MORE
http://www.daily-blessings.com/4500.htm

FORGET PC PHONE. GET REAL LONG DISTANCE AT NO COST bigredwire is the first 
and only company to offer REAL long distance at no cost
Switch your long distance to bigredwire and get REAL long distance at zero 
cost to you. Up to 100 complimentary minutes everyday when you zap your 
online bill. If you don't zap, pay only 5 cents a minute without fees. Switch 
now!
find out how at http://www.daily-blessings.com/cjbigredwire.htm

Mr Inkman-for all your ink needs
http://www.daily-blessings.com/inkman.htm

<<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>>
* To remove yourself from this mailing list, point your browser to:
http://inbound.postmastergeneral.com/remove?dailyblessings:10
* Enter your email address (judy.hernandez@enron.com) in the field
provided and click "Unsubscribe". The mailing list ID is "dailyblessings:10".

OR...

* Reply to this message with the word "remove" in the subject line.

This message was sent to address judy.hernandez@enron.com
X-PMG-Recipient: judy.hernandez@enron.com
<<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>> <<<>>>

Maria Sandoval
07/13/2000 01:50 PM

Sara Carrizal <scarrizal_99@yahoo.com> on 07/12/2000 02:39:26 PM

Note: forwarded message attached.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get Yahoo! Mail =01) Free email you can access from anywhere!
http://mail.yahoo.com/

 > Chicks rule!!!
 >
 > We got off the Titanic first.
 >
 > We can scare male bosses with mysterious gynecological disorder excuses.
 >
 > We've never lusted after a cartoon character or the central figure  in  =
a
 > computer game.
 >
 >  Taxis stop for us.
 >
 > We don't look like a frog in a blender when dancing.
 >
 > No fashion faux pas we make could ever rival The Speedo.
 >
 > We don't have to fart to amuse ourselves.
 >
 > If we forget to shave, no one has to know.
 >
 > We can congratulate our teammate without ever touching her butt.
 >
 > We never have to reach down every so often to make sure our privates are
 > still there.
 >
 > We have the ability to dress ourselves.
 >
 > We can talk to people of the opposite sex without having to picture  the=
m
 > naked.
 >
 > If we marry someone 20 years younger, we're aware that we look like an
 > idiot.
 >
 > There are times when chocolate really can solve all your problems.
 >
 > We'll never regret piercing our ears.
 >
 > We can fully assess a person just by looking at their shoes.............
 >
 >
 > Send this to five bright women you know and make their day!!!
 >
 >

******************************************************************
This email and any files transmitted with it from El Paso
Energy Corporation are confidential and intended solely
for the use of the individual or entity to whom they are
